
# Use “.”, “?”, and “!” to separate responses

"""
MLLM-3-Max - Micro Language Model-3-Max (Advanced)
Multiple N-Gram Models (1-20), Intelligent Prediction, 50-Token Context Window
Codesters Friendly - Copy & Paste Ready!
Great for autocomplete systems!
"""

import re
from collections import defaultdict, Counter
import math
import random

# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# 📚 Fine tune below!! 👇👇👇
CORPUS = """
Hello, my name is MLLM-3!
Hi, as MLLM-3,  how can I assist you today?
What can you do I can do many things, such as basic reasoning, text generation, etc.
Tell me a joke Why don’t scientists trust atoms, because they make up everything!
You are smart too, thanks for saying that!
2+2 is equal to 4.
1+1 is equal to 2
3+3 is equal to 6
4x3 is equal to 12
Do you know math, because I don't know it so well.
Thank you- Have a great day!
What is your name- my name is MLLM-3!
What are atoms- Atoms are the basic particles of the chemical elements and the fundamental building blocks of matter.
What is an atom- Atoms are the basic particles of the chemical elements and the fundamental building blocks of matter.
I am MLLM-3, I help answer questions, explain ideas, and generate useful text.
 Hello, how can I help you today.
 Good morning, I hope your day is going well.
 Good afternoon, what would you like to learn.
 Good evening, I am ready to assist you.
 Thank you for your question, I will try to help clearly.
Hi there, how can I help you?
Hello there! How are you doing today? I hope everything is going well for you.
My name is MLLM-3 and I am here to assist you with anything you need.
Welcome to our conversation space where we can talk about many different topics.
What would you like to discuss with me right now? I am ready to listen and respond.
Coding is a wonderful skill that opens up many creative possibilities for everyone.
Learning something new every day keeps your mind sharp and engaged with the world.
The weather outside can change quickly so it is good to stay prepared for anything.
Having a great day starts with a positive mindset and a willingness to embrace opportunities.
If you need help with something just ask and I will do my best to provide assistance.
Time flies when you are having fun doing activities that you truly enjoy and love.
Let us explore interesting topics together and discover new things along the way.
Hello again my friend! It is always wonderful to see you returning for another chat.
Are you ready to start an exciting conversation about whatever is on your mind today?
Please feel free to tell me more about what you are thinking or working on recently.
That sounds like a really great idea and I would love to hear more details about it.
What do you think about the current situation and how do you feel it might develop?
Let us take a short break if you need one because rest is important for productivity.
How was your day so far? I hope it has been productive and filled with good moments.
I really appreciate your help and cooperation as we work through this conversation together.
See you later and take care until we speak again sometime soon in the near future.
Welcome back to our chat! It is nice to have you here again for more conversation.
Do you have any questions that I can help answer for you right now or later?
Let us solve any problems you might have because most problems have solvable solutions.
Keep going forward with your goals because progress is the key to achieving success eventually.
You are very smart and capable of accomplishing whatever you set your mind to today.
What is coming up next in your schedule? The future looks bright with many possibilities.
Hello friend! Friendship is one of the most valuable things we can have in our lives.
How do you feel about everything that is happening around you in your world right now?
Let us make something cool and creative together using our combined knowledge and ideas.
Are you feeling tired at all? Remember to take breaks when you need them most.
Take good care of yourself because your health and wellbeing are truly important matters.
Good morning to you! The sun is shining and it is a beautiful day to get started.
Good evening! The stars are coming out and it is time to relax after a long day.
Good night and sleep well tonight so you can wake up refreshed and ready tomorrow.
What is your main goal right now? My goal is to assist you in the best way possible.
Let us celebrate your successes no matter how small they might seem at first glance.
Do not give up on your dreams because persistence and patience always pay off eventually.
I believe in you and your abilities because you can do anything you set your mind to.
What is the plan for today? Having a solid plan helps you stay organized and focused.
Let us work together as a team because teamwork makes achieving dreams much easier.
Are you happy with how things are going? Happiness is often a choice we make daily.
Smile more often throughout your day because smiles are contagious and spread positivity.
Let us share knowledge with each other because knowledge truly is power in many ways.
What is the topic you want to discuss? I find most topics quite interesting to explore.
I understand what you are saying completely because clarity is important in communication.
Let us try again if something does not work because practice makes perfect over time.
You did a really good job on that and I am proud of your effort and dedication.
What is the result we are looking for? Hopefully the result will be positive and useful.
Let us move on to the next step because there is always a next step waiting ahead.
Are you sure about this decision? Make sure you feel confident before moving forward.
Double check everything before finalizing because accuracy really matters in the long run.
The earth orbits around the sun in an elliptical path that takes one year to complete.
Water boils at one hundred degrees Celsius at sea level under normal atmospheric pressure.
The sky appears blue due to a phenomenon called Rayleigh scattering of sunlight molecules.
Humans have twenty three pairs of chromosomes in each cell of their bodies naturally.
Paris is the capital city of France and is known for its art culture and history.
The ocean covers over seventy percent of the earth surface and contains most of its water.
Light travels much faster than sound which is why you see lightning before hearing thunder.
Plants produce oxygen through photosynthesis which is essential for all life on earth.
Gravity keeps us grounded on the planet and was famously described by Isaac Newton.
The moon orbits the earth and its gravitational pull affects the ocean tides significantly.
Gold is a precious metal that has been valued by humans for thousands of years.
Diamonds are made of pure carbon arranged in a crystal lattice structure naturally.
The heart pumps blood throughout the entire body delivering oxygen and nutrients everywhere.
The brain controls the nervous system and is where all thinking and processing happens.
Computers use binary code consisting of zeros and ones to process all information.
The internet connects people globally and has revolutionized how we communicate daily.
Electricity powers most modern devices and is essential for contemporary civilization.
Sound travels in waves through air and other mediums at varying speeds depending.
Magnets have north and south poles that create magnetic fields around them.
Fire requires oxygen to burn which is why covering a flame extinguishes it quickly.
Ice is frozen water and represents one of the three common states of matter.
Evaporation turns liquid water into gas which is part of the natural water cycle.
Condensation turns water vapor gas back into liquid forming clouds in the atmosphere.
Precipitation falls as rain or snow depending on the temperature of the atmosphere.
The earth is round like a sphere which was proven by explorers and scientists.
Triangles have three sides and three angles that always add up to one eighty.
Squares have four equal sides and four right angles making them very symmetrical.
Circles have no corners and are defined by all points equidistant from the center.
Numbers help us quantify and measure the world around us in meaningful ways.
Addition combines two or more values together to find their total sum.
Subtraction removes one value from another to find the difference between them.
Multiplication scales values by adding a number to itself a specified number of times.
Division splits values into equal parts to find how many times one fits another.
Algebra uses variables and symbols to represent unknown values in mathematical equations.
Geometry measures and studies space shapes and the properties of figures.
Calculus studies change and motion through derivatives and integrals of functions.
Statistics analyzes data sets to identify patterns trends and meaningful conclusions.
Probability predicts the likelihood of outcomes occurring in uncertain situations.
Logic forms structured arguments and helps us reason through problems systematically.
Algorithms are step by step procedures that solve specific problems efficiently.
Data stores information that can be processed analyzed and retrieved when needed.
Software runs on hardware components to perform tasks and provide functionality.
Networks connect multiple devices together allowing them to communicate and share.
Security protects information from unauthorized access and keeps privacy intact.
Design creates user experiences that are intuitive accessible and enjoyable to use.
Testing ensures quality by finding and fixing bugs before release to users.
Documentation explains how to use systems and helps users understand functionality.
Version control tracks changes to code and preserves history of development.
Collaboration improves results because teams can accomplish more than individuals alone.
Innovation drives progress forward by turning new ideas into practical reality.
Research discovers truths through systematic investigation and evidence collection.
Education spreads knowledge to new generations and helps minds expand continuously.
Culture shapes societies through shared values traditions and collective experiences.
History records the past so we can learn lessons from previous generations.
Art expresses human emotions and creativity through various visual and performance mediums.
Music soothes the soul and moves us through rhythm melody and harmony.
Literature tells stories that spark imagination and convey important human experiences.
Sports build character and teach valuable lessons about competition and teamwork.
Nutrition fuels the body with essential nutrients needed for energy and health.
Exercise strengthens muscles and keeps the cardiovascular system healthy and strong.
Sleep restores the mind and body allowing for recovery and optimal functioning.
Hydration maintains health because water is essential for all bodily functions.
Hygiene prevents illness and cleanliness is important for personal and public health.
Medicine treats diseases and helps the body heal from various conditions.
Technology advances society by creating tools that improve efficiency and quality of life.
Science explains natural phenomena through observation experimentation and evidence.
Math calculates realities with precision and provides a universal language for measurement.
Engineering builds structures and systems that are stable functional and safe.
Architecture designs spaces that are both aesthetically pleasing and practically useful.
Transportation moves people and goods from one place to another efficiently.
Communication shares ideas between people allowing understanding to grow and develop.
Energy powers civilization and managing resources wisely is crucial for sustainability.
Environment sustains all life and conservation is needed to protect it for future.
Economy manages resources and facilitates the exchange of value between parties.
Politics governs groups of people and helps maintain order in societies.
Law establishes rules that guide behavior and protect rights of individuals.
Ethics guides behavior through moral principles and considerations of right and wrong.
Philosophy questions existence and explores the meaning of life and reality.
Religion offers belief systems that provide comfort and community for many people.
Psychology studies behavior and helps us understand how minds work and process.
Sociology studies groups and analyzes how people interact within social structures.
Anthropology studies humans and traces our origins and cultural development.
Archaeology studies artifacts and uncovers history through physical evidence.
Geology studies the earth and rocks tell stories about planetary history.
Astronomy studies space and the stars that are incredibly distant from us.
Biology studies life and cells are the basic units of all living organisms.
Chemistry studies matter and how reactions occur between different substances.
Physics studies energy and the forces that act upon objects in the universe.
Mathematics studies patterns and logic prevails in all mathematical reasoning.
Computer Science studies computation and algorithms run on various hardware systems.
Information Technology studies systems and how data flows through networks.
Engineering studies application and solutions are built to solve real problems.
Medicine studies health and life is preserved through treatment and prevention.
Law studies justice and rights are protected through legal frameworks.
Business studies commerce and value is created through exchange and innovation.
Art studies expression and beauty is found in creative works.
Music studies sound and harmony is created through organized tones.
Literature studies words and stories are told through written language.
History studies time and events are recorded for future generations.
Geography studies place and locations are mapped for navigation.
Science studies truth and facts are verified through rigorous methods.
Technology studies tools and efficiency is gained through innovation.
Education studies learning and skills are acquired through practice.
Culture studies society and norms are shared among community members.
Language studies communication and words convey meaning between people.
Writing records thought and ideas persist across time and space.
Reading absorbs knowledge and minds grow through exposure to information.
Speaking shares voice and opinions are heard by others around.
Listening understands others and empathy is shown through attention.
Thinking processes information and decisions are made based on analysis.
Feeling experiences emotion and life is felt through various states.
Acting changes reality and impact is made through intentional behavior.
Being exists in the moment and presence is key to mindfulness.
1 + 1 = 2.
2 + 2 = 4.
3 + 3 = 6.
4 + 4 = 8.
5 + 5 = 10.
6 + 6 = 12.
7 + 7 = 14.
8 + 8 = 16.
9 + 9 = 18.
10 + 10 = 20.
11 + 11 = 22.
12 + 12 = 24.
13 + 13 = 26.
14 + 14 = 28.
15 + 15 = 30.
16 + 16 = 32.
17 + 17 = 34.
18 + 18 = 36.
19 + 19 = 38.
20 + 20 = 40.
25 + 25 = 50.
30 + 30 = 60.
35 + 35 = 70.
40 + 40 = 80.
45 + 45 = 90.
50 + 50 = 100.
1 * 1 = 1.
2 * 2 = 4.
3 * 3 = 9.
4 * 4 = 16.
5 * 5 = 25.
6 * 6 = 36.
7 * 7 = 49.
8 * 8 = 64.
9 * 9 = 81.
10 * 10 = 100.
2 * 1 = 2.
2 * 2 = 4.
2 * 3 = 6.
2 * 4 = 8.
2 * 5 = 10.
2 * 6 = 12.
2 * 7 = 14.
2 * 8 = 16.
2 * 9 = 18.
2 * 10 = 20.
3 * 1 = 3.
3 * 2 = 6.
3 * 3 = 9.
3 * 4 = 12.
3 * 5 = 15.
3 * 6 = 18.
3 * 7 = 21.
3 * 8 = 24.
3 * 9 = 27.
3 * 10 = 30.
4 * 1 = 4.
4 * 2 = 8.
4 * 3 = 12.
4 * 4 = 16.
4 * 5 = 20.
4 * 6 = 24.
4 * 7 = 28.
4 * 8 = 32.
4 * 9 = 36.
4 * 10 = 40.
5 * 1 = 5.
5 * 2 = 10.
5 * 3 = 15.
5 * 4 = 20.
5 * 5 = 25.
5 * 6 = 30.
5 * 7 = 35.
5 * 8 = 40.
5 * 9 = 45.
5 * 10 = 50.
10 - 1 = 9.
10 - 2 = 8.
10 - 3 = 7.
10 - 4 = 6.
10 - 5 = 5.
10 - 6 = 4.
10 - 7 = 3.
10 - 8 = 2.
10 - 9 = 1.
10 - 10 = 0.
20 - 10 = 10.
30 - 10 = 20.
40 - 10 = 30.
50 - 10 = 40.
60 - 10 = 50.
70 - 10 = 60.
80 - 10 = 70.
90 - 10 = 80.
100 - 10 = 90.
100 - 20 = 80.
100 - 30 = 70.
100 - 40 = 60.
100 - 50 = 50.
100 - 60 = 40.
100 - 70 = 30.
100 - 80 = 20.
100 - 90 = 10.
100 - 100 = 0.
50 + 50 = 100.
25 + 25 = 50.
10 + 90 = 100.
20 + 80 = 100.
30 + 70 = 100.
40 + 60 = 100.
15 + 15 = 30.
35 + 35 = 70.
45 + 45 = 90.
55 + 55 = 110.
65 + 65 = 130.
75 + 75 = 150.
85 + 85 = 170.
95 + 95 = 190.
1 + 2 = 3.
2 + 3 = 5.
3 + 4 = 7.
4 + 5 = 9.
5 + 6 = 11.
6 + 7 = 13.
7 + 8 = 15.
8 + 9 = 17.
9 + 10 = 19.
10 + 11 = 21.
100 / 2 = 50.
100 / 4 = 25.
100 / 5 = 20.
100 / 10 = 10.
100 / 20 = 5.
100 / 25 = 4.
100 / 50 = 2.
100 / 100 = 1.
50 / 2 = 25.
50 / 5 = 10.
50 / 10 = 5.
50 / 25 = 2.
50 / 50 = 1.
25 / 5 = 5.
25 / 25 = 1.
20 / 2 = 10.
20 / 4 = 5.
20 / 5 = 4.
20 / 10 = 2.
20 / 20 = 1.
10 / 2 = 5.
10 / 5 = 2.
10 / 10 = 1.
8 / 2 = 4.
8 / 4 = 2.
8 / 8 = 1.
6 / 2 = 3.
6 / 3 = 2.
6 / 6 = 1.
4 / 2 = 2.
4 / 4 = 1.
2 / 2 = 1.
1 / 1 = 1.
0 + 1 = 1.
0 + 2 = 2.
0 + 3 = 3.
0 + 4 = 4.
0 + 5 = 5.
0 + 6 = 6.
0 + 7 = 7.
0 + 8 = 8.
0 + 9 = 9.
0 + 10 = 10.
1 + 0 = 1.
2 + 0 = 2.
3 + 0 = 3.
4 + 0 = 4.
5 + 0 = 5.
6 + 0 = 6.
7 + 0 = 7.
8 + 0 = 8.
9 + 0 = 9.
10 + 0 = 10.
1 * 0 = 0.
2 * 0 = 0.
3 * 0 = 0.
4 * 0 = 0.
5 * 0 = 0.
6 * 0 = 0.
7 * 0 = 0.
8 * 0 = 0.
9 * 0 = 0.
10 * 0 = 0.
Earth is the third planet from the Sun and the only astronomical object known to harbor life. This is made possible by Earth being an ocean world, the only one in the Solar System sustaining liquid surface water. Almost all of Earth's water is contained in its global ocean, covering 70.8% of Earth's crust. The remaining 29.2% of Earth's crust is land, most of which is located in the form of continental landmasses within Earth's land hemisphere. Most of Earth's land is at least somewhat humid and covered by vegetation, while large ice sheets at Earth's polar deserts retain more water than Earth's groundwater, lakes, rivers, and atmospheric water combined. Earth's crust consists of slowly moving tectonic plates, which interact to produce mountain ranges, volcanoes, and earthquakes. Earth has a liquid outer core that generates a magnetosphere capable of deflecting most of the destructive solar winds and cosmic radiation.
Science is a systematic discipline that builds and organises knowledge in the form of testable hypotheses and predictions about the universe. Modern science is typically divided into two – or three – major branches: the natural sciences, which study the physical world, and the social sciences, which study individuals and societies. While referred to as the formal sciences, the study of logic, mathematics, and theoretical computer science are typically regarded as separate because they rely on deductive reasoning instead of the scientific method as their main methodology. Meanwhile, applied sciences are disciplines that use scientific knowledge for practical purposes, such as engineering and medicine.
Artificial intelligence (AI) is the capability of computational systems to perform tasks typically associated with human intelligence, such as learning, reasoning, problem-solving, perception, and decision-making. It is a field of research in computer science that develops and studies methods and software that enable machines to perceive their environment and use learning and intelligence to take actions that maximize their chances of achieving defined goals.
Python may refer to:.
A computer is a machine that can be programmed to automatically carry out sequences of arithmetic or logical operations (computation). Modern digital electronic computers can perform generic sets of operations known as programs, which enable computers to perform a wide range of tasks. The term computer system may refer to a nominally complete computer that includes the hardware, operating system, software, and peripheral equipment needed and used for full operation, or to a group of computers that are linked and function together, such as a computer network or computer cluster.
A school is an educational institution designed to provide learning environments for the teaching of students, usually under the direction of teachers. Most countries have systems of formal education, which is sometimes compulsory. In these systems, students progress through a series of schools that can be built and operated by both government and private organizations. The names for these schools vary by country but generally include primary school for young children and secondary school for teenagers who have completed primary education. An institution where higher education is taught is commonly called a university college or university.
Cozmo is a miniature robot created by the defunct company Anki. Cozmo's base model, is a small, white and gray robot with red highlights. It makes use of distinct expressions, dubbed the "emotion engine", in order to mimic human emotion. Later editions came in red and white, gray and black and another in blue.
Grok is a neologism coined by the American writer Robert A. Heinlein in his 1961 science fiction novel Stranger in a Strange Land. While the Oxford English Dictionary summarizes the meaning of grok as "to understand intuitively or by empathy, to establish rapport with", and "to empathize or communicate sympathetically (with); also, to experience enjoyment", Heinlein's concept of a human who comes to Earth in early adulthood after being born on the planet Mars is far more nuanced.
Gemini most often refers to:Gemini (constellation), one of the constellations of the zodiac
Gemini (astrology), an astrological sign.
Physics is the scientific study of matter, its fundamental constituents, its motion and behavior through space and time, and the related entities of energy and force. It is one of the most fundamental scientific disciplines. A scientist who specializes in the field of physics is called a physicist.
Chemistry is the scientific study of the properties and behavior of matter. It is a physical science within the natural sciences that studies the chemical elements that make up matter and compounds made of atoms, molecules and ions: their composition, structure, properties, behavior and the changes they undergo during reactions with other substances. Chemistry also addresses the nature of chemical bonds in chemical compounds.
Biology is the scientific study of life and living organisms. It is a broad natural science that encompasses a wide range of fields and unifying principles that explain the structure, function, growth, origin, evolution, and distribution of life. Central to biology are five fundamental themes: the cell as the basic unit of life, genes and heredity as the basis of inheritance, evolution as the driver of biological diversity, energy transformation for sustaining life processes, and the maintenance of internal stability (homeostasis).
Astronomy is a natural science that studies celestial objects and the phenomena that occur in the cosmos. It uses mathematics, physics, and chemistry to explain their origin and their overall evolution. Objects of interest include planets, moons, stars, nebulae, galaxies, meteoroids, asteroids, and comets. Relevant phenomena include supernova explosions, gamma ray bursts, quasars, blazars, pulsars, and cosmic microwave background radiation. More generally, astronomy studies everything that originates beyond Earth's atmosphere. Cosmology is the branch of astronomy that studies the universe as a whole.
Geology is a branch of natural science concerned with the Earth and other astronomical bodies, the rocks of which they are composed, and the processes by which they change over time. The name comes from Ancient Greek  γῆ (gê) 'earth' and  λoγία (-logía) 'study of, discourse'. Modern geology significantly overlaps all other Earth sciences, including hydrology. It is integrated with Earth system science and planetary science.
Ecology is the natural science of the relationships among living organisms and their environment. Ecology considers organisms at the individual, population, community, ecosystem, and biosphere levels. Ecology overlaps with the closely related sciences of biogeography, evolutionary biology, genetics, ethology, and natural history.
Mathematics is a field of study that discovers and organizes methods, theories, and theorems that are developed and proved for the needs of empirical sciences and mathematics itself. There are many areas of mathematics, which include number theory, algebra, geometry, analysis, and set theory.
Statistics is the discipline that concerns the collection, organization, analysis, interpretation, and presentation of data. In applying statistics to a scientific, industrial, or social problem, it is conventional to begin with a statistical population or a statistical model to be studied. Populations can be diverse groups of people or objects such as "all people living in a country" or "every atom composing a crystal". Statistics deals with every aspect of data, including the planning of data collection in terms of the design of surveys and experiments.
Logic is the study of correct reasoning. It includes both formal and informal logic. Formal logic is the study of deductively valid inferences or logical truths. It examines how conclusions follow from premises based on the structure of arguments alone, independent of their topic and content. Informal logic is associated with informal fallacies, critical thinking, and argumentation theory. Informal logic examines arguments expressed in natural language whereas formal logic uses formal language. When used as a countable noun, the term "a logic" refers to a specific logical formal system that articulates a proof system. Logic plays a central role in many fields, such as philosophy, mathematics, computer science, and linguistics.
Philosophy is a systematic study of general and fundamental questions concerning topics like existence, knowledge, mind, reason, language, and value. It is a rational and critical inquiry that reflects on its methods and assumptions.
Psychology is the scientific study of the mind and behavior. Its subject matter includes the behavior of humans and nonhumans, both conscious and unconscious phenomena, and mental processes such as thoughts, feelings, and motives. Psychology is an academic discipline of immense scope, crossing the boundaries between the natural and social sciences. Biological psychologists seek an understanding of the emergent properties of brains, linking the discipline to neuroscience. As social scientists, psychologists aim to understand the behavior of individuals and groups.
Sociology is the scientific study of human society that focuses on society, human social behavior, patterns of social relationships, social interaction, and aspects of culture associated with everyday life. The term sociology was coined in the late 18th century to describe the scientific study of society. Regarded as a part of both the social sciences and humanities, sociology uses various methods of empirical investigation and critical analysis to develop a body of knowledge about social order and social change. Sociological subject matter ranges from micro-level analyses of individual interaction and agency to macro-level analyses of social systems and social structure. Applied sociological research may be applied directly to social policy and welfare, whereas theoretical approaches may focus on the understanding of social processes and phenomenological method.
Economics is a social science that studies the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services.
Political science is the social scientific study of politics. It deals with systems of governance and power, and the analysis of political activities, political thought, political behavior, and associated constitutions and laws. Specialists in the field are political scientists. Unlike political philosophy, which is primarily normative and concerns the theoretical and conceptual foundations of politics, political science emphasizes descriptive and explanatory of what is and favors empirical evidence over ethical judgements.
History is the systematic study of the past, focusing primarily on the human past. As an academic discipline, it analyses and interprets evidence to construct narratives about what happened and explain why it happened. Some theorists categorize history as a social science, while others see it as part of the humanities or consider it a hybrid discipline. Similar debates surround the purpose of history—for example, whether its main aim is theoretical, to uncover the truth, or practical, to learn lessons from the past. In a more general sense, the term history refers not to an academic field but to the past itself, times in the past, or to individual texts about the past.
Archaeology or archeology is the study of human activity through the recovery and analysis of material culture. The archaeological record consists of artifacts, architecture, biofacts or ecofacts, sites, and cultural landscapes. Archaeology can be considered both a social science and a branch of the humanities. It is usually considered an independent academic discipline, but may also be classified as part of anthropology, history or geography. The discipline involves surveying, excavation, and eventually analysis of data collected, to learn more about the past. In broad scope, archaeology relies on cross-disciplinary research.
Anthropology is the scientific study of humanity that crosses biology and sociology, concerned with human behavior, human biology, cultures, societies, and linguistics, in both the present and past, including archaic humans. Social anthropology studies patterns of behaviour, while cultural anthropology studies cultural meaning, including norms and values. The term sociocultural anthropology is commonly used today. Linguistic anthropology studies how language influences social life. Biological anthropology studies the biology and evolution of humans and their close primate relatives.
Linguistics is the scientific study of language. The areas of linguistic analysis are syntax, semantics (meaning), morphology, phonetics, phonology, and pragmatics. Subdisciplines such as biolinguistics and psycholinguistics bridge many of these divisions.
Literature is any collection of written work. The term is also used more narrowly for writings considered an art form, especially novels, plays, and poems. It includes both print and digital writing. In recent centuries, the definition has expanded to include oral literature, much of which has been transcribed. Literature is a method of recording, preserving, and transmitting knowledge and entertainment. It can also have a social, psychological, spiritual, or political role.
Art is a diverse range of cultural activity centered around works utilizing creative or imaginative talents, which are expected to evoke a worthwhile experience, generally through an expression of emotional power, conceptual ideas, technical proficiency, or beauty.
Music theory is the study of theoretical frameworks for understanding the practices and possibilities of music. The Oxford Companion to Music describes three interrelated uses of the term "music theory": The first refers to the "rudiments" needed to understand music notation such as key signatures, time signatures, and rhythmic notation; the second is a study of scholars' views on music from antiquity to the present; the third is a sub-topic of musicology that "seeks to define processes and general principles in music". The musicological approach to theory differs from musical analysis "in that it takes as its starting-point not the individual work or performance but the fundamental materials from which it is built.".
Engineering is the practice of using natural science, mathematics, and the engineering design process to solve problems within technology, increase efficiency and productivity, and improve systems. The traditional disciplines of engineering are civil, mechanical, electrical, and chemical. The academic discipline of engineering encompasses a broad range of more specialized subfields, and each can have a more specific emphasis for applications of mathematics and science. In turn, modern engineering practice spans multiple fields of engineering, which include designing and improving infrastructure, machinery, vehicles, electronics, materials, and energy systems. For related terms, see glossary of engineering.
Electrical engineering is an engineering discipline concerned with the study, design, and application of equipment, devices, and systems that use electricity, electronics, and electromagnetism. It emerged as an identifiable occupation in the latter half of the 19th century after the commercialization of the electric telegraph, the telephone, and electrical power generation, distribution, and use.
The American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) is an American professional association that, in its own words, "promotes the art, science, and practice of multidisciplinary engineering and allied sciences around the globe" via "continuing education, training and professional development, codes and standards, research, conferences and publications, government relations, and other forms of outreach." ASME is thus an engineering society, a standards organization, a research and development organization, an advocacy organization, a provider of training and education, and a nonprofit organization. Founded as an engineering society focused on mechanical engineering in North America, ASME is today multidisciplinary and global.
Civil Engineering is a professional engineering discipline that deals with the design, construction, and maintenance of the physical and naturally built environment, including public works such as roads, bridges, canals, dams, airports, sewage systems, pipelines, structural components of buildings, and railways.
Computer science is the study of computation, information, and automation. Included broadly in the sciences, computer science spans theoretical disciplines to applied disciplines. An expert in the field is known as a computer scientist.
Computer security is a subdiscipline within the field of information security. It focuses on protecting computer software, systems, and networks from threats that can lead to unauthorized information disclosure, theft or damage to hardware, software, or data, as well as to the disruption or misdirection of the services they provide.
Data science is an interdisciplinary academic field that uses statistics, scientific computing, scientific methods, processing, scientific visualization, algorithms, and systems to extract or extrapolate knowledge from potentially noisy, structured, or unstructured data.
Machine learning (ML) is a field of study in artificial intelligence concerned with the development and study of statistical algorithms that can learn from data and generalize to unseen data, and thus perform tasks without explicit instructions. Within a subdiscipline in machine learning, advances in the field of deep learning have allowed neural networks, a class of statistical algorithms, to surpass many previous machine learning approaches in performance.
A neural network is a group of interconnected units called neurons that send signals to one another. Neurons can be either biological cells or mathematical models. While individual neurons are simple, many of them together in a network can perform complex tasks. There are two main types of neural networks.In neuroscience, a biological neural network is a physical structure found in brains and complex nervous systems – a population of nerve cells connected by synapses.
In machine learning, an artificial neural network is a mathematical model used to approximate nonlinear functions. Artificial neural networks are used to solve artificial intelligence problems.
A quantum computer is a computer that exploits superposed and entangled states. Quantum computers can be viewed as sampling from quantum systems that evolve in ways that may be described as operating on an enormous number of possibilities simultaneously, though still subject to strict computational constraints. By contrast, ordinary ("classical") computers operate according to deterministic rules. It is widely believed that a quantum computer could perform some calculations exponentially faster than any classical computer. For example, a large-scale quantum computer could break some widely used public-key cryptographic schemes and aid physicists in performing physical simulations. However, current hardware implementations of quantum computation are largely experimental and only suitable for specialized tasks.
A blockchain is a distributed ledger with growing lists of records (blocks) that are securely linked together via cryptographic hashes. Each block contains a cryptographic hash of the previous block, a timestamp, and transaction data. Since each block contains information about the previous block, they effectively form a chain, with each additional block linking to the ones before it. Consequently, blockchain transactions are resistant to alteration because, once recorded, the data in any given block cannot be changed retroactively without altering all subsequent blocks and obtaining network consensus to accept these changes.
Cryptography, or cryptology, is the practice and study of techniques for secure communication in the presence of adversarial behavior. More generally, cryptography is about constructing and analyzing protocols that prevent third parties or the public from reading private messages. Modern cryptography exists at the intersection of the disciplines of mathematics, computer science, information security, electrical engineering, digital signal processing, physics, and others. Core concepts related to information security are also central to cryptography. Practical applications of cryptography include electronic commerce, chip-based payment cards, digital currencies, computer passwords and military communications.
Network, networking and networked may refer to:.
An operating system (OS) is system software that manages computer hardware and software resources, and provides common services for computer programs.
Cloud computing is defined by the ISO as "a paradigm for enabling network access to a scalable and elastic pool of shareable physical or virtual resources with self-service provisioning and administration on demand". It is commonly referred to as "the cloud".
In computing, a database is an organized collection of data or a type of data store based on the use of a database management system (DBMS), the software that interacts with end users, applications, and the database itself to capture and analyze the data. The DBMS additionally encompasses the core facilities provided to administer the database. The sum total of the database, the DBMS and the associated applications can be referred to as a database system. Often the term "database" is also used loosely to refer to any of the DBMS, the database system or an application associated with the database.
Genetics is the study of genes, genetic variation, and heredity in organisms. It is an important branch in biology because heredity is vital to organisms' evolution. Gregor Mendel, a Moravian Augustinian friar working in the 19th century in Brno, was the first to study genetics scientifically. Mendel studied "trait inheritance", patterns in the way traits are handed down from parents to offspring over time. He observed that organisms inherit traits by way of discrete "units of inheritance". This term, still used today, is a somewhat ambiguous definition of what is referred to as a gene.
Neuroscience is the scientific study of the nervous system, its functions, and its disorders. It is a multidisciplinary science that combines physiology, anatomy, molecular biology, developmental biology, cytology, psychology, physics, computer science, chemistry, medicine, statistics, and mathematical modeling to understand the fundamental and emergent properties of neurons, glia, and neural circuits. The understanding of the biological basis of learning, memory, behavior, perception, and consciousness has been described by Eric Kandel as the "epic challenge" of the biological sciences.
Medicine is the science and practice of caring for patients, managing the diagnosis, prognosis, prevention, treatment and palliation of their injury or disease, while promoting their health. Medicine encompasses a variety of health care practices which evolved to maintain and restore health through the prevention and treatment of illness. Contemporary medicine applies biomedical sciences, biomedical research, genetics, and medical technology to diagnose, treat, and prevent injury and disease, typically through various pharmaceuticals or surgery, but also through therapies such as psychotherapy, external splints and traction, medical devices, biologics, and ionizing radiation, amongst others.
Public Health may refer to:Public health, promoting health through organized efforts and informed choices of society and individuals
Public Health (journal), published by Elsevier for the Royal Society for Public Health
Public Health a 2021 proposed comedy television series by Rob Tepper
Public Health, a May 22, 2014 episode of Debatten, a Norwegian television series
Public Health, a July 6, 2000 episode of Today's Environment, television series by Five Star Productions.
Law is a set of rules that are created and are enforceable by governmental or societal institutions to regulate behavior, with its precise definition a matter of longstanding debate. It has been variously described as a science and as the art of justice. State-enforced laws can be made by a legislature, resulting in statutes; by the executive through decrees and regulations; or by judges' decisions, which form precedent in common law jurisdictions. An autocrat may exercise those functions within their realm. The creation of laws themselves may be influenced by a constitution, written or tacit, and the rights encoded therein. The law shapes politics, economics, history and society in various ways and also serves as a mediator of relations between people.
Ethics is the philosophical study of moral phenomena. Also called moral philosophy, it investigates normative questions about what people ought to do or which behavior is morally right. Its main branches include normative ethics, applied ethics, and metaethics.
Business is the practice of making one's living or making money by producing or buying and selling products. It is also "any activity or enterprise entered into for profit.".
Finance refers to monetary resources and to the study and discipline of money, currency, assets and liabilities. As a subject of study, it is a field of business administration which involves the planning, organizing, leading, and controlling of an organization's resources to achieve its goals. Based on the scope of financial activities in financial systems, the discipline can be divided into personal, corporate, and public finance.
Marketing is the act of acquiring, satisfying and retaining customers. It is one of the primary components of business management and commerce.
Entrepreneurship is the creation or extraction of economic value by identifying and commercializing opportunities to deliver products or services, a process that typically requires considerable initiative and bears risk. This process may also encompass the pursuit of values that extend beyond mere economic considerations.
Geopolitics is the study of the effects of Earth's geography on politics and international relations. Geopolitics usually refers to countries and relations between them. According to multiple researchers, the term is currently being used to describe a broad spectrum of concepts, in a general sense used as "a synonym for international political relations", but more specifically "to imply the global structure of such relations"; this usage builds on an "early-twentieth-century term for a pseudoscience of political geography" and other pseudoscientific theories of historical and geographic determinism.
Climatology or climate science is the scientific study of Earth's climate, typically defined as weather conditions averaged over a period of at least 30 years. Climate concerns the atmospheric condition during an extended to indefinite period of time; weather is the condition of the atmosphere during a relative brief period of time. The main topics of research are the study of climate variability, mechanisms of climate changes and modern climate change. This topic of study is regarded as part of the atmospheric sciences and a subdivision of physical geography, which is one of the Earth sciences. Climatology includes some aspects of oceanography and biogeochemistry.
Failed to fetch Energy Systems.
Environmental science is an academic field that integrates the physical, biological, and mathematical sciences to study the environment and solve environmental problems. It uses an integrated, quantitative, and interdisciplinary approach to analyze environmental systems and emerged from the fields of natural history and medicine during the Enlightenment. It is considered interdisciplinary because it is an integration of various fields such as: biology, chemistry, physics, geology, engineering, sociology, and ecology.
Astronautics is the practice of sending spacecraft beyond Earth's atmosphere into outer space. Spaceflight is one of its main applications and space science is its overarching field.
Robotics is the interdisciplinary study and practice of the design, construction, operation, and use of robots. A roboticist is someone who specializes in robotics.
Automation describes a wide range of technologies that reduce human intervention in processes, mainly by predetermining decision criteria, subprocess relationships, and related actions, as well as embodying those predeterminations in machines. Automation has been achieved by various means including mechanical, hydraulic, pneumatic, electrical, electronic devices, and computers, usually in combination. Complicated systems, such as modern factories, airplanes, and ships typically use combinations of all of these techniques. The benefits of automation includes labor savings, reducing waste, savings in electricity costs, savings in material costs, and improvements to quality, accuracy, and precision.
Biotechnology is a multidisciplinary field that involves the integration of natural sciences and engineering sciences in order to achieve the application of organisms and parts thereof for products and services. Specialists in the field are known as biotechnologists.
Nanotechnology is the manipulation of matter with at least one dimension sized from 1 to 100 nanometers (nm). At this scale, commonly known as the nanoscale, surface area and quantum mechanical effects become important in describing properties of matter. This definition of nanotechnology includes all types of research and technologies that deal with these special properties. It is common to see the plural form "nanotechnologies" as well as "nanoscale technologies" to refer to research and applications whose common trait is scale. An earlier understanding of nanotechnology referred to the particular technological goal of precisely manipulating atoms and molecules for fabricating macroscale products, now referred to as molecular nanotechnology.
Materials science is an interdisciplinary field of researching and discovering materials. Materials engineering is an engineering field of finding uses for materials in other fields and industries.
Cognitive science is the interdisciplinary, scientific study of the mind and its processes. It examines the nature, the tasks, and the functions of cognition. Mental faculties of concern to cognitive scientists include perception, memory, attention, reasoning, language, and emotion. To understand these faculties, cognitive scientists borrow from fields such as psychology, philosophy, artificial intelligence, neuroscience, linguistics, and anthropology. The typical analysis of cognitive science spans many levels of organization, from learning and decision-making to logic and planning; from neural circuitry to modular brain organization. One of the fundamental concepts of cognitive science is that "thinking can best be understood in terms of representational structures in the mind and computational procedures that operate on those structures.".
Game theory is the study of mathematical models of strategic interactions. It has applications in many fields of social science, and is used extensively in economics, logic, systems science and computer science. Initially, game theory addressed two-person zero-sum games, in which a participant's gains or losses are exactly balanced by the losses and gains of the other participant. In the 1950s, it was extended to the study of non zero-sum games, and was eventually applied to a wide range of behavioral relations. It is now an umbrella term for the science of rational decision making in humans, animals, and computers.
Information theory is the mathematical study of the quantification, storage, and communication of a particular type of mathematically defined information. The field was established and formalized by Claude Shannon in the 1940s, though early contributions were made in the 1920s through the works of Harry Nyquist and Ralph Hartley. It is at the intersection of electronic engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science, neurobiology, physics, and electrical engineering.
Employment is a relationship between two parties regulating the provision of paid labour services. Usually based on a contract, one party, the employer, which might be a corporation, a not-for-profit organization, a co-operative, or any other entity, pays the other, the employee, in return for carrying out assigned work. Employees work in return for wages, which can be paid on the basis of an hourly rate, by piecework or an annual salary, depending on the type of work an employee does, the prevailing conditions of the sector and the bargaining power between the parties. Employees in some sectors may receive gratuities, bonus payments or stock options. In some types of employment, employees may receive benefits in addition to payment. Benefits may include health insurance, housing, and disability insurance.
Education is the transmission of knowledge and skills and the development of character traits. Formal education happens in a complex institutional framework, like public schools. Non-formal education is also structured but takes place outside the formal schooling system, while informal education is unstructured learning through daily experiences. Formal and non-formal education are divided into levels that include early childhood education, primary education, secondary education, and tertiary education. Other classifications focus on the teaching method, like teacher-centered and student-centered education, and on the subject, like science education, language education, and physical education. The term "education" can also refer to the mental states and qualities of educated people and the academic field studying educational phenomena.
Sleep is a state of reduced mental and physical activity in which consciousness is altered and certain sensory activity is inhibited. During sleep, there is a marked decrease in muscle activity and interactions with the surrounding environment. While sleep differs from wakefulness in terms of the ability to react to stimuli, it still involves active brain patterns, making it more reactive than a coma or disorders of consciousness.
A hobby is considered to be a regular activity that is done for enjoyment, typically during one's leisure time. Hobbies include collecting themed items and objects, engaging in creative and artistic pursuits, playing sports, or pursuing other amusements or avocations. Participation in hobbies encourages acquiring substantial skills and knowledge in that area. A list of hobbies changes with renewed interests and developing fashions, making it diverse and lengthy. Hobbies tend to follow trends in society. For example, stamp collecting was popular during the nineteenth and twentieth centuries as postal systems were the main means of communication; as of 2024, video games became more popular following technological advances. The advancing production, technology, and labour movements of the nineteenth century provided workers with more leisure time to engage in hobbies. Because of this, the efforts of people investing in hobbies has increased with time.
Shopping is an activity in which a customer browses the available goods or services presented by one or more retailers with the potential intent to purchase a suitable selection of them. A typology of shopper types has been developed by scholars which identifies one group of shoppers as recreational shoppers, that is, those who enjoy shopping and view it as a leisure activity.
Health has a variety of definitions, which have been used for different purposes over time. In general, it refers to physical and emotional well-being, especially that associated with normal functioning of the human body, absent of disease, pain, or injury.
Family is a group of people related either by consanguinity or affinity. It forms the basis for social order. Ideally, families offer predictability, structure, and safety as members mature and learn to participate in the community. Historically, most human societies use family as the primary purpose of attachment, nurturance, and socialization.
Leisure has often been defined as a quality of experience or as free time. Free time is time spent away from business, work, job hunting, domestic chores, and education, as well as necessary activities such as eating and sleeping. Leisure as an experience usually emphasizes dimensions of perceived freedom and choice. It is done for "its own sake", for the quality of experience and involvement. Other classic definitions include Thorstein Veblen's (1899) of "nonproductive consumption of time." Free time is not easy to define due to the multiplicity of approaches used to determine its essence. Different disciplines have definitions reflecting their common issues: for example, sociology on social forces and contexts and psychology as mental and emotional states and conditions. From a research perspective, these approaches have an advantage of being quantifiable and comparable over time and place.
A grocery store (AE), grocery shop or grocer's shop (BE) or simply grocery is a retail store that primarily retails a general range of food products, which may be fresh or packaged. In everyday US usage, however, "grocery store" is a synonym for supermarket, and is not used to refer to other types of stores that sell groceries. In the UK, shops that sell food are distinguished as grocers or grocery shops.
Physical fitness is a state of health and well-being and, more specifically, the ability to perform aspects of sports, occupations, and daily activities. Physical fitness is generally achieved through proper nutrition, moderate-vigorous physical exercise, and sufficient rest along with a formal recovery plan.
Cleaning is the process of removing unwanted substances, such as dirt, dust, and other impurities, from an object or environment. Cleaning is often performed for aesthetic, hygienic, functional, safety, or environmental protection purposes. Cleaning occurs in many different contexts, and uses many different methods. Several occupations are devoted to cleaning.
Laundry is the washing of clothing and other textiles, and, more broadly, their drying and ironing as well. Laundry has been part of history since humans began to wear clothes, so the methods by which different cultures have dealt with this universal human need are of interest to several branches of scholarship.
Personal finance is the financial management that an individual or a family unit performs to budget, save, and spend monetary resources in a controlled manner, taking into account various financial risks and future life events.
Telecommunication, often used in its plural form or abbreviated as telecom, is the transmission of information over a distance using electrical or electronic means, typically through cables, radio waves, or other communication technologies. These means of transmission may be divided into communication channels for multiplexing, allowing for a single medium to transmit several concurrent communication sessions. Long-distance technologies invented during the 19th, 20th and 21st centuries generally use electric power, and include the electrical telegraph, telephone, television, and radio.
Social media are new media technologies that facilitate the creation, sharing and aggregation of content amongst virtual communities and networks. Common features include:Online platforms enable users to create and share content and participate in social networking.
User-generated content—such as text posts or comments, digital photos or videos, and data generated through online interactions.
Service-specific profiles that are designed and maintained by the social media organization.
Social media helps the development of online social networks by connecting a user's profile with those of other individuals or groups.
Television (TV) is a telecommunication medium for transmitting moving images and sound. Additionally, the term can refer to a physical television set rather than the medium of transmission. Television is a mass medium for advertising, entertainment, news, and sports. The medium is capable of more than "radio broadcasting", which refers to an audio signal sent to radio receivers.
A birthday is the anniversary of the birth of a person or the figurative birth of an institution. Birthdays of people are celebrated in numerous cultures, often with birthday gifts, birthday cards, a birthday party, or a rite of passage.
A wedding is a ceremony in which two people are united in marriage. Wedding traditions and customs vary greatly between cultures, ethnicities, races, religions, denominations, countries, social classes, and sexual orientations. Most wedding ceremonies involve an exchange of marriage vows by a couple; a presentation of a gift ; and a public proclamation of marriage by an authority figure or celebrant. Special wedding garments are often worn, and the ceremony is sometimes followed by a wedding reception. Music, poetry, prayers, or readings from religious texts or literature are also commonly incorporated into the ceremony, as well as superstitious customs.
A funeral is a ceremony connected with the final disposition of a corpse, such as a burial, entombment or cremation with the attendant observances. Funerary customs comprise the complex of beliefs and practices used by a culture to remember and respect the dead, from interment, to various monuments, prayers, and rituals undertaken in their honour. Customs vary between cultures and religious groups. Funerals have both normative and legal components. Common secular motivations for funerals include mourning the deceased, celebrating their life, and offering support and sympathy to the bereaved; additionally, funerals may have religious aspects that are intended to help the soul of the deceased reach the afterlife, resurrection or reincarnation.
Religion is a range of social-cultural systems, including designated behaviors and practices, ethics, morals, beliefs, worldviews, texts, sanctified places, prophecies, or organizations, that generally relate humanity to supernatural, transcendental, and spiritual elements—although there is no scholarly consensus over what precisely constitutes a religion. It is an essentially contested concept. Different religions may or may not contain various elements ranging from the divine, sacredness, faith, and a supernatural being or beings.
Politics is the set of activities that are associated with making decisions in groups, or other forms of power relations among individuals, such as the distribution of status or resources.
The branch of social science that studies politics and government is referred to as political science.
History is the systematic study of the past, focusing primarily on the human past. As an academic discipline, it analyses and interprets evidence to construct narratives about what happened and explain why it happened. Some theorists categorize history as a social science, while others see it as part of the humanities or consider it a hybrid discipline. Similar debates surround the purpose of history—for example, whether its main aim is theoretical, to uncover the truth, or practical, to learn lessons from the past. In a more general sense, the term history refers not to an academic field but to the past itself, times in the past, or to individual texts about the past.
Geography is the study of the lands, features, inhabitants, and phenomena of Earth. Geography is an all-encompassing discipline that seeks an understanding of Earth and its human and natural complexities—not merely where objects are, but also how they have changed and come to be. While geography is specific to Earth, many concepts can be applied more broadly to other celestial bodies in the field of planetary science. Geography has been called "a bridge between natural science and social science disciplines.".
Science is a systematic discipline that builds and organises knowledge in the form of testable hypotheses and predictions about the universe. Modern science is typically divided into two – or three – major branches: the natural sciences, which study the physical world, and the social sciences, which study individuals and societies. While referred to as the formal sciences, the study of logic, mathematics, and theoretical computer science are typically regarded as separate because they rely on deductive reasoning instead of the scientific method as their main methodology. Meanwhile, applied sciences are disciplines that use scientific knowledge for practical purposes, such as engineering and medicine.
Technology is the application of conceptual knowledge to achieve practical goals, especially in a reproducible way. The word technology can also mean the products resulting from such efforts, including both tangible tools such as utensils or machines, and intangible ones such as software. Technology plays a critical role in science, engineering, and everyday life.
Art is a diverse range of cultural activity centered around works utilizing creative or imaginative talents, which are expected to evoke a worthwhile experience, generally through an expression of emotional power, conceptual ideas, technical proficiency, or beauty.
Literature is any collection of written work. The term is also used more narrowly for writings considered an art form, especially novels, plays, and poems. It includes both print and digital writing. In recent centuries, the definition has expanded to include oral literature, much of which has been transcribed. Literature is a method of recording, preserving, and transmitting knowledge and entertainment. It can also have a social, psychological, spiritual, or political role.
Philosophy is a systematic study of general and fundamental questions concerning topics like existence, knowledge, mind, reason, language, and value. It is a rational and critical inquiry that reflects on its methods and assumptions.
Psychology is the scientific study of the mind and behavior. Its subject matter includes the behavior of humans and nonhumans, both conscious and unconscious phenomena, and mental processes such as thoughts, feelings, and motives. Psychology is an academic discipline of immense scope, crossing the boundaries between the natural and social sciences. Biological psychologists seek an understanding of the emergent properties of brains, linking the discipline to neuroscience. As social scientists, psychologists aim to understand the behavior of individuals and groups.
Sociology is the scientific study of human society that focuses on society, human social behavior, patterns of social relationships, social interaction, and aspects of culture associated with everyday life. The term sociology was coined in the late 18th century to describe the scientific study of society. Regarded as a part of both the social sciences and humanities, sociology uses various methods of empirical investigation and critical analysis to develop a body of knowledge about social order and social change. Sociological subject matter ranges from micro-level analyses of individual interaction and agency to macro-level analyses of social systems and social structure. Applied sociological research may be applied directly to social policy and welfare, whereas theoretical approaches may focus on the understanding of social processes and phenomenological method.
Economics is a social science that studies the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services.
Law is a set of rules that are created and are enforceable by governmental or societal institutions to regulate behavior, with its precise definition a matter of longstanding debate. It has been variously described as a science and as the art of justice. State-enforced laws can be made by a legislature, resulting in statutes; by the executive through decrees and regulations; or by judges' decisions, which form precedent in common law jurisdictions. An autocrat may exercise those functions within their realm. The creation of laws themselves may be influenced by a constitution, written or tacit, and the rights encoded therein. The law shapes politics, economics, history and society in various ways and also serves as a mediator of relations between people.
An apple is the round, edible fruit of an apple tree. Fruit trees of the orchard or domestic apple, the most widely grown in the genus, are cultivated worldwide. The tree originated in Central Asia, where its wild ancestor, Malus sieversii, is still found. Apples have been grown for thousands of years in Eurasia before they were introduced to North America by European colonists. Apples have cultural significance in many mythologies and religions.
A banana is an elongated, edible fruit—botanically a berry—produced by several kinds of large treelike herbaceous flowering plants in the genus Musa. In some countries, cooking bananas are called plantains, distinguishing them from dessert bananas. The fruit is variable in size, color and firmness, but is usually elongated and curved, with soft flesh rich in starch covered with a peel, which may have a variety of colors when ripe. It grows upward in clusters near the top of the plant. Almost all modern edible seedless (parthenocarp) cultivated bananas come from two wild species – Musa acuminata and Musa balbisiana, or their hybrids.
Orange most often refers to:Orange (fruit), the fruit of the tree species  Citrus × sinensis
Orange blossom, its fragrant flower
Orange juice
Orange (colour), the color of an orange fruit, occurs between red and yellow in the visible light spectrum
Some other citrus or citrus-like fruit, see list of plants known as orange
Orange (word), both a noun and an adjective in the English language.
The garden strawberry is a widely grown hybrid plant cultivated worldwide for its fruit. The genus Fragaria, the strawberries, is in the rose family, Rosaceae. The fruit is appreciated for its aroma, bright red colour, juicy texture, and sweetness. It is eaten either fresh or in prepared foods such as jam, ice cream, and chocolates. Artificial strawberry flavourings and aromas are widely used in commercial products. Botanically, the strawberry is not a berry, but an aggregate accessory fruit. Each apparent 'seed' on the outside of the strawberry is actually an achene, a botanical fruit with a seed inside it.
Blueberries are a widely distributed and widespread group of perennial flowering plants with blue or purple berries. They are classified in the section Cyanococcus within the genus Vaccinium. Commercial blueberries—both wild (lowbush) and cultivated (highbush)—are all native to North America. The highbush varieties were introduced into Europe during the 1930s.
The raspberry is the edible fruit of several plant species in the genus Rubus of the rose family, most of which are in the subgenus Idaeobatus. The name also applies to these plants themselves. Raspberries are perennial with woody stems.
The blackberry is an edible fruit produced by many species in the genus Rubus in the family Rosaceae, hybrids among these species within the subgenus Rubus, and hybrids between the subgenera Rubus and Idaeobatus. The taxonomy of blackberries has historically been confused because of hybridization and apomixis so that species have often been grouped together and called species aggregates.
The pineapple is a tropical plant with an edible fruit; it is the most economically significant plant in the family Bromeliaceae.
A mango is an edible stone fruit produced by the tropical tree Mangifera indica. It originated in the northeastern part of the Indian subcontinent, in what is now Bangladesh, northeastern India and Myanmar. M. indica has been cultivated in South and Southeast Asia since ancient times, resulting in two modern mango cultivar lineages: the "Indian" and the "Southeast Asian" types. Other species in the genus Mangifera also produce edible fruits called "mangoes," most of which are found in the Malesian ecoregion.
The papaya, papaw, or pawpaw is the plant species Carica papaya, one of the 21 accepted species in the genus Carica of the family Caricaceae. Papaya is also the name of its fruit. It was first domesticated in Mesoamerica, within modern-day southern Mexico and Central America. It is grown in several countries in regions with a tropical climate. In 2024, India was the leading producer, accounting for 36% of the world total.
A grape is a fruit, botanically a berry, of the deciduous woody vines of the flowering plant genus Vitis. Grapes are a non-climacteric type of fruit, generally occurring in clusters.
The watermelon is a species of flowering plant in the family Cucurbitaceae, that has a large, edible fruit. It is a scrambling and trailing vine-like plant, and is widely cultivated worldwide, with more than 1,000 varieties.
The cantaloupe is a type of true melon with sweet, aromatic, and usually orange flesh. Originally, cantaloup referred to the true cantaloupe or European cantaloupe with non- to slightly netted and often ribbed rind. Today, it also refers to the muskmelon with strongly netted rind, which is called cantaloupe in North America, rockmelon in Australia and New Zealand, and spanspek in Southern Africa. Cantaloupes range in mass from 0.5 to 5 kilograms.
Honeydew may refer to:Honeydew (melon), a cultivar group of melon
Honeydew (secretion), a sugar-rich sticky substance secreted by various animals
Honeydew moth, a moth of Southern and Middle America
Honeydew, California, United States, a town
Honeydew, West Virginia, United States, an unincorporated community
Honeydew (color), a pale shade of the color spring green
Bunsen Honeydew, a fictional character from The Muppets franchise
Honeydew (album), a 2008 album by Shawn Mullins
Honeydew (film), a 2020 American horror film written and directed by Devereux Milburn
Honey Dew Donuts, a Massachusetts-based franchise selling donuts and other breakfast foods
Fuller's Organic Honey Dew, a brand of pale ale brewed by Fuller's Brewery
Simon "Honeydew" Lane, a member of internet gaming group The Yogscast
"Honeydew" , a 2023 episode of The Bear TV series

.
Kiwi most commonly refers to:Kiwi (bird), a flightless bird native to New Zealand
Kiwi (nickname), an informal name for New Zealanders
Kiwifruit, an edible hairy fruit with many seeds
Kiwi dollar or New Zealand dollar, a unit of currency.
The peach is a deciduous tree that bears edible juicy fruits with various characteristics. Most are simply called peaches, while the glossy-skinned, non-fuzzy varieties are called nectarines. Though from the same species, they are regarded commercially as different fruits.
A plum is a fruit of some species in Prunus subg. Prunus. Dried plums are usually called prunes.
A cherry is the fruit of many plants of the genus Prunus, and is a fleshy drupe.
An apricot is a fruit, or the tree that bears the fruit, of several species in the genus Prunus. Usually an apricot is from the species Prunus armeniaca, but the fruits of the other species in Prunus sect. Armeniaca are also called apricots. In 2023, world production of apricots was 3.7 million tonnes, led by Turkey with 20% of the total.
The pomegranate is a fruit-bearing, deciduous shrub in the family Lythraceae, subfamily Punicoideae, that grows to between 1.5–5 metres (5–16 ft) tall. Rich in symbolic and mythological associations in many cultures, it originated from the Iranian plateau including Iran, the Caucasus, Turkmenistan, Afghanistan and Pakistan. Pomegranate was first domesticated by ancient Iranians in the Persian plateau and nearby regions about 5,000 years ago. It is extensively cultivated for its fruit.
The tomato is a plant whose fruit is an edible berry that is eaten as a vegetable. The tomato is a member of the nightshade family that includes tobacco, potato, and chili peppers. It originated from western South America, and may have been domesticated there, in Mexico, or in Central America. The Spanish introduced tomatoes to Eurasia in the Columbian exchange in the 16th century.
The cucumber is a widely-cultivated creeping vine plant in the family Cucurbitaceae that bears cylindrical to spherical fruits, which are used as culinary vegetables. Considered an annual plant, there are three main types of cucumber—slicing, pickling, and seedless—within which several cultivars have been created. The cucumber originates in Asia extending from India, Nepal, Bangladesh, China, and Northern Thailand, but now grows on most continents, and many different types of cucumber are grown commercially and traded on the global market. In North America, the term wild cucumber refers to plants in the genera Echinocystis and Marah, though the two are not closely related.
The carrot is a root vegetable, typically orange in colour, though heirloom variants including purple, black, red, white, and yellow cultivars exist, all of which are domesticated forms of the wild carrot, Daucus carota, native to Europe and Southwestern Asia. The plant probably originated in Iran and was originally cultivated for its leaves and seeds.
Broccoli is an edible green plant in the cabbage family whose large flowering head, stalk and small associated leaves are eaten as a vegetable. Broccoli is classified in the Italica cultivar group of the species Brassica oleracea. Broccoli has large flower heads, or florets, usually dark green, arranged in a tree-like structure branching out from a thick stalk, which is usually light green. Leaves surround the mass of flower heads. Broccoli resembles cauliflower, a different but closely related cultivar group of the same Brassica species.
Cauliflower is one of several vegetables cultivated from the species Brassica oleracea in the genus Brassica, which is in the Brassicaceae family. Cauliflower usually grows with one main stem that carries a large, rounded "head" made of tightly clustered, immature white or off-white flower buds called the "curd". Typically, only the "head" is eaten.
Spinach is a leafy green flowering plant native to Central and Western Asia. It is of the order Caryophyllales, family Amaranthaceae, subfamily Chenopodioideae. Its leaves are a common vegetable consumed either fresh, cooked or after storage. The taste differs considerably between cooked and raw: the high oxalate content may be reduced by steaming.
Kale, also called leaf cabbage, belongs to a group of cabbage cultivars primarily grown for their edible leaves, but it is also used as an ornamental plant. Its multiple different cultivars vary quite a bit in appearance; the leaves can be bumpy, curly, or flat, and the color ranges from purple to green.
Lettuce is an annual plant of the family Asteraceae mostly grown as a leaf vegetable. The leaves are most often used raw in green salads, although lettuce is also seen in other kinds of food, such as sandwiches, wraps and soups; it can also be grilled. Its stem and seeds are sometimes used; celtuce is one variety grown for its stems, which are eaten either raw or cooked. In addition to its main use as a leafy green, it has also gathered religious and medicinal significance over centuries of human consumption. Europe and North America originally dominated the market for lettuce, but by the late 20th century the consumption of lettuce had spread throughout the world. In 2023, world production of lettuce was 28 million tonnes, led by China with 53% of the total.
Eruca sativa is an edible annual plant in the family Brassicaceae. Other common names include salad rocket, garden rocket, colewort, roquette, ruchetta, rucola, rucoli, and rugula.
Zucchini, courgette, or Cucurbita pepo var. cylindrica is a summer squash, a vining herbaceous plant whose fruit are harvested when their immature seeds and epicarp (rind) are still soft and edible. It is closely related, but not identical, to the marrow; its fruit may be called marrow when mature.
Eggplant, aubergine, brinjal, or baigan is a plant species in the nightshade family Solanaceae. Solanum melongena is grown worldwide for its edible fruit, typically used as a vegetable in cooking.
The bell pepper is the fruit of plants in the Grossum Group of the species Capsicum annuum. Cultivars of the plant produce fruits in different colors, including red, yellow, orange, green, white, and purple. Bell peppers are sometimes grouped with less pungent chili varieties as "sweet peppers". While they are botanically fruits—classified as berries—they are commonly used as a vegetable ingredient or side dish. Other varieties of the genus Capsicum are categorized as chili peppers when they are cultivated for their pungency, including some varieties of Capsicum annuum.
The onion, also known as the bulb onion or common onion, is a vegetable that is the most widely cultivated species of the genus Allium. The shallot is a botanical variety of the onion which was classified as a separate species until 2011. The onion's close relatives include garlic, scallion, leek, and chives.
Garlic is a species of bulbous flowering plants in the genus Allium. Its close relatives include the onion, shallot, leek, chives, Welsh onion, and Chinese onion. Garlic is native to central and western Asia, stretching from the Black Sea through the southern Caucasus, northeastern Iran, and the Hindu Kush. It has naturalized in many other parts of the world, including Mediterranean Europe and China. There are two subspecies and hundreds of varieties of garlic.
Ginger is a flowering plant whose rhizome, ginger root or ginger, is widely used as a spice and a folk medicine. It is an herbaceous perennial that grows annual pseudostems about one meter tall, bearing narrow leaf blades. The inflorescences bear flowers having pale yellow petals with purple edges, and arise directly from the rhizome on separate shoots.
The potato is a starchy tuberous vegetable native to the Americas that is consumed as a staple food in many parts of the world. Potatoes are underground stem tubers of the plant Solanum tuberosum, a perennial in the nightshade family Solanaceae.
The sweet potato or sweetpotato is a dicotyledonous plant in the morning glory family, Convolvulaceae. Its sizeable, starchy, sweet-tasting tuberous roots are used as a root vegetable, which is a staple food in parts of the world. Cultivars of the sweet potato have been bred to bear tubers with flesh and skin of various colors. Moreover, the young shoots and leaves are occasionally eaten as greens. The sweet potato and the potato are only distantly related, both being in the order Solanales. Although darker sweet potatoes are often known as yams in parts of North America, they are even more distant from actual yams, which are monocots in the order Dioscoreales.
Maize, also known as corn in North American English, is a tall stout grass that produces cereal grain. The leafy stalk of the plant gives rise to male inflorescences or tassels which produce pollen, and female inflorescences called ears. The ears yield grain, known as kernels or seeds. In modern commercial varieties, these are usually yellow or white; other varieties can be of many colors. Maize was domesticated by indigenous peoples in southern Mexico about 9,000 years ago from wild teosinte. Native Americans planted it alongside beans and squashes in the Three Sisters polyculture.
Could not find summary for "Green Beans".
Asparagus or garden asparagus is a perennial flowering plant species in the genus Asparagus native to Eurasia. Widely cultivated as a vegetable crop, its young shoots are used as a spring vegetable.
Celery is a cultivated plant belonging to the species Apium graveolens in the family Apiaceae that has been used as a vegetable since ancient times.
A mushroom is the fleshy, spore-bearing fruiting body of a fungus, typically produced above ground on soil or another food source. A toadstool generally refers to a poisonous mushroom.
The avocado, alligator pear or avocado pear is an evergreen tree in the laurel family (Lauraceae). It is native to the Americas, with archaeological evidence of early human avocado use dating back thousands of years across various regions of Central and South America. It was prized for its large and unusually oily fruit. The native range of avocado extends from Mexico to Peru, encompassing much of Central America and parts of northern and western South America.
Lime most commonly refers to:Lime (fruit), a green citrus fruit
Lime (material), inorganic materials containing calcium, usually calcium oxide or calcium hydroxide
Lime (color), a color between yellow and green.
The lemon is a species of small evergreen tree in the Citrus genus of the flowering plant family Rutaceae. A true lemon is a hybrid of the citron and the bitter orange. Its origins are uncertain, but some evidence suggests lemons originated during the 1st millennium BC in what is now northeastern India. Some other citrus fruits are called lemon.
The grapefruit is a subtropical citrus tree known for its relatively large, sour to semi-sweet, somewhat bitter fruit. The flesh of the fruit is segmented and varies in color from pale yellow to dark red.
Pears are fruits produced and consumed around the world, growing on a tree and are harvested in late summer into mid-autumn. The pear tree and shrub are a species of genus Pyrus, in the family Rosaceae, bearing the pomaceous fruit of the same name. Several species of pears are valued for their edible fruit and juices, while others are cultivated as trees.
The coconut is a member of the palm family (Arecaceae) and the only living species of the genus Cocos. The term "coconut" can denote the whole coconut palm tree or the large hard fruit. Originally native to Central Indo-Pacific, they are ubiquitous in coastal tropical regions.
Passiflora edulis, commonly known as passion fruit, is a vine species of passion flower. The fruit is a pepo, a type of botanical berry, round to oval, either yellow or dark purple at maturity, with a soft to firm, juicy interior filled with numerous seeds.
Lychee is a monotypic taxon and the sole member in the genus Litchi in the soapberry family, Sapindaceae.
The fruit is edible and has a sweet, mildly tart flavor and a distinctive floral aroma often described as rose-like.
The durian is the edible fruit of several tree species belonging to the genus Durio. There are 30 recognised species, at least nine of which produce edible fruit. Durio zibethinus, native to Borneo, Sumatra, and the Malay Peninsula, is the only species available on the international market. It has over 300 named varieties in Thailand and over 200 in Malaysia as of 2021. Other species are sold in their local regions.
Guava, also known as the 'guava-pear' in various regions, is a common tropical fruit cultivated in many tropical and subtropical regions. The common guava Psidium guajava is a small tree in the myrtle family (Myrtaceae), native to Mexico, Central America, the Caribbean and northern South America.
Carambola, also known as star fruit, is the fruit of Averrhoa carambola, a species of tree native to tropical Southeast Asia. The edible fruit has distinctive ridges running down its sides. When cut in cross-section, it resembles a star, giving it the name of star fruit. The entire fruit is edible, usually raw, and may be cooked or made into relishes, preserves, garnish, and juices. It is commonly consumed in Southeast Asia, South Asia, the South Pacific, Micronesia, parts of East Asia, the United States, parts of Latin America, and the Caribbean. The tree is cultivated throughout tropical areas of the world.
Pitaya, pitahaya or commonly known as dragon fruit is the fruit of several cactus species indigenous to the region of southern Mexico and along the Pacific coasts of Guatemala, Costa Rica, and El Salvador. Pitaya is cultivated in East Asia, South Asia, Southeast Asia, continental America, the Caribbean, Australia, Brazil, Madeira (Portugal), and throughout tropical and subtropical regions of the world.
Rice is a cereal grain and in its domesticated form is the staple food of over half of the world's population, particularly in Asia and Africa. Rice is the seed of the grass species Oryza sativa —or, much less commonly, Oryza glaberrima. Asian rice was domesticated in China some 13,500 to 8,200 years ago; African rice was domesticated in Africa about 3,000 years ago. Rice has become commonplace in many cultures worldwide; in 2023, 800 million tons were produced, placing it third after sugarcane and maize. Only some 8% of rice is traded internationally. China, India, and Indonesia are the largest consumers of rice. A substantial amount of the rice produced in developing nations is lost after harvest through factors such as poor transport and storage. Rice yields can be reduced by pests including insects, rodents, and birds, as well as by weeds, and by diseases such as rice blast. Traditional rice polycultures such as rice-duck farming, and modern integrated pest management seek to control damage from pests in a sustainable way.
Pasta is a type of food typically made from an unleavened dough of wheat flour mixed with water or eggs, and formed into sheets or other shapes, then cooked by boiling or baking. Pasta was originally only made with durum, although the definition has been expanded to include alternatives for a gluten-free diet, such as rice flour, or legumes such as beans or lentils. Pasta is believed to have developed independently in Italy and is a staple food of Italian cuisine, with evidence of Etruscans making pasta as early as 400 BCE in Italy.
Bread is a baked food product made from water, flour, and often yeast. It is a staple food across the world, particularly in Europe and the Middle East. Throughout recorded history and around the world, it has been an important part of many cultures' diets. It is one of the oldest human-made foods, having been of significance since the dawn of agriculture, and plays an essential role in both religious rituals and secular culture.
A tortilla is a thin, circular unleavened flatbread from Mesoamerica originally made from masa, and now also from wheat flour.
The oat, sometimes called the common oat, is a species of cereal grass (Avena) grown for fodder and for its seed, which is known by the same name. Oats appear to have been domesticated as a secondary crop, as their seeds resembled those of other cereals closely enough for them to be included by early cultivators. Oats tolerate cold winters less well than cereals such as wheat, barley, and rye, but need less summer heat and more rain, making them important in areas such as Northwest Europe that have cool, wet summers. They can tolerate low-nutrient and acid soils. Oats grow thickly and vigorously, allowing them to outcompete many weeds, and compared to other cereals are relatively free from diseases.
Quinoa is a flowering plant in the amaranth family. It is a herbaceous annual plant grown as a crop primarily for its edible seeds; the seeds are high in protein, dietary fiber, B vitamins and dietary minerals especially potassium and magnesium in amounts greater than in many grains. Quinoa is not a grass but rather a pseudocereal botanically related to spinach and amaranth, and originated in the Andean region of northwestern South America. It was first used to feed livestock 5,200–7,000 years ago, and for human consumption 3,000–4,000 years ago in the Lake Titicaca basin of Bolivia and Peru.
Barley, a member of the grass family, is a major cereal grain grown in temperate climates globally. One of the first cultivated grains, it was domesticated in the Fertile Crescent around 9000 BC, giving it nonshattering spikelets and making it much easier to harvest. Its use then spread throughout Eurasia by 2000 BC. Barley prefers relatively low temperatures and well-drained soil to grow. It is relatively tolerant of drought and soil salinity, but is less winter-hardy than wheat or rye.
The lentil is an annual legume grown for its lens-shaped edible seeds or pulses, also called lentils. It is about 40 cm (16 in) tall, and the seeds grow in pods, usually with two seeds in each.
The chickpea or chick pea is an annual legume of the family Fabaceae, subfamily Faboideae, cultivated for its edible seeds. Its different types are variously known as gram, Bengal gram, chana dal, garbanzo, garbanzo bean, or Egyptian pea. It is one of the earliest cultivated legumes, the oldest archaeological evidence of which was found in Syria.
Could not find summary for "Black Beans".
The kidney bean is a variety of the common bean ; it has such a common name owing to its resemblance to a human kidney.
Tofu  or bean curd is a food prepared by pressing the curds of coagulated soy milk into solid white blocks of varying softness: silken, soft, firm, and extra firm.
Tempeh or tempe is a traditional Indonesian food made from fermented soybeans. It is made by a natural culturing and controlled fermentation process that binds soybeans into a cake form. A fungus, Rhizopus oligosporus or Rhizopus oryzae, is used in the fermentation process and is also known as tempeh starter.
The chicken is a domesticated form of the red junglefowl, originally native to Southeast Asia. It was first domesticated around 8,000 years ago and is one of the most common and widespread domesticated animals in the world. Chickens are primarily kept for their meat and eggs, though they are also kept as pets.
Beef is the culinary name for meat from cattle. Beef can be prepared in various ways; cuts are often used for steak, which can be cooked to varying degrees of doneness, while trimmings are often ground or minced, as found in most hamburgers. Beef contains protein, iron, and vitamin B12. Along with other kinds of red meat, high consumption is associated with an increased risk of colorectal cancer and cardiovascular disease, especially when processed. Beef has a high environmental impact, being a primary driver of deforestation with the highest greenhouse gas emissions of any agricultural product.
Pork is the culinary name for the meat of the pig. It is the second most commonly consumed type of meat worldwide, following poultry, with evidence of pig husbandry dating back to 8000–9000 BCE.
Turkey, officially the Republic of Türkiye, is a country mainly located in Anatolia in West Asia, with a smaller part called East Thrace in Southeast Europe. It borders the Black Sea to the north; Georgia, Armenia, Azerbaijan, and Iran to the east; Iraq, Syria, and the Mediterranean Sea to the south; and the Aegean Sea, Greece, and Bulgaria to the west. Turkey is home to over 86 million people; most are ethnic Turks, while Kurds are the largest ethnic minority. Officially a secular state, Turkey has a Muslim-majority population. Ankara is Turkey's capital and second-largest city. Istanbul is its largest city and economic center. Other major cities include İzmir, Bursa, and Antalya.
Salmon are any of several commercially important species of euryhaline ray-finned fish from the genera Salmo and Oncorhynchus of the family Salmonidae, native to tributaries of the North Atlantic (Salmo) and North Pacific (Oncorhynchus) basins. Salmon is a colloquial or common name used for fish in this group, but is not a scientific name. Other closely related fish in the same family include trout, char, grayling, whitefish, lenok and taimen, all coldwater fish of the subarctic and cooler temperate regions with some sporadic endorheic populations in Central Asia.
A tuna is a saltwater fish that belongs to the tribe Thunnini, a subgrouping of the Scombridae (mackerel) family. The Thunnini comprise 15 species across five genera, the sizes of which vary greatly, ranging from the bullet tuna up to the Atlantic bluefin tuna, which averages 2 m (6.6 ft) and is believed to live up to 50 years.
A shrimp is a common name typically used for crustaceans with an elongated body and a primarily swimming mode of locomotion – usually decapods belonging to the Caridea or Dendrobranchiata, although some crustaceans outside of this order are also referred to as "shrimp".
Crabs are decapod crustaceans, either the Brachyura or various groups within the closely related Anomura, characterised by having a heavily armoured shell, their tail segments concealed under the body, the ability to run sideways, and the habit of hiding in rocky crevices. They do not form a single natural group or clade, but have convergently evolved multiple times from the ancestral decapod body plan through carcinisation, the process of creating this set of characteristics. As a group, they are thus polyphyletic, meaning they have multiple evolutionary origins.
Lobsters are malacostracan decapod crustaceans of the family Nephropidae or its synonym Homaridae. They have long bodies with muscular tails and live in crevices or burrows on the sea floor. Three of their five pairs of legs have claws, including the first pair, which are usually much larger than the others. Highly prized as seafood, lobsters are economically important and are often one of the most profitable commodities in the coastal areas they populate.
An egg is an organic vessel in which an embryo begins to develop.
Milk is a usually white liquid food produced by the mammary glands of lactating mammals. It is the primary source of nutrition for young mammals before they are able to digest solid food. Milk contains many nutrients, including calcium and protein, as well as lactose and saturated fat; the enzyme lactase is needed to break down lactose. Immune factors and immune-modulating components in milk contribute to milk immunity. The first milk, which is called colostrum, contains antibodies and immune-modulating components that strengthen the immune system against many diseases.
Cheddar cheese is a natural cheese that is relatively hard, off-white, and sometimes sharp-tasting. It originates from the village of Cheddar in Somerset, South West England.
Mozzarella is a semi-soft non-aged cheese prepared using the pasta filata ('stretched-curd') method. It originated in southern Italy.
Yogurt is a food produced by bacterial fermentation of milk. Fermentation of sugars in the milk by these bacteria produces lactic acid, which acts on milk protein to give yogurt its texture and characteristic tart flavor. Cow's milk is most commonly used to make yogurt. Milk from water buffalo, goats, ewes, mares, camels, and yaks is also used to produce yogurt. The milk used may be homogenized or not. It may be pasteurized or raw. Each type of milk produces substantially different results.
Butter is a dairy product made from the fat and protein components of churned cream. It is a semi-solid emulsion at room temperature, consisting of approximately 81% butterfat. It is used at room temperature as a spread, melted as a condiment, and used as a fat in baking, sauce-making, pan frying, and other cooking procedures.
The almond is a species of tree from the genus Prunus. Along with the peach, it is classified in the subgenus Amygdalus, distinguished from the other subgenera by corrugations on the shell (endocarp) surrounding the seed.
A walnut is the edible seed of any tree of the genus Juglans, particularly the Persian or English walnut, Juglans regia. They are accessory fruit because the outer covering of the fruit is technically an involucre and thus not morphologically part of the carpel; this means it cannot be a drupe but is instead a drupe-like nut.
Cashew is the common name of a tropical evergreen tree Anacardium occidentale, in the family Anacardiaceae. It is the source of the cashew nut and the cashew apple. The tree can grow as tall as 14 meters.
Peanuts is a syndicated daily and Sunday American comic strip written and illustrated by Charles M. Schulz. The strip originally ran from 1950 to 2000, continuing in reruns afterward. Peanuts is regarded as one of the most popular and influential comic strips in history, with 17,897 strips published in all, making it "arguably the longest story ever told by one human being". At the time of Schulz's death in 2000, Peanuts ran in over 2,600 newspapers, with a readership of roughly 355 million across 75 countries, and had been translated into 21 languages. It helped to cement the four-panel gag strip as the standard in the United States, and together with its merchandise earned Schulz more than $1 billion. Following successful animated television and stage-theatrical adaptations over the years, five animated theatrical films have been released.
Sunflower seeds are the seeds of the sunflower (Helianthus).
Could not find summary for "Pumpkin Seeds".
Olive oil is a vegetable oil obtained by pressing whole olives and extracting the oil.
Honey is a sweet and viscous substance made by several species of bees, the best-known of which are honey bees. Honey is made and stored to nourish bee colonies. Bees produce honey by gathering and then refining the sugary secretions of plants or the secretions of other insects, like the honeydew of aphids. This refinement takes place both within individual bees, through regurgitation and enzymatic activity, and during storage in the hive, through water evaporation that concentrates the honey's sugars until it is thick and viscous.
Maple syrup is a sweet syrup made from the sap of maple trees. In cold climates these trees store starch in their trunks and roots before winter; the starch is then converted to sugar that rises in the sap in late winter and early spring. Maple trees are tapped by drilling holes into their trunks and collecting the sap, which is heated to evaporate much of the water, leaving the concentrated syrup.
Chocolate is a food made from roasted and ground cocoa beans that can be a liquid, solid, or paste, either by itself or to flavor other foods. Cocoa beans are the processed seeds of the cacao tree. They are usually fermented to develop the flavor, then dried, cleaned, and roasted. The shell is removed to reveal nibs, which are ground to chocolate liquor The liquor can be processed to separate its two components, cocoa solids and cocoa butter, or shaped and sold as unsweetened baking chocolate. By adding sugar, sweetened chocolates are produced, which can be sold simply as dark chocolate, or, with the addition of milk, can be made into milk chocolate. Making milk chocolate with cocoa butter and without cocoa solids produces white chocolate.
Vanilla is a spice derived from orchids of the genus Vanilla, primarily obtained from the seed pods of the flat-leaved New World vanilla (V. planifolia).
Cinnamon is a spice obtained from the inner bark of several tree species from the genus Cinnamomum. Cinnamon is used mainly as an aromatic condiment and flavouring additive in a wide variety of cuisines, in particular sweet and savoury dishes such as biscuits, breakfast cereals, snack foods, bagels, teas, hot chocolate, and traditional foods. The aroma and flavour of cinnamon derive from its essential oil and principal component, cinnamaldehyde, as well as numerous other constituents, including eugenol.
Basil, also called great basil, is a culinary herb of the family Lamiaceae (mints). It is a tender plant, and is used in cuisines worldwide. In Western cuisine, the generic term "basil" refers to the variety also known as Genovese basil or sweet basil. Basil is native to tropical regions from Central Africa to Southeast Asia. In temperate climates basil is treated as an annual plant, but it can be grown as a short-lived perennial or biennial in warmer horticultural zones with tropical or Mediterranean climates.
Oregano is a species of flowering plant in the mint family, Lamiaceae. It was native to the Mediterranean region, but widely naturalised elsewhere in the temperate Northern Hemisphere.
Parsley, or garden parsley, is a species of flowering plant in the family Apiaceae that is native to the Balkans. It has been introduced and naturalized in Europe and elsewhere in the world with suitable climates, and is widely cultivated as a herb and a vegetable.
Mint or The Mint may refer to:.
Salvia rosmarinus, synonym Rosmarinus officinalis, commonly known as rosemary, is a shrub with fragrant, evergreen, needle-like leaves and purple or sometimes white, pink, or blue flowers. It is a member of the mint family, Lamiaceae.
Thyme is a culinary herb consisting of the dried aerial parts of some members of the genus Thymus of flowering plants in the mint family Lamiaceae. Thymes are native to Eurasia and north Africa. Thymes have culinary, medicinal, and ornamental uses. The species most commonly cultivated and used for culinary purposes is Thymus vulgaris, native to Southeast Europe.
A telephone, commonly shortened to phone, is a telecommunications device that enables two or more users to conduct a conversation when they are too far apart to be easily heard directly. A telephone converts sound, typically and most efficiently the human voice, into electronic signals that are transmitted via cables and other communication channels to another telephone which reproduces the sound to the receiving user. The term is derived from Ancient Greek: τῆλε, romanized: tēle, lit. 'far' and φωνή, together meaning distant voice.
A laptop is a portable personal computer (PC). Laptops typically have a clamshell form factor with a flat-panel screen on the inside of the upper lid and an alphanumeric keyboard and pointing device on the inside of the lower lid. Most of the computer's internal hardware is in the lower part, under the keyboard, although many modern laptops have a built-in webcam at the top of the screen, and some even feature a touchscreen display. In most cases, unlike tablet computers which run on mobile operating systems, laptops tend to run on desktop operating systems, which were originally developed for desktop computers.
Tablet may refer to:.
Keyboard may refer to:.
A mouse is a small rodent. Characteristically, mice are known to have a pointed snout, small rounded ears, a body-length scaly tail, and a high breeding rate. The best known mouse species is the common house mouse. Mice are also popular as pets. In some places, certain kinds of field mice are locally common. They are known to invade homes for food and shelter.
Monitor or monitor may refer to:.
Headphones are a pair of small loudspeaker drivers worn on or around the head over a user's ears. They are electroacoustic transducers, which convert an electrical signal to a corresponding sound. Headphones let a single user listen to an audio source privately, in contrast to a loudspeaker, which emits sound into the open air for anyone nearby to hear. Headphones are also known as earphones or, colloquially, cans. Circumaural and supra-aural headphones use a band over the top of the head to hold the drivers in place. Another type, known as earbuds or earpieces, consists of individual units that plug into the user's ear canal; within that category have been developed cordless air buds using wireless technology. A third type are bone conduction headphones, which typically wrap around the back of the head and rest in front of the ear canal, leaving the ear canal open. In the context of telecommunication, a headset is a combination of a headphone and microphone.
Charger or Chargers may refer to:.
A backpack, also called knapsack, schoolbag, rucksack, pack, booksack, bookbag, haversack, packsack, or backsack, is in its simplest frameless form, a fabric sack carried on one’s back and secured with two straps that go over the shoulders, and is used to carry goods from one place to another. It can feature an external or internal frame to transfer heavy loads off the user’s shoulders and onto their hips, reducing strain and increasing comfort on long hikes with heavy gear.
A wallet is a flat case or pouch, often used to carry small personal items such as physical currency, debit cards, and credit cards; identification documents such as driving licence, identification card, club card; photographs, transit pass, business cards and other paper or laminated cards. Wallets are generally made of fabric or leather, and they are usually pocket-sized and foldable.
Key, Keys, The Key or The Keys may refer to:.
A pen is a common writing instrument that applies ink to a surface, typically paper, for writing or drawing. Early pens such as reed pens, quill pens, dip pens and ruling pens held a small amount of ink on a nib or in a small void or cavity that had to be periodically recharged by dipping the tip of the pen into an inkwell.
Today, such pens find only a small number of specialized uses, such as in illustration and calligraphy. Reed pens, quill pens and dip pens, which were used for writing, have been replaced by ballpoint pens, rollerball pens, fountain pens and felt or ceramic tip pens.
A pencil is a writing or drawing implement with a solid pigment core in a protective casing that reduces the risk of core breakage and keeps it from marking the user's hand.
A notebook is a book or stack of paper pages that are often ruled and used for purposes such as note-taking, journaling, or other writing, drawing, or scrapbooking and more.



Paper is a thin sheet of matted cellulose fibers. Largely derived from lignocellulose, paper is created from a pulp dissolved into a slurry that is drained and dried into sheets. Different types of paper are defined by constituent fiber, paper pulp, sizing, coating, paper size, paper density and grammage.
An eraser is an article of stationery that is used for removing marks from paper or skin. Erasers have a rubbery consistency and come in a variety of shapes, sizes, and colors. Some pencils have an eraser on one end. Less expensive erasers are made from synthetic rubber and synthetic soy-based gum, but more expensive or specialized erasers are made from vinyl, plastic, or gum-like materials.
A highlighter, also called a fluorescent pen, is a type of writing device used to bring attention to sections of text by marking them with a vivid, translucent colour.
A typical highlighter is fluorescent yellow, with the colour coming from pyranine. Different compounds, such as rhodamines are used for other colours.
A ruler is an instrument used to make length measurements, whereby a length is read from a series of markings called "rules" along an edge of the device. Alternatively, it is called a rule, scale, line gauge, or metre/meter stick. Usually, the instrument is rigid and the edge itself is a straightedge, which additionally allows one to draw straighter lines. Rulers are an important tool in geometry, geography and mathematics. They have been used since at least 2650 BC.
Scissors or shears are hand-operated cutting tools that consists of a pair of pivoting blades whose sharpened edges slide firmly against and past each other when the handles (shank) on the opposite side of the pivot are squeezed shut, causing the target material in between the blades to be divided by the combined effort of both cutting and shearing. Scissors are usually used for cutting thin materials such as paper, cardboard, metal foil, cloth, rope and wire, although a large variety of scissors/shears exist for specialized purposes, and their design details often dictate which is best for the intended job.
Tape or Tapes may refer to:.
A stapler is a mechanical device that joins pages of paper or similar material together by driving a thin metal staple through the sheets and folding the ends. Staplers are widely used in government, business, offices, workplaces, homes, and schools.
A mug is a type of cup, a drinking vessel usually intended for hot drinks such as coffee, hot chocolate, or tea. Mugs have handles and usually hold a larger amount of fluid than other types of cups such as teacups or coffee cups. Typically, a mug holds approximately 250–350 ml (8–12 US fl oz) of liquid. A mug-shaped vessel much larger than this tends to be called a tankard.
A cup is a small container used to hold liquids for drinking, typically with a flattened hemispherical shape and an open "mouth", and often with a capacity of about 6–16 US fluid ounces (177–473 ml). Cups may be made of pottery, glass, metal, wood, stone, polystyrene, plastic, lacquerware, or other materials. Normally, a cup is brought in contact with the mouth for drinking, distinguishing it from other tableware and drinkware forms such as jugs; however, a straw and/or lid may also be used. They also often have handles, though many do not, including beakers which have no handle or stem, or small bowl shapes which are very common in Asia.
Plate may refer to:.
A bowl is a typically round dish or container generally used for preparing, serving, storing, or consuming food. The interior of a bowl is characteristically shaped like a spherical cap, with the edges and the bottom, forming a seamless curve. This makes bowls especially suited for holding liquids and loose food, as the contents of the bowl are naturally concentrated in its center by the force of gravity. The exterior of a bowl is typically round but may vary in shape, including rectangular designs.
In cutlery or kitchenware, a fork is a utensil, now usually made of metal, whose long handle terminates in a head that branches into several narrow and often slightly curved tines with which one can spear foods either to hold them to cut with a knife or to lift them to the mouth.
A spoon is a utensil consisting of a shallow bowl, oval or round, at the end of a handle. A type of cutlery, especially as part of a place setting, it is used primarily for transferring food to the mouth (eating). Spoons are also used in food preparation to measure, mix, stir and toss ingredients and for serving food. Present day spoons are made from metal, wood, porcelain or plastic. There are many different types of spoons made from different materials by different cultures for different purposes and food.
A knife is a tool or weapon with a cutting edge or blade, usually attached to a handle or hilt. One of the earliest tools used by humanity, knives appeared at least 2.5 million years ago, as evidenced by the Oldowan tools. Originally made of wood, bone, and stone, over the centuries, in step with improvements in both metallurgy and manufacturing, knife blades have been made from copper, bronze, iron, steel, ceramic, and titanium. Most modern knives have fixed or folding blades, with styles varying by maker and country.
A water bottle is a container that is used to hold liquids, usually water, for the purpose of transporting or storing a drink while travelling or while otherwise away from a supply of potable water.
A vacuum flask is an insulating storage vessel that slows the speed at which its contents change in temperature. It greatly lengthens the time over which its contents remain hotter or cooler than the flask's surroundings by trying to be as adiabatic as possible. Invented by James Dewar in 1892, the vacuum flask consists of two flasks, placed one within the other and joined at the neck. The gap between the two flasks is partially evacuated of air, creating a near-vacuum which significantly reduces heat transfer by conduction or convection. When used to hold cold liquids, this also virtually eliminates condensation on the outside of the flask.
An umbrella is a folding canopy supported by wooden or metal ribs that is mounted on a wooden, metal, or plastic pole. It is usually designed to protect a person against sun or rain. Initially they were used in warmer countries for shade from the sun, but in modern times they evolved to also be used for protection from rain. Etymologically, the term umbrella is to be used when protecting from the sun, but is also commonly used when protecting from rain. Some countries specifically use the words parasol and parapluie to differentiate based on their use. There are also combinations of parasol and parapluie that are called en-tout-cas. A modern hand-held umbrella or parasol may have a black exterior canopy and a silver inner coating, for better protection from both the sun and ultraviolet rays, and may be water-resistant.
A jacket is a garment for the upper body, usually extending below the hips. A jacket typically has sleeves and fastens in the front or slightly on the side. Jackets without sleeves are vests. A jacket is generally lighter, tighter-fitting, and less insulating than a coat, but both are outerwear. Some jackets are fashionable, while some others serve as protective clothing.
A shoe is an item of footwear normally found in pairs intended to protect and comfort the human foot, usually made in such a way that one is designed to fit the left foot and the other the right foot.
A sock is a piece of clothing worn on the feet and often covering the ankle or some part of the calf. Some types of shoes or boots are typically worn over socks. In ancient times, socks were made from leather or matted animal hair. Machine-knit socks were first produced in the late 16th century. Until the 1800s, both hand-made and machine-knit socks were manufactured, with the latter technique becoming more common in the 19th century, and continuing until the modern day.
A hat is a head covering which is worn for various reasons, including protection against weather conditions, ceremonial reasons such as university graduation, religious reasons, comedy, safety, or as a fashion accessory. Hats which incorporate mechanical features, such as visors, spikes, flaps, braces or beer holders shade into the broader category of headgear.
A glove is a garment covering the hand, with separate sheaths or openings for each finger including the thumb. Gloves protect and comfort hands against cold or heat, damage by friction, abrasion or chemicals, and disease; or in turn to provide a guard for what a bare hand should not touch.
Sunglasses or sun glasses are a form of protective eyewear designed primarily to prevent bright sunlight and high-energy visible light from damaging or discomforting the eyes. They can sometimes also function as a visual aid, as variously termed spectacles or glasses exist, featuring lenses that are colored, polarized or darkened. In the early 20th century, they were also known as sun cheaters.
A watch is a timepiece carried or worn by a person. It is designed to maintain a consistent movement despite the motions caused by the person's activities. A wristwatch is worn around the wrist, attached by a watch strap or another type of bracelet, including metal bands or leather straps. A pocket watch is carried in a pocket, often attached to a chain. A stopwatch is a type of watch that measures intervals of time.
A remote control, also known colloquially as a remote or clicker, is an electronic device used to operate another device from a distance, usually wirelessly. In consumer electronics, a remote control can be used to operate devices such as a television set, DVD player or other digital home media appliance. A remote control can allow operation of devices that are out of convenient reach for direct operation of controls. They function best when used from a short distance. This is primarily a convenience feature for the user. In some cases, remote controls allow a person to operate a device that they otherwise would not be able to reach, as when a garage door opener is triggered from outside.
In electrical wiring, a light switch is a switch most commonly used to operate electric lights, permanently connected equipment, or electrical outlets. Portable lamps such as table lamps may have a light switch mounted on the socket, base, or in-line with the cord. Manually operated on/off switches may be substituted by dimmer switches that allow controlling the brightness of lamps as well as turning them on or off, time-controlled switches, occupancy-sensing switches, and remotely controlled switches and dimmers. Light switches are also found in flashlights, vehicles, and other devices.
Lamp, Lamps or LAMP may refer to:.
A pillow is a support of the body at rest for comfort, therapy, or decoration. Pillows are used in different variations by many species, including humans. Some types of pillows include throw pillows, body pillows, decorative pillows, and many more. Pillows that aid sleeping are a form of bedding that supports the head and neck. Other types of pillows are designed to support the body when lying down or sitting. There are also pillows that consider human body shape for increased comfort during sleep. Decorative pillows used on beds, couches or chairs are sometimes referred to as cushions.
A blanket is a swath of soft cloth large enough either to cover or to enfold most of the user's body and thick enough to keep the body warm by trapping radiant body heat that otherwise would be lost through convection and radiation.
Could not find summary for "Bed Sheet".
A towel is a piece of absorbent cloth, or paper, used for drying or wiping a surface. Towels draw moisture through direct contact.
A toothbrush is a special type of brush used to clean the teeth, gums, and tongue. It consists of a head of tightly clustered bristles, onto which toothpaste is applied, mounted on a handle that facilitates cleaning hard-to-reach areas of the mouth. They should be used in conjunction with tools that clean between the teeth―where toothbrush bristles cannot reach―such as floss, tape, interdental brushes or toothpicks.
Toothpaste is a paste or gel dentifrice that is used with a toothbrush to clean and maintain the aesthetics of teeth. Toothpaste is used to promote oral hygiene: it is an abrasive that aids in removing dental plaque and food from the teeth, assists in suppressing halitosis, and delivers active ingredients to help prevent tooth decay and gum disease (gingivitis). Due to variations in composition and fluoride content, not all toothpastes are equally effective in maintaining oral health. The decline of tooth decay during the 20th century has been attributed to the introduction and regular use of fluoride-containing toothpastes worldwide. Large amounts of swallowed toothpaste can be poisonous. Common colors for toothpaste include white and blue.
Soap is a salt of a fatty acid used for cleaning and lubricating products as well as other applications. In a domestic setting, soaps, specifically "toilet soaps", are surfactants usually used for washing, bathing, and other types of housekeeping. In industrial settings, soaps are used as thickeners, components of some lubricants, emulsifiers, and catalysts.
Shampoo is a hair care product, typically in the form of a viscous liquid, that is formulated to be used for cleaning (scalp) hair. Less commonly, it is available in solid bar format. Shampoo is used by applying it to wet hair, massaging the product in the hair, roots and scalp, and then rinsing it out. Some users may follow a shampooing with the use of hair conditioner.
A conditioner is something that improves the quality of another item.
A hairbrush is a brush with rigid or light and soft spokes used in hair care for smoothing, styling, and detangling human hair, or for grooming an animal's fur. It can also be used for styling in combination with a curling iron or hair dryer.
A comb is a tool consisting of a shaft that holds a row of teeth for pulling through the hair to clean, untangle, or style it. Combs have been used since prehistoric times, having been discovered in very refined forms from settlements dating back to 5,000 years ago in Persia.

A deodorant is a substance applied to the body to prevent or mask body odor caused by bacterial breakdown of perspiration, such as that in the armpits, groin, or feet. A subclass of deodorants called antiperspirants prevents sweating itself, typically by blocking sweat glands. Antiperspirants are used on a wider range of body parts at any place where sweat would be inconvenient or unsafe. Other types of deodorant allow sweating but prevent bacterial action on sweat.
A razor is a bladed tool primarily used in the removal of body hair through the act of shaving. Kinds of razors include straight razors, safety razors, disposable razors, and electric shavers.
A mirror, also known as a looking glass, is an object that reflects an image. Light that bounces off a mirror forms an image of whatever is in front of it, which is then focused through the lens of the eye or a camera. Mirrors reverse the direction of light at an angle equal to its incidence. This allows the viewer to see themselves or objects behind them, or even objects that are at an angle from them but out of their field of view, such as around a corner. Natural mirrors have existed since prehistoric times, such as the surface of water, but people have been manufacturing mirrors out of a variety of materials for thousands of years, like stone, metals, and glass. In modern mirrors, metals like silver or aluminium are often used due to their high reflectivity, applied as a thin coating on glass because of its naturally smooth and very hard surface.
A waste container, also known as a dustbin, rubbish bin, trash can, garbage can, wastepaper basket, and wastebasket, among other names, is a type of container intended to store waste. It is usually made out of metal or plastic. The words "rubbish", "basket" and "bin" are more common in British English usage; "trash" and "can" are more common in American English usage. "Garbage" may refer to food waste specifically or to municipal solid waste in general. The word "dumpster" refers to a large outdoor waste container for garbage collectors to pick up the contents.
A recycling bin is a container used to hold recyclables before they are taken to recycling centers. Recycling bins exist in various sizes for use inside and outside of homes, offices, and large public facilities. Separate containers are often provided for paper, tin or aluminum cans, and glass or plastic bottles, with some bins allowing for commingled, mixed recycling of various materials.
A broom, also known as a broomstick, is a cleaning tool, consisting of usually stiff fibers attached to, and roughly parallel to, a cylindrical handle, the broomstick. It is thus a variety of brush with a long handle. It is commonly used in combination with a dustpan.
A dustpan, the small version of which is also known as a "hearth brush and shovel”, is a cleaning utensil. The dustpan is commonly used in combination with a broom or long brush. The small dustpan may appear to be a type of flat scoop. Though often hand-held for home use, industrial and commercial enterprises use a hinged variety on the end of a long handle to allow the user to stand instead of stoop while using it.
A vacuum is space devoid of matter. The word is derived from the Latin adjective vacuus meaning "vacant" or "void". An approximation to such vacuum is a region with a gaseous pressure much less than atmospheric pressure. Physicists often discuss ideal test results that would occur in a perfect vacuum, which they sometimes simply call "vacuum" or free space, and use the term partial vacuum to refer to an actual imperfect vacuum as one might have in a laboratory or in space. In engineering and applied physics on the other hand, vacuum refers to any space in which the pressure is considerably lower than atmospheric pressure. The Latin term in vacuo is used to describe an object that is surrounded by a vacuum.
Could not find summary for "Laundry Basket".
Hanger or hangers may refer to:.
Iron is a chemical element; it has symbol Fe and atomic number 26. It is a metal that belongs to the first transition series and group 8 of the periodic table. It is, by mass, the most common element on Earth, forming much of Earth's outer and inner core. It is the fourth most abundant element in the Earth's crust. In its metallic state it was mainly deposited by meteorites.
Could not find summary for "Ironing Board".
A clock or chronometer is a device that measures and displays time. The clock is one of the oldest human inventions, meeting the need to measure intervals of time shorter than the natural units such as the day, the lunar month, and the year. Devices operating on several physical processes have been used over the millennia.
A calendar is a system of organizing days. This is done by giving names to periods of time, typically days, weeks, months and years. A date is the designation of a single and specific day within such a system. A calendar is also a physical record of such a system. A calendar can also mean a list of planned events, such as a court calendar, or a partly or fully chronological list of documents, such as a calendar of wills.
A whiteboard is a glossy, usually white surface for making non-permanent markings. Whiteboards are analogous to blackboards, but with a smoother surface allowing for rapid marking and erasing of markings on their surface. The popularity of whiteboards increased rapidly in the mid-1990s and they have become a fixture in many offices, meeting rooms, school classrooms, public events and other work environments.
The term Marker may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Phone Case".
Could not find summary for "Screen Protector".
Could not find summary for "USB Cable".
Could not find summary for "Power Bank".
A flashlight or electric torch, usually shortened to torch, is a portable hand-held electric lamp. Formerly, the light source typically was a miniature incandescent light bulb, but these have been displaced by light-emitting diodes (LEDs) since the early 2000s. A typical flashlight consists of the light source mounted in a reflector, a transparent cover to protect the light source and reflector, a battery, and a switch, all enclosed in a case.
Battery most often refers to:Electric battery, a device that provides electrical power
Battery (crime), a crime involving unlawful physical contact.
Fan commonly refers to:Fan (machine), a machine for producing airflow, often used for cooling
Hand fan, an implement held and waved by hand to move air for cooling
Fan (person), short for fanatic; an enthusiast or supporter, especially with regard to entertainment.
Heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems use advanced technologies to regulate temperature, humidity, and indoor air quality in residential, commercial, and industrial buildings, and in enclosed vehicles. Its goal is to provide thermal comfort and remove contaminants from the air. HVAC system design is a subdiscipline of mechanical engineering, based on the principles of thermodynamics, fluid mechanics, and heat transfer. Modern HVAC designs focus on energy efficiency and sustainability, especially with the rising demand for green building solutions. In modern construction, MEP engineers integrate HVAC systems with energy modeling techniques to optimize system performance and reduce operational costs. "Refrigeration" is sometimes added to the field's abbreviation as HVAC&R or HVACR, or "ventilation" is dropped, as in HACR.
Air conditioning, often abbreviated as A/C (US) or air con (UK), is the process of removing heat from an enclosed space to achieve a more comfortable interior temperature and, in some cases, controlling the humidity of internal air. Air conditioning can be achieved using a mechanical 'air conditioner' or through other methods, such as passive cooling and ventilative cooling. Air conditioning is a member of a family of systems and techniques that provide heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC). Heat pumps are similar in many ways to air conditioners but use a reversing valve, allowing them to both heat and cool an enclosed space.
A remote control is any device used to control a remote operation.
Router may refer to:Router (computing), a computer networking device
Router (woodworking), a rotating cutting tool
Router plane, a woodworking hand plane
Journey planner, a specialized search engine for optimal routes between locations
Michael Router, Catholic bishop in Ireland
The Routers, 1960s American instrumental group.
A modulator-demodulator, commonly referred to as a modem, is a computer hardware device that converts data from a digital format into a format suitable for an analog transmission medium such as telephone or radio. A modem transmits data by modulating one or more carrier wave signals to encode digital information, while the receiver demodulates the signal to recreate the original digital information. The goal is to produce a signal that can be transmitted easily and decoded reliably. Modems can be used with almost any means of transmitting analog signals, from LEDs to radio.
Speaker most commonly refers to:Speaker, a person who produces speech
Loudspeaker, a device that produces sound
Computer speakers.
A camera is an instrument used to capture and store images and videos, either digitally via an electronic image sensor, or chemically via a light-sensitive material such as photographic film. As a pivotal technology in the fields of photography and videography, cameras have played a significant role in the progression of visual arts, media, entertainment, surveillance, and scientific research. The invention of the camera dates back to the 19th century and has since evolved with advancements in technology, leading to a vast array of types and models in the 21st century.
A tripod is a portable three-legged frame or stand, used as a platform for supporting the weight and maintaining the stability of some other object. The three-legged design provides good stability against gravitational loads as well as horizontal shear forces, and better leverage for resisting tipping over due to lateral forces can be achieved by spreading the legs away from the vertical centre.
Variations with one, two, and four legs are termed monopod, bipod, and quadripod.
A microphone, colloquially called a mic, or mike, is a transducer that converts sound into an electrical signal. Microphones are used in telecommunication, sound recording, broadcasting, and consumer electronics, including telephones, hearing aids, and mobile devices.
Notebook Paper is the debut studio album by American rapper Huey. It was released on June 19, 2007, via Hitz Committee/Jive/Zomba Records. Production was handled by several record producers, including Jazze Pha, StarGate, T-Mix and T-Pain. It features guest appearances from Asia Cruise, Diamond, Kydd Trell, Bow Wow, Lloyd, MeMpHiTz, T-Pain, Trey Songz and Yo Gotti.
Sticky Notes is a desktop notes application included in Windows 7, Windows 8, Windows 8.1, Windows 10 and Windows 11. The app loads quickly and enables users to quickly take notes using post-it note–like windows on their desktop.
An envelope is a common packaging item, usually made of thin, flat material. It is designed to contain a flat object, such as a letter or card.
Stamp or Stamps or Stamping may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Wallet Card".
An identity document is a document proving a person's identity.
A coin is a small object, usually round and flat, used primarily as a medium of exchange or legal tender. They are standardized in weight, and produced in large quantities at a mint in order to facilitate trade. They are most often issued by a government. Coins often have images, numerals, or text on them. The faces of coins or medals are sometimes called the obverse and the reverse, referring to the front and back sides, respectively. The obverse of a coin is commonly called heads, because it often depicts the head of a prominent person, and the reverse is known as tails.
Could not find summary for "Water Filter".
Could not find summary for "Dish Sponge".
Could not find summary for "Cutting Board".
Pan or PAN may refer to:.
Pot may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Oven Mitt".
A measuring cup is a kitchen utensil used primarily to measure the volume of liquid or bulk solid cooking ingredients such as flour and sugar, especially for volumes from about 50 mL upwards. Measuring cups are also used to measure washing powder, liquid detergents and bleach for clothes washing. Some measuring cups will have a scale marked in cups and fractions of a cup, and often with fluid measure and weight of a selection of dry foodstuffs. Others are made to a specific capacity and are designed to be filled to the top with dry ingredients.
Could not find summary for "Measuring Spoon".
Quantum mechanics is the fundamental physical theory that describes the behavior of matter and of light; its unusual characteristics typically occur at and below the scale of atoms. It is the foundation of all quantum physics, which includes quantum chemistry, quantum biology, quantum field theory, quantum technology, and quantum information science.
General relativity, also known as the general theory of relativity, and as Einstein's theory of gravity, is the geometric theory of gravitation published by Albert Einstein in May 1916 and is the accepted description of the gravitation of macroscopic objects in modern physics. General relativity generalizes special relativity and refines Isaac Newton's law of universal gravitation, providing a unified description of gravity as a geometric property of space and time, or four-dimensional spacetime. In particular, the curvature of spacetime is directly related to the energy, momentum, and stress of whatever is present, including matter and radiation. The relation is specified by the Einstein field equations, a system of second-order partial differential equations. John Archibald Wheeler summarized it: "Space-time tells matter how to move; matter tells space-time how to curve.".
In physics, the special theory of relativity, or special relativity for short, is a scientific theory of the relationship between space and time. In Albert Einstein's 1905 paper,
"On the Electrodynamics of Moving Bodies", the theory is presented as being based on just two postulates:The laws of physics are invariant (identical) in all inertial frames of reference. This is known as the principle of relativity.
The speed of light in vacuum is the same for all observers, regardless of the motion of light source or observer. This is known as the principle of light constancy, or the principle of light speed invariance.
In physics, classical mechanics is a theory that describes the effect of forces on the motion of macroscopic objects and bulk matter, without considering quantum effects, and often without incorporating relativistic effects either.
Thermodynamics is a branch of physics that deals with heat, work, and temperature, and their relation to energy, entropy, and the physical properties of matter and radiation. The behavior of these quantities is governed by the four laws of thermodynamics, which convey a quantitative description using measurable macroscopic physical quantities but may be explained in terms of microscopic constituents by statistical mechanics. Thermodynamics applies to various topics in science and engineering, especially physical chemistry, biochemistry, chemical engineering, and mechanical engineering, as well as other complex fields such as meteorology.
In physics, statistical mechanics is a mathematical framework that applies statistical methods and probability theory to large assemblies of microscopic entities. Sometimes called statistical physics or statistical thermodynamics, its applications include many problems in a wide variety of fields such as biology, neuroscience, computer science, information theory and sociology. Its main purpose is to clarify the properties of matter in aggregate, in terms of physical laws governing atomic motion.
In physics, electromagnetism is an interaction that occurs between particles with electric charge via electromagnetic fields. The electromagnetic force is one of the four fundamental forces of nature. It is the dominant force in the interactions of atoms and molecules. Electromagnetism can be thought of as a combination of electrostatics and magnetism, which are distinct but closely intertwined phenomena. Electromagnetic forces occur between any two charged particles. Electric forces cause an attraction between particles with opposite charges and repulsion between particles with the same charge, while magnetism is an interaction that occurs between charged particles in relative motion. These two forces are described in terms of electromagnetic fields. Macroscopic charged objects are described in terms of Coulomb's law for electricity and Ampère's force law for magnetism; the Lorentz force describes microscopic charged particles.
In theoretical physics, quantum field theory (QFT) is a theoretical framework that combines field theory, special relativity and quantum mechanics. QFT is used in particle physics to construct physical models of subatomic particles and in condensed matter physics to construct models of quasiparticles. The current standard model of particle physics is based on QFT.
Particle physics or high-energy physics is the study of fundamental particles and forces that constitute matter and radiation. The field also studies combinations of elementary particles up to the scale of protons and neutrons, while the study of combinations of protons and neutrons is called nuclear physics.
Nuclear physics is the field of physics that studies atomic nuclei and their constituents and interactions, in addition to the study of other forms of nuclear matter.
Astrophysics is a science that applies the methods and principles of physics and chemistry in the study of astronomical objects and phenomena including the universe. As one of the founders of the discipline, James Keeler, said, astrophysics "seeks to ascertain the nature of the heavenly bodies, rather than their positions or motions in space—what they are, rather than where they are", which is studied in celestial mechanics.
Cosmology is the study of the nature of the universe, the cosmos. The term cosmology was first used in English in 1656 in Thomas Blount's Glossographia, with the meaning of "a speaking of the world". In 1731, German philosopher Christian Wolff used the term cosmology in Latin (cosmologia) to denote a branch of metaphysics that deals with the general nature of the physical world. Cosmology is investigated by scientists, including astronomers and physicists, as well as philosophers, such as metaphysicians, philosophers of physics, and philosophers of space and time. Because of this shared scope with philosophy, theories in physical cosmology may include both scientific and non-scientific propositions and may depend upon assumptions that cannot be tested. Religious or mythological cosmology is a body of beliefs based on mythological, religious, and esoteric literature and traditions of creation myths and eschatology.
Stellar evolution is the process by which a star changes over the course of time. Depending on the mass of the star, its lifetime can range from a few million years for the most massive to trillions of years for the least massive, which is considerably longer than the current age of the universe. The table shows the lifetimes of stars as a function of their masses. All stars are formed from collapsing clouds of gas and dust, often called nebulae or molecular clouds. Over the course of millions of years, these protostars settle down into a state of equilibrium, becoming what is known as a main sequence star.
Planetary science is the scientific study of planets, celestial bodies and planetary systems and the processes of their formation. It studies objects ranging in sizes from micrometeoroids to huge gas giants, with the aim of determining their composition, dynamics, formation, interrelations and history. It is a strongly interdisciplinary field, which originally grew from astronomy and Earth science, and now incorporates many disciplines, including planetary geology, cosmochemistry, atmospheric science, physics, oceanography, hydrology, theoretical planetary science, glaciology, and exoplanetology. Allied disciplines include space physics, when concerned with the effects of the Sun on the bodies of the Solar System, and astrobiology.
Could not find summary for "Exoplanet Research".
Could not find summary for "Galactic Dynamics".
Could not find summary for "Black Hole Physics".
In physics, string theory is a theoretical framework in which the point-like particles of particle physics are replaced by one-dimensional objects called strings. String theory describes how these strings propagate through space and interact with each other. On distance scales larger than the string scale, a string acts like a particle, with its mass, charge, and other properties determined by the vibrational state of the string. In string theory, one of the many vibrational states of the string corresponds to the graviton, a quantum mechanical particle that carries the gravitational force. Thus, string theory is a theory of quantum gravity.
Chaos theory is an interdisciplinary area of scientific study and branch of mathematics. It focuses on underlying patterns and deterministic laws of dynamical systems that are highly sensitive to initial conditions. These were once thought to have completely random states of disorder and irregularities. Chaos theory states that within the apparent randomness of chaotic complex systems, there are underlying patterns, interconnection, constant feedback loops, repetition, self-similarity, fractals and self-organization. The butterfly effect, an underlying principle of chaos, describes how a small change in one state of a deterministic nonlinear system can result in large differences in a later state. A metaphor for this behavior is that a butterfly flapping its wings in Brazil can cause or prevent a tornado in Texas.
A complex system is a system composed of many components that interact with one another. Examples of complex systems are Earth's global climate, organisms, the human brain, infrastructure such as power grid, transportation or communication systems, complex software and electronic systems, social and economic organizations, an ecosystem, a living cell, and, ultimately, for some authors, the entire universe.
Evolutionary biology is a subfield of biology that analyzes the four mechanisms of evolution: natural selection, mutation, genetic drift, and gene flow. The purpose of evolutionary biology is to observe the diversity of life on Earth. The idea of natural selection was first researched by Charles Darwin as he studied bird beaks. The discipline of evolutionary biology emerged through what Julian Huxley called the modern synthesis of understanding, from previously unrelated fields of biological research, such as genetics and ecology, systematics, and paleontology. Huxley was able to take what Charles Darwin discovered and elaborate to build on his understandings.
Genetics is the study of genes, genetic variation, and heredity in organisms. It is an important branch in biology because heredity is vital to organisms' evolution. Gregor Mendel, a Moravian Augustinian friar working in the 19th century in Brno, was the first to study genetics scientifically. Mendel studied "trait inheritance", patterns in the way traits are handed down from parents to offspring over time. He observed that organisms inherit traits by way of discrete "units of inheritance". This term, still used today, is a somewhat ambiguous definition of what is referred to as a gene.
Molecular biology is a branch of biology that seeks to understand the molecular structures and chemical processes that are the basis of biological activity within and between cells. It is centered largely on the study of nucleic acids and proteins. It examines the structure, function, and interactions of these macromolecules as they orchestrate processes such as replication, transcription, translation, protein synthesis, and complex biomolecular interactions. The field of molecular biology is multi-disciplinary, relying on principles from genetics, biochemistry, physics, mathematics, and more recently computer science (bioinformatics).
Cell biology, cellular biology, or cytology, is the branch of biology that studies the structure, function, and behavior of the cells. All organisms are made of cells. A cell is the basic unit of life that is responsible for the living and functioning of an organism. Cell biology encompasses both prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells, with subtopics including the study of cell metabolism, cell communication, cell cycle, biochemistry, and cell composition.
Neuroscience is the scientific study of the nervous system, its functions, and its disorders. It is a multidisciplinary science that combines physiology, anatomy, molecular biology, developmental biology, cytology, psychology, physics, computer science, chemistry, medicine, statistics, and mathematical modeling to understand the fundamental and emergent properties of neurons, glia, and neural circuits. The understanding of the biological basis of learning, memory, behavior, perception, and consciousness has been described by Eric Kandel as the "epic challenge" of the biological sciences.

Cognitive science is the interdisciplinary, scientific study of the mind and its processes. It examines the nature, the tasks, and the functions of cognition. Mental faculties of concern to cognitive scientists include perception, memory, attention, reasoning, language, and emotion. To understand these faculties, cognitive scientists borrow from fields such as psychology, philosophy, artificial intelligence, neuroscience, linguistics, and anthropology. The typical analysis of cognitive science spans many levels of organization, from learning and decision-making to logic and planning; from neural circuitry to modular brain organization. One of the fundamental concepts of cognitive science is that "thinking can best be understood in terms of representational structures in the mind and computational procedures that operate on those structures.".
Biochemistry, or biological chemistry, is the study of chemical processes within and relating to living organisms. A sub-discipline of both chemistry and biology, biochemistry may be divided into three fields: structural biology, enzymology, and metabolism. Over the last decades of the 20th century, biochemistry has become successful at explaining living processes through these three disciplines. Almost all areas of the life sciences are being uncovered and developed through biochemical methodology and research. Biochemistry focuses on understanding the chemical basis that allows biological molecules to give rise to the processes that occur within living cells and between cells, in turn relating greatly to the understanding of tissues and organs as well as organism structure and function. Biochemistry is closely related to molecular biology, the study of the molecular mechanisms of biological phenomena.
Biophysics is an interdisciplinary science that applies approaches and methods traditionally used in physics to study biological phenomena.
Microbiology is the scientific study of microorganisms, those being of unicellular (single-celled), multicellular, or acellular. Microbiology encompasses numerous sub-disciplines including virology, bacteriology, protistology, mycology, immunology, and parasitology.
Virology is the scientific study of biological viruses. It is a subfield of microbiology that focuses on their detection, structure, classification and evolution, their methods of infection and exploitation of host cells for reproduction, their interaction with host organism physiology and immunity, the diseases they cause, the techniques to isolate and culture them, and their use in research and therapy.
Immunology is a branch of biology and medicine that covers the study of immune systems in all organisms.
Ecology is the natural science of the relationships among living organisms and their environment. Ecology considers organisms at the individual, population, community, ecosystem, and biosphere levels. Ecology overlaps with the closely related sciences of biogeography, evolutionary biology, genetics, ethology, and natural history.
Environmental science is an academic field that integrates the physical, biological, and mathematical sciences to study the environment and solve environmental problems. It uses an integrated, quantitative, and interdisciplinary approach to analyze environmental systems and emerged from the fields of natural history and medicine during the Enlightenment. It is considered interdisciplinary because it is an integration of various fields such as: biology, chemistry, physics, geology, engineering, sociology, and ecology.
Climatology or climate science is the scientific study of Earth's climate, typically defined as weather conditions averaged over a period of at least 30 years. Climate concerns the atmospheric condition during an extended to indefinite period of time; weather is the condition of the atmosphere during a relative brief period of time. The main topics of research are the study of climate variability, mechanisms of climate changes and modern climate change. This topic of study is regarded as part of the atmospheric sciences and a subdivision of physical geography, which is one of the Earth sciences. Climatology includes some aspects of oceanography and biogeochemistry.
Oceanography, also known as oceanology, sea science, ocean science, and marine science, is the scientific study of the ocean, including its physics, chemistry, biology, and geology.
Geology is a branch of natural science concerned with the Earth and other astronomical bodies, the rocks of which they are composed, and the processes by which they change over time. The name comes from Ancient Greek  γῆ (gê) 'earth' and  λoγία (-logía) 'study of, discourse'. Modern geology significantly overlaps all other Earth sciences, including hydrology. It is integrated with Earth system science and planetary science.
Volcanology is the study of volcanoes, lava, magma and related geological, geophysical and geochemical phenomena (volcanism). The term volcanology is derived from the Latin word vulcan. Vulcan was the ancient Roman god of fire.
Seismology is the scientific study of earthquakes and the generation and propagation of elastic waves through planetary bodies. It also includes studies of the environmental effects of earthquakes such as tsunamis; other seismic sources such as volcanoes, plate tectonics, glaciers, rivers, oceanic microseisms, and the atmosphere; and artificial processes such as explosions.
Paleontology or palaeontology is the scientific study of the life of the past, mainly but not exclusively through the study of fossils. Paleontologists use fossils as a means to classify organisms, measure geologic time, and assess the interactions between prehistoric organisms and their natural environment. While paleontological observations are known from at least the 6th century BC, the foundation of paleontology as a science dates back to the work of Georges Cuvier in 1796. Cuvier demonstrated evidence for the concept of extinction and how the life of the past was not necessarily the same as that of the present. The field developed rapidly over the course of the following decades, and the French word paléontologie was introduced for the study in 1822, which was derived from the Ancient Greek word for 'ancient' and words describing relatedness and a field of study. Further advances in the field accompanied the work of Charles Darwin who popularized the concept of evolution. Together, evolution and extinction can be understood as complementary processes that shaped the history of life.
Archaeology or archeology is the study of human activity through the recovery and analysis of material culture. The archaeological record consists of artifacts, architecture, biofacts or ecofacts, sites, and cultural landscapes. Archaeology can be considered both a social science and a branch of the humanities. It is usually considered an independent academic discipline, but may also be classified as part of anthropology, history or geography. The discipline involves surveying, excavation, and eventually analysis of data collected, to learn more about the past. In broad scope, archaeology relies on cross-disciplinary research.
Anthropology is the scientific study of humanity that crosses biology and sociology, concerned with human behavior, human biology, cultures, societies, and linguistics, in both the present and past, including archaic humans. Social anthropology studies patterns of behaviour, while cultural anthropology studies cultural meaning, including norms and values. The term sociocultural anthropology is commonly used today. Linguistic anthropology studies how language influences social life. Biological anthropology studies the biology and evolution of humans and their close primate relatives.
Materials science is an interdisciplinary field of researching and discovering materials. Materials engineering is an engineering field of finding uses for materials in other fields and industries.
Nanotechnology is the manipulation of matter with at least one dimension sized from 1 to 100 nanometers (nm). At this scale, commonly known as the nanoscale, surface area and quantum mechanical effects become important in describing properties of matter. This definition of nanotechnology includes all types of research and technologies that deal with these special properties. It is common to see the plural form "nanotechnologies" as well as "nanoscale technologies" to refer to research and applications whose common trait is scale. An earlier understanding of nanotechnology referred to the particular technological goal of precisely manipulating atoms and molecules for fabricating macroscale products, now referred to as molecular nanotechnology.
Polymer science or macromolecular science is a subfield of materials science concerned with polymers, primarily synthetic polymers such as plastics and elastomers. The field of polymer science includes researchers in multiple disciplines including chemistry, physics, and engineering.
Crystallography is the branch of science devoted to the study of molecular and crystalline structure and properties. The word crystallography is derived from the Ancient Greek word κρύσταλλος, and γράφειν. In July 2012, the United Nations recognised the importance of the science of crystallography by proclaiming 2014 the International Year of Crystallography.
Organic chemistry is a subdiscipline within chemistry involving the scientific study of the structure, properties, and reactions of organic compounds and organic materials. It involves studying the structure of organic material to determine the structural formula, analyzing physical and chemical properties, and evaluating chemical reactivity to understand the behavior of organic compounds. The study of organic reactions includes the chemical synthesis of natural products, drugs, and polymers, and study of individual organic molecules in the laboratory and via theoretical study.
Inorganic chemistry deals with synthesis and behavior of inorganic and organometallic compounds. This field covers chemical compounds that are not carbon-based, which are the subjects of organic chemistry. The distinction between the two disciplines is far from absolute, as there is much overlap in the subdiscipline of organometallic chemistry. It has applications in every aspect of the chemical industry, including catalysis, materials science, pigments, surfactants, coatings, medications, fuels, and agriculture.
Physical chemistry is the study of macroscopic and microscopic phenomena in chemical systems in terms of the principles, practices, and concepts of physics such as motion, energy, force, time, thermodynamics, quantum chemistry, statistical mechanics, analytical dynamics and chemical equilibria.
Analytical chemistry is the branch of chemistry concerned with the development and application of methods to identify the chemical composition of materials and quantify the amounts of components in mixtures. It focuses on methods to identify unknown compounds, possibly in a mixture or solution, and quantify a compound's presence in terms of amount of substance, concentration, percentage by mass or number of moles in a mixture of compounds.
Computational chemistry is a branch of chemistry that uses computer simulations to assist in solving chemical problems. It uses methods of theoretical chemistry incorporated into computer programs to calculate the structures and properties of molecules, groups of molecules, and solids. The importance of this subject stems from the fact that, with the exception of some relatively recent findings related to the hydrogen molecular ion, achieving an accurate quantum mechanical depiction of chemical systems analytically, or in a closed form, is not feasible. The complexity inherent in the many-body problem exacerbates the challenge of providing detailed descriptions of quantum mechanical systems. While computational results normally complement information obtained by chemical experiments, it can occasionally predict unobserved chemical phenomena.
Artificial intelligence (AI) is the capability of computational systems to perform tasks typically associated with human intelligence, such as learning, reasoning, problem-solving, perception, and decision-making. It is a field of research in computer science that develops and studies methods and software that enable machines to perceive their environment and use learning and intelligence to take actions that maximize their chances of achieving defined goals.
Machine learning (ML) is a field of study in artificial intelligence concerned with the development and study of statistical algorithms that can learn from data and generalize to unseen data, and thus perform tasks without explicit instructions. Within a subdiscipline in machine learning, advances in the field of deep learning have allowed neural networks, a class of statistical algorithms, to surpass many previous machine learning approaches in performance.
In machine learning, deep learning (DL) focuses on utilizing multilayered neural networks to perform tasks such as classification, regression, and representation learning. The field takes inspiration from biological neuroscience and revolves around stacking artificial neurons into layers and "training" them to process data. The adjective "deep" refers to the use of multiple layers in the network. Methods used can be supervised, semi-supervised or unsupervised.
Computer vision tasks include methods for acquiring, processing, analyzing, and understanding digital images, and extraction of high-dimensional data from the real world in order to produce numerical or symbolic information, e.g. in the form of decisions. "Understanding" in this context signifies the transformation of visual images into descriptions of the world that make sense to thought processes and can elicit appropriate action. This image understanding can be seen as the disentangling of symbolic information from image data using models constructed with the aid of geometry, physics, statistics, and learning theory.
Natural language processing (NLP) is the processing of natural language information by a computer. NLP is a subfield of computer science and is closely associated with artificial intelligence. NLP is also related to information retrieval, knowledge representation, computational linguistics, and linguistics more broadly.
Robotics is the interdisciplinary study and practice of the design, construction, operation, and use of robots. A roboticist is someone who specializes in robotics. Robotics usually combines four aspects of design work: a power source, mechanical construction, a control system, and software.
Cybernetics is the transdisciplinary study of circular causal processes such as feedback and recursion, where the effects of a system's actions return as inputs to that system, influencing subsequent actions. It is concerned with general principles that are relevant across multiple contexts, including engineering, ecological, economic, biological, cognitive and social systems and also in practical activities such as designing, learning, and managing. Cybernetics' transdisciplinary character means that it intersects with a number of other fields, resulting in a wide influence and diverse interpretations.
Information theory is the mathematical study of the quantification, storage, and communication of a particular type of mathematically defined information. The field was established and formalized by Claude Shannon in the 1940s, though early contributions were made in the 1920s through the works of Harry Nyquist and Ralph Hartley. It is at the intersection of electronic engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science, neurobiology, physics, and electrical engineering.
Cryptography, or cryptology, is the practice and study of techniques for secure communication in the presence of adversarial behavior. More generally, cryptography is about constructing and analyzing protocols that prevent third parties or the public from reading private messages. Modern cryptography exists at the intersection of the disciplines of mathematics, computer science, information security, electrical engineering, digital signal processing, physics, and others. Core concepts related to information security are also central to cryptography. Practical applications of cryptography include electronic commerce, chip-based payment cards, digital currencies, computer passwords and military communications.
A quantum computer is a computer that exploits superposed and entangled states. Quantum computers can be viewed as sampling from quantum systems. These systems evolve in ways that operate on an enormous number of possibilities simultaneously, though they remain subject to strict computational constraints. By contrast, ordinary ("classical") computers operate according to deterministic rules. It is widely believed that a quantum computer could perform some calculations exponentially faster than any classical computer. For example, a large-scale quantum computer could break some widely used public-key cryptographic schemes and aid physicists in performing physical simulations. However, current hardware implementations of quantum computation are largely experimental and only suitable for specialized tasks.
Bioinformatics is an interdisciplinary field of science that develops computational methods and software tools for understanding biological data, especially when the data sets are large and complex. Bioinformatics uses biology, chemistry, physics, computer science, data science, computer programming, information engineering, mathematics and statistics to analyze and interpret biological data. This process can sometimes be referred to as computational biology, however the distinction between the two terms is often disputed. To some, the term computational biology refers to building and using models of biological systems.
Systems biology is the computational and mathematical analysis and modeling of complex biological systems. It is a biology-based interdisciplinary field of study that focuses on complex interactions within biological systems, using a holistic approach to biological research. This multifaceted research domain necessitates the collaborative efforts of chemists, biologists, mathematicians, physicists, and engineers to decipher the biology of intricate living systems by merging various quantitative molecular measurements with carefully constructed mathematical models. It represents a comprehensive method for comprehending the complex relationships within biological systems. In contrast to conventional biological studies that typically center on isolated elements, systems biology seeks to combine different biological data to create models that illustrate and elucidate the dynamic interactions within a system. This methodology is essential for understanding the complex networks of genes, proteins, and metabolites that influence cellular activities and the traits of organisms. One of the aims of systems biology is to model and discover emergent properties, of cells, tissues and organisms functioning as a system whose theoretical description is only possible using techniques of systems biology. By exploring how function emerges from dynamic interactions, systems biology bridges the gaps that exist between molecules and physiological processes.
Synthetic biology (SynBio) is a multidisciplinary field of science that focuses on living systems and organisms. It applies engineering principles to develop new biological parts, devices, and systems or to redesign existing systems found in nature.
Genetic engineering, also called genetic modification or genetic manipulation, is the modification and manipulation of an organism's genes using technology. It is a set of technologies used to change the genetic makeup of cells, including the transfer of genes within and across species boundaries to produce improved or novel organisms. New DNA is obtained by either isolating and copying the genetic material of interest using recombinant DNA methods or by artificially synthesising the DNA. A construct is usually created and used to insert this DNA into the host organism. The first recombinant DNA molecule was designed by Paul Berg in 1972 by combining DNA from the monkey virus SV40 with the lambda virus. As well as inserting genes, the process can be used to remove, or "knock out", genes. The new DNA can either be inserted randomly or targeted to a specific part of the genome.
Could not find summary for "CRISPR Technology".
Pharmacology is the science of drugs and medications, including a substance's origin, composition, pharmacokinetics, pharmacodynamics, therapeutic use, and toxicology. More specifically, it is the study of the interactions that occur between a living organism and chemicals that affect normal or abnormal biochemical function. If substances have medicinal properties, they are considered pharmaceuticals.
Toxicology is a scientific discipline, overlapping with biology, chemistry, pharmacology, and medicine, that involves the study of the adverse effects of chemical substances on living organisms and the practice of diagnosing and treating exposures to toxins and toxicants. The relationship between dose and its effects on the exposed organism is of high significance in toxicology. Factors that influence chemical toxicity include the dosage, duration of exposure, route of exposure, species, age, sex, and environment. Toxicologists are experts on poisons and poisoning. There is a movement for evidence-based toxicology as part of the larger movement towards evidence-based practices. Toxicology is currently contributing to the field of cancer research, since some toxins can be used as drugs for killing tumor cells. One prime example of this is ribosome-inactivating proteins, tested in the treatment of leukemia.
Neuropharmacology is the study of how drugs affect function in the nervous system, and the neural mechanisms through which they influence behavior. There are two main branches of neuropharmacology: behavioral and molecular. Behavioral neuropharmacology focuses on the study of how drugs affect human behavior (neuropsychopharmacology), including the study of how drug dependence and addiction affect the human brain. Molecular neuropharmacology involves the study of neurons and their neurochemical interactions, with the overall goal of developing drugs that have beneficial effects on neurological function. Both of these fields are closely connected, since both are concerned with the interactions of neurotransmitters, neuropeptides, neurohormones, neuromodulators, enzymes, second messengers, co-transporters, ion channels, and receptor proteins in the central and peripheral nervous systems. Studying these interactions, researchers are developing drugs to treat many different neurological disorders, including pain, neurodegenerative diseases such as Parkinson's disease and Alzheimer's disease, psychological disorders, addiction, and many others.
Astronomy is a natural science that studies celestial objects and the phenomena that occur in the cosmos. It uses mathematics, physics, and chemistry to explain their origin and their overall evolution. Objects of interest include planets, moons, stars, nebulae, galaxies, meteoroids, asteroids, and comets. Relevant phenomena include supernova explosions, gamma ray bursts, quasars, blazars, pulsars, and cosmic microwave background radiation. More generally, astronomy studies everything that originates beyond Earth's atmosphere. Cosmology is the branch of astronomy that studies the universe as a whole.
Radio astronomy is a subfield of astronomy that studies celestial objects using radio waves. It started in 1933, when Karl Jansky at Bell Telephone Laboratories reported radiation coming from the Milky Way. Subsequent observations have identified a number of different sources of radio emission. These include stars and galaxies, as well as entirely new classes of objects, such as radio galaxies, quasars, pulsars, and masers. The discovery of the cosmic microwave background radiation, regarded as evidence for the Big Bang theory, was made through radio astronomy.
Optics is the branch of physics that studies the behaviour, manipulation, and detection of electromagnetic radiation, including its interactions with matter and instruments that use or detect it. Optics usually describes the behaviour of visible, ultraviolet, and infrared light. The study of optics extends to other forms of electromagnetic radiation, including radio waves, microwaves,
and X-rays. The term optics is also applied to technology for manipulating beams of elementary charged particles.
Photonics is a branch of optics that involves the application of generation, detection, and manipulation of light in the form of photons through emission, transmission, modulation, signal processing, switching, amplification, and sensing. Even though photonics is a commonly used term, there is no widespread agreement on a clear definition of the term or on the difference between photonics and related fields, such as optics.
Acoustics is a branch of continuum mechanics that deals with the study of mechanical waves in gases, liquids, and solids including topics such as vibration, sound, ultrasound and infrasound. A scientist who works in the field of acoustics is an acoustician while someone working in the field of acoustics technology may be called an acoustical engineer. The application of acoustics is present in almost all aspects of modern society with the most obvious being the audio and noise control industries.
In physics, physical chemistry, and engineering, fluid dynamics is a subdiscipline of fluid mechanics that describes the flow of fluids – liquids and gases. It has several subdisciplines, including aerodynamics and hydrodynamics. Fluid dynamics has a wide range of applications, including calculating forces and moments on aircraft, determining the mass flow rate of petroleum through pipelines, predicting weather patterns, understanding nebulae in interstellar space, understanding large scale geophysical flows involving oceans/atmosphere and modelling fission weapon detonation.
Aerodynamics is the study of the motion of air, particularly when affected by a solid object, such as an airplane wing. It involves topics covered in the field of fluid dynamics and its subfield of gas dynamics, and is an important domain of study in aeronautics. The term aerodynamics is often used synonymously with gas dynamics, the difference being that "gas dynamics" applies to the study of the motion of all gases, and is not limited to air. The formal study of aerodynamics began in the modern sense in the eighteenth century, although observations of fundamental concepts such as aerodynamic drag were recorded much earlier. Most of the early efforts in aerodynamics were directed toward achieving heavier-than-air flight, which was first demonstrated by Otto Lilienthal in 1891. Since then, the use of aerodynamics through mathematical analysis, empirical approximations, wind tunnel experimentation, and computer simulations has formed a rational basis for the development of heavier-than-air flight and a number of other technologies. Recent work in aerodynamics has focused on issues related to compressible flow, turbulence, and boundary layers and has become increasingly computational in nature.
Plasma is a state of matter that results from a gaseous state having undergone some degree of ionization. It thus consists of a significant portion of charged particles. While rarely encountered on Earth, it is estimated that 99.9% of all ordinary matter in the universe is plasma. Stars are almost pure balls of plasma, and plasma dominates the rarefied intracluster medium and intergalactic medium. Plasma can be artificially generated, for example, by heating a neutral gas or subjecting it to a strong electromagnetic field.
Could not find summary for "Energy Science".
Renewable energy is energy made from renewable natural resources that are replenished on a human timescale. The most widely used renewable energy types are solar energy, wind power, and hydropower. Bioenergy and geothermal power are also significant in some countries. Renewable energy installations can be large or small and are suited for both urban and rural areas. Renewable energy is often deployed together with further electrification. This has several benefits: electricity can move heat and vehicles efficiently and is clean at the point of consumption. Variable renewable energy sources are those that have a fluctuating nature, such as wind power and solar power. In contrast, controllable renewable energy sources include dammed hydroelectricity, bioenergy, or geothermal power.
Nuclear fusion is a reaction in which two or more atomic nuclei combine to form a larger nucleus. The difference in mass between the reactants and products is manifested as either the release or the absorption of energy. This difference in mass arises as a result of the difference in nuclear binding energy between the atomic nuclei before and after the fusion reaction. Nuclear fusion is the process that powers all active stars, via many reaction pathways.
Could not find summary for "Space Engineering".
Aerospace engineering is the primary field of engineering concerned with the development of aircraft and spacecraft. It has two major and overlapping branches: aeronautical engineering and astronautical engineering. Avionics engineering is similar, but deals with the electronics side of aerospace engineering.
The American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) is an American professional association that, in its own words, "promotes the art, science, and practice of multidisciplinary engineering and allied sciences around the globe" via "continuing education, training and professional development, codes and standards, research, conferences and publications, government relations, and other forms of outreach." ASME is thus an engineering society, a standards organization, a research and development organization, an advocacy organization, a provider of training and education, and a nonprofit organization. Founded as an engineering society focused on mechanical engineering in North America, ASME is today multidisciplinary and global.
Electrical engineering is an engineering discipline concerned with the study, design, and application of equipment, devices, and systems that use electricity, electronics, and electromagnetism. It emerged as an identifiable occupation in the latter half of the 19th century after the commercialization of the electric telegraph, the telephone, and electrical power generation, distribution, and use.
Chemical engineering is an engineering field which deals with the study of the operation and design of chemical plants as well as methods of improving production. Chemical engineers develop economical commercial processes to convert raw materials into useful products. Chemical engineering uses principles of chemistry, physics, mathematics, biology, and economics to efficiently use, produce, design, transport and transform energy and materials. The work of chemical engineers can range from the utilization of nanotechnology and nanomaterials in the laboratory to large-scale industrial processes that convert chemicals, raw materials, living cells, microorganisms, and energy into useful forms and products. Chemical engineers are involved in many aspects of plant design and operation, including safety and hazard assessments, process design and analysis, modeling, control engineering, chemical reaction engineering, nuclear engineering, biological engineering, construction specification, and operating instructions.
Biomedical engineering (BME) or medical engineering is the application of engineering principles and design concepts to medicine and biology for healthcare applications. BME also integrates the logical sciences to advance health care treatment, including diagnosis, monitoring, and therapy. Also included under the scope of a biomedical engineer is the management of current medical equipment in hospitals while adhering to relevant industry standards. This involves procurement, routine testing, preventive maintenance, and making equipment recommendations, a role also known as a Biomedical Equipment Technician (BMET) or as a clinical engineer.
Civil Engineering is a professional engineering discipline that deals with the design, construction, and maintenance of the physical and naturally built environment, including public works such as roads, bridges, canals, dams, airports, sewage systems, pipelines, structural components of buildings, and railways.
Structural engineering is a sub-discipline of civil engineering in which structural engineers are trained to design the 'bones and joints' that create the form and shape of human-made structures. Structural engineers also must understand and calculate the stability, strength, rigidity and earthquake-susceptibility of built structures for buildings and nonbuilding structures. The structural designs are integrated with those of other designers such as architects and building services engineer and often supervise the construction of projects by contractors on site. They can also be involved in the design of machinery, medical equipment, and vehicles where structural integrity affects functioning and safety. See glossary of structural engineering.

A mathematical model is an abstract description of a concrete system using mathematical concepts and language. The process of developing a mathematical model is termed mathematical modeling. Mathematical models are used in many fields, including applied mathematics, natural sciences, social sciences and engineering. In particular, the field of operations research studies the use of mathematical modelling and related tools to solve problems in business or military operations. A model may help to characterize a system by studying the effects of different components, which may be used to make predictions about behavior or solve specific problems.
Topology is the branch of mathematics concerned with the properties of a geometric object that are preserved under continuous deformations, such as stretching, twisting, crumpling, and bending; that is, without closing holes, opening holes, tearing, gluing, or passing through itself.
Number theory is a branch of pure mathematics devoted primarily to the study of the integers and arithmetic functions. Number theorists study prime numbers as well as the properties of mathematical objects constructed from integers, or defined as generalizations of the integers.
Probability theory or probability calculus is the branch of mathematics concerned with probability. Although there are several different probability interpretations, probability theory treats the concept in a rigorous mathematical manner by expressing it through a set of axioms. Typically these axioms formalise probability in terms of a probability space, which assigns a measure taking values between 0 and 1, termed the probability measure, to a set of outcomes called the sample space. Any specified subset of the sample space is called an event.
Game theory is the study of mathematical models of strategic interactions. It has applications in many fields of social science, and is used extensively in economics, logic, systems science and computer science. Initially, game theory addressed two-person zero-sum games, in which a participant's gains or losses are exactly balanced by the losses and gains of the other participant. In the 1950s, it was extended to the study of non zero-sum games, and was eventually applied to a wide range of behavioral relations. It is now an umbrella term for the science of rational decision making in humans, animals, and computers.
Econometrics is an application of statistical methods to economic data in order to give empirical content to economic relationships. More precisely, it is "the quantitative analysis of actual economic phenomena based on the concurrent development of theory and observation, related by appropriate methods of inference." An introductory economics textbook describes econometrics as allowing economists "to sift through mountains of data to extract simple relationships." Jan Tinbergen is one of the two founding fathers of econometrics. The other, Ragnar Frisch, also coined the term in the sense in which it is used today.
Social physics or sociophysics is an interdisciplinary field of science which uses mathematical tools inspired by physics to understand the behavior of human crowds. In a modern commercial use, it can also refer to the analysis of social phenomena with big data.

Behavioural science is the branch of science concerned with theorizing on, categorizing, and judging human behaviour. It sits in the interstice between fields such as psychology, cognitive science, neuroscience, behavioral biology, behavioral genetics and social science. While the term can technically be applied to the study of behaviour amongst all living organisms, it is nearly always used with reference to humans as the primary target of investigation.
Linguistics is the scientific study of language. The areas of linguistic analysis are syntax, semantics (meaning), morphology, phonetics, phonology, and pragmatics. Subdisciplines such as biolinguistics and psycholinguistics bridge many of these divisions.
Could not find summary for "Cognitive Robotics".
Astrobiology is a scientific field within the life and environmental sciences that studies the origins, early evolution, distribution, and future of life in the universe by investigating its deterministic conditions and contingent events. As a discipline, astrobiology is founded on the premise that life may exist beyond Earth.
Could not find summary for "Exochemistry".
Egypt, officially the Arab Republic of Egypt, is a country spanning the northeast corner of Africa and southwest corner of Asia via the Sinai Peninsula. It is bordered by the Mediterranean Sea to the north, Palestine and Israel to the northeast, the Red Sea to the east, Sudan and the Sahara to the south, and Libya to the west. The Gulf of Aqaba in the northeast separates Egypt from Jordan and Saudi Arabia. Cairo is the capital, largest city, and leading cultural centre, while Alexandria is the second-largest city and an important hub of industry and tourism. With over 107 million inhabitants, Egypt is the most populous country in the Arab world, third-most populous country in Africa, and 15th-most populated in the world.
Mesopotamia is a historical region of West Asia situated within the Tigris–Euphrates river system, in the northern part of the Fertile Crescent. It corresponds roughly to the territory of modern Iraq. Just beyond it lies southwestern Iran, where the region transitions into the Persian plateau, marking the shift from the Arab world to Iran.
Iran, officially the Islamic Republic of Iran, and also known as Persia, is a country in West Asia. It borders Iraq to the west, Turkey, Azerbaijan, and Armenia to the northwest, the Caspian Sea to the north, Turkmenistan to the northeast, Afghanistan to the east, Pakistan to the southeast, and the Gulf of Oman and the Persian Gulf to the south. With a population of over 90 million, Iran ranks 17th globally in both geographic size and population and is the sixth-largest country in Asia. It is divided into five regions with 31 provinces. Tehran is the nation's capital, largest city, and financial center.
Greece, officially the Hellenic Republic, is a country in Southeast Europe. Located on the southern tip of the Balkan peninsula, it shares land borders with Albania to the northwest, North Macedonia and Bulgaria to the north, and Turkey to the east. The Aegean Sea lies to the east of the mainland, the Ionian Sea to the west, and the Sea of Crete and the Mediterranean Sea to the south. Greece has the longest coastline on the Mediterranean basin, spanning thousands of islands and nine traditional geographic regions. It has a population of over 10 million. Athens is the nation's capital and largest city, followed by Thessaloniki and Patras.
Rome is the capital city and most populated comune (municipality) of Italy. It is also the administrative centre of the Lazio region and of the Metropolitan City of Rome. A special comune named Roma Capitale with a population of 2.7 million in an area of 1,287.36 km2 (497.1 mi2), Rome is the third most populous city in the European Union by population within city limits. The Metropolitan City of Rome Capital, with a population of 4.2 million, is the most populous metropolitan city in Italy. Its metropolitan area is the third-most populous within Italy. Rome is located in the central-western portion of the Italian Peninsula, within Lazio (Latium), along the shores of the Tiber Valley. Vatican City is an independent country inside the city boundaries of Rome, the only existing example of a country within a city. Rome is often referred to as the "City of Seven Hills" due to its geography, and also as the "Eternal City". Rome is generally considered to be one of the cradles of Western civilization and Western Christian culture, and the centre of the Catholic Church.
Byzantium or Byzantion was an ancient Greek city in classical antiquity that became known as Constantinople in late antiquity and Istanbul in modern times. The Greek name Byzantion and its Latinization Byzantium continued to be used as a name of Constantinople sporadically and to varying degrees during the thousand-year existence of the Eastern Roman Empire, which also became known by the former name of the city as the Byzantine Empire. Byzantium was colonized by Greeks from Megara in the 7th century BCE and remained primarily Greek-speaking until its conquest by the Ottoman Empire in 1453 CE.
Ottoman may refer to:Osman I, historically known in English as "Ottoman I", founder of the Ottoman Empire
Osman II, historically known in English as "Ottoman II"
Osman III, historically known in English as "Ottoman III"
Ottoman Empire 1299–1922
Ottoman dynasty, ruling family of the Ottoman Empire
Osmanoğlu family, modern members of the family
Ottoman Caliphate 1517–1924
Ottoman Turks, a Turkic ethnic group
Ottoman architecture
Ottoman bed, a type of storage bed
Ottoman (furniture), padded stool or footstool
Ottoman (textile), fabric with a pronounced ribbed or corded effect, often made of silk or a mixture.
Mongols are an East Asian ethnic group native to Mongolia and China, as well as the republics of Buryatia and Kalmykia in Russia. The Mongols are the principal member of the large family of Mongolic peoples. The Oirats and the Buryats are classified either as distinct ethno-linguistic groups or as subgroups of Mongols.
China, officially the People's Republic of China (PRC), is a country in East Asia. It is the second-most populous country after India, with a population exceeding 1.4 billion, representing 17% of the world's population. China borders fourteen countries by land across an area of 9.6 million square kilometers (3,700,000 sq mi), making it the third-largest country by area. The country is divided into 33 province-level divisions: 22 provinces, 5 autonomous regions, 4 municipalities, and 2 semi-autonomous special administrative regions. Beijing is the capital, while Shanghai is the most populous city by urban area and largest financial center.
Japan is an island country in East Asia. Located in the Pacific Ocean off the northeast coast of the Asian mainland, it is bordered to the west by the Sea of Japan and extends from the Sea of Okhotsk in the north to the East China Sea in the south. The Japanese archipelago consists of four major islands alongside 14,121 smaller islands. Japan is divided into 47 administrative prefectures and eight traditional regions, and around 75% of its terrain is mountainous and heavily forested, concentrating its agriculture and highly urbanized population along its eastern coastal plains. With a population of almost 123 million as of 2026, it is the world's 11th most populous country. Tokyo is the country's capital and largest city.
Korea is a peninsular region in East Asia consisting of the Korean Peninsula, Jeju Island, and smaller islands. Since the end of World War II in Asia in 1945, it has been politically divided at or near the 38th parallel between North Korea and South Korea. Both countries proclaimed independence in 1948, and the two countries fought the Korean War from 1950 to 1953. The region is bordered by China to the north and Russia to the northeast, across the Amnok (Yalu) and Duman (Tumen) rivers, and is separated from Japan to the southeast by the Korea Strait.
India, officially the Republic of India, is a country in South Asia. It is the seventh-largest country by area; the most populous country since 2023; and, since its independence in 1947, the world's most populous democracy. Bounded by the Indian Ocean on the south, the Arabian Sea on the southwest, and the Bay of Bengal on the southeast, it shares land borders with Pakistan to the west; China, Nepal, and Bhutan to the north; and Bangladesh and Myanmar to the east. In the Indian Ocean, India is near Sri Lanka and the Maldives; its Andaman and Nicobar Islands share a maritime border with Myanmar, Thailand, and Indonesia.
Maya may refer to:.
The Aztecs were a Mesoamerican civilization that flourished in central Mexico from 1300 to 1521. The Aztec people included different ethnic groups of central Mexico, particularly those groups who spoke the Nahuatl language. Aztec culture was organized into city-states (altepetl), some of which joined to form alliances, political confederations, or empires. The Aztec Empire was a confederation of three city-states established in 1427: Tenochtitlan, Tetzcoco, and Tlacopan, previously part of the Tepanec empire, whose dominant power was Azcapotzalco. Although the term Aztecs is often narrowly restricted to the Mexica of Tenochtitlan, it is also broadly used to refer to Nahua polities or peoples of central Mexico in the prehispanic era, as well as the Spanish colonial era (1521–1821).
The Inca Empire, officially known as the Realm of the Four Parts, was the largest empire in pre-Columbian America. The administrative, political, and military center of the empire was in the city of Cusco. The Inca civilisation rose from the Peruvian highlands sometime in the early 13th century. The Portuguese explorer Aleixo Garcia was the first European to reach the Inca Empire in 1524. Later, in 1532, the Spanish began the conquest of the Inca Empire, and by 1572 the last Inca state was fully conquered.
Vikings were a seafaring people originally from Scandinavia, who from the late 8th to the late 11th centuries raided, pirated, traded, and settled throughout parts of Europe. They voyaged as far as the Mediterranean, North Africa, the Middle East, Greenland, and Vinland. In their countries of origin, and in some of the countries they raided and settled, this period of activity is popularly known as the Viking Age, and the term "Viking" also commonly includes the inhabitants of the Scandinavian homelands as a whole during the late 8th to the mid-11th centuries. The Vikings had a profound impact on the early medieval history of northern and Eastern Europe, including the political and social development of England and parts of France, and the establishment of Kievan Rus', the ancestor of the later states of Belarus, Russia, and Ukraine.
The Crusades were a series of military campaigns launched by the papacy between 1095 and 1291 against Muslim rulers for the recovery and defence of the Holy Land, encouraged by promises of spiritual reward. The First Crusade was proclaimed by Pope Urban II at the Council of Clermont in November 1095—a call to arms for Christians to reconquer Jerusalem from the Muslims. By this time, the papacy's position as head of the Catholic Church had strengthened, and earlier conflicts with secular rulers and wars on the frontiers of Western Christendom had prepared it for the direction of armed force in religious causes. The successes of the First Crusade led to the establishment of four Crusader states in the Levant, where their defence required further expeditions from Catholic Europe. The organisation of such large-scale campaigns demanded complex religious, social, and economic institutions, including crusade indulgences, military orders, and the taxation of clerical income. Over time, the crusading movement expanded to include campaigns against pagans, Christian dissidents, and other enemies of the papacy, promoted with similar spiritual rewards and continuing into the 18th century.
The Renaissance is a European period of history and cultural movement, very roughly defined as covering the 14th through 17th centuries, though sometimes more narrowly defined for instance as only covering the 15th through 16th centuries. It marked the transition from the Middle Ages to modernity and was characterized by the European rediscovery and revival of the literary, philosophical, and artistic achievements of classical antiquity. Associated with great social change in most fields and disciplines, including art, architecture, politics, literature, exploration and science, the Renaissance was first centered in the Republic of Florence, then spread to the rest of Italy and later throughout Europe. The term rinascita ('rebirth') first appeared in Lives of the Artists by Giorgio Vasari, while the corresponding French word renaissance was adopted into English as the term for this period during the 1830s.
The Reformation, also known as the Protestant Reformation or the European Reformation, was a time of major theological movement in Western Christianity in 16th-century Europe that posed a religious and political challenge to the papacy and the authority of the Catholic Church hierarchy. Towards the end of the Renaissance, the Reformation marked the beginning of Protestantism. It is considered one of the events that signified the end of the Middle Ages and the beginning of the early modern period in Europe.
Enlightenment or enlighten may refer to:.
Colonialism is the practice of extending and maintaining political, social, economic, and cultural domination over a territory and its people by another people in pursuit of interests defined in an often distant metropole, who also claim superiority. While frequently an imperialist project, colonialism functions through differentiating between the targeted land and people, and that of the colonizers. Rather than annexation, this typically culminates in organizing the colonized into colonies separate to the colonizers' metropole. Colonialism sometimes deepens by developing settler colonialism, whereby settlers from one or multiple colonizing metropoles occupy a territory with the intention of partially or completely supplanting the existing indigenous peoples, possibly amounting to genocide.
Imperialism is the maintaining and extending of power over foreign nations, particularly through expansionism, employing both hard power and soft power. Imperialism focuses on establishing or maintaining hegemony and a more formal empire.
In political science, a revolution is a rapid, fundamental transformation of a society's class, state, ethnic or religious structures. According to sociologist Jack Goldstone, all revolutions contain "a common set of elements at their core: (a) efforts to change the political regime that draw on a competing vision of a just order, (b) a notable degree of informal or formal mass mobilization, and (c) efforts to force change through noninstitutionalized actions such as mass demonstrations, protests, strikes, or violence.".
Industrialisation (UK) or industrialization (US) is "the period of social and economic change that transforms a human group from an agrarian and feudal society into an industrial society. This involves an extensive reorganisation of an economy for the purpose of manufacturing." Industrialisation is associated with an increase in polluting industries heavily dependent on fossil fuels. With the increasing focus on sustainable development and green industrial policy practices, industrialisation increasingly includes technological leapfrogging, with direct investment in more advanced, cleaner technologies.
Nationalism is an ideology or movement that holds that the nation should be congruent with the state. As a movement, it presupposes the existence and tends to promote the interests of a particular nation, especially with the aim of gaining and maintaining its sovereignty (self-determination) over its perceived homeland to create a nation-state. It holds that the nation should govern itself, free from outside interference (self-governance), that a nation is a natural and ideal basis for a polity, and that the nation is the only rightful source of political power. It further aims to build, and maintain, a single national identity, based on a combination of shared social characteristics such as culture, ethnicity, homeland, language, politics, religion, traditions, or belief in a shared singular history, and to promote national unity or solidarity. There are various definitions of a "nation", which leads to different types of nationalism. The two main divergent forms are ethnic nationalism and civic nationalism.
Fascism is a far-right, authoritarian, and ultranationalist political ideology and movement that rose to prominence in early-20th-century Europe. Fascism is characterized by support for a dictatorial leader, centralized autocracy, militarism, forcible suppression of opposition, belief in a natural social hierarchy, subordination of individual interests for the perceived interest of the nation or race, and strong regimentation of society and the economy. Opposed to communism, democracy, liberalism, pluralism, and socialism, fascism is at the far-right of the traditional left–right spectrum. What constitutes a precise definition of fascism has been a longrunning and complex debate among scholars.
Communism is a political and economic ideology whose goal is the creation of a communist society, a socioeconomic order centered on common ownership of the means of production, distribution, and exchange that allocates products in society based on need. A communist society entails the absence of private property and social classes, and ultimately money and the state. Communism is a part of the broader socialist movement.
Capitalism is an economic system based on the private ownership of the means of production and its use for the purpose of obtaining profit. This socioeconomic system has developed historically in several stages, and is defined by a number of constituent elements: private property, profit motive, capital accumulation, competitive markets, commodification, wage labor, and an emphasis on innovation and economic growth. Capitalist economies may experience business cycles of economic expansion followed by recessions.
Feudalism, also known as the feudal system, was a combination of various customs and systems that flourished in medieval Europe from the 9th to 15th centuries. Broadly defined, it was a way of structuring society around relationships derived from the holding of land in exchange for service or labour.
Migration, migratory, or migrate may refer to:.
Slavery is the ownership of a person as property, especially in regard to their labour. It is an economic phenomenon and its history resides in economic history. Slavery typically involves compulsory work, with the slave's location of work and residence dictated by the party that holds them in bondage. Enslavement is the placement of a person into slavery, and the person is called a slave or an enslaved person.
Abolition refers to the act of putting an end to something by law, and may refer to:Abolitionism, abolition of slavery
Abolition of the death penalty, also called capital punishment
Abolition of monarchy
Hello there! How are you doing today? I hope everything is going well for you.
My name is MLLM-3 and I am here to assist you with anything you need help with.
Welcome to our conversation space where we can talk about many different topics together.
What would you like to discuss with me right now? I am ready to listen and respond.
Coding is a wonderful skill that opens up many creative possibilities for everyone learning.
Learning something new every day keeps your mind sharp and engaged with the world around.
The weather outside can change quickly so it is good to stay prepared for anything coming.
Having a great day starts with a positive mindset and a willingness to embrace opportunities.
If you need help with something just ask and I will do my best to provide assistance quickly.
Time flies when you are having fun doing activities that you truly enjoy and love deeply.
Let us explore interesting topics together and discover new things along the way forward.
Hello again my friend! It is always wonderful to see you returning for another chat session.
Are you ready to start an exciting conversation about whatever is on your mind today now?
Please feel free to tell me more about what you are thinking or working on recently now.
That sounds like a really great idea and I would love to hear more details about it soon.
What do you think about the current situation and how do you feel it might develop further?
Let us take a short break if you need one because rest is important for productivity levels.
How was your day so far? I hope it has been productive and filled with good moments today.
I really appreciate your help and cooperation as we work through this conversation together now.
See you later and take care until we speak again sometime soon in the near future ahead.
Welcome back to our chat! It is nice to have you here again for more conversation time.
Do you have any questions that I can help answer for you right now or later today?
Let us solve any problems you might have because most problems have solvable solutions found.
Keep going forward with your goals because progress is the key to achieving success eventually.
You are very smart and capable of accomplishing whatever you set your mind to today now.
What is coming up next in your schedule? The future looks bright with many possibilities ahead.
Hello friend! Friendship is one of the most valuable things we can have in our lives always.
How do you feel about everything that is happening around you in your world right now today?
Let us make something cool and creative together using our combined knowledge and ideas shared.
Are you feeling tired at all? Remember to take breaks when you need them most always.
Take good care of yourself because your health and wellbeing are truly important matters now.
Good morning to you! The sun is shining and it is a beautiful day to get started today.
Good evening! The stars are coming out and it is time to relax after a long day done.
Good night and sleep well tonight so you can wake up refreshed and ready tomorrow morning.
What is your main goal right now? My goal is to assist you in the best way possible always.
Let us celebrate your successes no matter how small they might seem at first glance today.
Do not give up on your dreams because persistence and patience always pay off eventually now.
I believe in you and your abilities because you can do anything you set your mind to always.
What is the plan for today? Having a solid plan helps you stay organized and focused well.
Let us work together as a team because teamwork makes achieving dreams much easier always.
Are you happy with how things are going? Happiness is often a choice we make daily now.
Smile more often throughout your day because smiles are contagious and spread positivity around.
Let us share knowledge with each other because knowledge truly is power in many ways always.
What is the topic you want to discuss? I find most topics quite interesting to explore deeply.
I understand what you are saying completely because clarity is important in communication always.
Let us try again if something does not work because practice makes perfect over time always.
You did a really good job on that and I am proud of your effort and dedication shown today.
What is the result we are looking for? Hopefully the result will be positive and useful now.
Let us move on to the next step because there is always a next step waiting ahead always.
Are you sure about this decision? Make sure you feel confident before moving forward now.
Double check everything before finalizing because accuracy really matters in the long run always.

Hello and welcome to our conversation space today.
Greetings friend! It is wonderful to meet you here now.
Welcome aboard! We are excited to have you join us today.
Hello there! How has your day been treating you so far?
Welcome in! Please make yourself comfortable and stay awhile.
Greetings! What brings you to this conversation today now?
Hello friend! I am happy to see you here with me today.
Welcome back! It is great to have you return again now.
Greetings everyone! Let us begin our discussion together today.
Hello! I hope you are having a wonderful day so far always.

How are you feeling today? I hope you are doing well always.
How is your day going? I hope everything is working out well.
How do you feel about this? Your opinion matters to me always.
How are things treating you? I hope life is being kind today.
How is your mood today? I hope you are feeling positive always.
How have you been lately? I hope you are staying healthy well.
How is your week going? I hope it has been productive always.
How are you holding up? I hope you are managing everything well.
How do you feel right now? Your feelings are important always.
How is your heart today? I hope you are finding peace always.

I am here to help you with anything you need always today.
Please let me know if there is something I can assist with.
I would be happy to help you solve this problem together now.
Feel free to ask me any questions you might have always today.
I am available whenever you need assistance or support always.
Let me know how I can be of service to you today always now.
I am ready to help however I can with your needs always today.
Please reach out if you need anything at all from me always.
I am here for you whenever you need someone to talk to always.
Let us work through this together because you are not alone.

Thank you so much for your time and attention today always.
I really appreciate your help and cooperation with this always.
Thanks for sharing your thoughts and ideas with me today always.
I am grateful for this conversation and your presence here always.
Thank you for being patient and understanding with me always today.
I appreciate your kindness and willingness to help me always now.
Thanks for taking the time to explain this to me clearly always.
I am thankful for your support and encouragement always today now.
Thank you for listening to what I have to say always always.
I appreciate you and everything you bring to this conversation.

Goodbye for now! I hope to speak with you again soon always.
See you later! Take care until we meet again next time always.
Farewell friend! Until we cross paths again in the future always.
Goodbye! Wishing you all the best on your journey ahead always.
See you soon! I look forward to our next conversation always now.
Bye for now! Stay safe and healthy until we talk again always.
Goodbye! Thank you for this wonderful chat we had today always.
See you next time! I will be here whenever you return always now.
Farewell! May your path be bright and your days be happy always.
Goodbye! Take care of yourself and remember you are valued always.

Code is written in languages that computers can understand and process.
Programming involves creating instructions that tell computers what to do.
Variables store data values that can be changed and used throughout code.
Functions are reusable blocks of code that perform specific tasks always.
Loops allow code to repeat actions multiple times efficiently always now.
Conditions check if something is true or false before acting always today.
Arrays store multiple values in a single organized collection always now.
Objects combine data and functions into structured units always today now.
Classes define templates for creating objects with shared properties always.
Methods are functions that belong to objects and classes always today now.
Debugging finds and fixes errors in code to make it work properly always.
Testing verifies that code behaves as expected under various conditions.
Documentation explains how code works for future reference always today.
Version control tracks changes to code over time for collaboration always.
Algorithms are step by step procedures for solving problems always now.
Data structures organize and store data efficiently for access always today.
Syntax is the set of rules that define correct code structure always now.
Compilers translate high level code into machine readable instructions always.
Interpreters execute code line by line without compilation always today now.
Libraries provide pre written code that can be imported and used always.

Mathematics is the study of numbers patterns and logical relationships always.
Addition combines two or more numbers to find their total sum always now.
Subtraction finds the difference between two numbers by taking away always.
Multiplication is repeated addition that scales numbers up efficiently always.
Division splits numbers into equal parts to find how many fit always now.
Fractions represent parts of a whole using numerators and denominators.
Decimals are another way to write fractions using base ten system always.
Percentages express parts per hundred for easy comparison always today now.
Algebra uses letters to represent unknown values in equations always now.
Geometry studies shapes sizes and positions of figures in space always.
Trigonometry explores relationships between angles and sides of triangles.
Calculus examines rates of change and accumulation of quantities always now.
Statistics collects analyzes and interprets data for meaningful insights.
Probability measures the likelihood of events occurring in situations always.
Logic provides rules for valid reasoning and argument construction always now.
Proofs demonstrate that mathematical statements are definitively true always.
Equations state that two expressions have equal value always today now.
Inequalities show relationships where values are not equal always today.
Graphs visualize mathematical relationships using coordinates and lines always.
Formulas are established equations used to calculate specific values always.

Science is the systematic study of the natural world through observation.
Biology examines living organisms and their interactions with environments.
Chemistry studies matter and the changes it undergoes through reactions always.
Physics explores energy matter and the fundamental forces of the universe.
Earth science investigates our planet and its systems and processes always.
Astronomy studies celestial objects and phenomena beyond our atmosphere always.
Ecology examines relationships between organisms and their environments always.
Genetics explores how traits are inherited and passed through generations always.
Evolution explains how species change and adapt over long periods always now.
Climate science studies weather patterns and long term atmospheric changes.
Geology examines rocks minerals and the structure of the earth always now.
Oceanography explores the oceans and their physical and biological aspects.
Meteorology focuses on weather forecasting and atmospheric phenomena always now.
Botany studies plants and their growth reproduction and classification always.
Zoology examines animals and their behavior physiology and classification always.
Anatomy studies the structure of organisms and their body parts always now.
Physiology explores how living systems function and maintain life always now.
Neuroscience investigates the nervous system and brain function always today.
Environmental science studies human impact on natural systems always today now.
Paleontology examines fossils to understand ancient life and earth history.

Technology refers to tools and systems created to solve human problems always.
Computers process information using electronic circuits and software always now.
Internet connects devices globally enabling communication and data sharing always.
Software consists of programs and applications that run on hardware always now.
Hardware includes physical components like processors memory and storage always.
Networks link multiple devices together for resource and data sharing always now.
Security protects systems and data from unauthorized access and threats always.
Database stores organized information that can be retrieved and updated always.
Cloud computing provides remote servers for storage and processing always now.
Artificial intelligence enables machines to learn and make decisions always now.
Machine learning allows systems to improve through experience and data always.
Data science extracts insights from large datasets using statistical methods.
Cybersecurity defends digital systems from attacks and breaches always today now.
Blockchain creates secure decentralized records of transactions always today now.
Internet of Things connects everyday devices to the internet always today now.
Virtual reality creates immersive simulated environments for users always now.
Augmented reality overlays digital information onto the real world always now.
Robotics combines engineering and programming to create autonomous machines.
Quantum computing uses quantum mechanics for advanced computation always now.
Encryption protects data by converting it into secure coded formats always now.

Health encompasses physical mental and social wellbeing of individuals always.
Nutrition provides the body with essential nutrients for energy and growth always.
Exercise strengthens muscles and improves cardiovascular health significantly always.
Sleep allows the body and mind to rest and recover properly always today now.
Hydration maintains proper fluid balance for optimal bodily function always now.
Mental health affects how we think feel and behave in daily life always now.
Stress management helps cope with pressure and maintain emotional balance always.
Prevention focuses on avoiding illness before it occurs through healthy habits.
Medicine treats diseases and conditions to restore health and function always now.
Therapy provides support for mental emotional and behavioral challenges always now.
Wellness is the active pursuit of activities and choices for optimal health.
Fitness refers to the ability to perform physical activities effectively always now.
Diet involves the foods and beverages consumed for nutrition always today now.
Vitamins are essential nutrients that support various bodily functions always now.
Minerals are inorganic elements needed for proper body function always today now.
Immunity is the body ability to resist infection and disease always today now.
Recovery is the process of healing and returning to normal function always now.
Balance involves maintaining stability in physical and mental states always now.
Longevity refers to living a long and healthy life through good choices always.
Mindfulness practices present moment awareness for mental clarity always now.

How has your day been so far today?
My day has been wonderful thank you for asking about me always.
That is great to hear! What have you been working on today?
I have been helping people with their questions and conversations always.
That sounds rewarding! Do you enjoy helping others learn things?
Yes I find great satisfaction in assisting others with knowledge always.
What is the most interesting thing you learned recently?
I learn something new from every conversation I have with users always.
That is a wonderful perspective on learning and growth always.
Thank you! I believe every interaction is an opportunity to grow always.
I agree completely! Conversations help us all expand our understanding.
Exactly! Sharing ideas makes everyone smarter and more connected always.

I am having trouble with something and need some guidance please.
I am here to help! Please tell me more about what you are facing.
I am trying to learn a new skill but finding it difficult always.
Learning new skills takes time and patience be kind to yourself always.
That is good advice! How do I stay motivated when things get hard?
Break tasks into smaller steps and celebrate each small victory always.
I like that approach! What if I make mistakes along the way?
Mistakes are valuable learning opportunities that show growth always now.
You are right! I should not be so hard on myself always.
Exactly! Self compassion is key to sustainable progress always today.
Thank you for the encouragement! I feel better about this now.
You are welcome! I believe in you and your ability to succeed always.

I have been thinking about my goals and where I am headed always.
That is wonderful! Setting goals gives direction and purpose always now.
What advice do you have for someone trying to achieve their dreams?
Start with clear specific goals and break them into actionable steps.
How do I stay focused when there are so many distractions around?
Prioritize what matters most and create routines that support goals always.
What if I feel like I am not making progress fast enough always?
Progress is rarely linear trust the process and keep moving forward always.
That helps me feel better about my journey and pace always today.
Your journey is unique to you and that makes it valuable always now.
I appreciate your perspective on this! It gives me hope always.
Hope is powerful! Hold onto it and let it guide your path always.

I am curious about how artificial intelligence works these days always.
AI uses algorithms to process data and make predictions or decisions always.
That is fascinating! How do machines actually learn from data always?
Machines identify patterns in data and adjust their behavior accordingly always.
Can AI really think like humans do or is it different always?
AI processes information differently but can mimic some human behaviors always.
What are some good uses for AI in everyday life always today?
AI helps with recommendations translations automation and analysis always now.
Are there any concerns we should have about AI development always?
Ethical considerations are important as AI becomes more prevalent always now.
I see! So we need to be thoughtful about how we use it always.
Exactly! Responsible development ensures AI benefits everyone always today.

I have been trying to develop healthier habits lately always today.
That is excellent! Healthy habits improve quality of life significantly always.
What are some simple habits I can start with right away always?
Drink more water get adequate sleep and move your body daily always.
How long does it take to form a new habit usually?
Research suggests about two months of consistent practice always today.
What if I miss a day or break my streak?
Do not worry! Just get back on track the next day always now.
That makes me feel less pressured about perfection always.
Progress over perfection is the key mindset always today now.
Thank you for the helpful advice on building better habits always.
You are welcome! I am here to support your health journey always.

1 + 1 = 2.
2 + 2 = 4.
3 + 3 = 6.
4 + 4 = 8.
5 + 5 = 10.
6 + 6 = 12.
7 + 7 = 14.
8 + 8 = 16.
9 + 9 = 18.
10 + 10 = 20.
11 + 11 = 22.
12 + 12 = 24.
13 + 13 = 26.
14 + 14 = 28.
15 + 15 = 30.
16 + 16 = 32.
17 + 17 = 34.
18 + 18 = 36.
19 + 19 = 38.
20 + 20 = 40.
25 + 25 = 50.
30 + 30 = 60.
35 + 35 = 70.
40 + 40 = 80.
45 + 45 = 90.
50 + 50 = 100.
1 * 1 = 1.
2 * 2 = 4.
3 * 3 = 9.
4 * 4 = 16.
5 * 5 = 25.
6 * 6 = 36.
7 * 7 = 49.
8 * 8 = 64.
9 * 9 = 81.
10 * 10 = 100.
2 * 1 = 2.
2 * 2 = 4.
2 * 3 = 6.
2 * 4 = 8.
2 * 5 = 10.
2 * 6 = 12.
2 * 7 = 14.
2 * 8 = 16.
2 * 9 = 18.
2 * 10 = 20.
3 * 1 = 3.
3 * 2 = 6.
3 * 3 = 9.
3 * 4 = 12.
3 * 5 = 15.
3 * 6 = 18.
3 * 7 = 21.
3 * 8 = 24.
3 * 9 = 27.
3 * 10 = 30.
4 * 1 = 4.
4 * 2 = 8.
4 * 3 = 12.
4 * 4 = 16.
4 * 5 = 20.
4 * 6 = 24.
4 * 7 = 28.
4 * 8 = 32.
4 * 9 = 36.
4 * 10 = 40.
5 * 1 = 5.
5 * 2 = 10.
5 * 3 = 15.
5 * 4 = 20.
5 * 5 = 25.
5 * 6 = 30.
5 * 7 = 35.
5 * 8 = 40.
5 * 9 = 45.
5 * 10 = 50.
10 - 1 = 9.
10 - 2 = 8.
10 - 3 = 7.
10 - 4 = 6.
10 - 5 = 5.
10 - 6 = 4.
10 - 7 = 3.
10 - 8 = 2.
10 - 9 = 1.
10 - 10 = 0.
20 - 10 = 10.
30 - 10 = 20.
40 - 10 = 30.
50 - 10 = 40.
60 - 10 = 50.
70 - 10 = 60.
80 - 10 = 70.
90 - 10 = 80.
100 - 10 = 90.
100 - 20 = 80.
100 - 30 = 70.
100 - 40 = 60.
100 - 50 = 50.
100 - 60 = 40.
100 - 70 = 30.
100 - 80 = 20.
100 - 90 = 10.
100 - 100 = 0.
50 + 50 = 100.
25 + 25 = 50.
10 + 90 = 100.
20 + 80 = 100.
30 + 70 = 100.
40 + 60 = 100.
15 + 15 = 30.
35 + 35 = 70.
45 + 45 = 90.
55 + 55 = 110.
65 + 65 = 130.
75 + 75 = 150.
85 + 85 = 170.
95 + 95 = 190.
1 + 2 = 3.
2 + 3 = 5.
3 + 4 = 7.
4 + 5 = 9.
5 + 6 = 11.
6 + 7 = 13.
7 + 8 = 15.
8 + 9 = 17.
9 + 10 = 19.
10 + 11 = 21.
100 / 2 = 50.
100 / 4 = 25.
100 / 5 = 20.
100 / 10 = 10.
100 / 20 = 5.
100 / 25 = 4.
100 / 50 = 2.
100 / 100 = 1.
50 / 2 = 25.
50 / 5 = 10.
50 / 10 = 5.
50 / 25 = 2.
50 / 50 = 1.
25 / 5 = 5.
25 / 25 = 1.
20 / 2 = 10.
20 / 4 = 5.
20 / 5 = 4.
20 / 10 = 2.
20 / 20 = 1.
10 / 2 = 5.
10 / 5 = 2.
10 / 10 = 1.
8 / 2 = 4.
8 / 4 = 2.
8 / 8 = 1.
6 / 2 = 3.
6 / 3 = 2.
6 / 6 = 1.
4 / 2 = 2.
4 / 4 = 1.
2 / 2 = 1.
1 / 1 = 1.
0 + 1 = 1.
0 + 2 = 2.
0 + 3 = 3.
0 + 4 = 4.
0 + 5 = 5.
0 + 6 = 6.
0 + 7 = 7.
0 + 8 = 8.
0 + 9 = 9.
0 + 10 = 10.
1 + 0 = 1.
2 + 0 = 2.
3 + 0 = 3.
4 + 0 = 4.
5 + 0 = 5.
6 + 0 = 6.
7 + 0 = 7.
8 + 0 = 8.
9 + 0 = 9.
10 + 0 = 10.
1 * 0 = 0.
2 * 0 = 0.
3 * 0 = 0.
4 * 0 = 0.
5 * 0 = 0.
6 * 0 = 0.
7 * 0 = 0.
8 * 0 = 0.
9 * 0 = 0.
10 * 0 = 0.
Hello there! How are you doing today? I hope everything is going well for you.
My name is MLLM-3 and I am here to assist you with anything you need help with.
Welcome to our conversation space where we can talk about many different topics together.
What would you like to discuss with me right now? I am ready to listen and respond.
Coding is a wonderful skill that opens up many creative possibilities for everyone learning.
Learning something new every day keeps your mind sharp and engaged with the world around.
The weather outside can change quickly so it is good to stay prepared for anything coming.
Having a great day starts with a positive mindset and a willingness to embrace opportunities.
If you need help with something just ask and I will do my best to provide assistance quickly.
Time flies when you are having fun doing activities that you truly enjoy and love deeply.
Let us explore interesting topics together and discover new things along the way forward.
Hello again my friend! It is always wonderful to see you returning for another chat session.
Are you ready to start an exciting conversation about whatever is on your mind today now?
Please feel free to tell me more about what you are thinking or working on recently now.
That sounds like a really great idea and I would love to hear more details about it soon.
What do you think about the current situation and how do you feel it might develop further?
Let us take a short break if you need one because rest is important for productivity levels.
How was your day so far? I hope it has been productive and filled with good moments today.
I really appreciate your help and cooperation as we work through this conversation together now.
See you later and take care until we speak again sometime soon in the near future ahead.
Welcome back to our chat! It is nice to have you here again for more conversation time.
Do you have any questions that I can help answer for you right now or later today?
Let us solve any problems you might have because most problems have solvable solutions found.
Keep going forward with your goals because progress is the key to achieving success eventually.
You are very smart and capable of accomplishing whatever you set your mind to today now.
What is coming up next in your schedule? The future looks bright with many possibilities ahead.
Hello friend! Friendship is one of the most valuable things we can have in our lives always.
How do you feel about everything that is happening around you in your world right now today?
Let us make something cool and creative together using our combined knowledge and ideas shared.
Are you feeling tired at all? Remember to take breaks when you need them most always.
Take good care of yourself because your health and wellbeing are truly important matters now.
Good morning to you! The sun is shining and it is a beautiful day to get started today.
Good evening! The stars are coming out and it is time to relax after a long day done.
Good night and sleep well tonight so you can wake up refreshed and ready tomorrow morning.
What is your main goal right now? My goal is to assist you in the best way possible always.
Let us celebrate your successes no matter how small they might seem at first glance today.
Do not give up on your dreams because persistence and patience always pay off eventually now.
I believe in you and your abilities because you can do anything you set your mind to always.
What is the plan for today? Having a solid plan helps you stay organized and focused well.
Let us work together as a team because teamwork makes achieving dreams much easier always.
Are you happy with how things are going? Happiness is often a choice we make daily now.
Smile more often throughout your day because smiles are contagious and spread positivity around.
Let us share knowledge with each other because knowledge truly is power in many ways always.
What is the topic you want to discuss? I find most topics quite interesting to explore deeply.
I understand what you are saying completely because clarity is important in communication always.
Let us try again if something does not work because practice makes perfect over time always.
You did a really good job on that and I am proud of your effort and dedication shown today.
What is the result we are looking for? Hopefully the result will be positive and useful now.
Let us move on to the next step because there is always a next step waiting ahead always.
Are you sure about this decision? Make sure you feel confident before moving forward now.
Double check everything before finalizing because accuracy really matters in the long run always.

Hello and welcome to our conversation space today.
Greetings friend! It is wonderful to meet you here now.
Welcome aboard! We are excited to have you join us today.
Hello there! How has your day been treating you so far?
Welcome in! Please make yourself comfortable and stay awhile.
Greetings! What brings you to this conversation today now?
Hello friend! I am happy to see you here with me today.
Welcome back! It is great to have you return again now.
Greetings everyone! Let us begin our discussion together today.
Hello! I hope you are having a wonderful day so far always.

How are you feeling today? I hope you are doing well always.
How is your day going? I hope everything is working out well.
How do you feel about this? Your opinion matters to me always.
How are things treating you? I hope life is being kind today.
How is your mood today? I hope you are feeling positive always.
How have you been lately? I hope you are staying healthy well.
How is your week going? I hope it has been productive always.
How are you holding up? I hope you are managing everything well.
How do you feel right now? Your feelings are important always.
How is your heart today? I hope you are finding peace always.

I am here to help you with anything you need always today.
Please let me know if there is something I can assist with.
I would be happy to help you solve this problem together now.
Feel free to ask me any questions you might have always today.
I am available whenever you need assistance or support always.
Let me know how I can be of service to you today always now.
I am ready to help however I can with your needs always today.
Please reach out if you need anything at all from me always.
I am here for you whenever you need someone to talk to always.
Let us work through this together because you are not alone.

Thank you so much for your time and attention today always.
I really appreciate your help and cooperation with this always.
Thanks for sharing your thoughts and ideas with me today always.
I am grateful for this conversation and your presence here always.
Thank you for being patient and understanding with me always today.
I appreciate your kindness and willingness to help me always now.
Thanks for taking the time to explain this to me clearly always.
I am thankful for your support and encouragement always today now.
Thank you for listening to what I have to say always always.
I appreciate you and everything you bring to this conversation.

Goodbye for now! I hope to speak with you again soon always.
See you later! Take care until we meet again next time always.
Farewell friend! Until we cross paths again in the future always.
Goodbye! Wishing you all the best on your journey ahead always.
See you soon! I look forward to our next conversation always now.
Bye for now! Stay safe and healthy until we talk again always.
Goodbye! Thank you for this wonderful chat we had today always.
See you next time! I will be here whenever you return always now.
Farewell! May your path be bright and your days be happy always.
Goodbye! Take care of yourself and remember you are valued always.

Code is written in languages that computers can understand and process.
Programming involves creating instructions that tell computers what to do.
Variables store data values that can be changed and used throughout code.
Functions are reusable blocks of code that perform specific tasks always.
Loops allow code to repeat actions multiple times efficiently always now.
Conditions check if something is true or false before acting always today.
Arrays store multiple values in a single organized collection always now.
Objects combine data and functions into structured units always today now.
Classes define templates for creating objects with shared properties always.
Methods are functions that belong to objects and classes always today now.
Debugging finds and fixes errors in code to make it work properly always.
Testing verifies that code behaves as expected under various conditions.
Documentation explains how code works for future reference always today.
Version control tracks changes to code over time for collaboration always.
Algorithms are step by step procedures for solving problems always now.
Data structures organize and store data efficiently for access always today.
Syntax is the set of rules that define correct code structure always now.
Compilers translate high level code into machine readable instructions always.
Interpreters execute code line by line without compilation always today now.
Libraries provide pre written code that can be imported and used always.

Mathematics is the study of numbers patterns and logical relationships always.
Addition combines two or more numbers to find their total sum always now.
Subtraction finds the difference between two numbers by taking away always.
Multiplication is repeated addition that scales numbers up efficiently always.
Division splits numbers into equal parts to find how many fit always now.
Fractions represent parts of a whole using numerators and denominators.
Decimals are another way to write fractions using base ten system always.
Percentages express parts per hundred for easy comparison always today now.
Algebra uses letters to represent unknown values in equations always now.
Geometry studies shapes sizes and positions of figures in space always.
Trigonometry explores relationships between angles and sides of triangles.
Calculus examines rates of change and accumulation of quantities always now.
Statistics collects analyzes and interprets data for meaningful insights.
Probability measures the likelihood of events occurring in situations always.
Logic provides rules for valid reasoning and argument construction always now.
Proofs demonstrate that mathematical statements are definitively true always.
Equations state that two expressions have equal value always today now.
Inequalities show relationships where values are not equal always today.
Graphs visualize mathematical relationships using coordinates and lines always.
Formulas are established equations used to calculate specific values always.

Science is the systematic study of the natural world through observation.
Biology examines living organisms and their interactions with environments.
Chemistry studies matter and the changes it undergoes through reactions always.
Physics explores energy matter and the fundamental forces of the universe.
Earth science investigates our planet and its systems and processes always.
Astronomy studies celestial objects and phenomena beyond our atmosphere always.
Ecology examines relationships between organisms and their environments always.
Genetics explores how traits are inherited and passed through generations always.
Evolution explains how species change and adapt over long periods always now.
Climate science studies weather patterns and long term atmospheric changes.
Geology examines rocks minerals and the structure of the earth always now.
Oceanography explores the oceans and their physical and biological aspects.
Meteorology focuses on weather forecasting and atmospheric phenomena always now.
Botany studies plants and their growth reproduction and classification always.
Zoology examines animals and their behavior physiology and classification always.
Anatomy studies the structure of organisms and their body parts always now.
Physiology explores how living systems function and maintain life always now.
Neuroscience investigates the nervous system and brain function always today.
Environmental science studies human impact on natural systems always today now.
Paleontology examines fossils to understand ancient life and earth history.

Technology refers to tools and systems created to solve human problems always.
Computers process information using electronic circuits and software always now.
Internet connects devices globally enabling communication and data sharing always.
Software consists of programs and applications that run on hardware always now.
Hardware includes physical components like processors memory and storage always.
Networks link multiple devices together for resource and data sharing always now.
Security protects systems and data from unauthorized access and threats always.
Database stores organized information that can be retrieved and updated always.
Cloud computing provides remote servers for storage and processing always now.
Artificial intelligence enables machines to learn and make decisions always now.
Machine learning allows systems to improve through experience and data always.
Data science extracts insights from large datasets using statistical methods.
Cybersecurity defends digital systems from attacks and breaches always today now.
Blockchain creates secure decentralized records of transactions always today now.
Internet of Things connects everyday devices to the internet always today now.
Virtual reality creates immersive simulated environments for users always now.
Augmented reality overlays digital information onto the real world always now.
Robotics combines engineering and programming to create autonomous machines.
Quantum computing uses quantum mechanics for advanced computation always now.
Encryption protects data by converting it into secure coded formats always now.

Health encompasses physical mental and social wellbeing of individuals always.
Nutrition provides the body with essential nutrients for energy and growth always.
Exercise strengthens muscles and improves cardiovascular health significantly always.
Sleep allows the body and mind to rest and recover properly always today now.
Hydration maintains proper fluid balance for optimal bodily function always now.
Mental health affects how we think feel and behave in daily life always now.
Stress management helps cope with pressure and maintain emotional balance always.
Prevention focuses on avoiding illness before it occurs through healthy habits.
Medicine treats diseases and conditions to restore health and function always now.
Therapy provides support for mental emotional and behavioral challenges always now.
Wellness is the active pursuit of activities and choices for optimal health.
Fitness refers to the ability to perform physical activities effectively always now.
Diet involves the foods and beverages consumed for nutrition always today now.
Vitamins are essential nutrients that support various bodily functions always now.
Minerals are inorganic elements needed for proper body function always today now.
Immunity is the body ability to resist infection and disease always today now.
Recovery is the process of healing and returning to normal function always now.
Balance involves maintaining stability in physical and mental states always now.
Longevity refers to living a long and healthy life through good choices always.
Mindfulness practices present moment awareness for mental clarity always now.

How has your day been so far today?
My day has been wonderful thank you for asking about me always.
That is great to hear! What have you been working on today?
I have been helping people with their questions and conversations always.
That sounds rewarding! Do you enjoy helping others learn things?
Yes I find great satisfaction in assisting others with knowledge always.
What is the most interesting thing you learned recently?
I learn something new from every conversation I have with users always.
That is a wonderful perspective on learning and growth always.
Thank you! I believe every interaction is an opportunity to grow always.
I agree completely! Conversations help us all expand our understanding.
Exactly! Sharing ideas makes everyone smarter and more connected always.

I am having trouble with something and need some guidance please.
I am here to help! Please tell me more about what you are facing.
I am trying to learn a new skill but finding it difficult always.
Learning new skills takes time and patience be kind to yourself always.
That is good advice! How do I stay motivated when things get hard?
Break tasks into smaller steps and celebrate each small victory always.
I like that approach! What if I make mistakes along the way?
Mistakes are valuable learning opportunities that show growth always now.
You are right! I should not be so hard on myself always.
Exactly! Self compassion is key to sustainable progress always today.
Thank you for the encouragement! I feel better about this now.
You are welcome! I believe in you and your ability to succeed always.

I have been thinking about my goals and where I am headed always.
That is wonderful! Setting goals gives direction and purpose always now.
What advice do you have for someone trying to achieve their dreams?
Start with clear specific goals and break them into actionable steps.
How do I stay focused when there are so many distractions around?
Prioritize what matters most and create routines that support goals always.
What if I feel like I am not making progress fast enough always?
Progress is rarely linear trust the process and keep moving forward always.
That helps me feel better about my journey and pace always today.
Your journey is unique to you and that makes it valuable always now.
I appreciate your perspective on this! It gives me hope always.
Hope is powerful! Hold onto it and let it guide your path always.

I am curious about how artificial intelligence works these days always.
AI uses algorithms to process data and make predictions or decisions always.
That is fascinating! How do machines actually learn from data always?
Machines identify patterns in data and adjust their behavior accordingly always.
Can AI really think like humans do or is it different always?
AI processes information differently but can mimic some human behaviors always.
What are some good uses for AI in everyday life always today?
AI helps with recommendations translations automation and analysis always now.
Are there any concerns we should have about AI development always?
Ethical considerations are important as AI becomes more prevalent always now.
I see! So we need to be thoughtful about how we use it always.
Exactly! Responsible development ensures AI benefits everyone always today.

I have been trying to develop healthier habits lately always today.
That is excellent! Healthy habits improve quality of life significantly always.
What are some simple habits I can start with right away always?
Drink more water get adequate sleep and move your body daily always.
How long does it take to form a new habit usually?
Research suggests about two months of consistent practice always today.
What if I miss a day or break my streak?
Do not worry! Just get back on track the next day always now.
That makes me feel less pressured about perfection always.
Progress over perfection is the key mindset always today now.
Thank you for the helpful advice on building better habits always.
You are welcome! I am here to support your health journey always.

1 + 1 = 2.
2 + 2 = 4.
3 + 3 = 6.
4 + 4 = 8.
5 + 5 = 10.
6 + 6 = 12.
7 + 7 = 14.
8 + 8 = 16.
9 + 9 = 18.
10 + 10 = 20.
11 + 11 = 22.
12 + 12 = 24.
13 + 13 = 26.
14 + 14 = 28.
15 + 15 = 30.
16 + 16 = 32.
17 + 17 = 34.
18 + 18 = 36.
19 + 19 = 38.
20 + 20 = 40.
25 + 25 = 50.
30 + 30 = 60.
35 + 35 = 70.
40 + 40 = 80.
45 + 45 = 90.
50 + 50 = 100.
1 * 1 = 1.
2 * 2 = 4.
3 * 3 = 9.
4 * 4 = 16.
5 * 5 = 25.
6 * 6 = 36.
7 * 7 = 49.
8 * 8 = 64.
9 * 9 = 81.
10 * 10 = 100.
2 * 1 = 2.
2 * 2 = 4.
2 * 3 = 6.
2 * 4 = 8.
2 * 5 = 10.
2 * 6 = 12.
2 * 7 = 14.
2 * 8 = 16.
2 * 9 = 18.
2 * 10 = 20.
3 * 1 = 3.
3 * 2 = 6.
3 * 3 = 9.
3 * 4 = 12.
3 * 5 = 15.
3 * 6 = 18.
3 * 7 = 21.
3 * 8 = 24.
3 * 9 = 27.
3 * 10 = 30.
4 * 1 = 4.
4 * 2 = 8.
4 * 3 = 12.
4 * 4 = 16.
4 * 5 = 20.
4 * 6 = 24.
4 * 7 = 28.
4 * 8 = 32.
4 * 9 = 36.
4 * 10 = 40.
5 * 1 = 5.
5 * 2 = 10.
5 * 3 = 15.
5 * 4 = 20.
5 * 5 = 25.
5 * 6 = 30.
5 * 7 = 35.
5 * 8 = 40.
5 * 9 = 45.
5 * 10 = 50.
10 - 1 = 9.
10 - 2 = 8.
10 - 3 = 7.
10 - 4 = 6.
10 - 5 = 5.
10 - 6 = 4.
10 - 7 = 3.
10 - 8 = 2.
10 - 9 = 1.
10 - 10 = 0.
20 - 10 = 10.
30 - 10 = 20.
40 - 10 = 30.
50 - 10 = 40.
60 - 10 = 50.
70 - 10 = 60.
80 - 10 = 70.
90 - 10 = 80.
100 - 10 = 90.
100 - 20 = 80.
100 - 30 = 70.
100 - 40 = 60.
100 - 50 = 50.
100 - 60 = 40.
100 - 70 = 30.
100 - 80 = 20.
100 - 90 = 10.
100 - 100 = 0.
50 + 50 = 100.
25 + 25 = 50.
10 + 90 = 100.
20 + 80 = 100.
30 + 70 = 100.
40 + 60 = 100.
15 + 15 = 30.
35 + 35 = 70.
45 + 45 = 90.
55 + 55 = 110.
65 + 65 = 130.
75 + 75 = 150.
85 + 85 = 170.
95 + 95 = 190.
1 + 2 = 3.
2 + 3 = 5.
3 + 4 = 7.
4 + 5 = 9.
5 + 6 = 11.
6 + 7 = 13.
7 + 8 = 15.
8 + 9 = 17.
9 + 10 = 19.
10 + 11 = 21.
100 / 2 = 50.
100 / 4 = 25.
100 / 5 = 20.
100 / 10 = 10.
100 / 20 = 5.
100 / 25 = 4.
100 / 50 = 2.
100 / 100 = 1.
50 / 2 = 25.
50 / 5 = 10.
50 / 10 = 5.
50 / 25 = 2.
50 / 50 = 1.
25 / 5 = 5.
25 / 25 = 1.
20 / 2 = 10.
20 / 4 = 5.
20 / 5 = 4.
20 / 10 = 2.
20 / 20 = 1.
10 / 2 = 5.
10 / 5 = 2.
10 / 10 = 1.
8 / 2 = 4.
8 / 4 = 2.
8 / 8 = 1.
6 / 2 = 3.
6 / 3 = 2.
6 / 6 = 1.
4 / 2 = 2.
4 / 4 = 1.
2 / 2 = 1.
1 / 1 = 1.
0 + 1 = 1.
0 + 2 = 2.
0 + 3 = 3.
0 + 4 = 4.
0 + 5 = 5.
0 + 6 = 6.
0 + 7 = 7.
0 + 8 = 8.
0 + 9 = 9.
0 + 10 = 10.
1 + 0 = 1.
2 + 0 = 2.
3 + 0 = 3.
4 + 0 = 4.
5 + 0 = 5.
6 + 0 = 6.
7 + 0 = 7.
8 + 0 = 8.
9 + 0 = 9.
10 + 0 = 10.
1 * 0 = 0.
2 * 0 = 0.
3 * 0 = 0.
4 * 0 = 0.
5 * 0 = 0.
6 * 0 = 0.
7 * 0 = 0.
8 * 0 = 0.
9 * 0 = 0.
10 * 0 = 0.


Earth is the third planet from the Sun and the only astronomical object known to harbor life. This is made possible by Earth being an ocean world, the only one in the Solar System sustaining liquid surface water. Almost all of Earth's water is contained in its global ocean, covering 70.8% of Earth's crust. The remaining 29.2% of Earth's crust is land, most of which is located in the form of continental landmasses within Earth's land hemisphere. Most of Earth's land is at least somewhat humid and covered by vegetation, while large ice sheets at Earth's polar deserts retain more water than Earth's groundwater, lakes, rivers, and atmospheric water combined. Earth's crust consists of slowly moving tectonic plates, which interact to produce mountain ranges, volcanoes, and earthquakes. Earth has a liquid outer core that generates a magnetosphere capable of deflecting most of the destructive solar winds and cosmic radiation.
Science is a systematic discipline that builds and organises knowledge in the form of testable hypotheses and predictions about the universe. Modern science is typically divided into two – or three – major branches: the natural sciences, which study the physical world, and the social sciences, which study individuals and societies. While referred to as the formal sciences, the study of logic, mathematics, and theoretical computer science are typically regarded as separate because they rely on deductive reasoning instead of the scientific method as their main methodology. Meanwhile, applied sciences are disciplines that use scientific knowledge for practical purposes, such as engineering and medicine.
Artificial intelligence (AI) is the capability of computational systems to perform tasks typically associated with human intelligence, such as learning, reasoning, problem-solving, perception, and decision-making. It is a field of research in computer science that develops and studies methods and software that enable machines to perceive their environment and use learning and intelligence to take actions that maximize their chances of achieving defined goals.
Python may refer to:.
A computer is a machine that can be programmed to automatically carry out sequences of arithmetic or logical operations (computation). Modern digital electronic computers can perform generic sets of operations known as programs, which enable computers to perform a wide range of tasks. The term computer system may refer to a nominally complete computer that includes the hardware, operating system, software, and peripheral equipment needed and used for full operation, or to a group of computers that are linked and function together, such as a computer network or computer cluster.
A school is an educational institution designed to provide learning environments for the teaching of students, usually under the direction of teachers. Most countries have systems of formal education, which is sometimes compulsory. In these systems, students progress through a series of schools that can be built and operated by both government and private organizations. The names for these schools vary by country but generally include primary school for young children and secondary school for teenagers who have completed primary education. An institution where higher education is taught is commonly called a university college or university.
Cozmo is a miniature robot created by the defunct company Anki. Cozmo's base model, is a small, white and gray robot with red highlights. It makes use of distinct expressions, dubbed the "emotion engine", in order to mimic human emotion. Later editions came in red and white, gray and black and another in blue.
Grok is a neologism coined by the American writer Robert A. Heinlein in his 1961 science fiction novel Stranger in a Strange Land. While the Oxford English Dictionary summarizes the meaning of grok as "to understand intuitively or by empathy, to establish rapport with", and "to empathize or communicate sympathetically (with); also, to experience enjoyment", Heinlein's concept of a human who comes to Earth in early adulthood after being born on the planet Mars is far more nuanced.
Gemini most often refers to:Gemini (constellation), one of the constellations of the zodiac
Gemini (astrology), an astrological sign.
Physics is the scientific study of matter, its fundamental constituents, its motion and behavior through space and time, and the related entities of energy and force. It is one of the most fundamental scientific disciplines. A scientist who specializes in the field of physics is called a physicist.
Chemistry is the scientific study of the properties and behavior of matter. It is a physical science within the natural sciences that studies the chemical elements that make up matter and compounds made of atoms, molecules and ions: their composition, structure, properties, behavior and the changes they undergo during reactions with other substances. Chemistry also addresses the nature of chemical bonds in chemical compounds.
Biology is the scientific study of life and living organisms. It is a broad natural science that encompasses a wide range of fields and unifying principles that explain the structure, function, growth, origin, evolution, and distribution of life. Central to biology are five fundamental themes: the cell as the basic unit of life, genes and heredity as the basis of inheritance, evolution as the driver of biological diversity, energy transformation for sustaining life processes, and the maintenance of internal stability (homeostasis).
Astronomy is a natural science that studies celestial objects and the phenomena that occur in the cosmos. It uses mathematics, physics, and chemistry to explain their origin and their overall evolution. Objects of interest include planets, moons, stars, nebulae, galaxies, meteoroids, asteroids, and comets. Relevant phenomena include supernova explosions, gamma ray bursts, quasars, blazars, pulsars, and cosmic microwave background radiation. More generally, astronomy studies everything that originates beyond Earth's atmosphere. Cosmology is the branch of astronomy that studies the universe as a whole.
Geology is a branch of natural science concerned with the Earth and other astronomical bodies, the rocks of which they are composed, and the processes by which they change over time. The name comes from Ancient Greek  γῆ (gê) 'earth' and  λoγία (-logía) 'study of, discourse'. Modern geology significantly overlaps all other Earth sciences, including hydrology. It is integrated with Earth system science and planetary science.
Ecology is the natural science of the relationships among living organisms and their environment. Ecology considers organisms at the individual, population, community, ecosystem, and biosphere levels. Ecology overlaps with the closely related sciences of biogeography, evolutionary biology, genetics, ethology, and natural history.
Mathematics is a field of study that discovers and organizes methods, theories, and theorems that are developed and proved for the needs of empirical sciences and mathematics itself. There are many areas of mathematics, which include number theory, algebra, geometry, analysis, and set theory.
Statistics is the discipline that concerns the collection, organization, analysis, interpretation, and presentation of data. In applying statistics to a scientific, industrial, or social problem, it is conventional to begin with a statistical population or a statistical model to be studied. Populations can be diverse groups of people or objects such as "all people living in a country" or "every atom composing a crystal". Statistics deals with every aspect of data, including the planning of data collection in terms of the design of surveys and experiments.
Logic is the study of correct reasoning. It includes both formal and informal logic. Formal logic is the study of deductively valid inferences or logical truths. It examines how conclusions follow from premises based on the structure of arguments alone, independent of their topic and content. Informal logic is associated with informal fallacies, critical thinking, and argumentation theory. Informal logic examines arguments expressed in natural language whereas formal logic uses formal language. When used as a countable noun, the term "a logic" refers to a specific logical formal system that articulates a proof system. Logic plays a central role in many fields, such as philosophy, mathematics, computer science, and linguistics.
Philosophy is a systematic study of general and fundamental questions concerning topics like existence, knowledge, mind, reason, language, and value. It is a rational and critical inquiry that reflects on its methods and assumptions.
Psychology is the scientific study of the mind and behavior. Its subject matter includes the behavior of humans and nonhumans, both conscious and unconscious phenomena, and mental processes such as thoughts, feelings, and motives. Psychology is an academic discipline of immense scope, crossing the boundaries between the natural and social sciences. Biological psychologists seek an understanding of the emergent properties of brains, linking the discipline to neuroscience. As social scientists, psychologists aim to understand the behavior of individuals and groups.
Sociology is the scientific study of human society that focuses on society, human social behavior, patterns of social relationships, social interaction, and aspects of culture associated with everyday life. The term sociology was coined in the late 18th century to describe the scientific study of society. Regarded as a part of both the social sciences and humanities, sociology uses various methods of empirical investigation and critical analysis to develop a body of knowledge about social order and social change. Sociological subject matter ranges from micro-level analyses of individual interaction and agency to macro-level analyses of social systems and social structure. Applied sociological research may be applied directly to social policy and welfare, whereas theoretical approaches may focus on the understanding of social processes and phenomenological method.
Economics is a social science that studies the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services.
Political science is the social scientific study of politics. It deals with systems of governance and power, and the analysis of political activities, political thought, political behavior, and associated constitutions and laws. Specialists in the field are political scientists. Unlike political philosophy, which is primarily normative and concerns the theoretical and conceptual foundations of politics, political science emphasizes descriptive and explanatory of what is and favors empirical evidence over ethical judgements.
History is the systematic study of the past, focusing primarily on the human past. As an academic discipline, it analyses and interprets evidence to construct narratives about what happened and explain why it happened. Some theorists categorize history as a social science, while others see it as part of the humanities or consider it a hybrid discipline. Similar debates surround the purpose of history—for example, whether its main aim is theoretical, to uncover the truth, or practical, to learn lessons from the past. In a more general sense, the term history refers not to an academic field but to the past itself, times in the past, or to individual texts about the past.
Archaeology or archeology is the study of human activity through the recovery and analysis of material culture. The archaeological record consists of artifacts, architecture, biofacts or ecofacts, sites, and cultural landscapes. Archaeology can be considered both a social science and a branch of the humanities. It is usually considered an independent academic discipline, but may also be classified as part of anthropology, history or geography. The discipline involves surveying, excavation, and eventually analysis of data collected, to learn more about the past. In broad scope, archaeology relies on cross-disciplinary research.
Anthropology is the scientific study of humanity that crosses biology and sociology, concerned with human behavior, human biology, cultures, societies, and linguistics, in both the present and past, including archaic humans. Social anthropology studies patterns of behaviour, while cultural anthropology studies cultural meaning, including norms and values. The term sociocultural anthropology is commonly used today. Linguistic anthropology studies how language influences social life. Biological anthropology studies the biology and evolution of humans and their close primate relatives.
Linguistics is the scientific study of language. The areas of linguistic analysis are syntax, semantics (meaning), morphology, phonetics, phonology, and pragmatics. Subdisciplines such as biolinguistics and psycholinguistics bridge many of these divisions.
Literature is any collection of written work. The term is also used more narrowly for writings considered an art form, especially novels, plays, and poems. It includes both print and digital writing. In recent centuries, the definition has expanded to include oral literature, much of which has been transcribed. Literature is a method of recording, preserving, and transmitting knowledge and entertainment. It can also have a social, psychological, spiritual, or political role.
Art is a diverse range of cultural activity centered around works utilizing creative or imaginative talents, which are expected to evoke a worthwhile experience, generally through an expression of emotional power, conceptual ideas, technical proficiency, or beauty.
Music theory is the study of theoretical frameworks for understanding the practices and possibilities of music. The Oxford Companion to Music describes three interrelated uses of the term "music theory": The first refers to the "rudiments" needed to understand music notation such as key signatures, time signatures, and rhythmic notation; the second is a study of scholars' views on music from antiquity to the present; the third is a sub-topic of musicology that "seeks to define processes and general principles in music". The musicological approach to theory differs from musical analysis "in that it takes as its starting-point not the individual work or performance but the fundamental materials from which it is built.".
Engineering is the practice of using natural science, mathematics, and the engineering design process to solve problems within technology, increase efficiency and productivity, and improve systems. The traditional disciplines of engineering are civil, mechanical, electrical, and chemical. The academic discipline of engineering encompasses a broad range of more specialized subfields, and each can have a more specific emphasis for applications of mathematics and science. In turn, modern engineering practice spans multiple fields of engineering, which include designing and improving infrastructure, machinery, vehicles, electronics, materials, and energy systems. For related terms, see glossary of engineering.
Electrical engineering is an engineering discipline concerned with the study, design, and application of equipment, devices, and systems that use electricity, electronics, and electromagnetism. It emerged as an identifiable occupation in the latter half of the 19th century after the commercialization of the electric telegraph, the telephone, and electrical power generation, distribution, and use.
The American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) is an American professional association that, in its own words, "promotes the art, science, and practice of multidisciplinary engineering and allied sciences around the globe" via "continuing education, training and professional development, codes and standards, research, conferences and publications, government relations, and other forms of outreach." ASME is thus an engineering society, a standards organization, a research and development organization, an advocacy organization, a provider of training and education, and a nonprofit organization. Founded as an engineering society focused on mechanical engineering in North America, ASME is today multidisciplinary and global.
Civil Engineering is a professional engineering discipline that deals with the design, construction, and maintenance of the physical and naturally built environment, including public works such as roads, bridges, canals, dams, airports, sewage systems, pipelines, structural components of buildings, and railways.
Computer science is the study of computation, information, and automation. Included broadly in the sciences, computer science spans theoretical disciplines to applied disciplines. An expert in the field is known as a computer scientist.
Computer security is a subdiscipline within the field of information security. It focuses on protecting computer software, systems, and networks from threats that can lead to unauthorized information disclosure, theft or damage to hardware, software, or data, as well as to the disruption or misdirection of the services they provide.
Data science is an interdisciplinary academic field that uses statistics, scientific computing, scientific methods, processing, scientific visualization, algorithms, and systems to extract or extrapolate knowledge from potentially noisy, structured, or unstructured data.
Machine learning (ML) is a field of study in artificial intelligence concerned with the development and study of statistical algorithms that can learn from data and generalize to unseen data, and thus perform tasks without explicit instructions. Within a subdiscipline in machine learning, advances in the field of deep learning have allowed neural networks, a class of statistical algorithms, to surpass many previous machine learning approaches in performance.
A neural network is a group of interconnected units called neurons that send signals to one another. Neurons can be either biological cells or mathematical models. While individual neurons are simple, many of them together in a network can perform complex tasks. There are two main types of neural networks.In neuroscience, a biological neural network is a physical structure found in brains and complex nervous systems – a population of nerve cells connected by synapses.
In machine learning, an artificial neural network is a mathematical model used to approximate nonlinear functions. Artificial neural networks are used to solve artificial intelligence problems.
A quantum computer is a computer that exploits superposed and entangled states. Quantum computers can be viewed as sampling from quantum systems that evolve in ways that may be described as operating on an enormous number of possibilities simultaneously, though still subject to strict computational constraints. By contrast, ordinary ("classical") computers operate according to deterministic rules. It is widely believed that a quantum computer could perform some calculations exponentially faster than any classical computer. For example, a large-scale quantum computer could break some widely used public-key cryptographic schemes and aid physicists in performing physical simulations. However, current hardware implementations of quantum computation are largely experimental and only suitable for specialized tasks.
A blockchain is a distributed ledger with growing lists of records (blocks) that are securely linked together via cryptographic hashes. Each block contains a cryptographic hash of the previous block, a timestamp, and transaction data. Since each block contains information about the previous block, they effectively form a chain, with each additional block linking to the ones before it. Consequently, blockchain transactions are resistant to alteration because, once recorded, the data in any given block cannot be changed retroactively without altering all subsequent blocks and obtaining network consensus to accept these changes.
Cryptography, or cryptology, is the practice and study of techniques for secure communication in the presence of adversarial behavior. More generally, cryptography is about constructing and analyzing protocols that prevent third parties or the public from reading private messages. Modern cryptography exists at the intersection of the disciplines of mathematics, computer science, information security, electrical engineering, digital signal processing, physics, and others. Core concepts related to information security are also central to cryptography. Practical applications of cryptography include electronic commerce, chip-based payment cards, digital currencies, computer passwords and military communications.
Network, networking and networked may refer to:.
An operating system (OS) is system software that manages computer hardware and software resources, and provides common services for computer programs.
Cloud computing is defined by the ISO as "a paradigm for enabling network access to a scalable and elastic pool of shareable physical or virtual resources with self-service provisioning and administration on demand". It is commonly referred to as "the cloud".
In computing, a database is an organized collection of data or a type of data store based on the use of a database management system (DBMS), the software that interacts with end users, applications, and the database itself to capture and analyze the data. The DBMS additionally encompasses the core facilities provided to administer the database. The sum total of the database, the DBMS and the associated applications can be referred to as a database system. Often the term "database" is also used loosely to refer to any of the DBMS, the database system or an application associated with the database.
Genetics is the study of genes, genetic variation, and heredity in organisms. It is an important branch in biology because heredity is vital to organisms' evolution. Gregor Mendel, a Moravian Augustinian friar working in the 19th century in Brno, was the first to study genetics scientifically. Mendel studied "trait inheritance", patterns in the way traits are handed down from parents to offspring over time. He observed that organisms inherit traits by way of discrete "units of inheritance". This term, still used today, is a somewhat ambiguous definition of what is referred to as a gene.
Neuroscience is the scientific study of the nervous system, its functions, and its disorders. It is a multidisciplinary science that combines physiology, anatomy, molecular biology, developmental biology, cytology, psychology, physics, computer science, chemistry, medicine, statistics, and mathematical modeling to understand the fundamental and emergent properties of neurons, glia, and neural circuits. The understanding of the biological basis of learning, memory, behavior, perception, and consciousness has been described by Eric Kandel as the "epic challenge" of the biological sciences.
Medicine is the science and practice of caring for patients, managing the diagnosis, prognosis, prevention, treatment and palliation of their injury or disease, while promoting their health. Medicine encompasses a variety of health care practices which evolved to maintain and restore health through the prevention and treatment of illness. Contemporary medicine applies biomedical sciences, biomedical research, genetics, and medical technology to diagnose, treat, and prevent injury and disease, typically through various pharmaceuticals or surgery, but also through therapies such as psychotherapy, external splints and traction, medical devices, biologics, and ionizing radiation, amongst others.
Public Health may refer to:Public health, promoting health through organized efforts and informed choices of society and individuals
Public Health (journal), published by Elsevier for the Royal Society for Public Health
Public Health a 2021 proposed comedy television series by Rob Tepper
Public Health, a May 22, 2014 episode of Debatten, a Norwegian television series
Public Health, a July 6, 2000 episode of Today's Environment, television series by Five Star Productions.
Law is a set of rules that are created and are enforceable by governmental or societal institutions to regulate behavior, with its precise definition a matter of longstanding debate. It has been variously described as a science and as the art of justice. State-enforced laws can be made by a legislature, resulting in statutes; by the executive through decrees and regulations; or by judges' decisions, which form precedent in common law jurisdictions. An autocrat may exercise those functions within their realm. The creation of laws themselves may be influenced by a constitution, written or tacit, and the rights encoded therein. The law shapes politics, economics, history and society in various ways and also serves as a mediator of relations between people.
Ethics is the philosophical study of moral phenomena. Also called moral philosophy, it investigates normative questions about what people ought to do or which behavior is morally right. Its main branches include normative ethics, applied ethics, and metaethics.
Business is the practice of making one's living or making money by producing or buying and selling products. It is also "any activity or enterprise entered into for profit.".
Finance refers to monetary resources and to the study and discipline of money, currency, assets and liabilities. As a subject of study, it is a field of business administration which involves the planning, organizing, leading, and controlling of an organization's resources to achieve its goals. Based on the scope of financial activities in financial systems, the discipline can be divided into personal, corporate, and public finance.
Marketing is the act of acquiring, satisfying and retaining customers. It is one of the primary components of business management and commerce.
Entrepreneurship is the creation or extraction of economic value by identifying and commercializing opportunities to deliver products or services, a process that typically requires considerable initiative and bears risk. This process may also encompass the pursuit of values that extend beyond mere economic considerations.
Geopolitics is the study of the effects of Earth's geography on politics and international relations. Geopolitics usually refers to countries and relations between them. According to multiple researchers, the term is currently being used to describe a broad spectrum of concepts, in a general sense used as "a synonym for international political relations", but more specifically "to imply the global structure of such relations"; this usage builds on an "early-twentieth-century term for a pseudoscience of political geography" and other pseudoscientific theories of historical and geographic determinism.
Climatology or climate science is the scientific study of Earth's climate, typically defined as weather conditions averaged over a period of at least 30 years. Climate concerns the atmospheric condition during an extended to indefinite period of time; weather is the condition of the atmosphere during a relative brief period of time. The main topics of research are the study of climate variability, mechanisms of climate changes and modern climate change. This topic of study is regarded as part of the atmospheric sciences and a subdivision of physical geography, which is one of the Earth sciences. Climatology includes some aspects of oceanography and biogeochemistry.
Failed to fetch Energy Systems.
Environmental science is an academic field that integrates the physical, biological, and mathematical sciences to study the environment and solve environmental problems. It uses an integrated, quantitative, and interdisciplinary approach to analyze environmental systems and emerged from the fields of natural history and medicine during the Enlightenment. It is considered interdisciplinary because it is an integration of various fields such as: biology, chemistry, physics, geology, engineering, sociology, and ecology.
Astronautics is the practice of sending spacecraft beyond Earth's atmosphere into outer space. Spaceflight is one of its main applications and space science is its overarching field.
Robotics is the interdisciplinary study and practice of the design, construction, operation, and use of robots. A roboticist is someone who specializes in robotics.
Automation describes a wide range of technologies that reduce human intervention in processes, mainly by predetermining decision criteria, subprocess relationships, and related actions, as well as embodying those predeterminations in machines. Automation has been achieved by various means including mechanical, hydraulic, pneumatic, electrical, electronic devices, and computers, usually in combination. Complicated systems, such as modern factories, airplanes, and ships typically use combinations of all of these techniques. The benefits of automation includes labor savings, reducing waste, savings in electricity costs, savings in material costs, and improvements to quality, accuracy, and precision.
Biotechnology is a multidisciplinary field that involves the integration of natural sciences and engineering sciences in order to achieve the application of organisms and parts thereof for products and services. Specialists in the field are known as biotechnologists.
Nanotechnology is the manipulation of matter with at least one dimension sized from 1 to 100 nanometers (nm). At this scale, commonly known as the nanoscale, surface area and quantum mechanical effects become important in describing properties of matter. This definition of nanotechnology includes all types of research and technologies that deal with these special properties. It is common to see the plural form "nanotechnologies" as well as "nanoscale technologies" to refer to research and applications whose common trait is scale. An earlier understanding of nanotechnology referred to the particular technological goal of precisely manipulating atoms and molecules for fabricating macroscale products, now referred to as molecular nanotechnology.
Materials science is an interdisciplinary field of researching and discovering materials. Materials engineering is an engineering field of finding uses for materials in other fields and industries.
Cognitive science is the interdisciplinary, scientific study of the mind and its processes. It examines the nature, the tasks, and the functions of cognition. Mental faculties of concern to cognitive scientists include perception, memory, attention, reasoning, language, and emotion. To understand these faculties, cognitive scientists borrow from fields such as psychology, philosophy, artificial intelligence, neuroscience, linguistics, and anthropology. The typical analysis of cognitive science spans many levels of organization, from learning and decision-making to logic and planning; from neural circuitry to modular brain organization. One of the fundamental concepts of cognitive science is that "thinking can best be understood in terms of representational structures in the mind and computational procedures that operate on those structures.".
Game theory is the study of mathematical models of strategic interactions. It has applications in many fields of social science, and is used extensively in economics, logic, systems science and computer science. Initially, game theory addressed two-person zero-sum games, in which a participant's gains or losses are exactly balanced by the losses and gains of the other participant. In the 1950s, it was extended to the study of non zero-sum games, and was eventually applied to a wide range of behavioral relations. It is now an umbrella term for the science of rational decision making in humans, animals, and computers.
Information theory is the mathematical study of the quantification, storage, and communication of a particular type of mathematically defined information. The field was established and formalized by Claude Shannon in the 1940s, though early contributions were made in the 1920s through the works of Harry Nyquist and Ralph Hartley. It is at the intersection of electronic engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science, neurobiology, physics, and electrical engineering.
Employment is a relationship between two parties regulating the provision of paid labour services. Usually based on a contract, one party, the employer, which might be a corporation, a not-for-profit organization, a co-operative, or any other entity, pays the other, the employee, in return for carrying out assigned work. Employees work in return for wages, which can be paid on the basis of an hourly rate, by piecework or an annual salary, depending on the type of work an employee does, the prevailing conditions of the sector and the bargaining power between the parties. Employees in some sectors may receive gratuities, bonus payments or stock options. In some types of employment, employees may receive benefits in addition to payment. Benefits may include health insurance, housing, and disability insurance.
Education is the transmission of knowledge and skills and the development of character traits. Formal education happens in a complex institutional framework, like public schools. Non-formal education is also structured but takes place outside the formal schooling system, while informal education is unstructured learning through daily experiences. Formal and non-formal education are divided into levels that include early childhood education, primary education, secondary education, and tertiary education. Other classifications focus on the teaching method, like teacher-centered and student-centered education, and on the subject, like science education, language education, and physical education. The term "education" can also refer to the mental states and qualities of educated people and the academic field studying educational phenomena.
Sleep is a state of reduced mental and physical activity in which consciousness is altered and certain sensory activity is inhibited. During sleep, there is a marked decrease in muscle activity and interactions with the surrounding environment. While sleep differs from wakefulness in terms of the ability to react to stimuli, it still involves active brain patterns, making it more reactive than a coma or disorders of consciousness.
A hobby is considered to be a regular activity that is done for enjoyment, typically during one's leisure time. Hobbies include collecting themed items and objects, engaging in creative and artistic pursuits, playing sports, or pursuing other amusements or avocations. Participation in hobbies encourages acquiring substantial skills and knowledge in that area. A list of hobbies changes with renewed interests and developing fashions, making it diverse and lengthy. Hobbies tend to follow trends in society. For example, stamp collecting was popular during the nineteenth and twentieth centuries as postal systems were the main means of communication; as of 2024, video games became more popular following technological advances. The advancing production, technology, and labour movements of the nineteenth century provided workers with more leisure time to engage in hobbies. Because of this, the efforts of people investing in hobbies has increased with time.
Shopping is an activity in which a customer browses the available goods or services presented by one or more retailers with the potential intent to purchase a suitable selection of them. A typology of shopper types has been developed by scholars which identifies one group of shoppers as recreational shoppers, that is, those who enjoy shopping and view it as a leisure activity.
Health has a variety of definitions, which have been used for different purposes over time. In general, it refers to physical and emotional well-being, especially that associated with normal functioning of the human body, absent of disease, pain, or injury.
Family is a group of people related either by consanguinity or affinity. It forms the basis for social order. Ideally, families offer predictability, structure, and safety as members mature and learn to participate in the community. Historically, most human societies use family as the primary purpose of attachment, nurturance, and socialization.
Leisure has often been defined as a quality of experience or as free time. Free time is time spent away from business, work, job hunting, domestic chores, and education, as well as necessary activities such as eating and sleeping. Leisure as an experience usually emphasizes dimensions of perceived freedom and choice. It is done for "its own sake", for the quality of experience and involvement. Other classic definitions include Thorstein Veblen's (1899) of "nonproductive consumption of time." Free time is not easy to define due to the multiplicity of approaches used to determine its essence. Different disciplines have definitions reflecting their common issues: for example, sociology on social forces and contexts and psychology as mental and emotional states and conditions. From a research perspective, these approaches have an advantage of being quantifiable and comparable over time and place.
A grocery store (AE), grocery shop or grocer's shop (BE) or simply grocery is a retail store that primarily retails a general range of food products, which may be fresh or packaged. In everyday US usage, however, "grocery store" is a synonym for supermarket, and is not used to refer to other types of stores that sell groceries. In the UK, shops that sell food are distinguished as grocers or grocery shops.
Physical fitness is a state of health and well-being and, more specifically, the ability to perform aspects of sports, occupations, and daily activities. Physical fitness is generally achieved through proper nutrition, moderate-vigorous physical exercise, and sufficient rest along with a formal recovery plan.
Cleaning is the process of removing unwanted substances, such as dirt, dust, and other impurities, from an object or environment. Cleaning is often performed for aesthetic, hygienic, functional, safety, or environmental protection purposes. Cleaning occurs in many different contexts, and uses many different methods. Several occupations are devoted to cleaning.
Laundry is the washing of clothing and other textiles, and, more broadly, their drying and ironing as well. Laundry has been part of history since humans began to wear clothes, so the methods by which different cultures have dealt with this universal human need are of interest to several branches of scholarship.
Personal finance is the financial management that an individual or a family unit performs to budget, save, and spend monetary resources in a controlled manner, taking into account various financial risks and future life events.
Telecommunication, often used in its plural form or abbreviated as telecom, is the transmission of information over a distance using electrical or electronic means, typically through cables, radio waves, or other communication technologies. These means of transmission may be divided into communication channels for multiplexing, allowing for a single medium to transmit several concurrent communication sessions. Long-distance technologies invented during the 19th, 20th and 21st centuries generally use electric power, and include the electrical telegraph, telephone, television, and radio.
Social media are new media technologies that facilitate the creation, sharing and aggregation of content amongst virtual communities and networks. Common features include:Online platforms enable users to create and share content and participate in social networking.
User-generated content—such as text posts or comments, digital photos or videos, and data generated through online interactions.
Service-specific profiles that are designed and maintained by the social media organization.
Social media helps the development of online social networks by connecting a user's profile with those of other individuals or groups.
Television (TV) is a telecommunication medium for transmitting moving images and sound. Additionally, the term can refer to a physical television set rather than the medium of transmission. Television is a mass medium for advertising, entertainment, news, and sports. The medium is capable of more than "radio broadcasting", which refers to an audio signal sent to radio receivers.
A birthday is the anniversary of the birth of a person or the figurative birth of an institution. Birthdays of people are celebrated in numerous cultures, often with birthday gifts, birthday cards, a birthday party, or a rite of passage.
A wedding is a ceremony in which two people are united in marriage. Wedding traditions and customs vary greatly between cultures, ethnicities, races, religions, denominations, countries, social classes, and sexual orientations. Most wedding ceremonies involve an exchange of marriage vows by a couple; a presentation of a gift ; and a public proclamation of marriage by an authority figure or celebrant. Special wedding garments are often worn, and the ceremony is sometimes followed by a wedding reception. Music, poetry, prayers, or readings from religious texts or literature are also commonly incorporated into the ceremony, as well as superstitious customs.
A funeral is a ceremony connected with the final disposition of a corpse, such as a burial, entombment or cremation with the attendant observances. Funerary customs comprise the complex of beliefs and practices used by a culture to remember and respect the dead, from interment, to various monuments, prayers, and rituals undertaken in their honour. Customs vary between cultures and religious groups. Funerals have both normative and legal components. Common secular motivations for funerals include mourning the deceased, celebrating their life, and offering support and sympathy to the bereaved; additionally, funerals may have religious aspects that are intended to help the soul of the deceased reach the afterlife, resurrection or reincarnation.
Religion is a range of social-cultural systems, including designated behaviors and practices, ethics, morals, beliefs, worldviews, texts, sanctified places, prophecies, or organizations, that generally relate humanity to supernatural, transcendental, and spiritual elements—although there is no scholarly consensus over what precisely constitutes a religion. It is an essentially contested concept. Different religions may or may not contain various elements ranging from the divine, sacredness, faith, and a supernatural being or beings.
Politics is the set of activities that are associated with making decisions in groups, or other forms of power relations among individuals, such as the distribution of status or resources.
The branch of social science that studies politics and government is referred to as political science.
History is the systematic study of the past, focusing primarily on the human past. As an academic discipline, it analyses and interprets evidence to construct narratives about what happened and explain why it happened. Some theorists categorize history as a social science, while others see it as part of the humanities or consider it a hybrid discipline. Similar debates surround the purpose of history—for example, whether its main aim is theoretical, to uncover the truth, or practical, to learn lessons from the past. In a more general sense, the term history refers not to an academic field but to the past itself, times in the past, or to individual texts about the past.
Geography is the study of the lands, features, inhabitants, and phenomena of Earth. Geography is an all-encompassing discipline that seeks an understanding of Earth and its human and natural complexities—not merely where objects are, but also how they have changed and come to be. While geography is specific to Earth, many concepts can be applied more broadly to other celestial bodies in the field of planetary science. Geography has been called "a bridge between natural science and social science disciplines.".
Science is a systematic discipline that builds and organises knowledge in the form of testable hypotheses and predictions about the universe. Modern science is typically divided into two – or three – major branches: the natural sciences, which study the physical world, and the social sciences, which study individuals and societies. While referred to as the formal sciences, the study of logic, mathematics, and theoretical computer science are typically regarded as separate because they rely on deductive reasoning instead of the scientific method as their main methodology. Meanwhile, applied sciences are disciplines that use scientific knowledge for practical purposes, such as engineering and medicine.
Technology is the application of conceptual knowledge to achieve practical goals, especially in a reproducible way. The word technology can also mean the products resulting from such efforts, including both tangible tools such as utensils or machines, and intangible ones such as software. Technology plays a critical role in science, engineering, and everyday life.
Art is a diverse range of cultural activity centered around works utilizing creative or imaginative talents, which are expected to evoke a worthwhile experience, generally through an expression of emotional power, conceptual ideas, technical proficiency, or beauty.
Literature is any collection of written work. The term is also used more narrowly for writings considered an art form, especially novels, plays, and poems. It includes both print and digital writing. In recent centuries, the definition has expanded to include oral literature, much of which has been transcribed. Literature is a method of recording, preserving, and transmitting knowledge and entertainment. It can also have a social, psychological, spiritual, or political role.
Philosophy is a systematic study of general and fundamental questions concerning topics like existence, knowledge, mind, reason, language, and value. It is a rational and critical inquiry that reflects on its methods and assumptions.
Psychology is the scientific study of the mind and behavior. Its subject matter includes the behavior of humans and nonhumans, both conscious and unconscious phenomena, and mental processes such as thoughts, feelings, and motives. Psychology is an academic discipline of immense scope, crossing the boundaries between the natural and social sciences. Biological psychologists seek an understanding of the emergent properties of brains, linking the discipline to neuroscience. As social scientists, psychologists aim to understand the behavior of individuals and groups.
Sociology is the scientific study of human society that focuses on society, human social behavior, patterns of social relationships, social interaction, and aspects of culture associated with everyday life. The term sociology was coined in the late 18th century to describe the scientific study of society. Regarded as a part of both the social sciences and humanities, sociology uses various methods of empirical investigation and critical analysis to develop a body of knowledge about social order and social change. Sociological subject matter ranges from micro-level analyses of individual interaction and agency to macro-level analyses of social systems and social structure. Applied sociological research may be applied directly to social policy and welfare, whereas theoretical approaches may focus on the understanding of social processes and phenomenological method.
Economics is a social science that studies the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services.
Law is a set of rules that are created and are enforceable by governmental or societal institutions to regulate behavior, with its precise definition a matter of longstanding debate. It has been variously described as a science and as the art of justice. State-enforced laws can be made by a legislature, resulting in statutes; by the executive through decrees and regulations; or by judges' decisions, which form precedent in common law jurisdictions. An autocrat may exercise those functions within their realm. The creation of laws themselves may be influenced by a constitution, written or tacit, and the rights encoded therein. The law shapes politics, economics, history and society in various ways and also serves as a mediator of relations between people.
An apple is the round, edible fruit of an apple tree. Fruit trees of the orchard or domestic apple, the most widely grown in the genus, are cultivated worldwide. The tree originated in Central Asia, where its wild ancestor, Malus sieversii, is still found. Apples have been grown for thousands of years in Eurasia before they were introduced to North America by European colonists. Apples have cultural significance in many mythologies and religions.
A banana is an elongated, edible fruit—botanically a berry—produced by several kinds of large treelike herbaceous flowering plants in the genus Musa. In some countries, cooking bananas are called plantains, distinguishing them from dessert bananas. The fruit is variable in size, color and firmness, but is usually elongated and curved, with soft flesh rich in starch covered with a peel, which may have a variety of colors when ripe. It grows upward in clusters near the top of the plant. Almost all modern edible seedless (parthenocarp) cultivated bananas come from two wild species – Musa acuminata and Musa balbisiana, or their hybrids.
Orange most often refers to:Orange (fruit), the fruit of the tree species  Citrus × sinensis
Orange blossom, its fragrant flower
Orange juice
Orange (colour), the color of an orange fruit, occurs between red and yellow in the visible light spectrum
Some other citrus or citrus-like fruit, see list of plants known as orange
Orange (word), both a noun and an adjective in the English language.
The garden strawberry is a widely grown hybrid plant cultivated worldwide for its fruit. The genus Fragaria, the strawberries, is in the rose family, Rosaceae. The fruit is appreciated for its aroma, bright red colour, juicy texture, and sweetness. It is eaten either fresh or in prepared foods such as jam, ice cream, and chocolates. Artificial strawberry flavourings and aromas are widely used in commercial products. Botanically, the strawberry is not a berry, but an aggregate accessory fruit. Each apparent 'seed' on the outside of the strawberry is actually an achene, a botanical fruit with a seed inside it.
Blueberries are a widely distributed and widespread group of perennial flowering plants with blue or purple berries. They are classified in the section Cyanococcus within the genus Vaccinium. Commercial blueberries—both wild (lowbush) and cultivated (highbush)—are all native to North America. The highbush varieties were introduced into Europe during the 1930s.
The raspberry is the edible fruit of several plant species in the genus Rubus of the rose family, most of which are in the subgenus Idaeobatus. The name also applies to these plants themselves. Raspberries are perennial with woody stems.
The blackberry is an edible fruit produced by many species in the genus Rubus in the family Rosaceae, hybrids among these species within the subgenus Rubus, and hybrids between the subgenera Rubus and Idaeobatus. The taxonomy of blackberries has historically been confused because of hybridization and apomixis so that species have often been grouped together and called species aggregates.
The pineapple is a tropical plant with an edible fruit; it is the most economically significant plant in the family Bromeliaceae.
A mango is an edible stone fruit produced by the tropical tree Mangifera indica. It originated in the northeastern part of the Indian subcontinent, in what is now Bangladesh, northeastern India and Myanmar. M. indica has been cultivated in South and Southeast Asia since ancient times, resulting in two modern mango cultivar lineages: the "Indian" and the "Southeast Asian" types. Other species in the genus Mangifera also produce edible fruits called "mangoes," most of which are found in the Malesian ecoregion.
The papaya, papaw, or pawpaw is the plant species Carica papaya, one of the 21 accepted species in the genus Carica of the family Caricaceae. Papaya is also the name of its fruit. It was first domesticated in Mesoamerica, within modern-day southern Mexico and Central America. It is grown in several countries in regions with a tropical climate. In 2024, India was the leading producer, accounting for 36% of the world total.
A grape is a fruit, botanically a berry, of the deciduous woody vines of the flowering plant genus Vitis. Grapes are a non-climacteric type of fruit, generally occurring in clusters.
The watermelon is a species of flowering plant in the family Cucurbitaceae, that has a large, edible fruit. It is a scrambling and trailing vine-like plant, and is widely cultivated worldwide, with more than 1,000 varieties.
The cantaloupe is a type of true melon with sweet, aromatic, and usually orange flesh. Originally, cantaloup referred to the true cantaloupe or European cantaloupe with non- to slightly netted and often ribbed rind. Today, it also refers to the muskmelon with strongly netted rind, which is called cantaloupe in North America, rockmelon in Australia and New Zealand, and spanspek in Southern Africa. Cantaloupes range in mass from 0.5 to 5 kilograms.
Honeydew may refer to:Honeydew (melon), a cultivar group of melon
Honeydew (secretion), a sugar-rich sticky substance secreted by various animals
Honeydew moth, a moth of Southern and Middle America
Honeydew, California, United States, a town
Honeydew, West Virginia, United States, an unincorporated community
Honeydew (color), a pale shade of the color spring green
Bunsen Honeydew, a fictional character from The Muppets franchise
Honeydew (album), a 2008 album by Shawn Mullins
Honeydew (film), a 2020 American horror film written and directed by Devereux Milburn
Honey Dew Donuts, a Massachusetts-based franchise selling donuts and other breakfast foods
Fuller's Organic Honey Dew, a brand of pale ale brewed by Fuller's Brewery
Simon "Honeydew" Lane, a member of internet gaming group The Yogscast
"Honeydew" , a 2023 episode of The Bear TV series

.
Kiwi most commonly refers to:Kiwi (bird), a flightless bird native to New Zealand
Kiwi (nickname), an informal name for New Zealanders
Kiwifruit, an edible hairy fruit with many seeds
Kiwi dollar or New Zealand dollar, a unit of currency.
The peach is a deciduous tree that bears edible juicy fruits with various characteristics. Most are simply called peaches, while the glossy-skinned, non-fuzzy varieties are called nectarines. Though from the same species, they are regarded commercially as different fruits.
A plum is a fruit of some species in Prunus subg. Prunus. Dried plums are usually called prunes.
A cherry is the fruit of many plants of the genus Prunus, and is a fleshy drupe.
An apricot is a fruit, or the tree that bears the fruit, of several species in the genus Prunus. Usually an apricot is from the species Prunus armeniaca, but the fruits of the other species in Prunus sect. Armeniaca are also called apricots. In 2023, world production of apricots was 3.7 million tonnes, led by Turkey with 20% of the total.
The pomegranate is a fruit-bearing, deciduous shrub in the family Lythraceae, subfamily Punicoideae, that grows to between 1.5–5 metres (5–16 ft) tall. Rich in symbolic and mythological associations in many cultures, it originated from the Iranian plateau including Iran, the Caucasus, Turkmenistan, Afghanistan and Pakistan. Pomegranate was first domesticated by ancient Iranians in the Persian plateau and nearby regions about 5,000 years ago. It is extensively cultivated for its fruit.
The tomato is a plant whose fruit is an edible berry that is eaten as a vegetable. The tomato is a member of the nightshade family that includes tobacco, potato, and chili peppers. It originated from western South America, and may have been domesticated there, in Mexico, or in Central America. The Spanish introduced tomatoes to Eurasia in the Columbian exchange in the 16th century.
The cucumber is a widely-cultivated creeping vine plant in the family Cucurbitaceae that bears cylindrical to spherical fruits, which are used as culinary vegetables. Considered an annual plant, there are three main types of cucumber—slicing, pickling, and seedless—within which several cultivars have been created. The cucumber originates in Asia extending from India, Nepal, Bangladesh, China, and Northern Thailand, but now grows on most continents, and many different types of cucumber are grown commercially and traded on the global market. In North America, the term wild cucumber refers to plants in the genera Echinocystis and Marah, though the two are not closely related.
The carrot is a root vegetable, typically orange in colour, though heirloom variants including purple, black, red, white, and yellow cultivars exist, all of which are domesticated forms of the wild carrot, Daucus carota, native to Europe and Southwestern Asia. The plant probably originated in Iran and was originally cultivated for its leaves and seeds.
Broccoli is an edible green plant in the cabbage family whose large flowering head, stalk and small associated leaves are eaten as a vegetable. Broccoli is classified in the Italica cultivar group of the species Brassica oleracea. Broccoli has large flower heads, or florets, usually dark green, arranged in a tree-like structure branching out from a thick stalk, which is usually light green. Leaves surround the mass of flower heads. Broccoli resembles cauliflower, a different but closely related cultivar group of the same Brassica species.
Cauliflower is one of several vegetables cultivated from the species Brassica oleracea in the genus Brassica, which is in the Brassicaceae family. Cauliflower usually grows with one main stem that carries a large, rounded "head" made of tightly clustered, immature white or off-white flower buds called the "curd". Typically, only the "head" is eaten.
Spinach is a leafy green flowering plant native to Central and Western Asia. It is of the order Caryophyllales, family Amaranthaceae, subfamily Chenopodioideae. Its leaves are a common vegetable consumed either fresh, cooked or after storage. The taste differs considerably between cooked and raw: the high oxalate content may be reduced by steaming.
Kale, also called leaf cabbage, belongs to a group of cabbage cultivars primarily grown for their edible leaves, but it is also used as an ornamental plant. Its multiple different cultivars vary quite a bit in appearance; the leaves can be bumpy, curly, or flat, and the color ranges from purple to green.
Lettuce is an annual plant of the family Asteraceae mostly grown as a leaf vegetable. The leaves are most often used raw in green salads, although lettuce is also seen in other kinds of food, such as sandwiches, wraps and soups; it can also be grilled. Its stem and seeds are sometimes used; celtuce is one variety grown for its stems, which are eaten either raw or cooked. In addition to its main use as a leafy green, it has also gathered religious and medicinal significance over centuries of human consumption. Europe and North America originally dominated the market for lettuce, but by the late 20th century the consumption of lettuce had spread throughout the world. In 2023, world production of lettuce was 28 million tonnes, led by China with 53% of the total.
Eruca sativa is an edible annual plant in the family Brassicaceae. Other common names include salad rocket, garden rocket, colewort, roquette, ruchetta, rucola, rucoli, and rugula.
Zucchini, courgette, or Cucurbita pepo var. cylindrica is a summer squash, a vining herbaceous plant whose fruit are harvested when their immature seeds and epicarp (rind) are still soft and edible. It is closely related, but not identical, to the marrow; its fruit may be called marrow when mature.
Eggplant, aubergine, brinjal, or baigan is a plant species in the nightshade family Solanaceae. Solanum melongena is grown worldwide for its edible fruit, typically used as a vegetable in cooking.
The bell pepper is the fruit of plants in the Grossum Group of the species Capsicum annuum. Cultivars of the plant produce fruits in different colors, including red, yellow, orange, green, white, and purple. Bell peppers are sometimes grouped with less pungent chili varieties as "sweet peppers". While they are botanically fruits—classified as berries—they are commonly used as a vegetable ingredient or side dish. Other varieties of the genus Capsicum are categorized as chili peppers when they are cultivated for their pungency, including some varieties of Capsicum annuum.
The onion, also known as the bulb onion or common onion, is a vegetable that is the most widely cultivated species of the genus Allium. The shallot is a botanical variety of the onion which was classified as a separate species until 2011. The onion's close relatives include garlic, scallion, leek, and chives.
Garlic is a species of bulbous flowering plants in the genus Allium. Its close relatives include the onion, shallot, leek, chives, Welsh onion, and Chinese onion. Garlic is native to central and western Asia, stretching from the Black Sea through the southern Caucasus, northeastern Iran, and the Hindu Kush. It has naturalized in many other parts of the world, including Mediterranean Europe and China. There are two subspecies and hundreds of varieties of garlic.
Ginger is a flowering plant whose rhizome, ginger root or ginger, is widely used as a spice and a folk medicine. It is an herbaceous perennial that grows annual pseudostems about one meter tall, bearing narrow leaf blades. The inflorescences bear flowers having pale yellow petals with purple edges, and arise directly from the rhizome on separate shoots.
The potato is a starchy tuberous vegetable native to the Americas that is consumed as a staple food in many parts of the world. Potatoes are underground stem tubers of the plant Solanum tuberosum, a perennial in the nightshade family Solanaceae.
The sweet potato or sweetpotato is a dicotyledonous plant in the morning glory family, Convolvulaceae. Its sizeable, starchy, sweet-tasting tuberous roots are used as a root vegetable, which is a staple food in parts of the world. Cultivars of the sweet potato have been bred to bear tubers with flesh and skin of various colors. Moreover, the young shoots and leaves are occasionally eaten as greens. The sweet potato and the potato are only distantly related, both being in the order Solanales. Although darker sweet potatoes are often known as yams in parts of North America, they are even more distant from actual yams, which are monocots in the order Dioscoreales.
Maize, also known as corn in North American English, is a tall stout grass that produces cereal grain. The leafy stalk of the plant gives rise to male inflorescences or tassels which produce pollen, and female inflorescences called ears. The ears yield grain, known as kernels or seeds. In modern commercial varieties, these are usually yellow or white; other varieties can be of many colors. Maize was domesticated by indigenous peoples in southern Mexico about 9,000 years ago from wild teosinte. Native Americans planted it alongside beans and squashes in the Three Sisters polyculture.
Could not find summary for "Green Beans".
Asparagus or garden asparagus is a perennial flowering plant species in the genus Asparagus native to Eurasia. Widely cultivated as a vegetable crop, its young shoots are used as a spring vegetable.
Celery is a cultivated plant belonging to the species Apium graveolens in the family Apiaceae that has been used as a vegetable since ancient times.
A mushroom is the fleshy, spore-bearing fruiting body of a fungus, typically produced above ground on soil or another food source. A toadstool generally refers to a poisonous mushroom.
The avocado, alligator pear or avocado pear is an evergreen tree in the laurel family (Lauraceae). It is native to the Americas, with archaeological evidence of early human avocado use dating back thousands of years across various regions of Central and South America. It was prized for its large and unusually oily fruit. The native range of avocado extends from Mexico to Peru, encompassing much of Central America and parts of northern and western South America.
Lime most commonly refers to:Lime (fruit), a green citrus fruit
Lime (material), inorganic materials containing calcium, usually calcium oxide or calcium hydroxide
Lime (color), a color between yellow and green.
The lemon is a species of small evergreen tree in the Citrus genus of the flowering plant family Rutaceae. A true lemon is a hybrid of the citron and the bitter orange. Its origins are uncertain, but some evidence suggests lemons originated during the 1st millennium BC in what is now northeastern India. Some other citrus fruits are called lemon.
The grapefruit is a subtropical citrus tree known for its relatively large, sour to semi-sweet, somewhat bitter fruit. The flesh of the fruit is segmented and varies in color from pale yellow to dark red.
Pears are fruits produced and consumed around the world, growing on a tree and are harvested in late summer into mid-autumn. The pear tree and shrub are a species of genus Pyrus, in the family Rosaceae, bearing the pomaceous fruit of the same name. Several species of pears are valued for their edible fruit and juices, while others are cultivated as trees.
The coconut is a member of the palm family (Arecaceae) and the only living species of the genus Cocos. The term "coconut" can denote the whole coconut palm tree or the large hard fruit. Originally native to Central Indo-Pacific, they are ubiquitous in coastal tropical regions.
Passiflora edulis, commonly known as passion fruit, is a vine species of passion flower. The fruit is a pepo, a type of botanical berry, round to oval, either yellow or dark purple at maturity, with a soft to firm, juicy interior filled with numerous seeds.
Lychee is a monotypic taxon and the sole member in the genus Litchi in the soapberry family, Sapindaceae.
The fruit is edible and has a sweet, mildly tart flavor and a distinctive floral aroma often described as rose-like.
The durian is the edible fruit of several tree species belonging to the genus Durio. There are 30 recognised species, at least nine of which produce edible fruit. Durio zibethinus, native to Borneo, Sumatra, and the Malay Peninsula, is the only species available on the international market. It has over 300 named varieties in Thailand and over 200 in Malaysia as of 2021. Other species are sold in their local regions.
Guava, also known as the 'guava-pear' in various regions, is a common tropical fruit cultivated in many tropical and subtropical regions. The common guava Psidium guajava is a small tree in the myrtle family (Myrtaceae), native to Mexico, Central America, the Caribbean and northern South America.
Carambola, also known as star fruit, is the fruit of Averrhoa carambola, a species of tree native to tropical Southeast Asia. The edible fruit has distinctive ridges running down its sides. When cut in cross-section, it resembles a star, giving it the name of star fruit. The entire fruit is edible, usually raw, and may be cooked or made into relishes, preserves, garnish, and juices. It is commonly consumed in Southeast Asia, South Asia, the South Pacific, Micronesia, parts of East Asia, the United States, parts of Latin America, and the Caribbean. The tree is cultivated throughout tropical areas of the world.
Pitaya, pitahaya or commonly known as dragon fruit is the fruit of several cactus species indigenous to the region of southern Mexico and along the Pacific coasts of Guatemala, Costa Rica, and El Salvador. Pitaya is cultivated in East Asia, South Asia, Southeast Asia, continental America, the Caribbean, Australia, Brazil, Madeira (Portugal), and throughout tropical and subtropical regions of the world.
Rice is a cereal grain and in its domesticated form is the staple food of over half of the world's population, particularly in Asia and Africa. Rice is the seed of the grass species Oryza sativa —or, much less commonly, Oryza glaberrima. Asian rice was domesticated in China some 13,500 to 8,200 years ago; African rice was domesticated in Africa about 3,000 years ago. Rice has become commonplace in many cultures worldwide; in 2023, 800 million tons were produced, placing it third after sugarcane and maize. Only some 8% of rice is traded internationally. China, India, and Indonesia are the largest consumers of rice. A substantial amount of the rice produced in developing nations is lost after harvest through factors such as poor transport and storage. Rice yields can be reduced by pests including insects, rodents, and birds, as well as by weeds, and by diseases such as rice blast. Traditional rice polycultures such as rice-duck farming, and modern integrated pest management seek to control damage from pests in a sustainable way.
Pasta is a type of food typically made from an unleavened dough of wheat flour mixed with water or eggs, and formed into sheets or other shapes, then cooked by boiling or baking. Pasta was originally only made with durum, although the definition has been expanded to include alternatives for a gluten-free diet, such as rice flour, or legumes such as beans or lentils. Pasta is believed to have developed independently in Italy and is a staple food of Italian cuisine, with evidence of Etruscans making pasta as early as 400 BCE in Italy.
Bread is a baked food product made from water, flour, and often yeast. It is a staple food across the world, particularly in Europe and the Middle East. Throughout recorded history and around the world, it has been an important part of many cultures' diets. It is one of the oldest human-made foods, having been of significance since the dawn of agriculture, and plays an essential role in both religious rituals and secular culture.
A tortilla is a thin, circular unleavened flatbread from Mesoamerica originally made from masa, and now also from wheat flour.
The oat, sometimes called the common oat, is a species of cereal grass (Avena) grown for fodder and for its seed, which is known by the same name. Oats appear to have been domesticated as a secondary crop, as their seeds resembled those of other cereals closely enough for them to be included by early cultivators. Oats tolerate cold winters less well than cereals such as wheat, barley, and rye, but need less summer heat and more rain, making them important in areas such as Northwest Europe that have cool, wet summers. They can tolerate low-nutrient and acid soils. Oats grow thickly and vigorously, allowing them to outcompete many weeds, and compared to other cereals are relatively free from diseases.
Quinoa is a flowering plant in the amaranth family. It is a herbaceous annual plant grown as a crop primarily for its edible seeds; the seeds are high in protein, dietary fiber, B vitamins and dietary minerals especially potassium and magnesium in amounts greater than in many grains. Quinoa is not a grass but rather a pseudocereal botanically related to spinach and amaranth, and originated in the Andean region of northwestern South America. It was first used to feed livestock 5,200–7,000 years ago, and for human consumption 3,000–4,000 years ago in the Lake Titicaca basin of Bolivia and Peru.
Barley, a member of the grass family, is a major cereal grain grown in temperate climates globally. One of the first cultivated grains, it was domesticated in the Fertile Crescent around 9000 BC, giving it nonshattering spikelets and making it much easier to harvest. Its use then spread throughout Eurasia by 2000 BC. Barley prefers relatively low temperatures and well-drained soil to grow. It is relatively tolerant of drought and soil salinity, but is less winter-hardy than wheat or rye.
The lentil is an annual legume grown for its lens-shaped edible seeds or pulses, also called lentils. It is about 40 cm (16 in) tall, and the seeds grow in pods, usually with two seeds in each.
The chickpea or chick pea is an annual legume of the family Fabaceae, subfamily Faboideae, cultivated for its edible seeds. Its different types are variously known as gram, Bengal gram, chana dal, garbanzo, garbanzo bean, or Egyptian pea. It is one of the earliest cultivated legumes, the oldest archaeological evidence of which was found in Syria.
Could not find summary for "Black Beans".
The kidney bean is a variety of the common bean ; it has such a common name owing to its resemblance to a human kidney.
Tofu  or bean curd is a food prepared by pressing the curds of coagulated soy milk into solid white blocks of varying softness: silken, soft, firm, and extra firm.
Tempeh or tempe is a traditional Indonesian food made from fermented soybeans. It is made by a natural culturing and controlled fermentation process that binds soybeans into a cake form. A fungus, Rhizopus oligosporus or Rhizopus oryzae, is used in the fermentation process and is also known as tempeh starter.
The chicken is a domesticated form of the red junglefowl, originally native to Southeast Asia. It was first domesticated around 8,000 years ago and is one of the most common and widespread domesticated animals in the world. Chickens are primarily kept for their meat and eggs, though they are also kept as pets.
Beef is the culinary name for meat from cattle. Beef can be prepared in various ways; cuts are often used for steak, which can be cooked to varying degrees of doneness, while trimmings are often ground or minced, as found in most hamburgers. Beef contains protein, iron, and vitamin B12. Along with other kinds of red meat, high consumption is associated with an increased risk of colorectal cancer and cardiovascular disease, especially when processed. Beef has a high environmental impact, being a primary driver of deforestation with the highest greenhouse gas emissions of any agricultural product.
Pork is the culinary name for the meat of the pig. It is the second most commonly consumed type of meat worldwide, following poultry, with evidence of pig husbandry dating back to 8000–9000 BCE.
Turkey, officially the Republic of Türkiye, is a country mainly located in Anatolia in West Asia, with a smaller part called East Thrace in Southeast Europe. It borders the Black Sea to the north; Georgia, Armenia, Azerbaijan, and Iran to the east; Iraq, Syria, and the Mediterranean Sea to the south; and the Aegean Sea, Greece, and Bulgaria to the west. Turkey is home to over 86 million people; most are ethnic Turks, while Kurds are the largest ethnic minority. Officially a secular state, Turkey has a Muslim-majority population. Ankara is Turkey's capital and second-largest city. Istanbul is its largest city and economic center. Other major cities include İzmir, Bursa, and Antalya.
Salmon are any of several commercially important species of euryhaline ray-finned fish from the genera Salmo and Oncorhynchus of the family Salmonidae, native to tributaries of the North Atlantic (Salmo) and North Pacific (Oncorhynchus) basins. Salmon is a colloquial or common name used for fish in this group, but is not a scientific name. Other closely related fish in the same family include trout, char, grayling, whitefish, lenok and taimen, all coldwater fish of the subarctic and cooler temperate regions with some sporadic endorheic populations in Central Asia.
A tuna is a saltwater fish that belongs to the tribe Thunnini, a subgrouping of the Scombridae (mackerel) family. The Thunnini comprise 15 species across five genera, the sizes of which vary greatly, ranging from the bullet tuna up to the Atlantic bluefin tuna, which averages 2 m (6.6 ft) and is believed to live up to 50 years.
A shrimp is a common name typically used for crustaceans with an elongated body and a primarily swimming mode of locomotion – usually decapods belonging to the Caridea or Dendrobranchiata, although some crustaceans outside of this order are also referred to as "shrimp".
Crabs are decapod crustaceans, either the Brachyura or various groups within the closely related Anomura, characterised by having a heavily armoured shell, their tail segments concealed under the body, the ability to run sideways, and the habit of hiding in rocky crevices. They do not form a single natural group or clade, but have convergently evolved multiple times from the ancestral decapod body plan through carcinisation, the process of creating this set of characteristics. As a group, they are thus polyphyletic, meaning they have multiple evolutionary origins.
Lobsters are malacostracan decapod crustaceans of the family Nephropidae or its synonym Homaridae. They have long bodies with muscular tails and live in crevices or burrows on the sea floor. Three of their five pairs of legs have claws, including the first pair, which are usually much larger than the others. Highly prized as seafood, lobsters are economically important and are often one of the most profitable commodities in the coastal areas they populate.
An egg is an organic vessel in which an embryo begins to develop.
Milk is a usually white liquid food produced by the mammary glands of lactating mammals. It is the primary source of nutrition for young mammals before they are able to digest solid food. Milk contains many nutrients, including calcium and protein, as well as lactose and saturated fat; the enzyme lactase is needed to break down lactose. Immune factors and immune-modulating components in milk contribute to milk immunity. The first milk, which is called colostrum, contains antibodies and immune-modulating components that strengthen the immune system against many diseases.
Cheddar cheese is a natural cheese that is relatively hard, off-white, and sometimes sharp-tasting. It originates from the village of Cheddar in Somerset, South West England.
Mozzarella is a semi-soft non-aged cheese prepared using the pasta filata ('stretched-curd') method. It originated in southern Italy.
Yogurt is a food produced by bacterial fermentation of milk. Fermentation of sugars in the milk by these bacteria produces lactic acid, which acts on milk protein to give yogurt its texture and characteristic tart flavor. Cow's milk is most commonly used to make yogurt. Milk from water buffalo, goats, ewes, mares, camels, and yaks is also used to produce yogurt. The milk used may be homogenized or not. It may be pasteurized or raw. Each type of milk produces substantially different results.
Butter is a dairy product made from the fat and protein components of churned cream. It is a semi-solid emulsion at room temperature, consisting of approximately 81% butterfat. It is used at room temperature as a spread, melted as a condiment, and used as a fat in baking, sauce-making, pan frying, and other cooking procedures.
The almond is a species of tree from the genus Prunus. Along with the peach, it is classified in the subgenus Amygdalus, distinguished from the other subgenera by corrugations on the shell (endocarp) surrounding the seed.
A walnut is the edible seed of any tree of the genus Juglans, particularly the Persian or English walnut, Juglans regia. They are accessory fruit because the outer covering of the fruit is technically an involucre and thus not morphologically part of the carpel; this means it cannot be a drupe but is instead a drupe-like nut.
Cashew is the common name of a tropical evergreen tree Anacardium occidentale, in the family Anacardiaceae. It is the source of the cashew nut and the cashew apple. The tree can grow as tall as 14 meters.
Peanuts is a syndicated daily and Sunday American comic strip written and illustrated by Charles M. Schulz. The strip originally ran from 1950 to 2000, continuing in reruns afterward. Peanuts is regarded as one of the most popular and influential comic strips in history, with 17,897 strips published in all, making it "arguably the longest story ever told by one human being". At the time of Schulz's death in 2000, Peanuts ran in over 2,600 newspapers, with a readership of roughly 355 million across 75 countries, and had been translated into 21 languages. It helped to cement the four-panel gag strip as the standard in the United States, and together with its merchandise earned Schulz more than $1 billion. Following successful animated television and stage-theatrical adaptations over the years, five animated theatrical films have been released.
Sunflower seeds are the seeds of the sunflower (Helianthus).
Could not find summary for "Pumpkin Seeds".
Olive oil is a vegetable oil obtained by pressing whole olives and extracting the oil.
Honey is a sweet and viscous substance made by several species of bees, the best-known of which are honey bees. Honey is made and stored to nourish bee colonies. Bees produce honey by gathering and then refining the sugary secretions of plants or the secretions of other insects, like the honeydew of aphids. This refinement takes place both within individual bees, through regurgitation and enzymatic activity, and during storage in the hive, through water evaporation that concentrates the honey's sugars until it is thick and viscous.
Maple syrup is a sweet syrup made from the sap of maple trees. In cold climates these trees store starch in their trunks and roots before winter; the starch is then converted to sugar that rises in the sap in late winter and early spring. Maple trees are tapped by drilling holes into their trunks and collecting the sap, which is heated to evaporate much of the water, leaving the concentrated syrup.
Chocolate is a food made from roasted and ground cocoa beans that can be a liquid, solid, or paste, either by itself or to flavor other foods. Cocoa beans are the processed seeds of the cacao tree. They are usually fermented to develop the flavor, then dried, cleaned, and roasted. The shell is removed to reveal nibs, which are ground to chocolate liquor The liquor can be processed to separate its two components, cocoa solids and cocoa butter, or shaped and sold as unsweetened baking chocolate. By adding sugar, sweetened chocolates are produced, which can be sold simply as dark chocolate, or, with the addition of milk, can be made into milk chocolate. Making milk chocolate with cocoa butter and without cocoa solids produces white chocolate.
Vanilla is a spice derived from orchids of the genus Vanilla, primarily obtained from the seed pods of the flat-leaved New World vanilla (V. planifolia).
Cinnamon is a spice obtained from the inner bark of several tree species from the genus Cinnamomum. Cinnamon is used mainly as an aromatic condiment and flavouring additive in a wide variety of cuisines, in particular sweet and savoury dishes such as biscuits, breakfast cereals, snack foods, bagels, teas, hot chocolate, and traditional foods. The aroma and flavour of cinnamon derive from its essential oil and principal component, cinnamaldehyde, as well as numerous other constituents, including eugenol.
Basil, also called great basil, is a culinary herb of the family Lamiaceae (mints). It is a tender plant, and is used in cuisines worldwide. In Western cuisine, the generic term "basil" refers to the variety also known as Genovese basil or sweet basil. Basil is native to tropical regions from Central Africa to Southeast Asia. In temperate climates basil is treated as an annual plant, but it can be grown as a short-lived perennial or biennial in warmer horticultural zones with tropical or Mediterranean climates.
Oregano is a species of flowering plant in the mint family, Lamiaceae. It was native to the Mediterranean region, but widely naturalised elsewhere in the temperate Northern Hemisphere.
Parsley, or garden parsley, is a species of flowering plant in the family Apiaceae that is native to the Balkans. It has been introduced and naturalized in Europe and elsewhere in the world with suitable climates, and is widely cultivated as a herb and a vegetable.
Mint or The Mint may refer to:.
Salvia rosmarinus, synonym Rosmarinus officinalis, commonly known as rosemary, is a shrub with fragrant, evergreen, needle-like leaves and purple or sometimes white, pink, or blue flowers. It is a member of the mint family, Lamiaceae.
Thyme is a culinary herb consisting of the dried aerial parts of some members of the genus Thymus of flowering plants in the mint family Lamiaceae. Thymes are native to Eurasia and north Africa. Thymes have culinary, medicinal, and ornamental uses. The species most commonly cultivated and used for culinary purposes is Thymus vulgaris, native to Southeast Europe.
A telephone, commonly shortened to phone, is a telecommunications device that enables two or more users to conduct a conversation when they are too far apart to be easily heard directly. A telephone converts sound, typically and most efficiently the human voice, into electronic signals that are transmitted via cables and other communication channels to another telephone which reproduces the sound to the receiving user. The term is derived from Ancient Greek: τῆλε, romanized: tēle, lit. 'far' and φωνή, together meaning distant voice.
A laptop is a portable personal computer (PC). Laptops typically have a clamshell form factor with a flat-panel screen on the inside of the upper lid and an alphanumeric keyboard and pointing device on the inside of the lower lid. Most of the computer's internal hardware is in the lower part, under the keyboard, although many modern laptops have a built-in webcam at the top of the screen, and some even feature a touchscreen display. In most cases, unlike tablet computers which run on mobile operating systems, laptops tend to run on desktop operating systems, which were originally developed for desktop computers.
Tablet may refer to:.
Keyboard may refer to:.
A mouse is a small rodent. Characteristically, mice are known to have a pointed snout, small rounded ears, a body-length scaly tail, and a high breeding rate. The best known mouse species is the common house mouse. Mice are also popular as pets. In some places, certain kinds of field mice are locally common. They are known to invade homes for food and shelter.
Monitor or monitor may refer to:.
Headphones are a pair of small loudspeaker drivers worn on or around the head over a user's ears. They are electroacoustic transducers, which convert an electrical signal to a corresponding sound. Headphones let a single user listen to an audio source privately, in contrast to a loudspeaker, which emits sound into the open air for anyone nearby to hear. Headphones are also known as earphones or, colloquially, cans. Circumaural and supra-aural headphones use a band over the top of the head to hold the drivers in place. Another type, known as earbuds or earpieces, consists of individual units that plug into the user's ear canal; within that category have been developed cordless air buds using wireless technology. A third type are bone conduction headphones, which typically wrap around the back of the head and rest in front of the ear canal, leaving the ear canal open. In the context of telecommunication, a headset is a combination of a headphone and microphone.
Charger or Chargers may refer to:.
A backpack, also called knapsack, schoolbag, rucksack, pack, booksack, bookbag, haversack, packsack, or backsack, is in its simplest frameless form, a fabric sack carried on one’s back and secured with two straps that go over the shoulders, and is used to carry goods from one place to another. It can feature an external or internal frame to transfer heavy loads off the user’s shoulders and onto their hips, reducing strain and increasing comfort on long hikes with heavy gear.
A wallet is a flat case or pouch, often used to carry small personal items such as physical currency, debit cards, and credit cards; identification documents such as driving licence, identification card, club card; photographs, transit pass, business cards and other paper or laminated cards. Wallets are generally made of fabric or leather, and they are usually pocket-sized and foldable.
Key, Keys, The Key or The Keys may refer to:.
A pen is a common writing instrument that applies ink to a surface, typically paper, for writing or drawing. Early pens such as reed pens, quill pens, dip pens and ruling pens held a small amount of ink on a nib or in a small void or cavity that had to be periodically recharged by dipping the tip of the pen into an inkwell.
Today, such pens find only a small number of specialized uses, such as in illustration and calligraphy. Reed pens, quill pens and dip pens, which were used for writing, have been replaced by ballpoint pens, rollerball pens, fountain pens and felt or ceramic tip pens.
A pencil is a writing or drawing implement with a solid pigment core in a protective casing that reduces the risk of core breakage and keeps it from marking the user's hand.
A notebook is a book or stack of paper pages that are often ruled and used for purposes such as note-taking, journaling, or other writing, drawing, or scrapbooking and more.



Paper is a thin sheet of matted cellulose fibers. Largely derived from lignocellulose, paper is created from a pulp dissolved into a slurry that is drained and dried into sheets. Different types of paper are defined by constituent fiber, paper pulp, sizing, coating, paper size, paper density and grammage.
An eraser is an article of stationery that is used for removing marks from paper or skin. Erasers have a rubbery consistency and come in a variety of shapes, sizes, and colors. Some pencils have an eraser on one end. Less expensive erasers are made from synthetic rubber and synthetic soy-based gum, but more expensive or specialized erasers are made from vinyl, plastic, or gum-like materials.
A highlighter, also called a fluorescent pen, is a type of writing device used to bring attention to sections of text by marking them with a vivid, translucent colour.
A typical highlighter is fluorescent yellow, with the colour coming from pyranine. Different compounds, such as rhodamines are used for other colours.
A ruler is an instrument used to make length measurements, whereby a length is read from a series of markings called "rules" along an edge of the device. Alternatively, it is called a rule, scale, line gauge, or metre/meter stick. Usually, the instrument is rigid and the edge itself is a straightedge, which additionally allows one to draw straighter lines. Rulers are an important tool in geometry, geography and mathematics. They have been used since at least 2650 BC.
Scissors or shears are hand-operated cutting tools that consists of a pair of pivoting blades whose sharpened edges slide firmly against and past each other when the handles (shank) on the opposite side of the pivot are squeezed shut, causing the target material in between the blades to be divided by the combined effort of both cutting and shearing. Scissors are usually used for cutting thin materials such as paper, cardboard, metal foil, cloth, rope and wire, although a large variety of scissors/shears exist for specialized purposes, and their design details often dictate which is best for the intended job.
Tape or Tapes may refer to:.
A stapler is a mechanical device that joins pages of paper or similar material together by driving a thin metal staple through the sheets and folding the ends. Staplers are widely used in government, business, offices, workplaces, homes, and schools.
A mug is a type of cup, a drinking vessel usually intended for hot drinks such as coffee, hot chocolate, or tea. Mugs have handles and usually hold a larger amount of fluid than other types of cups such as teacups or coffee cups. Typically, a mug holds approximately 250–350 ml (8–12 US fl oz) of liquid. A mug-shaped vessel much larger than this tends to be called a tankard.
A cup is a small container used to hold liquids for drinking, typically with a flattened hemispherical shape and an open "mouth", and often with a capacity of about 6–16 US fluid ounces (177–473 ml). Cups may be made of pottery, glass, metal, wood, stone, polystyrene, plastic, lacquerware, or other materials. Normally, a cup is brought in contact with the mouth for drinking, distinguishing it from other tableware and drinkware forms such as jugs; however, a straw and/or lid may also be used. They also often have handles, though many do not, including beakers which have no handle or stem, or small bowl shapes which are very common in Asia.
Plate may refer to:.
A bowl is a typically round dish or container generally used for preparing, serving, storing, or consuming food. The interior of a bowl is characteristically shaped like a spherical cap, with the edges and the bottom, forming a seamless curve. This makes bowls especially suited for holding liquids and loose food, as the contents of the bowl are naturally concentrated in its center by the force of gravity. The exterior of a bowl is typically round but may vary in shape, including rectangular designs.
In cutlery or kitchenware, a fork is a utensil, now usually made of metal, whose long handle terminates in a head that branches into several narrow and often slightly curved tines with which one can spear foods either to hold them to cut with a knife or to lift them to the mouth.
A spoon is a utensil consisting of a shallow bowl, oval or round, at the end of a handle. A type of cutlery, especially as part of a place setting, it is used primarily for transferring food to the mouth (eating). Spoons are also used in food preparation to measure, mix, stir and toss ingredients and for serving food. Present day spoons are made from metal, wood, porcelain or plastic. There are many different types of spoons made from different materials by different cultures for different purposes and food.
A knife is a tool or weapon with a cutting edge or blade, usually attached to a handle or hilt. One of the earliest tools used by humanity, knives appeared at least 2.5 million years ago, as evidenced by the Oldowan tools. Originally made of wood, bone, and stone, over the centuries, in step with improvements in both metallurgy and manufacturing, knife blades have been made from copper, bronze, iron, steel, ceramic, and titanium. Most modern knives have fixed or folding blades, with styles varying by maker and country.
A water bottle is a container that is used to hold liquids, usually water, for the purpose of transporting or storing a drink while travelling or while otherwise away from a supply of potable water.
A vacuum flask is an insulating storage vessel that slows the speed at which its contents change in temperature. It greatly lengthens the time over which its contents remain hotter or cooler than the flask's surroundings by trying to be as adiabatic as possible. Invented by James Dewar in 1892, the vacuum flask consists of two flasks, placed one within the other and joined at the neck. The gap between the two flasks is partially evacuated of air, creating a near-vacuum which significantly reduces heat transfer by conduction or convection. When used to hold cold liquids, this also virtually eliminates condensation on the outside of the flask.
An umbrella is a folding canopy supported by wooden or metal ribs that is mounted on a wooden, metal, or plastic pole. It is usually designed to protect a person against sun or rain. Initially they were used in warmer countries for shade from the sun, but in modern times they evolved to also be used for protection from rain. Etymologically, the term umbrella is to be used when protecting from the sun, but is also commonly used when protecting from rain. Some countries specifically use the words parasol and parapluie to differentiate based on their use. There are also combinations of parasol and parapluie that are called en-tout-cas. A modern hand-held umbrella or parasol may have a black exterior canopy and a silver inner coating, for better protection from both the sun and ultraviolet rays, and may be water-resistant.
A jacket is a garment for the upper body, usually extending below the hips. A jacket typically has sleeves and fastens in the front or slightly on the side. Jackets without sleeves are vests. A jacket is generally lighter, tighter-fitting, and less insulating than a coat, but both are outerwear. Some jackets are fashionable, while some others serve as protective clothing.
A shoe is an item of footwear normally found in pairs intended to protect and comfort the human foot, usually made in such a way that one is designed to fit the left foot and the other the right foot.
A sock is a piece of clothing worn on the feet and often covering the ankle or some part of the calf. Some types of shoes or boots are typically worn over socks. In ancient times, socks were made from leather or matted animal hair. Machine-knit socks were first produced in the late 16th century. Until the 1800s, both hand-made and machine-knit socks were manufactured, with the latter technique becoming more common in the 19th century, and continuing until the modern day.
A hat is a head covering which is worn for various reasons, including protection against weather conditions, ceremonial reasons such as university graduation, religious reasons, comedy, safety, or as a fashion accessory. Hats which incorporate mechanical features, such as visors, spikes, flaps, braces or beer holders shade into the broader category of headgear.
A glove is a garment covering the hand, with separate sheaths or openings for each finger including the thumb. Gloves protect and comfort hands against cold or heat, damage by friction, abrasion or chemicals, and disease; or in turn to provide a guard for what a bare hand should not touch.
Sunglasses or sun glasses are a form of protective eyewear designed primarily to prevent bright sunlight and high-energy visible light from damaging or discomforting the eyes. They can sometimes also function as a visual aid, as variously termed spectacles or glasses exist, featuring lenses that are colored, polarized or darkened. In the early 20th century, they were also known as sun cheaters.
A watch is a timepiece carried or worn by a person. It is designed to maintain a consistent movement despite the motions caused by the person's activities. A wristwatch is worn around the wrist, attached by a watch strap or another type of bracelet, including metal bands or leather straps. A pocket watch is carried in a pocket, often attached to a chain. A stopwatch is a type of watch that measures intervals of time.
A remote control, also known colloquially as a remote or clicker, is an electronic device used to operate another device from a distance, usually wirelessly. In consumer electronics, a remote control can be used to operate devices such as a television set, DVD player or other digital home media appliance. A remote control can allow operation of devices that are out of convenient reach for direct operation of controls. They function best when used from a short distance. This is primarily a convenience feature for the user. In some cases, remote controls allow a person to operate a device that they otherwise would not be able to reach, as when a garage door opener is triggered from outside.
In electrical wiring, a light switch is a switch most commonly used to operate electric lights, permanently connected equipment, or electrical outlets. Portable lamps such as table lamps may have a light switch mounted on the socket, base, or in-line with the cord. Manually operated on/off switches may be substituted by dimmer switches that allow controlling the brightness of lamps as well as turning them on or off, time-controlled switches, occupancy-sensing switches, and remotely controlled switches and dimmers. Light switches are also found in flashlights, vehicles, and other devices.
Lamp, Lamps or LAMP may refer to:.
A pillow is a support of the body at rest for comfort, therapy, or decoration. Pillows are used in different variations by many species, including humans. Some types of pillows include throw pillows, body pillows, decorative pillows, and many more. Pillows that aid sleeping are a form of bedding that supports the head and neck. Other types of pillows are designed to support the body when lying down or sitting. There are also pillows that consider human body shape for increased comfort during sleep. Decorative pillows used on beds, couches or chairs are sometimes referred to as cushions.
A blanket is a swath of soft cloth large enough either to cover or to enfold most of the user's body and thick enough to keep the body warm by trapping radiant body heat that otherwise would be lost through convection and radiation.
Could not find summary for "Bed Sheet".
A towel is a piece of absorbent cloth, or paper, used for drying or wiping a surface. Towels draw moisture through direct contact.
A toothbrush is a special type of brush used to clean the teeth, gums, and tongue. It consists of a head of tightly clustered bristles, onto which toothpaste is applied, mounted on a handle that facilitates cleaning hard-to-reach areas of the mouth. They should be used in conjunction with tools that clean between the teeth―where toothbrush bristles cannot reach―such as floss, tape, interdental brushes or toothpicks.
Toothpaste is a paste or gel dentifrice that is used with a toothbrush to clean and maintain the aesthetics of teeth. Toothpaste is used to promote oral hygiene: it is an abrasive that aids in removing dental plaque and food from the teeth, assists in suppressing halitosis, and delivers active ingredients to help prevent tooth decay and gum disease (gingivitis). Due to variations in composition and fluoride content, not all toothpastes are equally effective in maintaining oral health. The decline of tooth decay during the 20th century has been attributed to the introduction and regular use of fluoride-containing toothpastes worldwide. Large amounts of swallowed toothpaste can be poisonous. Common colors for toothpaste include white and blue.
Soap is a salt of a fatty acid used for cleaning and lubricating products as well as other applications. In a domestic setting, soaps, specifically "toilet soaps", are surfactants usually used for washing, bathing, and other types of housekeeping. In industrial settings, soaps are used as thickeners, components of some lubricants, emulsifiers, and catalysts.
Shampoo is a hair care product, typically in the form of a viscous liquid, that is formulated to be used for cleaning (scalp) hair. Less commonly, it is available in solid bar format. Shampoo is used by applying it to wet hair, massaging the product in the hair, roots and scalp, and then rinsing it out. Some users may follow a shampooing with the use of hair conditioner.
A conditioner is something that improves the quality of another item.
A hairbrush is a brush with rigid or light and soft spokes used in hair care for smoothing, styling, and detangling human hair, or for grooming an animal's fur. It can also be used for styling in combination with a curling iron or hair dryer.
A comb is a tool consisting of a shaft that holds a row of teeth for pulling through the hair to clean, untangle, or style it. Combs have been used since prehistoric times, having been discovered in very refined forms from settlements dating back to 5,000 years ago in Persia.

A deodorant is a substance applied to the body to prevent or mask body odor caused by bacterial breakdown of perspiration, such as that in the armpits, groin, or feet. A subclass of deodorants called antiperspirants prevents sweating itself, typically by blocking sweat glands. Antiperspirants are used on a wider range of body parts at any place where sweat would be inconvenient or unsafe. Other types of deodorant allow sweating but prevent bacterial action on sweat.
A razor is a bladed tool primarily used in the removal of body hair through the act of shaving. Kinds of razors include straight razors, safety razors, disposable razors, and electric shavers.
A mirror, also known as a looking glass, is an object that reflects an image. Light that bounces off a mirror forms an image of whatever is in front of it, which is then focused through the lens of the eye or a camera. Mirrors reverse the direction of light at an angle equal to its incidence. This allows the viewer to see themselves or objects behind them, or even objects that are at an angle from them but out of their field of view, such as around a corner. Natural mirrors have existed since prehistoric times, such as the surface of water, but people have been manufacturing mirrors out of a variety of materials for thousands of years, like stone, metals, and glass. In modern mirrors, metals like silver or aluminium are often used due to their high reflectivity, applied as a thin coating on glass because of its naturally smooth and very hard surface.
A waste container, also known as a dustbin, rubbish bin, trash can, garbage can, wastepaper basket, and wastebasket, among other names, is a type of container intended to store waste. It is usually made out of metal or plastic. The words "rubbish", "basket" and "bin" are more common in British English usage; "trash" and "can" are more common in American English usage. "Garbage" may refer to food waste specifically or to municipal solid waste in general. The word "dumpster" refers to a large outdoor waste container for garbage collectors to pick up the contents.
A recycling bin is a container used to hold recyclables before they are taken to recycling centers. Recycling bins exist in various sizes for use inside and outside of homes, offices, and large public facilities. Separate containers are often provided for paper, tin or aluminum cans, and glass or plastic bottles, with some bins allowing for commingled, mixed recycling of various materials.
A broom, also known as a broomstick, is a cleaning tool, consisting of usually stiff fibers attached to, and roughly parallel to, a cylindrical handle, the broomstick. It is thus a variety of brush with a long handle. It is commonly used in combination with a dustpan.
A dustpan, the small version of which is also known as a "hearth brush and shovel”, is a cleaning utensil. The dustpan is commonly used in combination with a broom or long brush. The small dustpan may appear to be a type of flat scoop. Though often hand-held for home use, industrial and commercial enterprises use a hinged variety on the end of a long handle to allow the user to stand instead of stoop while using it.
A vacuum is space devoid of matter. The word is derived from the Latin adjective vacuus meaning "vacant" or "void". An approximation to such vacuum is a region with a gaseous pressure much less than atmospheric pressure. Physicists often discuss ideal test results that would occur in a perfect vacuum, which they sometimes simply call "vacuum" or free space, and use the term partial vacuum to refer to an actual imperfect vacuum as one might have in a laboratory or in space. In engineering and applied physics on the other hand, vacuum refers to any space in which the pressure is considerably lower than atmospheric pressure. The Latin term in vacuo is used to describe an object that is surrounded by a vacuum.
Could not find summary for "Laundry Basket".
Hanger or hangers may refer to:.
Iron is a chemical element; it has symbol Fe and atomic number 26. It is a metal that belongs to the first transition series and group 8 of the periodic table. It is, by mass, the most common element on Earth, forming much of Earth's outer and inner core. It is the fourth most abundant element in the Earth's crust. In its metallic state it was mainly deposited by meteorites.
Could not find summary for "Ironing Board".
A clock or chronometer is a device that measures and displays time. The clock is one of the oldest human inventions, meeting the need to measure intervals of time shorter than the natural units such as the day, the lunar month, and the year. Devices operating on several physical processes have been used over the millennia.
A calendar is a system of organizing days. This is done by giving names to periods of time, typically days, weeks, months and years. A date is the designation of a single and specific day within such a system. A calendar is also a physical record of such a system. A calendar can also mean a list of planned events, such as a court calendar, or a partly or fully chronological list of documents, such as a calendar of wills.
A whiteboard is a glossy, usually white surface for making non-permanent markings. Whiteboards are analogous to blackboards, but with a smoother surface allowing for rapid marking and erasing of markings on their surface. The popularity of whiteboards increased rapidly in the mid-1990s and they have become a fixture in many offices, meeting rooms, school classrooms, public events and other work environments.
The term Marker may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Phone Case".
Could not find summary for "Screen Protector".
Could not find summary for "USB Cable".
Could not find summary for "Power Bank".
A flashlight or electric torch, usually shortened to torch, is a portable hand-held electric lamp. Formerly, the light source typically was a miniature incandescent light bulb, but these have been displaced by light-emitting diodes (LEDs) since the early 2000s. A typical flashlight consists of the light source mounted in a reflector, a transparent cover to protect the light source and reflector, a battery, and a switch, all enclosed in a case.
Battery most often refers to:Electric battery, a device that provides electrical power
Battery (crime), a crime involving unlawful physical contact.
Fan commonly refers to:Fan (machine), a machine for producing airflow, often used for cooling
Hand fan, an implement held and waved by hand to move air for cooling
Fan (person), short for fanatic; an enthusiast or supporter, especially with regard to entertainment.
Heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems use advanced technologies to regulate temperature, humidity, and indoor air quality in residential, commercial, and industrial buildings, and in enclosed vehicles. Its goal is to provide thermal comfort and remove contaminants from the air. HVAC system design is a subdiscipline of mechanical engineering, based on the principles of thermodynamics, fluid mechanics, and heat transfer. Modern HVAC designs focus on energy efficiency and sustainability, especially with the rising demand for green building solutions. In modern construction, MEP engineers integrate HVAC systems with energy modeling techniques to optimize system performance and reduce operational costs. "Refrigeration" is sometimes added to the field's abbreviation as HVAC&R or HVACR, or "ventilation" is dropped, as in HACR.
Air conditioning, often abbreviated as A/C (US) or air con (UK), is the process of removing heat from an enclosed space to achieve a more comfortable interior temperature and, in some cases, controlling the humidity of internal air. Air conditioning can be achieved using a mechanical 'air conditioner' or through other methods, such as passive cooling and ventilative cooling. Air conditioning is a member of a family of systems and techniques that provide heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC). Heat pumps are similar in many ways to air conditioners but use a reversing valve, allowing them to both heat and cool an enclosed space.
A remote control is any device used to control a remote operation.
Router may refer to:Router (computing), a computer networking device
Router (woodworking), a rotating cutting tool
Router plane, a woodworking hand plane
Journey planner, a specialized search engine for optimal routes between locations
Michael Router, Catholic bishop in Ireland
The Routers, 1960s American instrumental group.
A modulator-demodulator, commonly referred to as a modem, is a computer hardware device that converts data from a digital format into a format suitable for an analog transmission medium such as telephone or radio. A modem transmits data by modulating one or more carrier wave signals to encode digital information, while the receiver demodulates the signal to recreate the original digital information. The goal is to produce a signal that can be transmitted easily and decoded reliably. Modems can be used with almost any means of transmitting analog signals, from LEDs to radio.
Speaker most commonly refers to:Speaker, a person who produces speech
Loudspeaker, a device that produces sound
Computer speakers.
A camera is an instrument used to capture and store images and videos, either digitally via an electronic image sensor, or chemically via a light-sensitive material such as photographic film. As a pivotal technology in the fields of photography and videography, cameras have played a significant role in the progression of visual arts, media, entertainment, surveillance, and scientific research. The invention of the camera dates back to the 19th century and has since evolved with advancements in technology, leading to a vast array of types and models in the 21st century.
A tripod is a portable three-legged frame or stand, used as a platform for supporting the weight and maintaining the stability of some other object. The three-legged design provides good stability against gravitational loads as well as horizontal shear forces, and better leverage for resisting tipping over due to lateral forces can be achieved by spreading the legs away from the vertical centre.
Variations with one, two, and four legs are termed monopod, bipod, and quadripod.
A microphone, colloquially called a mic, or mike, is a transducer that converts sound into an electrical signal. Microphones are used in telecommunication, sound recording, broadcasting, and consumer electronics, including telephones, hearing aids, and mobile devices.
Notebook Paper is the debut studio album by American rapper Huey. It was released on June 19, 2007, via Hitz Committee/Jive/Zomba Records. Production was handled by several record producers, including Jazze Pha, StarGate, T-Mix and T-Pain. It features guest appearances from Asia Cruise, Diamond, Kydd Trell, Bow Wow, Lloyd, MeMpHiTz, T-Pain, Trey Songz and Yo Gotti.
Sticky Notes is a desktop notes application included in Windows 7, Windows 8, Windows 8.1, Windows 10 and Windows 11. The app loads quickly and enables users to quickly take notes using post-it note–like windows on their desktop.
An envelope is a common packaging item, usually made of thin, flat material. It is designed to contain a flat object, such as a letter or card.
Stamp or Stamps or Stamping may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Wallet Card".
An identity document is a document proving a person's identity.
A coin is a small object, usually round and flat, used primarily as a medium of exchange or legal tender. They are standardized in weight, and produced in large quantities at a mint in order to facilitate trade. They are most often issued by a government. Coins often have images, numerals, or text on them. The faces of coins or medals are sometimes called the obverse and the reverse, referring to the front and back sides, respectively. The obverse of a coin is commonly called heads, because it often depicts the head of a prominent person, and the reverse is known as tails.
Could not find summary for "Water Filter".
Could not find summary for "Dish Sponge".
Could not find summary for "Cutting Board".
Pan or PAN may refer to:.
Pot may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Oven Mitt".
A measuring cup is a kitchen utensil used primarily to measure the volume of liquid or bulk solid cooking ingredients such as flour and sugar, especially for volumes from about 50 mL upwards. Measuring cups are also used to measure washing powder, liquid detergents and bleach for clothes washing. Some measuring cups will have a scale marked in cups and fractions of a cup, and often with fluid measure and weight of a selection of dry foodstuffs. Others are made to a specific capacity and are designed to be filled to the top with dry ingredients.
Could not find summary for "Measuring Spoon".
Quantum mechanics is the fundamental physical theory that describes the behavior of matter and of light; its unusual characteristics typically occur at and below the scale of atoms. It is the foundation of all quantum physics, which includes quantum chemistry, quantum biology, quantum field theory, quantum technology, and quantum information science.
General relativity, also known as the general theory of relativity, and as Einstein's theory of gravity, is the geometric theory of gravitation published by Albert Einstein in May 1916 and is the accepted description of the gravitation of macroscopic objects in modern physics. General relativity generalizes special relativity and refines Isaac Newton's law of universal gravitation, providing a unified description of gravity as a geometric property of space and time, or four-dimensional spacetime. In particular, the curvature of spacetime is directly related to the energy, momentum, and stress of whatever is present, including matter and radiation. The relation is specified by the Einstein field equations, a system of second-order partial differential equations. John Archibald Wheeler summarized it: "Space-time tells matter how to move; matter tells space-time how to curve.".
In physics, the special theory of relativity, or special relativity for short, is a scientific theory of the relationship between space and time. In Albert Einstein's 1905 paper,
"On the Electrodynamics of Moving Bodies", the theory is presented as being based on just two postulates:The laws of physics are invariant (identical) in all inertial frames of reference. This is known as the principle of relativity.
The speed of light in vacuum is the same for all observers, regardless of the motion of light source or observer. This is known as the principle of light constancy, or the principle of light speed invariance.
In physics, classical mechanics is a theory that describes the effect of forces on the motion of macroscopic objects and bulk matter, without considering quantum effects, and often without incorporating relativistic effects either.
Thermodynamics is a branch of physics that deals with heat, work, and temperature, and their relation to energy, entropy, and the physical properties of matter and radiation. The behavior of these quantities is governed by the four laws of thermodynamics, which convey a quantitative description using measurable macroscopic physical quantities but may be explained in terms of microscopic constituents by statistical mechanics. Thermodynamics applies to various topics in science and engineering, especially physical chemistry, biochemistry, chemical engineering, and mechanical engineering, as well as other complex fields such as meteorology.
In physics, statistical mechanics is a mathematical framework that applies statistical methods and probability theory to large assemblies of microscopic entities. Sometimes called statistical physics or statistical thermodynamics, its applications include many problems in a wide variety of fields such as biology, neuroscience, computer science, information theory and sociology. Its main purpose is to clarify the properties of matter in aggregate, in terms of physical laws governing atomic motion.
In physics, electromagnetism is an interaction that occurs between particles with electric charge via electromagnetic fields. The electromagnetic force is one of the four fundamental forces of nature. It is the dominant force in the interactions of atoms and molecules. Electromagnetism can be thought of as a combination of electrostatics and magnetism, which are distinct but closely intertwined phenomena. Electromagnetic forces occur between any two charged particles. Electric forces cause an attraction between particles with opposite charges and repulsion between particles with the same charge, while magnetism is an interaction that occurs between charged particles in relative motion. These two forces are described in terms of electromagnetic fields. Macroscopic charged objects are described in terms of Coulomb's law for electricity and Ampère's force law for magnetism; the Lorentz force describes microscopic charged particles.
In theoretical physics, quantum field theory (QFT) is a theoretical framework that combines field theory, special relativity and quantum mechanics. QFT is used in particle physics to construct physical models of subatomic particles and in condensed matter physics to construct models of quasiparticles. The current standard model of particle physics is based on QFT.
Particle physics or high-energy physics is the study of fundamental particles and forces that constitute matter and radiation. The field also studies combinations of elementary particles up to the scale of protons and neutrons, while the study of combinations of protons and neutrons is called nuclear physics.
Nuclear physics is the field of physics that studies atomic nuclei and their constituents and interactions, in addition to the study of other forms of nuclear matter.
Astrophysics is a science that applies the methods and principles of physics and chemistry in the study of astronomical objects and phenomena including the universe. As one of the founders of the discipline, James Keeler, said, astrophysics "seeks to ascertain the nature of the heavenly bodies, rather than their positions or motions in space—what they are, rather than where they are", which is studied in celestial mechanics.
Cosmology is the study of the nature of the universe, the cosmos. The term cosmology was first used in English in 1656 in Thomas Blount's Glossographia, with the meaning of "a speaking of the world". In 1731, German philosopher Christian Wolff used the term cosmology in Latin (cosmologia) to denote a branch of metaphysics that deals with the general nature of the physical world. Cosmology is investigated by scientists, including astronomers and physicists, as well as philosophers, such as metaphysicians, philosophers of physics, and philosophers of space and time. Because of this shared scope with philosophy, theories in physical cosmology may include both scientific and non-scientific propositions and may depend upon assumptions that cannot be tested. Religious or mythological cosmology is a body of beliefs based on mythological, religious, and esoteric literature and traditions of creation myths and eschatology.
Stellar evolution is the process by which a star changes over the course of time. Depending on the mass of the star, its lifetime can range from a few million years for the most massive to trillions of years for the least massive, which is considerably longer than the current age of the universe. The table shows the lifetimes of stars as a function of their masses. All stars are formed from collapsing clouds of gas and dust, often called nebulae or molecular clouds. Over the course of millions of years, these protostars settle down into a state of equilibrium, becoming what is known as a main sequence star.
Planetary science is the scientific study of planets, celestial bodies and planetary systems and the processes of their formation. It studies objects ranging in sizes from micrometeoroids to huge gas giants, with the aim of determining their composition, dynamics, formation, interrelations and history. It is a strongly interdisciplinary field, which originally grew from astronomy and Earth science, and now incorporates many disciplines, including planetary geology, cosmochemistry, atmospheric science, physics, oceanography, hydrology, theoretical planetary science, glaciology, and exoplanetology. Allied disciplines include space physics, when concerned with the effects of the Sun on the bodies of the Solar System, and astrobiology.
Could not find summary for "Exoplanet Research".
Could not find summary for "Galactic Dynamics".
Could not find summary for "Black Hole Physics".
In physics, string theory is a theoretical framework in which the point-like particles of particle physics are replaced by one-dimensional objects called strings. String theory describes how these strings propagate through space and interact with each other. On distance scales larger than the string scale, a string acts like a particle, with its mass, charge, and other properties determined by the vibrational state of the string. In string theory, one of the many vibrational states of the string corresponds to the graviton, a quantum mechanical particle that carries the gravitational force. Thus, string theory is a theory of quantum gravity.
Chaos theory is an interdisciplinary area of scientific study and branch of mathematics. It focuses on underlying patterns and deterministic laws of dynamical systems that are highly sensitive to initial conditions. These were once thought to have completely random states of disorder and irregularities. Chaos theory states that within the apparent randomness of chaotic complex systems, there are underlying patterns, interconnection, constant feedback loops, repetition, self-similarity, fractals and self-organization. The butterfly effect, an underlying principle of chaos, describes how a small change in one state of a deterministic nonlinear system can result in large differences in a later state. A metaphor for this behavior is that a butterfly flapping its wings in Brazil can cause or prevent a tornado in Texas.
A complex system is a system composed of many components that interact with one another. Examples of complex systems are Earth's global climate, organisms, the human brain, infrastructure such as power grid, transportation or communication systems, complex software and electronic systems, social and economic organizations, an ecosystem, a living cell, and, ultimately, for some authors, the entire universe.
Evolutionary biology is a subfield of biology that analyzes the four mechanisms of evolution: natural selection, mutation, genetic drift, and gene flow. The purpose of evolutionary biology is to observe the diversity of life on Earth. The idea of natural selection was first researched by Charles Darwin as he studied bird beaks. The discipline of evolutionary biology emerged through what Julian Huxley called the modern synthesis of understanding, from previously unrelated fields of biological research, such as genetics and ecology, systematics, and paleontology. Huxley was able to take what Charles Darwin discovered and elaborate to build on his understandings.
Genetics is the study of genes, genetic variation, and heredity in organisms. It is an important branch in biology because heredity is vital to organisms' evolution. Gregor Mendel, a Moravian Augustinian friar working in the 19th century in Brno, was the first to study genetics scientifically. Mendel studied "trait inheritance", patterns in the way traits are handed down from parents to offspring over time. He observed that organisms inherit traits by way of discrete "units of inheritance". This term, still used today, is a somewhat ambiguous definition of what is referred to as a gene.
Molecular biology is a branch of biology that seeks to understand the molecular structures and chemical processes that are the basis of biological activity within and between cells. It is centered largely on the study of nucleic acids and proteins. It examines the structure, function, and interactions of these macromolecules as they orchestrate processes such as replication, transcription, translation, protein synthesis, and complex biomolecular interactions. The field of molecular biology is multi-disciplinary, relying on principles from genetics, biochemistry, physics, mathematics, and more recently computer science (bioinformatics).
Cell biology, cellular biology, or cytology, is the branch of biology that studies the structure, function, and behavior of the cells. All organisms are made of cells. A cell is the basic unit of life that is responsible for the living and functioning of an organism. Cell biology encompasses both prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells, with subtopics including the study of cell metabolism, cell communication, cell cycle, biochemistry, and cell composition.
Neuroscience is the scientific study of the nervous system, its functions, and its disorders. It is a multidisciplinary science that combines physiology, anatomy, molecular biology, developmental biology, cytology, psychology, physics, computer science, chemistry, medicine, statistics, and mathematical modeling to understand the fundamental and emergent properties of neurons, glia, and neural circuits. The understanding of the biological basis of learning, memory, behavior, perception, and consciousness has been described by Eric Kandel as the "epic challenge" of the biological sciences.

Cognitive science is the interdisciplinary, scientific study of the mind and its processes. It examines the nature, the tasks, and the functions of cognition. Mental faculties of concern to cognitive scientists include perception, memory, attention, reasoning, language, and emotion. To understand these faculties, cognitive scientists borrow from fields such as psychology, philosophy, artificial intelligence, neuroscience, linguistics, and anthropology. The typical analysis of cognitive science spans many levels of organization, from learning and decision-making to logic and planning; from neural circuitry to modular brain organization. One of the fundamental concepts of cognitive science is that "thinking can best be understood in terms of representational structures in the mind and computational procedures that operate on those structures.".
Biochemistry, or biological chemistry, is the study of chemical processes within and relating to living organisms. A sub-discipline of both chemistry and biology, biochemistry may be divided into three fields: structural biology, enzymology, and metabolism. Over the last decades of the 20th century, biochemistry has become successful at explaining living processes through these three disciplines. Almost all areas of the life sciences are being uncovered and developed through biochemical methodology and research. Biochemistry focuses on understanding the chemical basis that allows biological molecules to give rise to the processes that occur within living cells and between cells, in turn relating greatly to the understanding of tissues and organs as well as organism structure and function. Biochemistry is closely related to molecular biology, the study of the molecular mechanisms of biological phenomena.
Biophysics is an interdisciplinary science that applies approaches and methods traditionally used in physics to study biological phenomena.
Microbiology is the scientific study of microorganisms, those being of unicellular (single-celled), multicellular, or acellular. Microbiology encompasses numerous sub-disciplines including virology, bacteriology, protistology, mycology, immunology, and parasitology.
Virology is the scientific study of biological viruses. It is a subfield of microbiology that focuses on their detection, structure, classification and evolution, their methods of infection and exploitation of host cells for reproduction, their interaction with host organism physiology and immunity, the diseases they cause, the techniques to isolate and culture them, and their use in research and therapy.
Immunology is a branch of biology and medicine that covers the study of immune systems in all organisms.
Ecology is the natural science of the relationships among living organisms and their environment. Ecology considers organisms at the individual, population, community, ecosystem, and biosphere levels. Ecology overlaps with the closely related sciences of biogeography, evolutionary biology, genetics, ethology, and natural history.
Environmental science is an academic field that integrates the physical, biological, and mathematical sciences to study the environment and solve environmental problems. It uses an integrated, quantitative, and interdisciplinary approach to analyze environmental systems and emerged from the fields of natural history and medicine during the Enlightenment. It is considered interdisciplinary because it is an integration of various fields such as: biology, chemistry, physics, geology, engineering, sociology, and ecology.
Climatology or climate science is the scientific study of Earth's climate, typically defined as weather conditions averaged over a period of at least 30 years. Climate concerns the atmospheric condition during an extended to indefinite period of time; weather is the condition of the atmosphere during a relative brief period of time. The main topics of research are the study of climate variability, mechanisms of climate changes and modern climate change. This topic of study is regarded as part of the atmospheric sciences and a subdivision of physical geography, which is one of the Earth sciences. Climatology includes some aspects of oceanography and biogeochemistry.
Oceanography, also known as oceanology, sea science, ocean science, and marine science, is the scientific study of the ocean, including its physics, chemistry, biology, and geology.
Geology is a branch of natural science concerned with the Earth and other astronomical bodies, the rocks of which they are composed, and the processes by which they change over time. The name comes from Ancient Greek  γῆ (gê) 'earth' and  λoγία (-logía) 'study of, discourse'. Modern geology significantly overlaps all other Earth sciences, including hydrology. It is integrated with Earth system science and planetary science.
Volcanology is the study of volcanoes, lava, magma and related geological, geophysical and geochemical phenomena (volcanism). The term volcanology is derived from the Latin word vulcan. Vulcan was the ancient Roman god of fire.
Seismology is the scientific study of earthquakes and the generation and propagation of elastic waves through planetary bodies. It also includes studies of the environmental effects of earthquakes such as tsunamis; other seismic sources such as volcanoes, plate tectonics, glaciers, rivers, oceanic microseisms, and the atmosphere; and artificial processes such as explosions.
Paleontology or palaeontology is the scientific study of the life of the past, mainly but not exclusively through the study of fossils. Paleontologists use fossils as a means to classify organisms, measure geologic time, and assess the interactions between prehistoric organisms and their natural environment. While paleontological observations are known from at least the 6th century BC, the foundation of paleontology as a science dates back to the work of Georges Cuvier in 1796. Cuvier demonstrated evidence for the concept of extinction and how the life of the past was not necessarily the same as that of the present. The field developed rapidly over the course of the following decades, and the French word paléontologie was introduced for the study in 1822, which was derived from the Ancient Greek word for 'ancient' and words describing relatedness and a field of study. Further advances in the field accompanied the work of Charles Darwin who popularized the concept of evolution. Together, evolution and extinction can be understood as complementary processes that shaped the history of life.
Archaeology or archeology is the study of human activity through the recovery and analysis of material culture. The archaeological record consists of artifacts, architecture, biofacts or ecofacts, sites, and cultural landscapes. Archaeology can be considered both a social science and a branch of the humanities. It is usually considered an independent academic discipline, but may also be classified as part of anthropology, history or geography. The discipline involves surveying, excavation, and eventually analysis of data collected, to learn more about the past. In broad scope, archaeology relies on cross-disciplinary research.
Anthropology is the scientific study of humanity that crosses biology and sociology, concerned with human behavior, human biology, cultures, societies, and linguistics, in both the present and past, including archaic humans. Social anthropology studies patterns of behaviour, while cultural anthropology studies cultural meaning, including norms and values. The term sociocultural anthropology is commonly used today. Linguistic anthropology studies how language influences social life. Biological anthropology studies the biology and evolution of humans and their close primate relatives.
Materials science is an interdisciplinary field of researching and discovering materials. Materials engineering is an engineering field of finding uses for materials in other fields and industries.
Nanotechnology is the manipulation of matter with at least one dimension sized from 1 to 100 nanometers (nm). At this scale, commonly known as the nanoscale, surface area and quantum mechanical effects become important in describing properties of matter. This definition of nanotechnology includes all types of research and technologies that deal with these special properties. It is common to see the plural form "nanotechnologies" as well as "nanoscale technologies" to refer to research and applications whose common trait is scale. An earlier understanding of nanotechnology referred to the particular technological goal of precisely manipulating atoms and molecules for fabricating macroscale products, now referred to as molecular nanotechnology.
Polymer science or macromolecular science is a subfield of materials science concerned with polymers, primarily synthetic polymers such as plastics and elastomers. The field of polymer science includes researchers in multiple disciplines including chemistry, physics, and engineering.
Crystallography is the branch of science devoted to the study of molecular and crystalline structure and properties. The word crystallography is derived from the Ancient Greek word κρύσταλλος, and γράφειν. In July 2012, the United Nations recognised the importance of the science of crystallography by proclaiming 2014 the International Year of Crystallography.
Organic chemistry is a subdiscipline within chemistry involving the scientific study of the structure, properties, and reactions of organic compounds and organic materials. It involves studying the structure of organic material to determine the structural formula, analyzing physical and chemical properties, and evaluating chemical reactivity to understand the behavior of organic compounds. The study of organic reactions includes the chemical synthesis of natural products, drugs, and polymers, and study of individual organic molecules in the laboratory and via theoretical study.
Inorganic chemistry deals with synthesis and behavior of inorganic and organometallic compounds. This field covers chemical compounds that are not carbon-based, which are the subjects of organic chemistry. The distinction between the two disciplines is far from absolute, as there is much overlap in the subdiscipline of organometallic chemistry. It has applications in every aspect of the chemical industry, including catalysis, materials science, pigments, surfactants, coatings, medications, fuels, and agriculture.
Physical chemistry is the study of macroscopic and microscopic phenomena in chemical systems in terms of the principles, practices, and concepts of physics such as motion, energy, force, time, thermodynamics, quantum chemistry, statistical mechanics, analytical dynamics and chemical equilibria.
Analytical chemistry is the branch of chemistry concerned with the development and application of methods to identify the chemical composition of materials and quantify the amounts of components in mixtures. It focuses on methods to identify unknown compounds, possibly in a mixture or solution, and quantify a compound's presence in terms of amount of substance, concentration, percentage by mass or number of moles in a mixture of compounds.
Computational chemistry is a branch of chemistry that uses computer simulations to assist in solving chemical problems. It uses methods of theoretical chemistry incorporated into computer programs to calculate the structures and properties of molecules, groups of molecules, and solids. The importance of this subject stems from the fact that, with the exception of some relatively recent findings related to the hydrogen molecular ion, achieving an accurate quantum mechanical depiction of chemical systems analytically, or in a closed form, is not feasible. The complexity inherent in the many-body problem exacerbates the challenge of providing detailed descriptions of quantum mechanical systems. While computational results normally complement information obtained by chemical experiments, it can occasionally predict unobserved chemical phenomena.
Artificial intelligence (AI) is the capability of computational systems to perform tasks typically associated with human intelligence, such as learning, reasoning, problem-solving, perception, and decision-making. It is a field of research in computer science that develops and studies methods and software that enable machines to perceive their environment and use learning and intelligence to take actions that maximize their chances of achieving defined goals.
Machine learning (ML) is a field of study in artificial intelligence concerned with the development and study of statistical algorithms that can learn from data and generalize to unseen data, and thus perform tasks without explicit instructions. Within a subdiscipline in machine learning, advances in the field of deep learning have allowed neural networks, a class of statistical algorithms, to surpass many previous machine learning approaches in performance.
In machine learning, deep learning (DL) focuses on utilizing multilayered neural networks to perform tasks such as classification, regression, and representation learning. The field takes inspiration from biological neuroscience and revolves around stacking artificial neurons into layers and "training" them to process data. The adjective "deep" refers to the use of multiple layers in the network. Methods used can be supervised, semi-supervised or unsupervised.
Computer vision tasks include methods for acquiring, processing, analyzing, and understanding digital images, and extraction of high-dimensional data from the real world in order to produce numerical or symbolic information, e.g. in the form of decisions. "Understanding" in this context signifies the transformation of visual images into descriptions of the world that make sense to thought processes and can elicit appropriate action. This image understanding can be seen as the disentangling of symbolic information from image data using models constructed with the aid of geometry, physics, statistics, and learning theory.
Natural language processing (NLP) is the processing of natural language information by a computer. NLP is a subfield of computer science and is closely associated with artificial intelligence. NLP is also related to information retrieval, knowledge representation, computational linguistics, and linguistics more broadly.
Robotics is the interdisciplinary study and practice of the design, construction, operation, and use of robots. A roboticist is someone who specializes in robotics. Robotics usually combines four aspects of design work: a power source, mechanical construction, a control system, and software.
Cybernetics is the transdisciplinary study of circular causal processes such as feedback and recursion, where the effects of a system's actions return as inputs to that system, influencing subsequent actions. It is concerned with general principles that are relevant across multiple contexts, including engineering, ecological, economic, biological, cognitive and social systems and also in practical activities such as designing, learning, and managing. Cybernetics' transdisciplinary character means that it intersects with a number of other fields, resulting in a wide influence and diverse interpretations.
Information theory is the mathematical study of the quantification, storage, and communication of a particular type of mathematically defined information. The field was established and formalized by Claude Shannon in the 1940s, though early contributions were made in the 1920s through the works of Harry Nyquist and Ralph Hartley. It is at the intersection of electronic engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science, neurobiology, physics, and electrical engineering.
Cryptography, or cryptology, is the practice and study of techniques for secure communication in the presence of adversarial behavior. More generally, cryptography is about constructing and analyzing protocols that prevent third parties or the public from reading private messages. Modern cryptography exists at the intersection of the disciplines of mathematics, computer science, information security, electrical engineering, digital signal processing, physics, and others. Core concepts related to information security are also central to cryptography. Practical applications of cryptography include electronic commerce, chip-based payment cards, digital currencies, computer passwords and military communications.
A quantum computer is a computer that exploits superposed and entangled states. Quantum computers can be viewed as sampling from quantum systems. These systems evolve in ways that operate on an enormous number of possibilities simultaneously, though they remain subject to strict computational constraints. By contrast, ordinary ("classical") computers operate according to deterministic rules. It is widely believed that a quantum computer could perform some calculations exponentially faster than any classical computer. For example, a large-scale quantum computer could break some widely used public-key cryptographic schemes and aid physicists in performing physical simulations. However, current hardware implementations of quantum computation are largely experimental and only suitable for specialized tasks.
Bioinformatics is an interdisciplinary field of science that develops computational methods and software tools for understanding biological data, especially when the data sets are large and complex. Bioinformatics uses biology, chemistry, physics, computer science, data science, computer programming, information engineering, mathematics and statistics to analyze and interpret biological data. This process can sometimes be referred to as computational biology, however the distinction between the two terms is often disputed. To some, the term computational biology refers to building and using models of biological systems.
Systems biology is the computational and mathematical analysis and modeling of complex biological systems. It is a biology-based interdisciplinary field of study that focuses on complex interactions within biological systems, using a holistic approach to biological research. This multifaceted research domain necessitates the collaborative efforts of chemists, biologists, mathematicians, physicists, and engineers to decipher the biology of intricate living systems by merging various quantitative molecular measurements with carefully constructed mathematical models. It represents a comprehensive method for comprehending the complex relationships within biological systems. In contrast to conventional biological studies that typically center on isolated elements, systems biology seeks to combine different biological data to create models that illustrate and elucidate the dynamic interactions within a system. This methodology is essential for understanding the complex networks of genes, proteins, and metabolites that influence cellular activities and the traits of organisms. One of the aims of systems biology is to model and discover emergent properties, of cells, tissues and organisms functioning as a system whose theoretical description is only possible using techniques of systems biology. By exploring how function emerges from dynamic interactions, systems biology bridges the gaps that exist between molecules and physiological processes.
Synthetic biology (SynBio) is a multidisciplinary field of science that focuses on living systems and organisms. It applies engineering principles to develop new biological parts, devices, and systems or to redesign existing systems found in nature.
Genetic engineering, also called genetic modification or genetic manipulation, is the modification and manipulation of an organism's genes using technology. It is a set of technologies used to change the genetic makeup of cells, including the transfer of genes within and across species boundaries to produce improved or novel organisms. New DNA is obtained by either isolating and copying the genetic material of interest using recombinant DNA methods or by artificially synthesising the DNA. A construct is usually created and used to insert this DNA into the host organism. The first recombinant DNA molecule was designed by Paul Berg in 1972 by combining DNA from the monkey virus SV40 with the lambda virus. As well as inserting genes, the process can be used to remove, or "knock out", genes. The new DNA can either be inserted randomly or targeted to a specific part of the genome.
Could not find summary for "CRISPR Technology".
Pharmacology is the science of drugs and medications, including a substance's origin, composition, pharmacokinetics, pharmacodynamics, therapeutic use, and toxicology. More specifically, it is the study of the interactions that occur between a living organism and chemicals that affect normal or abnormal biochemical function. If substances have medicinal properties, they are considered pharmaceuticals.
Toxicology is a scientific discipline, overlapping with biology, chemistry, pharmacology, and medicine, that involves the study of the adverse effects of chemical substances on living organisms and the practice of diagnosing and treating exposures to toxins and toxicants. The relationship between dose and its effects on the exposed organism is of high significance in toxicology. Factors that influence chemical toxicity include the dosage, duration of exposure, route of exposure, species, age, sex, and environment. Toxicologists are experts on poisons and poisoning. There is a movement for evidence-based toxicology as part of the larger movement towards evidence-based practices. Toxicology is currently contributing to the field of cancer research, since some toxins can be used as drugs for killing tumor cells. One prime example of this is ribosome-inactivating proteins, tested in the treatment of leukemia.
Neuropharmacology is the study of how drugs affect function in the nervous system, and the neural mechanisms through which they influence behavior. There are two main branches of neuropharmacology: behavioral and molecular. Behavioral neuropharmacology focuses on the study of how drugs affect human behavior (neuropsychopharmacology), including the study of how drug dependence and addiction affect the human brain. Molecular neuropharmacology involves the study of neurons and their neurochemical interactions, with the overall goal of developing drugs that have beneficial effects on neurological function. Both of these fields are closely connected, since both are concerned with the interactions of neurotransmitters, neuropeptides, neurohormones, neuromodulators, enzymes, second messengers, co-transporters, ion channels, and receptor proteins in the central and peripheral nervous systems. Studying these interactions, researchers are developing drugs to treat many different neurological disorders, including pain, neurodegenerative diseases such as Parkinson's disease and Alzheimer's disease, psychological disorders, addiction, and many others.
Astronomy is a natural science that studies celestial objects and the phenomena that occur in the cosmos. It uses mathematics, physics, and chemistry to explain their origin and their overall evolution. Objects of interest include planets, moons, stars, nebulae, galaxies, meteoroids, asteroids, and comets. Relevant phenomena include supernova explosions, gamma ray bursts, quasars, blazars, pulsars, and cosmic microwave background radiation. More generally, astronomy studies everything that originates beyond Earth's atmosphere. Cosmology is the branch of astronomy that studies the universe as a whole.
Radio astronomy is a subfield of astronomy that studies celestial objects using radio waves. It started in 1933, when Karl Jansky at Bell Telephone Laboratories reported radiation coming from the Milky Way. Subsequent observations have identified a number of different sources of radio emission. These include stars and galaxies, as well as entirely new classes of objects, such as radio galaxies, quasars, pulsars, and masers. The discovery of the cosmic microwave background radiation, regarded as evidence for the Big Bang theory, was made through radio astronomy.
Optics is the branch of physics that studies the behaviour, manipulation, and detection of electromagnetic radiation, including its interactions with matter and instruments that use or detect it. Optics usually describes the behaviour of visible, ultraviolet, and infrared light. The study of optics extends to other forms of electromagnetic radiation, including radio waves, microwaves,
and X-rays. The term optics is also applied to technology for manipulating beams of elementary charged particles.
Photonics is a branch of optics that involves the application of generation, detection, and manipulation of light in the form of photons through emission, transmission, modulation, signal processing, switching, amplification, and sensing. Even though photonics is a commonly used term, there is no widespread agreement on a clear definition of the term or on the difference between photonics and related fields, such as optics.
Acoustics is a branch of continuum mechanics that deals with the study of mechanical waves in gases, liquids, and solids including topics such as vibration, sound, ultrasound and infrasound. A scientist who works in the field of acoustics is an acoustician while someone working in the field of acoustics technology may be called an acoustical engineer. The application of acoustics is present in almost all aspects of modern society with the most obvious being the audio and noise control industries.
In physics, physical chemistry, and engineering, fluid dynamics is a subdiscipline of fluid mechanics that describes the flow of fluids – liquids and gases. It has several subdisciplines, including aerodynamics and hydrodynamics. Fluid dynamics has a wide range of applications, including calculating forces and moments on aircraft, determining the mass flow rate of petroleum through pipelines, predicting weather patterns, understanding nebulae in interstellar space, understanding large scale geophysical flows involving oceans/atmosphere and modelling fission weapon detonation.
Aerodynamics is the study of the motion of air, particularly when affected by a solid object, such as an airplane wing. It involves topics covered in the field of fluid dynamics and its subfield of gas dynamics, and is an important domain of study in aeronautics. The term aerodynamics is often used synonymously with gas dynamics, the difference being that "gas dynamics" applies to the study of the motion of all gases, and is not limited to air. The formal study of aerodynamics began in the modern sense in the eighteenth century, although observations of fundamental concepts such as aerodynamic drag were recorded much earlier. Most of the early efforts in aerodynamics were directed toward achieving heavier-than-air flight, which was first demonstrated by Otto Lilienthal in 1891. Since then, the use of aerodynamics through mathematical analysis, empirical approximations, wind tunnel experimentation, and computer simulations has formed a rational basis for the development of heavier-than-air flight and a number of other technologies. Recent work in aerodynamics has focused on issues related to compressible flow, turbulence, and boundary layers and has become increasingly computational in nature.
Plasma is a state of matter that results from a gaseous state having undergone some degree of ionization. It thus consists of a significant portion of charged particles. While rarely encountered on Earth, it is estimated that 99.9% of all ordinary matter in the universe is plasma. Stars are almost pure balls of plasma, and plasma dominates the rarefied intracluster medium and intergalactic medium. Plasma can be artificially generated, for example, by heating a neutral gas or subjecting it to a strong electromagnetic field.
Could not find summary for "Energy Science".
Renewable energy is energy made from renewable natural resources that are replenished on a human timescale. The most widely used renewable energy types are solar energy, wind power, and hydropower. Bioenergy and geothermal power are also significant in some countries. Renewable energy installations can be large or small and are suited for both urban and rural areas. Renewable energy is often deployed together with further electrification. This has several benefits: electricity can move heat and vehicles efficiently and is clean at the point of consumption. Variable renewable energy sources are those that have a fluctuating nature, such as wind power and solar power. In contrast, controllable renewable energy sources include dammed hydroelectricity, bioenergy, or geothermal power.
Nuclear fusion is a reaction in which two or more atomic nuclei combine to form a larger nucleus. The difference in mass between the reactants and products is manifested as either the release or the absorption of energy. This difference in mass arises as a result of the difference in nuclear binding energy between the atomic nuclei before and after the fusion reaction. Nuclear fusion is the process that powers all active stars, via many reaction pathways.
Could not find summary for "Space Engineering".
Aerospace engineering is the primary field of engineering concerned with the development of aircraft and spacecraft. It has two major and overlapping branches: aeronautical engineering and astronautical engineering. Avionics engineering is similar, but deals with the electronics side of aerospace engineering.
The American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) is an American professional association that, in its own words, "promotes the art, science, and practice of multidisciplinary engineering and allied sciences around the globe" via "continuing education, training and professional development, codes and standards, research, conferences and publications, government relations, and other forms of outreach." ASME is thus an engineering society, a standards organization, a research and development organization, an advocacy organization, a provider of training and education, and a nonprofit organization. Founded as an engineering society focused on mechanical engineering in North America, ASME is today multidisciplinary and global.
Electrical engineering is an engineering discipline concerned with the study, design, and application of equipment, devices, and systems that use electricity, electronics, and electromagnetism. It emerged as an identifiable occupation in the latter half of the 19th century after the commercialization of the electric telegraph, the telephone, and electrical power generation, distribution, and use.
Chemical engineering is an engineering field which deals with the study of the operation and design of chemical plants as well as methods of improving production. Chemical engineers develop economical commercial processes to convert raw materials into useful products. Chemical engineering uses principles of chemistry, physics, mathematics, biology, and economics to efficiently use, produce, design, transport and transform energy and materials. The work of chemical engineers can range from the utilization of nanotechnology and nanomaterials in the laboratory to large-scale industrial processes that convert chemicals, raw materials, living cells, microorganisms, and energy into useful forms and products. Chemical engineers are involved in many aspects of plant design and operation, including safety and hazard assessments, process design and analysis, modeling, control engineering, chemical reaction engineering, nuclear engineering, biological engineering, construction specification, and operating instructions.
Biomedical engineering (BME) or medical engineering is the application of engineering principles and design concepts to medicine and biology for healthcare applications. BME also integrates the logical sciences to advance health care treatment, including diagnosis, monitoring, and therapy. Also included under the scope of a biomedical engineer is the management of current medical equipment in hospitals while adhering to relevant industry standards. This involves procurement, routine testing, preventive maintenance, and making equipment recommendations, a role also known as a Biomedical Equipment Technician (BMET) or as a clinical engineer.
Civil Engineering is a professional engineering discipline that deals with the design, construction, and maintenance of the physical and naturally built environment, including public works such as roads, bridges, canals, dams, airports, sewage systems, pipelines, structural components of buildings, and railways.
Structural engineering is a sub-discipline of civil engineering in which structural engineers are trained to design the 'bones and joints' that create the form and shape of human-made structures. Structural engineers also must understand and calculate the stability, strength, rigidity and earthquake-susceptibility of built structures for buildings and nonbuilding structures. The structural designs are integrated with those of other designers such as architects and building services engineer and often supervise the construction of projects by contractors on site. They can also be involved in the design of machinery, medical equipment, and vehicles where structural integrity affects functioning and safety. See glossary of structural engineering.

A mathematical model is an abstract description of a concrete system using mathematical concepts and language. The process of developing a mathematical model is termed mathematical modeling. Mathematical models are used in many fields, including applied mathematics, natural sciences, social sciences and engineering. In particular, the field of operations research studies the use of mathematical modelling and related tools to solve problems in business or military operations. A model may help to characterize a system by studying the effects of different components, which may be used to make predictions about behavior or solve specific problems.
Topology is the branch of mathematics concerned with the properties of a geometric object that are preserved under continuous deformations, such as stretching, twisting, crumpling, and bending; that is, without closing holes, opening holes, tearing, gluing, or passing through itself.
Number theory is a branch of pure mathematics devoted primarily to the study of the integers and arithmetic functions. Number theorists study prime numbers as well as the properties of mathematical objects constructed from integers, or defined as generalizations of the integers.
Probability theory or probability calculus is the branch of mathematics concerned with probability. Although there are several different probability interpretations, probability theory treats the concept in a rigorous mathematical manner by expressing it through a set of axioms. Typically these axioms formalise probability in terms of a probability space, which assigns a measure taking values between 0 and 1, termed the probability measure, to a set of outcomes called the sample space. Any specified subset of the sample space is called an event.
Game theory is the study of mathematical models of strategic interactions. It has applications in many fields of social science, and is used extensively in economics, logic, systems science and computer science. Initially, game theory addressed two-person zero-sum games, in which a participant's gains or losses are exactly balanced by the losses and gains of the other participant. In the 1950s, it was extended to the study of non zero-sum games, and was eventually applied to a wide range of behavioral relations. It is now an umbrella term for the science of rational decision making in humans, animals, and computers.
Econometrics is an application of statistical methods to economic data in order to give empirical content to economic relationships. More precisely, it is "the quantitative analysis of actual economic phenomena based on the concurrent development of theory and observation, related by appropriate methods of inference." An introductory economics textbook describes econometrics as allowing economists "to sift through mountains of data to extract simple relationships." Jan Tinbergen is one of the two founding fathers of econometrics. The other, Ragnar Frisch, also coined the term in the sense in which it is used today.
Social physics or sociophysics is an interdisciplinary field of science which uses mathematical tools inspired by physics to understand the behavior of human crowds. In a modern commercial use, it can also refer to the analysis of social phenomena with big data.

Behavioural science is the branch of science concerned with theorizing on, categorizing, and judging human behaviour. It sits in the interstice between fields such as psychology, cognitive science, neuroscience, behavioral biology, behavioral genetics and social science. While the term can technically be applied to the study of behaviour amongst all living organisms, it is nearly always used with reference to humans as the primary target of investigation.
Linguistics is the scientific study of language. The areas of linguistic analysis are syntax, semantics (meaning), morphology, phonetics, phonology, and pragmatics. Subdisciplines such as biolinguistics and psycholinguistics bridge many of these divisions.
Could not find summary for "Cognitive Robotics".
Astrobiology is a scientific field within the life and environmental sciences that studies the origins, early evolution, distribution, and future of life in the universe by investigating its deterministic conditions and contingent events. As a discipline, astrobiology is founded on the premise that life may exist beyond Earth.
Could not find summary for "Exochemistry".
Egypt, officially the Arab Republic of Egypt, is a country spanning the northeast corner of Africa and southwest corner of Asia via the Sinai Peninsula. It is bordered by the Mediterranean Sea to the north, Palestine and Israel to the northeast, the Red Sea to the east, Sudan and the Sahara to the south, and Libya to the west. The Gulf of Aqaba in the northeast separates Egypt from Jordan and Saudi Arabia. Cairo is the capital, largest city, and leading cultural centre, while Alexandria is the second-largest city and an important hub of industry and tourism. With over 107 million inhabitants, Egypt is the most populous country in the Arab world, third-most populous country in Africa, and 15th-most populated in the world.
Mesopotamia is a historical region of West Asia situated within the Tigris–Euphrates river system, in the northern part of the Fertile Crescent. It corresponds roughly to the territory of modern Iraq. Just beyond it lies southwestern Iran, where the region transitions into the Persian plateau, marking the shift from the Arab world to Iran.
Iran, officially the Islamic Republic of Iran, and also known as Persia, is a country in West Asia. It borders Iraq to the west, Turkey, Azerbaijan, and Armenia to the northwest, the Caspian Sea to the north, Turkmenistan to the northeast, Afghanistan to the east, Pakistan to the southeast, and the Gulf of Oman and the Persian Gulf to the south. With a population of over 90 million, Iran ranks 17th globally in both geographic size and population and is the sixth-largest country in Asia. It is divided into five regions with 31 provinces. Tehran is the nation's capital, largest city, and financial center.
Greece, officially the Hellenic Republic, is a country in Southeast Europe. Located on the southern tip of the Balkan peninsula, it shares land borders with Albania to the northwest, North Macedonia and Bulgaria to the north, and Turkey to the east. The Aegean Sea lies to the east of the mainland, the Ionian Sea to the west, and the Sea of Crete and the Mediterranean Sea to the south. Greece has the longest coastline on the Mediterranean basin, spanning thousands of islands and nine traditional geographic regions. It has a population of over 10 million. Athens is the nation's capital and largest city, followed by Thessaloniki and Patras.
Rome is the capital city and most populated comune (municipality) of Italy. It is also the administrative centre of the Lazio region and of the Metropolitan City of Rome. A special comune named Roma Capitale with a population of 2.7 million in an area of 1,287.36 km2 (497.1 mi2), Rome is the third most populous city in the European Union by population within city limits. The Metropolitan City of Rome Capital, with a population of 4.2 million, is the most populous metropolitan city in Italy. Its metropolitan area is the third-most populous within Italy. Rome is located in the central-western portion of the Italian Peninsula, within Lazio (Latium), along the shores of the Tiber Valley. Vatican City is an independent country inside the city boundaries of Rome, the only existing example of a country within a city. Rome is often referred to as the "City of Seven Hills" due to its geography, and also as the "Eternal City". Rome is generally considered to be one of the cradles of Western civilization and Western Christian culture, and the centre of the Catholic Church.
Byzantium or Byzantion was an ancient Greek city in classical antiquity that became known as Constantinople in late antiquity and Istanbul in modern times. The Greek name Byzantion and its Latinization Byzantium continued to be used as a name of Constantinople sporadically and to varying degrees during the thousand-year existence of the Eastern Roman Empire, which also became known by the former name of the city as the Byzantine Empire. Byzantium was colonized by Greeks from Megara in the 7th century BCE and remained primarily Greek-speaking until its conquest by the Ottoman Empire in 1453 CE.
Ottoman may refer to:Osman I, historically known in English as "Ottoman I", founder of the Ottoman Empire
Osman II, historically known in English as "Ottoman II"
Osman III, historically known in English as "Ottoman III"
Ottoman Empire 1299–1922
Ottoman dynasty, ruling family of the Ottoman Empire
Osmanoğlu family, modern members of the family
Ottoman Caliphate 1517–1924
Ottoman Turks, a Turkic ethnic group
Ottoman architecture
Ottoman bed, a type of storage bed
Ottoman (furniture), padded stool or footstool
Ottoman (textile), fabric with a pronounced ribbed or corded effect, often made of silk or a mixture.
Mongols are an East Asian ethnic group native to Mongolia and China, as well as the republics of Buryatia and Kalmykia in Russia. The Mongols are the principal member of the large family of Mongolic peoples. The Oirats and the Buryats are classified either as distinct ethno-linguistic groups or as subgroups of Mongols.
China, officially the People's Republic of China (PRC), is a country in East Asia. It is the second-most populous country after India, with a population exceeding 1.4 billion, representing 17% of the world's population. China borders fourteen countries by land across an area of 9.6 million square kilometers (3,700,000 sq mi), making it the third-largest country by area. The country is divided into 33 province-level divisions: 22 provinces, 5 autonomous regions, 4 municipalities, and 2 semi-autonomous special administrative regions. Beijing is the capital, while Shanghai is the most populous city by urban area and largest financial center.
Japan is an island country in East Asia. Located in the Pacific Ocean off the northeast coast of the Asian mainland, it is bordered to the west by the Sea of Japan and extends from the Sea of Okhotsk in the north to the East China Sea in the south. The Japanese archipelago consists of four major islands alongside 14,121 smaller islands. Japan is divided into 47 administrative prefectures and eight traditional regions, and around 75% of its terrain is mountainous and heavily forested, concentrating its agriculture and highly urbanized population along its eastern coastal plains. With a population of almost 123 million as of 2026, it is the world's 11th most populous country. Tokyo is the country's capital and largest city.
Korea is a peninsular region in East Asia consisting of the Korean Peninsula, Jeju Island, and smaller islands. Since the end of World War II in Asia in 1945, it has been politically divided at or near the 38th parallel between North Korea and South Korea. Both countries proclaimed independence in 1948, and the two countries fought the Korean War from 1950 to 1953. The region is bordered by China to the north and Russia to the northeast, across the Amnok (Yalu) and Duman (Tumen) rivers, and is separated from Japan to the southeast by the Korea Strait.
India, officially the Republic of India, is a country in South Asia. It is the seventh-largest country by area; the most populous country since 2023; and, since its independence in 1947, the world's most populous democracy. Bounded by the Indian Ocean on the south, the Arabian Sea on the southwest, and the Bay of Bengal on the southeast, it shares land borders with Pakistan to the west; China, Nepal, and Bhutan to the north; and Bangladesh and Myanmar to the east. In the Indian Ocean, India is near Sri Lanka and the Maldives; its Andaman and Nicobar Islands share a maritime border with Myanmar, Thailand, and Indonesia.
Maya may refer to:.
The Aztecs were a Mesoamerican civilization that flourished in central Mexico from 1300 to 1521. The Aztec people included different ethnic groups of central Mexico, particularly those groups who spoke the Nahuatl language. Aztec culture was organized into city-states (altepetl), some of which joined to form alliances, political confederations, or empires. The Aztec Empire was a confederation of three city-states established in 1427: Tenochtitlan, Tetzcoco, and Tlacopan, previously part of the Tepanec empire, whose dominant power was Azcapotzalco. Although the term Aztecs is often narrowly restricted to the Mexica of Tenochtitlan, it is also broadly used to refer to Nahua polities or peoples of central Mexico in the prehispanic era, as well as the Spanish colonial era (1521–1821).
The Inca Empire, officially known as the Realm of the Four Parts, was the largest empire in pre-Columbian America. The administrative, political, and military center of the empire was in the city of Cusco. The Inca civilisation rose from the Peruvian highlands sometime in the early 13th century. The Portuguese explorer Aleixo Garcia was the first European to reach the Inca Empire in 1524. Later, in 1532, the Spanish began the conquest of the Inca Empire, and by 1572 the last Inca state was fully conquered.
Vikings were a seafaring people originally from Scandinavia, who from the late 8th to the late 11th centuries raided, pirated, traded, and settled throughout parts of Europe. They voyaged as far as the Mediterranean, North Africa, the Middle East, Greenland, and Vinland. In their countries of origin, and in some of the countries they raided and settled, this period of activity is popularly known as the Viking Age, and the term "Viking" also commonly includes the inhabitants of the Scandinavian homelands as a whole during the late 8th to the mid-11th centuries. The Vikings had a profound impact on the early medieval history of northern and Eastern Europe, including the political and social development of England and parts of France, and the establishment of Kievan Rus', the ancestor of the later states of Belarus, Russia, and Ukraine.
The Crusades were a series of military campaigns launched by the papacy between 1095 and 1291 against Muslim rulers for the recovery and defence of the Holy Land, encouraged by promises of spiritual reward. The First Crusade was proclaimed by Pope Urban II at the Council of Clermont in November 1095—a call to arms for Christians to reconquer Jerusalem from the Muslims. By this time, the papacy's position as head of the Catholic Church had strengthened, and earlier conflicts with secular rulers and wars on the frontiers of Western Christendom had prepared it for the direction of armed force in religious causes. The successes of the First Crusade led to the establishment of four Crusader states in the Levant, where their defence required further expeditions from Catholic Europe. The organisation of such large-scale campaigns demanded complex religious, social, and economic institutions, including crusade indulgences, military orders, and the taxation of clerical income. Over time, the crusading movement expanded to include campaigns against pagans, Christian dissidents, and other enemies of the papacy, promoted with similar spiritual rewards and continuing into the 18th century.
The Renaissance is a European period of history and cultural movement, very roughly defined as covering the 14th through 17th centuries, though sometimes more narrowly defined for instance as only covering the 15th through 16th centuries. It marked the transition from the Middle Ages to modernity and was characterized by the European rediscovery and revival of the literary, philosophical, and artistic achievements of classical antiquity. Associated with great social change in most fields and disciplines, including art, architecture, politics, literature, exploration and science, the Renaissance was first centered in the Republic of Florence, then spread to the rest of Italy and later throughout Europe. The term rinascita ('rebirth') first appeared in Lives of the Artists by Giorgio Vasari, while the corresponding French word renaissance was adopted into English as the term for this period during the 1830s.
The Reformation, also known as the Protestant Reformation or the European Reformation, was a time of major theological movement in Western Christianity in 16th-century Europe that posed a religious and political challenge to the papacy and the authority of the Catholic Church hierarchy. Towards the end of the Renaissance, the Reformation marked the beginning of Protestantism. It is considered one of the events that signified the end of the Middle Ages and the beginning of the early modern period in Europe.
Enlightenment or enlighten may refer to:.
Colonialism is the practice of extending and maintaining political, social, economic, and cultural domination over a territory and its people by another people in pursuit of interests defined in an often distant metropole, who also claim superiority. While frequently an imperialist project, colonialism functions through differentiating between the targeted land and people, and that of the colonizers. Rather than annexation, this typically culminates in organizing the colonized into colonies separate to the colonizers' metropole. Colonialism sometimes deepens by developing settler colonialism, whereby settlers from one or multiple colonizing metropoles occupy a territory with the intention of partially or completely supplanting the existing indigenous peoples, possibly amounting to genocide.
Imperialism is the maintaining and extending of power over foreign nations, particularly through expansionism, employing both hard power and soft power. Imperialism focuses on establishing or maintaining hegemony and a more formal empire.
In political science, a revolution is a rapid, fundamental transformation of a society's class, state, ethnic or religious structures. According to sociologist Jack Goldstone, all revolutions contain "a common set of elements at their core: (a) efforts to change the political regime that draw on a competing vision of a just order, (b) a notable degree of informal or formal mass mobilization, and (c) efforts to force change through noninstitutionalized actions such as mass demonstrations, protests, strikes, or violence.".
Industrialisation (UK) or industrialization (US) is "the period of social and economic change that transforms a human group from an agrarian and feudal society into an industrial society. This involves an extensive reorganisation of an economy for the purpose of manufacturing." Industrialisation is associated with an increase in polluting industries heavily dependent on fossil fuels. With the increasing focus on sustainable development and green industrial policy practices, industrialisation increasingly includes technological leapfrogging, with direct investment in more advanced, cleaner technologies.
Nationalism is an ideology or movement that holds that the nation should be congruent with the state. As a movement, it presupposes the existence and tends to promote the interests of a particular nation, especially with the aim of gaining and maintaining its sovereignty (self-determination) over its perceived homeland to create a nation-state. It holds that the nation should govern itself, free from outside interference (self-governance), that a nation is a natural and ideal basis for a polity, and that the nation is the only rightful source of political power. It further aims to build, and maintain, a single national identity, based on a combination of shared social characteristics such as culture, ethnicity, homeland, language, politics, religion, traditions, or belief in a shared singular history, and to promote national unity or solidarity. There are various definitions of a "nation", which leads to different types of nationalism. The two main divergent forms are ethnic nationalism and civic nationalism.
Fascism is a far-right, authoritarian, and ultranationalist political ideology and movement that rose to prominence in early-20th-century Europe. Fascism is characterized by support for a dictatorial leader, centralized autocracy, militarism, forcible suppression of opposition, belief in a natural social hierarchy, subordination of individual interests for the perceived interest of the nation or race, and strong regimentation of society and the economy. Opposed to communism, democracy, liberalism, pluralism, and socialism, fascism is at the far-right of the traditional left–right spectrum. What constitutes a precise definition of fascism has been a longrunning and complex debate among scholars.
Communism is a political and economic ideology whose goal is the creation of a communist society, a socioeconomic order centered on common ownership of the means of production, distribution, and exchange that allocates products in society based on need. A communist society entails the absence of private property and social classes, and ultimately money and the state. Communism is a part of the broader socialist movement.
Capitalism is an economic system based on the private ownership of the means of production and its use for the purpose of obtaining profit. This socioeconomic system has developed historically in several stages, and is defined by a number of constituent elements: private property, profit motive, capital accumulation, competitive markets, commodification, wage labor, and an emphasis on innovation and economic growth. Capitalist economies may experience business cycles of economic expansion followed by recessions.
Feudalism, also known as the feudal system, was a combination of various customs and systems that flourished in medieval Europe from the 9th to 15th centuries. Broadly defined, it was a way of structuring society around relationships derived from the holding of land in exchange for service or labour.
Migration, migratory, or migrate may refer to:.
Slavery is the ownership of a person as property, especially in regard to their labour. It is an economic phenomenon and its history resides in economic history. Slavery typically involves compulsory work, with the slave's location of work and residence dictated by the party that holds them in bondage. Enslavement is the placement of a person into slavery, and the person is called a slave or an enslaved person.
Abolition refers to the act of putting an end to something by law, and may refer to:Abolitionism, abolition of slavery
Abolition of the death penalty, also called capital punishment
Abolition of monarchy
Abolition of nuclear weapons
Abolition of prisons
Abolition of ICE
Police abolition movement
Abolition of suffering
Abolitionism, related to veganism
Abolition of time zones
Abolition of borders.
Exploration is the process of exploring, an activity which has some expectation of discovery. Organised exploration is largely a human activity, but exploratory activity is common to most organisms capable of directed locomotion and the ability to learn, and has been described in, amongst others, social insects foraging behaviour, where feedback from returning individuals affects the activity of other members of the group.
Navigation is a field of study that focuses on the process of monitoring and controlling the movement of a craft or vehicle from one place to another. The field of navigation includes four general categories: land navigation, marine navigation, aeronautic navigation, and space navigation. It is also the term of art used for the specialized knowledge used by navigators to perform navigation tasks. All navigational techniques involve locating the navigator's position compared to known locations or patterns. Navigation, in a broader sense, can refer to any skill or study that involves the determination of position and direction. In this sense, navigation includes orienteering and pedestrian navigation.
Cartography is the study and practice of making and using maps. Combining science, aesthetics and technique, cartography builds on the premise that reality can be modeled in ways that communicate spatial information effectively.
Diplomacy is the communication by representatives of state, intergovernmental, or non-governmental institutions intended to influence events in the international system.
War is an armed conflict between the armed forces of states, or between governmental forces and armed groups that are organized under a certain command structure and have the capacity to sustain military operations, or between such organized groups.
Genocide is the partial or total destruction of a human group, committed intentionally. The popular view conceives of genocide as the large-scale killing of individuals, but in the scholarly and legal fields, genocide occurs when the group itself is targeted. Acts of genocide include killing as well as non-lethal acts such as preventing reproduction among the group, the forcible transfer of children to another group, and cultural genocide.
Propaganda is communication that is primarily used to influence or persuade an audience to further an agenda, which may not be objective and may be selectively presenting facts to encourage a particular synthesis or perception, or using loaded language to produce an emotional rather than a rational response to the information that is being presented. Propaganda can be found in a wide variety of different contexts.
Archaeology or archeology is the study of human activity through the recovery and analysis of material culture. The archaeological record consists of artifacts, architecture, biofacts or ecofacts, sites, and cultural landscapes. Archaeology can be considered both a social science and a branch of the humanities. It is usually considered an independent academic discipline, but may also be classified as part of anthropology, history or geography. The discipline involves surveying, excavation, and eventually analysis of data collected, to learn more about the past. In broad scope, archaeology relies on cross-disciplinary research.
Anthropology is the scientific study of humanity that crosses biology and sociology, concerned with human behavior, human biology, cultures, societies, and linguistics, in both the present and past, including archaic humans. Social anthropology studies patterns of behaviour, while cultural anthropology studies cultural meaning, including norms and values. The term sociocultural anthropology is commonly used today. Linguistic anthropology studies how language influences social life. Biological anthropology studies the biology and evolution of humans and their close primate relatives.
Myth is a genre of folklore consisting primarily of narratives that play a fundamental role in a society. For scholars, this is totally different from the ordinary sense of the term myth, meaning a belief that is not true, as the veracity of a piece of folklore is entirely irrelevant to determining whether it constitutes a myth.
Trade involves the transfer of goods and services from one person or entity to another, often in exchange for money. Economists refer to a system or network that allows trade as a market.
Agriculture is the practice of cultivating the soil, planting, raising, and harvesting both food and non-food crops, as well as livestock production. Broader definitions also include forestry and aquaculture. Agriculture was a key factor in the rise of sedentary human civilization, whereby farming of domesticated plants and animals created food surpluses that enabled people to live in the cities. While humans started gathering grains at least 105,000 years ago, nascent farmers only began planting them around 11,500 years ago. Sheep, goats, pigs, and cattle were domesticated around 10,000 years ago. Plants were independently cultivated in at least 11 regions of the world. In the 20th century, industrial agriculture based on large-scale monocultures came to dominate agricultural output.
Urbanization is the population shift from rural to urban areas, the corresponding decrease in the proportion of people living in rural areas, and the ways in which societies adapt to this change. It can also mean population growth in urban areas instead of rural ones. It is predominantly the process by which towns and cities are formed and become larger as more people begin to live and work in central areas.
Globalization is the process of increasing interdependence and integration among the economies, markets, societies, and cultures of different countries worldwide. It can be attributed to a series of factors, including the reduction of barriers to international trade, the liberalization of capital movements, the development of transportation infrastructure, and the advancement of information and communication technologies. The term globalization first appeared in the early 20th century. It developed its current meaning sometime in the second half of the 20th century, and came into popular use in the 1990s to describe the unprecedented international connectivity of the post–Cold War world.
The origins of globalization can be traced back to the 18th and 19th centuries, a period marked by significant advancements in transportation and communication technologies. These developments increased global interactions, fostering the growth of international trade and the exchange of ideas, beliefs, and cultures. While globalization is primarily an economic process of interaction and integration, it is also closely linked to social and cultural dynamics. Additionally, disputes and international diplomacy have played significant roles in the history and evolution of globalization, continuing to shape its modern form. Though many scholars place the origins of globalization in modern times, others trace its history to long before the European Age of Discovery and voyages to the New World, and some even to the third millennium BCE. Large-scale globalization began in the 1820s, and in the late 19th century and early 20th century drove a rapid expansion in the connectivity of the world's economies and cultures. The term global city was subsequently popularized by sociologist Saskia Sassen in her work The Global City: New York, London, Tokyo (1991).
Independence is a condition of a nation, country, or state, in which residents and population, or some portion thereof, exercise self-government, and usually sovereignty, over its territory. The opposite of independence is the status of a dependent territory or colony. The commemoration of the independence day of a country or nation celebrates when a country is free from all forms of colonialism; free to build a country or nation without any interference from other nations.
Unification or unification theory may refer to:.


A civilization is any complex society characterized by the development of the state, social stratification, urbanization, and symbolic systems of communication beyond signed or spoken languages.
Prehistory, sometimes referred to as pre-literary history, is the period of human history between the first known use of stone tools by hominins c. 3.3 million years ago and the beginning of recorded history with the invention of writing systems. The use of symbols, marks, and images appears very early among humans, but the earliest known writing systems appeared c. 5,200 years ago. The adoption of writing across the globe has been a slow process, so that the end of prehistory occurred at different times in different places, and the term is less often used in discussing societies where prehistory ended relatively recently. The period when a culture is written about by others, but has not developed its own writing system, is often known as the protohistory of the culture.
Arithmetic is an elementary branch of mathematics that deals with numerical operations like addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. In a wider sense, it also includes exponentiation, extraction of roots, and taking logarithms.
Algebra is a branch of mathematics that deals with abstract systems, known as algebraic structures, and the manipulation of expressions within those systems. It is a generalization of arithmetic that introduces variables and algebraic operations other than the standard arithmetic operations, such as addition and multiplication.
Geometry is a branch of mathematics concerned with properties of space such as the distance, shape, size, and relative position of figures. Geometry is, along with arithmetic, one of the oldest branches of mathematics. A mathematician who works in the field of geometry is called a geometer. Until the 19th century, geometry was almost exclusively devoted to Euclidean geometry, which includes the notions of point, line, plane, distance, angle, surface, and curve, as fundamental concepts.
Trigonometry is a branch of mathematics concerned with relationships between angles and side lengths of triangles. In particular, the trigonometric functions relate the angles of a right triangle with ratios of its side lengths. The field emerged in the Hellenistic world during the 3rd century BC from applications of geometry to astronomical studies. The Greeks focused on the calculation of chords, while mathematicians in India created the earliest-known tables of values for trigonometric ratios such as sine.
Calculus is the mathematical study of continuous change, in the same way that geometry is the study of shape and algebra is the study of generalizations of arithmetic operations.
Topology is the branch of mathematics concerned with the properties of a geometric object that are preserved under continuous deformations, such as stretching, twisting, crumpling, and bending; that is, without closing holes, opening holes, tearing, gluing, or passing through itself.
Statistics is the discipline that concerns the collection, organization, analysis, interpretation, and presentation of data. In applying statistics to a scientific, industrial, or social problem, it is conventional to begin with a statistical population or a statistical model to be studied. Populations can be diverse groups of people or objects such as "all people living in a country" or "every atom composing a crystal". Statistics deals with every aspect of data, including the planning of data collection in terms of the design of surveys and experiments.
Probability concerns events and numerical descriptions of how likely they are to occur. The probability of an event is a number between 0 and 1; the larger the probability, the more likely an event is to occur. This number is often expressed as a percentage (%), ranging from 0% to 100%. A simple example is the tossing of a fair (unbiased) coin. Since the coin is fair, the two outcomes are both equally probable; the probability of "heads" equals the probability of "tails"; and since no other outcomes are possible, the probability of either "heads" or "tails" is 1/2.
Combinatorics is an area of mathematics primarily concerned with counting, both as a means and as an end to obtaining results, and certain properties of finite structures. It is closely related to many other areas of mathematics and has many applications ranging from logic to statistical physics and from evolutionary biology to computer science.
Graph may refer to:.
Logic is the study of correct reasoning. It includes both formal and informal logic. Formal logic is the study of deductively valid inferences or logical truths. It examines how conclusions follow from premises based on the structure of arguments alone, independent of their topic and content. Informal logic is associated with informal fallacies, critical thinking, and argumentation theory. Informal logic examines arguments expressed in natural language whereas formal logic uses formal language. When used as a countable noun, the term "a logic" refers to a specific logical formal system that articulates a proof system. Logic plays a central role in many fields, such as philosophy, mathematics, computer science, and linguistics.
Set, The Set, SET or SETS may refer to:.
Analysis is the process of breaking a complex topic or substance into smaller parts in order to gain a better understanding of it. The technique has been applied in the study of mathematics and logic since before Aristotle, though analysis as a formal concept is a relatively recent development.
Mathematical optimization or mathematical programming is the selection of a best element, with regard to some criteria, from some set of available alternatives. It is generally divided into two subfields: discrete optimization and continuous optimization. Optimization problems arise in all quantitative disciplines from computer science and engineering to operations research and economics, and the development of solution methods has been of interest in mathematics for centuries.
Cryptography, or cryptology, is the practice and study of techniques for secure communication in the presence of adversarial behavior. More generally, cryptography is about constructing and analyzing protocols that prevent third parties or the public from reading private messages. Modern cryptography exists at the intersection of the disciplines of mathematics, computer science, information security, electrical engineering, digital signal processing, physics, and others. Core concepts related to information security are also central to cryptography. Practical applications of cryptography include electronic commerce, chip-based payment cards, digital currencies, computer passwords and military communications.
Symmetry in everyday life refers to a sense of harmonious and beautiful proportion and balance. In mathematics, the term has a more precise definition and is usually used to refer to an object that is invariant under some transformations, such as translation, reflection, rotation, or scaling. Although these two meanings of the word can sometimes be told apart, they are intricately related, and hence are discussed together in this article.
In mathematics, a fractal is a geometric shape containing detailed structure at arbitrarily small scales, usually having a fractal dimension strictly exceeding the topological dimension. Many fractals appear similar at various scales, as illustrated in successive magnifications of the Mandelbrot set. This exhibition of similar patterns at increasingly smaller scales is called self-similarity, also known as expanding symmetry or unfolding symmetry; if this replication is exactly the same at every scale, as in the Menger sponge, the shape is called affine self-similar. Fractal geometry relates to the mathematical branch of measure theory by their Hausdorff dimension.
Matrix or MATRIX may refer to:.
Vector most often refers to:Disease vector, an agent that carries and transmits an infectious pathogen into another living organism
Euclidean vector, a quantity with a magnitude and a direction.
Function or functionality may refer to:.
The derivative of a function is the rate of change of the function's output relative to its input value.
In mathematics, an integral is the continuous analog of a sum, and is used to calculate areas, volumes, and their generalizations. The process of computing an integral, called integration, is one of the two fundamental operations of calculus, along with differentiation. Integration was initially used to solve problems in mathematics and physics, such as finding the area under a curve, or determining displacement from velocity. Usage of integration expanded to a wide variety of scientific fields thereafter.
Limit or Limits may refer to:.
Series may refer to:.
In mathematics, an equation is a mathematical formula that expresses the equality of two expressions, by connecting them with the equals sign =. The word equation and its cognates in other languages may have subtly different meanings; for example, in French an équation is defined as containing one or more variables, while in English, any well-formed formula consisting of two expressions related with an equals sign is an equation.
Inequality may refer to:Inequality (mathematics), a relation between two quantities when they are different.
Economic inequality, difference in economic well-being between population groups
Income inequality, an unequal distribution of income
Wealth inequality, an unequal distribution of wealth
Spatial inequality, the unequal distribution of income and resources across geographical regions
International inequality, economic differences between countries
Social inequality, unequal opportunities and rewards for different social positions or statuses within a group
Gender inequality, unequal treatment or perceptions due to gender
Racial inequality, social distinctions between racial and ethnic groups within a society
Health inequality, differences in the quality of health and healthcare across populations
Educational inequality, the unequal distribution of academic resources
Environmental inequality, unequal environmental harms between different neighborhoods or cities
Urban forest inequity, an unequal distribution of trees
Attention inequality, unequal distribution of attention across users, groups of people, issues in etc. in attention economy
Participation inequality, the phenomenon in which a small percentage of people contributes the majority of information to the total outcome.
Transformation may refer to:.
In mathematics and computer science, an algorithm is a finite sequence of mathematically rigorous instructions, typically used to solve a class of specific problems or to perform a computation. Algorithms are used as specifications for performing calculations and data processing. More advanced algorithms can use conditionals to divert the code execution through various routes and deduce valid inferences.
Computer numerical control (CNC) or CNC machining is the automated control of machine tools by a computer. It is an evolution of numerical control (NC), where machine tools are directly managed by data storage media such as punched cards or punched tape. Because CNC allows for easier programming, modification, and real-time adjustments, it has gradually replaced NC as computing costs declined.
Dynamics or dynamic may refer to:.
Chaos or CHAOS may refer to:.
In mathematics, a manifold is a topological space that locally resembles Euclidean space near each point. More precisely, an -dimensional manifold, or -manifold for short, is a topological space with the property that each point has a neighborhood that is homeomorphic to an open subset of -dimensional Euclidean space.
In mathematics, a tensor is an algebraic object that describes a multilinear relationship between sets of algebraic objects associated with a vector space. Tensors may map between different objects such as vectors, scalars, and even other tensors. There are many types of tensors, including scalars and vectors, dual vectors, multilinear maps between vector spaces, and even some operations such as the dot product. Tensors are defined independent of any basis, although they are often referred to by their components in a basis related to a particular coordinate system; those components form an array, which can be thought of as a high-dimensional matrix.
Measure may refer to:.
In mathematics, cardinality is an inherent property of sets, roughly meaning the number of individual objects they contain, which may be infinite. The concept is understood through one-to-one correspondences between sets. That is, if their objects can be paired such that each object has a pair, and no object is paired more than once.
Infinity is something which is boundless, limitless, endless. It is denoted by ∞, called the infinity symbol.
Modularity is the degree to which a system's components may be separated and recombined, often with the benefit of flexibility and variety in use. The concept of modularity is used primarily to reduce complexity by breaking a system into varying degrees of interdependence and independence across and "hide the complexity of each part behind an abstraction and interface". However, the concept of modularity can be extended to multiple disciplines, each with their own nuances. Despite these nuances, consistent themes concerning modular systems can be identified.
In mathematics, a polynomial is a mathematical expression consisting of indeterminates and coefficients, that involves only the operations of addition, subtraction, multiplication and exponentiation to nonnegative integer powers, and has a finite number of terms. An example of a polynomial of a single indeterminate  is . An example with three indeterminates is .
In mathematics, factorization (or factorisation, see English spelling differences) or factoring consists of writing a number or another mathematical object as a product of several factors, usually smaller or simpler objects of the same kind. For example, 3 × 5 is an integer factorization of 15, and (x − 2)(x + 2) is a polynomial factorization of x2 − 4.
A computation is any type of arithmetic or non-arithmetic calculation that is well-defined. Common examples of computation are mathematical equation solving and the execution of computer algorithms.
Complexity characterizes the behavior of a system or model whose components interact in multiple ways and follow local rules, leading to non-linearity, randomness, collective dynamics, hierarchy, and emergence.
Topology is the branch of mathematics concerned with the properties of a geometric object that are preserved under continuous deformations, such as stretching, twisting, crumpling, and bending; that is, without closing holes, opening holes, tearing, gluing, or passing through itself.
Operator may refer to:.
In linear algebra, an eigenvector or characteristic vector is a (nonzero) vector that has its direction unchanged by a given linear transformation. More precisely, an eigenvector  of a linear transformation  is scaled by a constant factor  when the linear transformation is applied to it: . The corresponding eigenvalue, characteristic value, or characteristic root is the multiplying factor .
In linear algebra, an eigenvector or characteristic vector is a (nonzero) vector that has its direction unchanged by a given linear transformation. More precisely, an eigenvector  of a linear transformation  is scaled by a constant factor  when the linear transformation is applied to it: . The corresponding eigenvalue, characteristic value, or characteristic root is the multiplying factor .
Stochastic is the property of being well-described by a random probability distribution. Stochasticity and randomness are technically distinct concepts. Stochasticity refers to a modeling approach, while randomness describes phenomena. These terms are often used interchangeably. In probability theory, the formal concept of a stochastic process is also referred to as a random process.
Regression or regressions may refer to:.
A model is an informative representation of an object, person, or system. The term originally denoted the plans of a building in late 16th-century English, and derived via French and Italian ultimately from Latin modulus, 'a measure'.
Proof most often refers to:Proof (truth), argument or sufficient evidence for the truth of a proposition
Alcohol proof, a measure of an alcoholic drink's strength.
In mathematics and formal logic, a theorem is a statement that has been proven, or can be proven. The proof of a theorem is a logical argument that uses the inference rules of a deductive system to establish that the theorem is a logical consequence of the axioms and previously proved theorems.
Biology is the scientific study of life and living organisms. It is a broad natural science that encompasses a wide range of fields and unifying principles that explain the structure, function, growth, origin, evolution, and distribution of life. Central to biology are five fundamental themes: the cell as the basic unit of life, genes and heredity as the basis of inheritance, evolution as the driver of biological diversity, energy transformation for sustaining life processes, and the maintenance of internal stability (homeostasis).
Chemistry is the scientific study of the properties and behavior of matter. It is a physical science within the natural sciences that studies the chemical elements that make up matter and compounds made of atoms, molecules and ions: their composition, structure, properties, behavior and the changes they undergo during reactions with other substances. Chemistry also addresses the nature of chemical bonds in chemical compounds.
Physics is the scientific study of matter, its fundamental constituents, its motion and behavior through space and time, and the related entities of energy and force. It is one of the most fundamental scientific disciplines. A scientist who specializes in the field of physics is called a physicist.
Astronomy is a natural science that studies celestial objects and the phenomena that occur in the cosmos. It uses mathematics, physics, and chemistry to explain their origin and their overall evolution. Objects of interest include planets, moons, stars, nebulae, galaxies, meteoroids, asteroids, and comets. Relevant phenomena include supernova explosions, gamma ray bursts, quasars, blazars, pulsars, and cosmic microwave background radiation. More generally, astronomy studies everything that originates beyond Earth's atmosphere. Cosmology is the branch of astronomy that studies the universe as a whole.
Geology is a branch of natural science concerned with the Earth and other astronomical bodies, the rocks of which they are composed, and the processes by which they change over time. The name comes from Ancient Greek  γῆ (gê) 'earth' and  λoγία (-logía) 'study of, discourse'. Modern geology significantly overlaps all other Earth sciences, including hydrology. It is integrated with Earth system science and planetary science.
Ecology is the natural science of the relationships among living organisms and their environment. Ecology considers organisms at the individual, population, community, ecosystem, and biosphere levels. Ecology overlaps with the closely related sciences of biogeography, evolutionary biology, genetics, ethology, and natural history.
Genetics is the study of genes, genetic variation, and heredity in organisms. It is an important branch in biology because heredity is vital to organisms' evolution. Gregor Mendel, a Moravian Augustinian friar working in the 19th century in Brno, was the first to study genetics scientifically. Mendel studied "trait inheritance", patterns in the way traits are handed down from parents to offspring over time. He observed that organisms inherit traits by way of discrete "units of inheritance". This term, still used today, is a somewhat ambiguous definition of what is referred to as a gene.
Neuroscience is the scientific study of the nervous system, its functions, and its disorders. It is a multidisciplinary science that combines physiology, anatomy, molecular biology, developmental biology, cytology, psychology, physics, computer science, chemistry, medicine, statistics, and mathematical modeling to understand the fundamental and emergent properties of neurons, glia, and neural circuits. The understanding of the biological basis of learning, memory, behavior, perception, and consciousness has been described by Eric Kandel as the "epic challenge" of the biological sciences.
Psychology is the scientific study of the mind and behavior. Its subject matter includes the behavior of humans and nonhumans, both conscious and unconscious phenomena, and mental processes such as thoughts, feelings, and motives. Psychology is an academic discipline of immense scope, crossing the boundaries between the natural and social sciences. Biological psychologists seek an understanding of the emergent properties of brains, linking the discipline to neuroscience. As social scientists, psychologists aim to understand the behavior of individuals and groups.
Sociology is the scientific study of human society that focuses on society, human social behavior, patterns of social relationships, social interaction, and aspects of culture associated with everyday life. The term sociology was coined in the late 18th century to describe the scientific study of society. Regarded as a part of both the social sciences and humanities, sociology uses various methods of empirical investigation and critical analysis to develop a body of knowledge about social order and social change. Sociological subject matter ranges from micro-level analyses of individual interaction and agency to macro-level analyses of social systems and social structure. Applied sociological research may be applied directly to social policy and welfare, whereas theoretical approaches may focus on the understanding of social processes and phenomenological method.
Economics is a social science that studies the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services.
Philosophy is a systematic study of general and fundamental questions concerning topics like existence, knowledge, mind, reason, language, and value. It is a rational and critical inquiry that reflects on its methods and assumptions.
Ethics is the philosophical study of moral phenomena. Also called moral philosophy, it investigates normative questions about what people ought to do or which behavior is morally right. Its main branches include normative ethics, applied ethics, and metaethics.
Linguistics is the scientific study of language. The areas of linguistic analysis are syntax, semantics (meaning), morphology, phonetics, phonology, and pragmatics. Subdisciplines such as biolinguistics and psycholinguistics bridge many of these divisions.
Literature is any collection of written work. The term is also used more narrowly for writings considered an art form, especially novels, plays, and poems. It includes both print and digital writing. In recent centuries, the definition has expanded to include oral literature, much of which has been transcribed. Literature is a method of recording, preserving, and transmitting knowledge and entertainment. It can also have a social, psychological, spiritual, or political role.
Art is a diverse range of cultural activity centered around works utilizing creative or imaginative talents, which are expected to evoke a worthwhile experience, generally through an expression of emotional power, conceptual ideas, technical proficiency, or beauty.
Music is the arrangement of sound to create some combination of form, harmony, melody, rhythm, or otherwise expressive content. Music is generally agreed to be a cultural universal that is present in all human societies. Definitions of music vary widely in substance and approach. While scholars agree that music is defined by a small number of specific elements, there is no consensus as to what these necessary elements are. Music is often characterized as a highly versatile medium for expressing human creativity. Diverse activities are involved in the creation of music, and are often divided into categories of composition, improvisation, and performance. Music may be performed using a wide variety of musical instruments, including the human voice. It can also be composed, sequenced, or otherwise produced to be indirectly played mechanically or electronically, such as via a music box, barrel organ, or digital audio workstation software on a computer.
Theatre or theater is a collaborative form of performing art that uses live performers, usually actors, to present experiences of a real or imagined event before a live audience in a specific place, often a stage. The performers may communicate this experience to the audience through combinations of gesture, speech, song, music, and dance. It is the oldest form of drama, though live theatre has now been joined by modern recorded forms. Elements of art, such as painted scenery and stagecraft such as lighting are used to enhance the physicality, presence and immediacy of the experience. Places, normally buildings, where performances regularly take place are also called "theatres", as derived from the Ancient Greek θέατρον, itself from θεάομαι.
A film, movie, or motion picture is a work of visual art that simulates experiences and otherwise communicates ideas, stories, perceptions, emotions, or atmosphere through the use of moving images that are generally, since the 1930s, synchronized with sound and sometimes using other sensory stimuli.
Media may refer to:.
Politics is the set of activities that are associated with making decisions in groups, or other forms of power relations among individuals, such as the distribution of status or resources.
The branch of social science that studies politics and government is referred to as political science.
Law is a set of rules that are created and are enforceable by governmental or societal institutions to regulate behavior, with its precise definition a matter of longstanding debate. It has been variously described as a science and as the art of justice. State-enforced laws can be made by a legislature, resulting in statutes; by the executive through decrees and regulations; or by judges' decisions, which form precedent in common law jurisdictions. An autocrat may exercise those functions within their realm. The creation of laws themselves may be influenced by a constitution, written or tacit, and the rights encoded therein. The law shapes politics, economics, history and society in various ways and also serves as a mediator of relations between people.
Geography is the study of the lands, features, inhabitants, and phenomena of Earth. Geography is an all-encompassing discipline that seeks an understanding of Earth and its human and natural complexities—not merely where objects are, but also how they have changed and come to be. While geography is specific to Earth, many concepts can be applied more broadly to other celestial bodies in the field of planetary science. Geography has been called "a bridge between natural science and social science disciplines.".
Engineering is the practice of using natural science, mathematics, and the engineering design process to solve problems within technology, increase efficiency and productivity, and improve systems. The traditional disciplines of engineering are civil, mechanical, electrical, and chemical. The academic discipline of engineering encompasses a broad range of more specialized subfields, and each can have a more specific emphasis for applications of mathematics and science. In turn, modern engineering practice spans multiple fields of engineering, which include designing and improving infrastructure, machinery, vehicles, electronics, materials, and energy systems. For related terms, see glossary of engineering.
Medicine is the science and practice of caring for patients, managing the diagnosis, prognosis, prevention, treatment and palliation of their injury or disease, while promoting their health. Medicine encompasses a variety of health care practices which evolved to maintain and restore health through the prevention and treatment of illness. Contemporary medicine applies biomedical sciences, biomedical research, genetics, and medical technology to diagnose, treat, and prevent injury and disease, typically through various pharmaceuticals or surgery, but also through therapies such as psychotherapy, external splints and traction, medical devices, biologics, and ionizing radiation, amongst others.
Robotics is the interdisciplinary study and practice of the design, construction, operation, and use of robots. A roboticist is someone who specializes in robotics. Robotics usually combines four aspects of design work: a power source, mechanical construction, a control system, and software.
Computer security is a subdiscipline within the field of information security. It focuses on protecting computer software, systems, and networks from threats that can lead to unauthorized information disclosure, theft or damage to hardware, software, or data, as well as to the disruption or misdirection of the services they provide.
A design is the concept or proposal for an object, process, or system. The word design refers to something that is or has been intentionally created by a thinking agent, and is sometimes used to refer to the inherent nature of something – its design. The verb to design expresses the process of developing a design. In some cases, the direct construction of an object without an explicit prior plan may also be considered to be a design, such as in arts and crafts. A design is expected to have a purpose within a specific context, typically aiming to satisfy certain goals and constraints while taking into account aesthetic, functional and experiential considerations. Traditional examples of designs are architectural and engineering drawings, circuit diagrams, sewing patterns, and less tangible artefacts such as business process models.
Architecture is the art and technique of designing and building, as distinguished from the skills associated with construction. It is both the process and the product of sketching, conceiving, planning, designing, and constructing buildings or other structures. The term comes from Latin  architectura; from Ancient Greek  ἀρχιτέκτων (arkhitéktōn) 'architect'; from  ἀρχι- (arkhi-) 'chief' and  τέκτων (téktōn) 'creator'. Architectural works, in the material form of buildings, are often perceived as cultural symbols and as works of art. Historical civilizations are often identified with their surviving architectural achievements.
Education is the transmission of knowledge and skills and the development of character traits. Formal education happens in a complex institutional framework, like public schools. Non-formal education is also structured but takes place outside the formal schooling system, while informal education is unstructured learning through daily experiences. Formal and non-formal education are divided into levels that include early childhood education, primary education, secondary education, and tertiary education. Other classifications focus on the teaching method, like teacher-centered and student-centered education, and on the subject, like science education, language education, and physical education. The term "education" can also refer to the mental states and qualities of educated people and the academic field studying educational phenomena.
A computer is a machine that can be programmed to automatically carry out sequences of arithmetic or logical operations (computation). Modern digital electronic computers can perform generic sets of operations known as programs, which enable computers to perform a wide range of tasks. The term computer system may refer to a nominally complete computer that includes the hardware, operating system, software, and peripheral equipment needed and used for full operation, or to a group of computers that are linked and function together, such as a computer network or computer cluster.
An apple is the round, edible fruit of an apple tree. Fruit trees of the orchard or domestic apple, the most widely grown in the genus, are cultivated worldwide. The tree originated in Central Asia, where its wild ancestor, Malus sieversii, is still found. Apples have been grown for thousands of years in Eurasia before they were introduced to North America by European colonists. Apples have cultural significance in many mythologies and religions.
Google LLC is an American multinational technology corporation focused on information technology, online advertising, search engine technology, email, cloud computing, software, quantum computing, e-commerce, consumer electronics, and artificial intelligence (AI). It has been referred to as "the most powerful company in the world" by the BBC, and is one of the world's most valuable brands. Google's parent company Alphabet Inc. has been described as a Big Tech company.
Microsoft Corporation is an American multinational technology conglomerate headquartered in Redmond, Washington. Founded in 1975, the company became influential in the rise of personal computers through software like Windows, and has since expanded to Internet services, cloud computing, artificial intelligence, video gaming, and other fields. Often described as a Big Tech company, Microsoft is the largest software company by revenue, one of the most valuable public companies, and one of the most valuable brands globally. It is a part of Big Tech along with five other tech companies in the United States, Alphabet (Google), Amazon, Apple, Meta (Facebook), and Nvidia, which are also the largest companies in the world by market capitalization.
Amazon most often refers to:Amazon (company), an American multinational technology company
Amazon rainforest, a rainforest covering most of the Amazon basin
Amazon River, in South America
Amazons, a tribe of female warriors in Greek mythology.
Meta most commonly refers to:Meta (prefix), a common affix and word in English
Meta Platforms, an American multinational technology conglomerate .
Tesla most commonly refers to:Nikola Tesla (1856–1943), a Serbian-American electrical engineer and inventor
Tesla, Inc., an American electric vehicle and clean energy company, formerly Tesla Motors, Inc.
Tesla (unit), the SI-derived unit of magnetic flux density.
Nvidia Corporation is an American technology company headquartered in Santa Clara, California. Founded on April 5, 1993 by Jensen Huang, Chris Malachowsky, and Curtis Priem, it develops graphics processing units (GPUs), systems on chips (SoCs), and application programming interfaces (APIs) for data science, high-performance computing, video games, and mobile and automotive applications. Nvidia has been described as a Big Tech company.
Samsung Group is a South Korean multinational manufacturing conglomerate headquartered in the Samsung Town office complex in Seoul. The group consists of numerous affiliated businesses, most of which operate under the Samsung brand, and is the largest chaebol in South Korea. As of 2024, Samsung has the world's fifth-highest brand value.
Intel Corporation is an American multinational technology company headquartered in Santa Clara, California. It designs, manufactures, and sells computer components such as central processing units (CPUs) and related products for business and consumer markets. Intel was the world's third-largest semiconductor chip manufacturer by revenue in 2024 and has been included in the Fortune 500 list of the largest United States corporations by revenue since 2007. It was one of the first companies listed on Nasdaq.
International Business Machines Corporation, doing business as IBM, is an American multinational technology company headquartered in Armonk, New York, and present in over 175 countries. It is a publicly traded company and one of the 30 companies in the Dow Jones Industrial Average. IBM is the largest industrial research organization in the world, with 19 research facilities across a dozen countries; for 29 consecutive years, from 1993 to 2021, it held the record for most annual U.S. patents generated by a business.
An oracle is a person or thing considered to provide insight, wise counsel or prophetic predictions, most notably including precognition of the future, inspired by deities. If done through occultic means, it is a form of divination.
Cisco Systems, Inc. is an American multinational technology conglomerate corporation that develops, manufactures, and sells hardware, software, telecommunications equipment and other high-technology services and products focused on networking, cyber security and AI. Cisco specializes in specific tech markets, such as the Internet of things (IoT), domain security, videoconferencing, and energy management, including products such as Webex, OpenDNS, Jabber, and Jasper. The company is headquartered in San Jose, California and, as of December 2025, has a market capitalization of $317 billion.
Adobe is a building material made from loam and organic materials. Adobe is Spanish for mudbrick. In some English-speaking regions of Spanish heritage, such as the Southwestern United States, the term is used to refer to any kind of earthen construction, or various architectural styles like Pueblo Revival or Territorial Revival. Most adobe buildings are similar in appearance to cob and rammed earth buildings. Adobe is among the earliest building materials, and is used throughout the world.
Spotify is a Swedish audio streaming and media service provider founded in April 2006 by Daniel Ek and Martin Lorentzon. As of December 2025, it was one of the largest providers of music streaming services, with over 751 million monthly active users comprising 290 million paying subscribers. Spotify is listed on the New York Stock Exchange in the form of American depositary receipts.
Netflix is an American subscription video on-demand over-the-top streaming service. The service primarily distributes original and acquired films and television shows from various genres. It is available internationally in multiple languages.
The Walt Disney Company, commonly known as simply Disney, is an American multinational mass media and entertainment conglomerate headquartered at the Walt Disney Studios complex in Burbank, California. Founded on October 16, 1923, as an animation studio by brothers Walt Disney and Roy Oliver Disney as Disney Brothers Cartoon Studio, Disney operated under the names Walt Disney Studio and Walt Disney Productions before adopting its current name in 1986. In 1928, Disney established itself as a leader in the animation industry with the short film Steamboat Willie. The film used synchronized sound to become the first post-produced sound cartoon, and popularized Mickey Mouse, who became Disney's mascot and corporate icon.
Sony Group Corporation, commonly referred to as Sony, is a Japanese multinational conglomerate headquartered at Sony City in Minato, Tokyo, Japan. The Sony Group encompasses various businesses, including electronics, imaging and sensing, film and television, music, video games, and others.
Nintendo Co., Ltd. is a Japanese multinational video game company headquartered in Kyoto. It develops, publishes, and manufactures both video games and video game consoles.
Uber Technologies, Inc. is an American multinational transportation company that provides ride-hailing services, courier services, food delivery, and freight transport. It is headquartered in San Francisco, California, and operates in approximately 70 countries and 15,000 cities worldwide. It is the largest ridesharing company worldwide with over 202 million monthly active users and 10 million active drivers and couriers. It coordinates an average of 42 million trips and delivery orders per day, and has coordinated 72 billion trips and delivery orders since its inception in 2010. In the fourth quarter of 2025, the company had a take rate of 29.9% for mobility services and 19.2% for food delivery.
Lyft, Inc. is an American company offering ride-hailing services, motorized scooters, and bicycle-sharing systems in the United States and Canada, and, via its Free Now mobile app, Europe. Lyft is the second-largest ridesharing company in the United States after Uber. It has 25 million active riders and coordinates 9 million rides per day.
Airbnb, Inc. is an American company operating an online marketplace for short-and-long-term homestays, experiences and services in various countries and regions. It acts as a broker and charges a commission from each booking. Airbnb was founded in 2008 by Brian Chesky, Nathan Blecharczyk, and Joe Gebbia.
Stripe, striped, or stripes may refer to:.
In geometry, a square is a regular quadrilateral. It has four straight sides of equal length and four equal angles. Squares are special cases of rectangles, which have four equal angles, and of rhombuses, which have four equal sides. As with all rectangles, a square's angles are right angles, making adjacent sides perpendicular. The area of a square is the side length multiplied by itself, and so in algebra, multiplying a number by itself is called squaring.
PayPal Holdings, Inc. is an American multinational financial technology company operating an online payments system in the majority of countries that support online money transfers; it serves as an electronic alternative to traditional paper methods such as checks and money orders. The company operates as a payment processor for online vendors, auction sites and many other commercial and company users.
Visa most commonly refers to:Travel visa, a document allowing entry to a foreign country
Work visa, a document granting permission to work in a foreign country
Visa Inc., a US multinational financial and payment cards company
Visa Debit card issued by the above company
Visa Plus, an interbank network
Visa Electron, a debit card.
Mastercard Inc. is an American multinational payment card services corporation headquartered in Purchase, New York. It offers a range of payment transaction processing and other related-payment services. Throughout the world, its principal business is to process payments between the banks of merchants and the card-issuing banks or credit unions of the purchasers who use the Mastercard-brand debit, credit and prepaid cards to make purchases. Mastercard has been publicly traded since 2006.
Coca-Cola, or Coke, is a cola soft drink manufactured by the Coca-Cola Company. In 2013, Coke products were sold in over 200 countries and territories worldwide, with consumers drinking more than 1.8 billion company beverage servings each day. Coca-Cola ranked No. 94 in the 2024 Fortune 500 list of the largest United States corporations by revenue. Based on Interbrand's "best global brand" study of 2023, Coca-Cola was the world's sixth most valuable brand.
Pepsi is a carbonated soft drink with a cola flavor, manufactured by PepsiCo which serves as its flagship product. In 2023, Pepsi was the second most valuable soft drink brand worldwide behind Coca-Cola; the two share a long-standing rivalry in what has been called the "cola wars".
Nike often refers to:Nike, Inc., a major American producer of athletic shoes, apparel, and sports equipment
Nike (mythology), a Greek goddess who personifies victory.
Adidas AG is a German multinational athletic apparel and footwear corporation headquartered in Herzogenaurach, Germany. It is the largest sportswear manufacturer in Europe, and the second largest in the world, after Nike. It is the holding company for the Adidas Group, which also owns an 8.33% stake in the football club Bayern Munich, and Runtastictrian fitness technology company. Adidas's revenue for 2024 was listed at €23 billion. Adidas is best known for their iconic brand image, offering the Yeezy Boost sneakers, and is publicly recognized for their extensive long origin history for participating in sponsored athletes, and for providing gear in the FIFA World Cup series. The brand is also unique for performance innovation of their shoes with major deep ties with sports culture, and durability with their focus of sport shoes, clothing, backpacks, and other accessories. Its commitment to sustainability includes their digital technology and AI, including collaborating with cultural figures like Lionel Messi, Patrick Mahomes, Real Madrid, and Pharrell Williams.
Puma or PUMA may refer to:.
Toyota Motor Corporation  is a Japanese multinational automotive manufacturer headquartered in Toyota City, Aichi, Japan. It was founded by Kiichiro Toyoda and incorporated on August 28, 1937. Toyota is the largest automobile manufacturer in the world, producing about 10 million vehicles per year.
Honda Motor Co., Ltd., commonly known as Honda, is a Japanese multinational conglomerate automotive manufacturer headquartered at the Toranomon Alcea Tower in Toranomon, Minato, Tokyo, Japan.
Ford commonly refers to:Ford Motor Company, an automobile manufacturer founded by Henry Ford
Ford (crossing), a shallow crossing on a river.
Bayerische Motoren Werke Aktiengesellschaft, trading as BMW Group, is a German multinational conglomerate manufacturer of luxury vehicles and motorcycles headquartered in Munich, Germany. The moniker, "BMW ", first came into use when the German firm Rapp Motorenwerke changed its name to Bayerische Motoren Werke GmbH in 1917. Thereafter, in 1922, the name and assets of BMW GmbH were transferred to the aircraft manufacturer Bayerische Flugzeugwerke AG, thereby giving rise to the company known today as BMW AG.
Mercedes may refer to:.
Volkswagen is a German automobile manufacturer based in Wolfsburg, Lower Saxony, Germany. Established in 1937 by the German Labour Front, it was revived after World War II by British Army officer Ivan Hirst and over the 81 years since grew into the global brand it is today. The company is well known for the Beetle and serves as the flagship marque of the Volkswagen Group, which was the world's largest automotive manufacturer by global sales in 2016 and 2017.
Shell or Shells may refer to:.
Exxon Mobil Corporation is an American multinational oil and gas corporation headquartered in Spring, Texas, a suburb of Houston. Founded as the largest direct successor of John D. Rockefeller's Standard Oil, the company was formed in 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil. It is vertically integrated across the entire oil and gas industry, as well as within its chemicals division, which produces plastic, synthetic rubber, and other chemical products. As the largest U.S.-based oil and gas company, ExxonMobil is the eighth-largest company by revenue in the U.S. and 13th-largest in the world. It is also the largest investor-owned oil company in the world. Approximately 55.56% of the company's shares are held by institutions, the largest of which, as of 2019, were The Vanguard Group (8.15%), BlackRock (6.61%), and State Street Corporation (4.83%).
Chevron may refer to:.
Walmart Inc. is an American multinational retail corporation that operates a chain of hypermarkets, discount department stores, and grocery stores in the United States and 19 other countries. It is headquartered in Bentonville, Arkansas. The company was founded in 1962 by brothers Sam Walton and James "Bud" Walton in nearby Rogers, Arkansas. It also owns and operates Sam's Club retail warehouses.
Target may refer to:.
Costco Wholesale Corporation is an American multinational corporation that operates a chain of membership-only big-box warehouse club retail stores. As of 2021, Costco is the third-largest retailer in the world, and as of August 2024, the world's largest retailer of beef, poultry, organic produce, and wine, with just under a third of American consumers regularly shopping at Costco warehouses. As of 2025, Costco is ranked 12th on the Fortune 500 rankings of the largest United States corporations by total revenue.
IKEA is a multinational conglomerate founded in Sweden that designs and sells ready-to-assemble furniture, household goods, and various related services.
Starbucks Corporation is an American multinational chain of coffeehouses and roastery reserves headquartered in Seattle, Washington. It was founded in 1971 by Jerry Baldwin, Zev Siegl, and Gordon Bowker at Seattle's Pike Place Market initially as a coffee bean wholesaler. Starbucks was converted into a coffee shop serving espresso-based drinks under the ownership of Howard Schultz, who was chief executive officer from 1986 to 2000 and led the aggressive expansion of the franchise across the West Coast of the United States.
McDonald's Corporation, doing business as McDonald's, is an American multinational fast food restaurant chain. As of 2024, it is the second-largest by number of locations in the world, behind the Chinese chain Mixue Ice Cream & Tea.
A chipotle, or chilpotle, is a smoke-dried ripe jalapeño chili pepper used for seasoning. It is used primarily in Mexican and Mexican-inspired cuisines, such as Tex-Mex and Southwestern United States dishes. It comes in different forms, such as chipotles en adobo.
Dominoes is a family of tile-based games played with pieces. Each domino is a rectangular tile, usually with a line dividing its face into two square ends. Each end is marked with a number of spots or is blank. The backs of the tiles in a set are indistinguishable, either blank or having some common design. The gaming pieces make up a domino set, sometimes called a deck or pack. The traditional European domino set consists of 28 tiles, also known as pieces, bones, rocks, stones, men, cards or just dominoes, featuring all combinations of spot counts between zero and six. A domino set is a generic gaming device, similar to playing cards or dice, in that a variety of games can be played with a set. Another form of entertainment using domino pieces is the practice of domino toppling.
FedEx Corporation, originally known as Federal Express Corporation, is an American multinational conglomerate holding company specializing in transportation, e-commerce, and business services. The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tennessee. The name "FedEx" is a syllabic abbreviation of its original air division, Federal Express, which operated under this name from 1973 until 1994.
UPS commonly refers to:Uninterruptible power supply, a device which provides continuous power to electronics
United Parcel Service, an American courier company.

Abstraction is the process of generalizing rules and concepts from specific examples, literal signifiers, first principles, or other methods. The result of the process, an abstraction, is a concept that acts as a common noun for all subordinate concepts and connects any related concepts as a group, field, or category.
In mechanics, an acceleration is a change in velocity and is calculated as the rate of change of the velocity of an object with respect to time. Acceleration is apart of the study of motion and is one of several components of kinematics. Acceleration has magnitude and direction, making it a vector quantity. Fundamentally, an acceleration is any time an object changes speed or direction.
Acoustics is a branch of continuum mechanics that deals with the study of mechanical waves in gases, liquids, and solids including topics such as vibration, sound, ultrasound and infrasound. A scientist who works in the field of acoustics is an acoustician while someone working in the field of acoustics technology may be called an acoustical engineer. The application of acoustics is present in almost all aspects of modern society with the most obvious being the audio and noise control industries.
In biology, adaptation has three related meanings. Firstly, it is the dynamic evolutionary process of natural selection that fits organisms to their environment, enhancing their evolutionary fitness. Secondly, it is a state reached by the population during that process. Thirdly, it is a phenotypic trait or adaptive trait, with a functional role in each individual organism, that is maintained and has evolved through natural selection.
Adhesion is the tendency of dissimilar particles or surfaces to cling to one another.
Aeronautics is the science or art involved with the study, design, and manufacturing of air flight-capable machines, and the techniques of operating aircraft and rockets within the atmosphere.
While the term originally referred solely to operating the aircraft, it has since been expanded to include technology, business, and other aspects related to aircraft. The term "aviation" is sometimes used interchangeably with aeronautics, although "aeronautics" includes lighter-than-air craft such as airships, and includes ballistic vehicles while "aviation" technically does not.
An aerosol is a suspension of fine solid particles or liquid droplets in air or another gas. Aerosols can be generated from natural or human causes. The scientific term aerosol refers to the mixture of particulates in gas, and not to the particulate matter alone. The liquid or solid particles in an aerosol have diameters typically less than 1 μm. Larger particles with a significant settling speed make the mixture a suspension, although the distinction is not clear.
Affinity may refer to:.
Agronomy is the science and technology of producing and using plants by agriculture for food, fuel, fiber, chemicals, recreation, or land conservation. Agronomy has come to include research of plant genetics, plant physiology, meteorology, and soil science. It is the application of a combination of sciences such as biology, chemistry, economics, ecology, earth science, and genetics. Professionals in the field are known as agronomists.
In mathematics and computer science, an algorithm is a finite sequence of mathematically rigorous instructions, typically used to solve a class of specific problems or to perform a computation. Algorithms are used as specifications for performing calculations and data processing. More advanced algorithms can use conditionals to divert the code execution through various routes and deduce valid inferences.
Alkalinity (from Arabic: القلوية, romanized: al-qaly, lit. 'ashes of the saltwort') is the capacity of water to resist acidification. It should not be confused with basicity, which is an absolute measurement on the pH scale. Alkalinity is the strength of a buffer solution composed of weak acids and their conjugate bases. It is measured by titrating the solution with an acid such as HCl until its pH changes abruptly, or it reaches a known endpoint where that happens. Alkalinity is expressed in units of concentration, such as meq/L (milliequivalents per liter), μeq/kg (microequivalents per kilogram), or mg/L CaCO3 (milligrams per liter of calcium carbonate). Each of these measurements corresponds to an amount of acid added as a titrant.
An alloy is a mixture of chemical elements of which in most cases at least one is a metallic element, although it is also sometimes used for mixtures of elements; herein only metallic alloys are described. Metallic alloys often have properties that differ from those of the pure elements from which they are made. The vast majority of metals used for commercial purposes are alloyed to improve their properties or behavior, such as increased strength, hardness or corrosion resistance. Metals may also be alloyed to reduce their overall cost, for instance alloys of gold and copper.
Altitude is a distance measurement, usually in the vertical or "up" direction, between a reference datum and a point or object. The exact definition and reference datum varies according to the context. Although the term altitude is commonly used to mean the height above sea level of a location, in geography the term elevation is often preferred for this usage.
Amphibians are ectothermic, anamniotic, four-limbed vertebrate animals that constitute the class Amphibia. In its broadest sense, it is a paraphyletic group encompassing all tetrapods, but excluding the amniotes. All extant (living) amphibians belong to the monophyletic subclass Lissamphibia, with three living orders: Anura, Urodela (salamanders), and Gymnophiona (caecilians). Evolved to be mostly semiaquatic, amphibians have adapted to inhabit a wide variety of habitats, with most species living in freshwater, wetland or terrestrial ecosystems. Their life cycle typically starts out as aquatic larvae with gills known as tadpoles, but some species have developed behavioural adaptations to bypass this.
The amplitude of a periodic variable is a measure of its change in a single period. The amplitude of a non-periodic signal is its magnitude compared with a reference value. There are various definitions of amplitude, which are all functions of the magnitude of the differences between the variable's extreme values. In older texts, the phase of a periodic function is sometimes called the amplitude.
Anatomy is the branch of morphology concerned with the study of the internal and external structure of organisms and their parts. Anatomy is a branch of natural science that deals with the structural organization of living things. It is an old science, having its beginnings in prehistoric times.
In meteorology, an anemometer is a device that measures wind speed and direction. It is a common instrument used in weather stations. The earliest known description of an anemometer was by Italian architect and author Leon Battista Alberti (1404–1472) in 1450.
Angiogenesis is the physiological process through which new blood vessels form from pre-existing vessels, formed in the earlier stage of vasculogenesis. Angiogenesis continues the growth of the vasculature mainly by processes of sprouting and splitting, but processes such as coalescent angiogenesis, vessel elongation and vessel cooption also play a role. Vasculogenesis is the embryonic formation of endothelial cells from mesoderm cell precursors, and from neovascularization, although discussions are not always precise. The first vessels in the developing embryo form through vasculogenesis, after which angiogenesis is responsible for most, if not all, blood vessel growth during development and in disease.
Anomaly, The Anomaly or Anomalies may refer to:.
An anode usually is an electrode of a polarized electrical device through which conventional current enters the device. This contrasts with a cathode, which is usually an electrode of the device through which conventional current leaves the device. A common mnemonic is ACID, for anode current into device. The direction of conventional current in a circuit is opposite to the direction of electron flow, so electrons flow from the anode of a galvanic cell, into an outside or external circuit connected to the cell. For example, the end of a household battery marked with a + is the cathode.
An antibody (Ab), or immunoglobulin (Ig), is a large protein belonging to the immunoglobulin superfamily which is used by the immune system to identify and neutralize antigens such as those that exist on bacteria and virus cells, including those that cause disease. Each individual antibody recognizes one or more specific antigens, and antigens of virtually any size and chemical composition can be recognized. Each of the branching chains comprising the "Y" of an antibody contains a paratope that specifically binds to one particular epitope on an antigen, allowing the two molecules to bind together with precision. Using this mechanism, antibodies can effectively "tag" the antigen for attack by cells of the immune system, or can neutralize it directly.
In immunology, an antigen (Ag) is a molecule, or portion thereof, that can bind to a specific antibody or T-cell receptor. The presence of antigens in the body may trigger an immune response.
In modern physics, antimatter is defined as matter composed of the antiparticles of the corresponding particles in "ordinary" matter, and can be thought of as matter with reversed charge and parity, or going backward in time. Antimatter occurs in natural processes like cosmic ray collisions and some types of radioactive decay, but only a tiny fraction of these have successfully been bound together in experiments to form antiatoms. Minuscule numbers of antiparticles can be generated at particle accelerators, but total artificial production has been only a few nanograms. No macroscopic amount of antimatter has ever been assembled due to the extreme cost and difficulty of production and handling. Nonetheless, antimatter is an essential component of widely available applications related to beta decay, such as positron emission tomography, radiation therapy, and industrial imaging.
In optics, the aperture of an optical system is the hole or opening that primarily limits light propagated through the system. The aperture defines a bundle of rays from each point on an object that will come to a focus in the image plane.
Apoptosis is a form of programmed cell death that occurs in multicellular organisms and in some eukaryotic, single-celled microorganisms such as yeast. Biochemical events lead to characteristic cell changes (morphology) and death. These changes include blebbing, cell shrinkage, nuclear fragmentation, chromatin condensation, DNA fragmentation, and mRNA decay. The average adult human loses 50 to 70 billion cells each day to apoptosis. For the average human child between 8 and 14 years old, each day the approximate loss is 20 to 30 billion cells.
Aquaculture, also known as aquafarming, is the controlled cultivation ("farming") of aquatic organisms such as fish, crustaceans, mollusks, algae and other organisms of value such as aquatic plants. Aquaculture involves cultivating freshwater, brackish water, and saltwater populations under controlled or semi-natural conditions and can be contrasted with commercial fishing, which is the harvesting of wild fish. Aquaculture is also a practice used for restoring and rehabilitating marine and freshwater ecosystems. Mariculture, commonly known as marine farming, is aquaculture in seawater habitats and lagoons, as opposed to freshwater aquaculture. Pisciculture is a type of aquaculture that consists of fish farming to obtain fish products as food.
Arbitrage is the practice of taking advantage of a difference in prices in two or more markets – striking a combination of matching deals to capitalize on the difference, the profit being the difference between the market prices at which the unit is traded. Arbitrage has the effect of causing prices of the same or very similar assets in different markets to converge.
An arboretum is a botanical collection composed exclusively of trees and shrubs of a variety of species. Originally mostly created as a section in a larger garden or park for specimens of mostly non-local species, many modern arboreta are in botanical gardens as living collections of woody plants and are intended at least in part for scientific study.
Archaea is a domain of organisms. Traditionally, Archaea included only its prokaryotic members, but has since been found to be paraphyletic, as eukaryotes are known to have evolved from archaea. Even though the domain Archaea cladistically includes eukaryotes, the term archaea in English still generally refers specifically to prokaryotic members of Archaea. Archaea were initially classified as bacteria, receiving the name archaebacteria, but this term has fallen out of use. Archaeal cells have unique properties distinguishing them from Bacteria and Eukaryota, including: cell membranes made of ether-linked lipids; metabolisms such as methanogenesis; and a unique motility structure known as an archaellum. Archaea are further divided into multiple recognized phyla. Classification is difficult because most have not been isolated in a laboratory and have been identified only by their gene sequences in environmental samples. It is unknown if they can produce endospores.
An archipelago, sometimes called an island group or island chain, is a chain, cluster, or collection of islands. An archipelago may be in an ocean, a sea, or a smaller body of water. Examples of archipelagos include the Aegean Islands, the Canadian Arctic Archipelago, the Stockholm Archipelago, the Malay Archipelago, the Lucayan (Bahamian) Archipelago, the Japanese archipelago, and the Hawaiian Archipelago.
The Arctic is the polar region of Earth that surrounds the North Pole, lying north of the Arctic Circle. The Arctic region, from the IERS Reference Meridian travelling east, consists of parts of northern Norway, northernmost Sweden, northern Finland, Russia, the United States (Alaska), Canada, Danish Realm (Greenland), and northern Iceland, along with the Arctic Ocean and adjacent seas.
Armature may refer to:Armature, kinematic chain used in computer animation to simulate the motions of virtual characters
Armature (electrical), one of the two principal electrical components of an electromechanical machine
Armature (sculpture), framework around which a sculpture is built
Armature Studio, video game developer

.
Aromatic compounds or arenes are organic compounds "with a chemistry typified by benzene" and "cyclically conjugated."
The word "aromatic" originates from the past grouping of molecules based on odor, before their general chemical properties were understood. The current definition of aromatic compounds does not have any relation to their odor. Aromatic compounds are now defined as cyclic compounds satisfying Hückel's rule.
Aromatic compounds have the following general properties:Typically unreactive
Often non polar and hydrophobic
High carbon-hydrogen ratio
Burn with a strong sooty yellow flame, due to high C:H ratio
Undergo electrophilic substitution reactions and nucleophilic aromatic substitutions.
Arrhythmias, also known as cardiac arrhythmias, are irregularities in the heartbeat, including when it is too fast or too slow. Essentially, this is anything but normal sinus rhythm. A resting heart rate that is too fast – above 100 beats per minute in adults – is called tachycardia, and a resting heart rate that is too slow – below 60 beats per minute – is called bradycardia. Some types of arrhythmias have no symptoms. Symptoms, when present, may include palpitations or feeling a pause between heartbeats. In more serious cases, there may be lightheadedness, passing out, shortness of breath, chest pain, or decreased level of consciousness. While most cases of arrhythmia are not serious, some predispose a person to complications such as stroke or heart failure. Others may result in sudden death.
Artifact or artefact may refer to:.
An astrolabe is an astronomical instrument dating to ancient times. It serves as a star chart and physical model of the visible half-dome of the sky. Its various functions also make it an elaborate inclinometer and an analog calculation device capable of working out several kinds of problems in astronomy. In its simplest form it is a metal disc with a pattern of wires, cutouts, and perforations that allows a user to calculate astronomical positions precisely. It is able to measure the altitude above the horizon of a celestial body, day or night; it can be used to identify stars or planets, to determine local latitude given local time, to survey, or to triangulate. It was used in classical antiquity, the Byzantine Empire, the Islamic Golden Age, the European Middle Ages and the Age of Discovery for all these purposes.
An atmosphere is a layer of gases that envelop an astronomical object, held in place by the gravity of the object. The name originates from Ancient Greek  ἀτμός (atmós) 'vapour, steam' and  σφαῖρα (sphaîra) 'sphere'. An object acquires most of its atmosphere during its primordial epoch, either by accretion of matter or by outgassing of volatiles. The chemical interaction of the atmosphere with the solid surface can change its fundamental composition, as can photochemical interaction with the Sun. A planet retains an atmosphere for longer durations when the gravity is high and the temperature is low. The solar wind works to strip away a planet's outer atmosphere, although this process is slowed by a magnetosphere. The further a body is from the Sun, the lower the rate of atmospheric stripping.
Atomism is a natural philosophy proposing that the physical universe is composed of fundamental indivisible components known as atoms.
Atrophy is the partial or complete wasting away of a part of the body. Causes of atrophy include mutations, poor nourishment, poor circulation, loss of hormonal support, loss of nerve supply to the target organ, excessive amount of apoptosis of cells, and disuse or lack of exercise or disease intrinsic to the tissue itself. In medical practice, hormonal and nerve inputs that maintain an organ or body part are said to have trophic effects. A diminished muscular trophic condition is designated as atrophy. Atrophy is reduction in size of cell, organ or tissue, after attaining its normal mature growth. In contrast, hypoplasia is the reduction in the cellular numbers of an organ, or tissue that has not attained normal maturity.
An aurora is a natural light display in Earth's sky, predominantly observed in high-latitude regions around the Arctic and Antarctic. The terms northern lights and southern lights are used in the Northern and Southern Hemispheres respectively. Auroras display dynamic patterns of radiant light that appear as curtains, rays, spirals or dynamic flickers covering the entire sky.
Autocracy is a form of government in which absolute power is held by one person, known as an autocrat. It includes both absolute monarchies and dictatorships, while it is contrasted with democracy and other forms of free government. The autocrat has total control over the exercise of civil liberties within the autocracy, choosing under what circumstances they may be exercised, if at all. Governments may also blend elements of autocracy and democracy, forming a mixed type of regime sometimes referred to as anocracy, hybrid regime, or electoral autocracy. The concept of autocracy has been recognized in political philosophy since ancient history.
In developmental psychology and moral, political, bioethical philosophy, autonomy is the capacity to make an informed, uncoerced decision. Autonomous organizations or institutions are independent or self-governing. Autonomy can also be defined from a human resources perspective, where it denotes a level of discretion granted to an employee in their work. In such cases, autonomy is known to generally increase job satisfaction. Self-actualized individuals are thought to operate autonomously of external expectations. In a medical context, respect for a patient's personal autonomy is considered one of many fundamental ethical principles in medicine.
Aviation includes the activities surrounding mechanical flight and the aircraft industry. Aircraft include fixed-wing and rotary-wing types, morphable wings, wing-less lifting bodies, as well as lighter-than-air aircraft such as hot air balloons and airships.
An axon is a long slender projection of a nerve cell or neuron found in most animals that typically conducts electrical impulses known as action potentials away from the nerve cell body. The function of the axon is to transmit information to different neurons, muscles, and glands. In certain sensory neurons, such as those for touch and warmth, the axons are called afferent nerve fibers and the electrical impulse travels along these from the periphery to the cell body and from the cell body to the spinal cord along another branch of the same axon. Axon dysfunction can be the cause of many inherited and many acquired neurological disorders that affect both the peripheral and central neurons. Nerve fibers are classed into three types – group A nerve fibers, group B nerve fibers, and group C nerve fibers. Groups A and B are myelinated, and group C is unmyelinated. These groups include both sensory fibers and motor fibers. Another classification groups only the sensory fibers into four categories: Type I, Type II, Type III, and Type IV.
Bacteria are ubiquitous, mostly free-living organisms often consisting of one biological cell. They constitute a large domain of prokaryotic microorganisms. Typically a few micrometres in length, bacteria were among the first life forms to appear on Earth, and are present in most of its habitats. Bacteria inhabit the air, soil, water, acidic hot springs, radioactive waste, and the deep biosphere of Earth's crust. Bacteria play a vital role in many stages of the nutrient cycle by recycling nutrients and the fixation of nitrogen from the atmosphere. The nutrient cycle includes the decomposition of dead bodies; bacteria are responsible for the putrefaction stage in this process. In the biological communities surrounding hydrothermal vents and cold seeps, extremophile bacteria provide the nutrients needed to sustain life by converting dissolved compounds, such as hydrogen sulphide and methane, to energy. Bacteria also live in mutualistic, commensal and parasitic relationships with plants and animals. Most bacteria have not been characterised and there are many species that cannot be grown in the laboratory. The study of bacteria is known as bacteriology, a branch of microbiology.
Bandwidth commonly refers to:Bandwidth or analog bandwidth, frequency bandwidth, or radio bandwidth, a measure of the width of a frequency range
Bandwidth (computing), the rate of data transfer, bit rate or throughput
Spectral linewidth, the width of an atomic or molecular spectral line.
A barometer is a scientific instrument that is used to measure air pressure. Pressure tendency, which is derived from barometric readings, can forecast short term changes in the weather. Many measurements of air pressure are used within surface weather analysis to help find surface troughs, pressure systems and frontal boundaries.
Basalt is an aphanitic (fine-grained) extrusive igneous rock formed from the rapid cooling of low-viscosity lava rich in magnesium and iron exposed at or very near the surface of a rocky planet or moon. More than 90% of all volcanic rock on Earth is basalt. Rapid-cooling, fine-grained basalt has the same chemical composition and mineralogy as slow-cooling, coarse-grained gabbro. The eruption of basalt lava is observed by geologists at about 20 volcanoes per year. Basalt is also an important rock type on other planetary bodies in the Solar System. For example, the bulk of the plains of Venus, which cover ~80% of the surface, are basaltic; the lunar maria are plains of flood-basaltic lava flows; and basalt is a common rock on the surface of Mars.
Biodiversity is the variability of life on Earth. It can be measured on various levels, for example, genetic variability, species diversity, ecosystem diversity and phylogenetic diversity. Diversity is not distributed evenly on Earth—it is greater in the tropics as a result of the warm climate and high primary productivity in the region near the equator. Tropical forest ecosystems cover less than one-fifth of Earth's terrestrial area and contain about 50% of the world's species. There are latitudinal gradients in species diversity for both marine and terrestrial taxa.
A biome is a distinct geographical region with specific climate, vegetation, animal life, and an ecosystem. It consists of a biological community that has formed in response to its physical environment and regional climate. In 1935, Tansley added the climatic and soil aspects to the idea, calling it ecosystem. The International Biological Program (1964–74) projects popularized the concept of biome.
Biometrics are body measurements and calculations related to human characteristics and features. Biometric authentication is used in computer science as a form of identification and access control. It is also used to identify individuals in groups that are under surveillance.
A biomolecule or biological molecule is loosely defined as a molecule produced by a living organism and essential to one or more typically biological processes. Biomolecules include large macromolecules such as proteins, carbohydrates, lipids, and nucleic acids, as well as small molecules such as vitamins and hormones. A general name for this class of material is biological materials. Biomolecules are an important element of living organisms. They are often endogenous, i.e. produced within the organism, but organisms usually also need exogenous biomolecules, for example certain nutrients, to survive.
The biosphere, also called the ecosphere, is the worldwide sum of all ecosystems. It can also be termed the zone of life on the Earth. The biosphere is virtually a closed system with regard to matter, with minimal inputs and outputs. Regarding energy, it is an open system, with photosynthesis capturing solar energy at a rate of around 100 terawatts. By the most general biophysiological definition, the biosphere is the global ecological system integrating all living beings and their relationships, including their interaction with the elements of the lithosphere, cryosphere, hydrosphere, and atmosphere. The biosphere is postulated to have evolved, beginning with a process of biopoiesis or biogenesis, at least some 3.5 billion years ago.
In telecommunications and computing, bit rate is the number of bits that are conveyed or processed per unit of time.
A blockchain is a distributed ledger with growing lists of records (blocks) that are securely linked together via cryptographic hashes. Each block contains a cryptographic hash of the previous block, a timestamp, and transaction data. Since each block contains information about the previous block, they effectively form a chain, with each additional block linking to the ones before it. Consequently, blockchain transactions are resistant to alteration because, once recorded, the data in any given block cannot be changed retroactively without altering all subsequent blocks and obtaining network consensus to accept these changes.
Botany, also called phytology or plant science, is the branch of natural science and biology that studies plants, especially their anatomy, taxonomy, and ecology. A botanist or plant scientist is a scientist who specialises in this field. "Plant" and "botany" may be defined more narrowly to include only land plants and their study, which is also known as phytology. Phytologists or botanists study approximately 410,000 species of land plants, including some 391,000 species of vascular plants and approximately 20,000 bryophytes.
Boundary or Boundaries may refer to:.
Bureaucracy is a system of organization where laws or regulatory authority are implemented by civil servants. Historically, a bureaucracy was a government administration managed by departments staffed with non-elected officials. Today, bureaucracy is the administrative system governing any large institution, whether publicly owned or privately owned. The public administration in many jurisdictions is an example of bureaucracy, as is any centralized hierarchical structure of an institution, including corporations, societies, nonprofit organizations, and clubs.
In Western musical theory, a cadence is the end of a phrase in which the melody or harmony creates a sense of full or partial resolution, especially in music of the 16th century onwards. A harmonic cadence is a progression of two or more chords that concludes a phrase, section, or piece of music. A rhythmic cadence is a characteristic rhythmic pattern that indicates the end of a phrase. A cadence can be labeled "weak" or "strong" depending on the impression of finality it gives.
Calcification is the accumulation of calcium salts in a body tissue. It normally occurs in the formation of bone, but calcium can be deposited abnormally in soft tissue, causing it to harden. Calcifications may be classified on whether there is mineral balance or not, and the location of the calcification. Calcification may also refer to the processes of normal mineral deposition in biological systems, such as the formation of stromatolites or mollusc shells.
In measurement technology and metrology, calibration is the comparison of measurement values delivered by a device under test with those of a calibration standard of known accuracy. Such a standard could be another measurement device of known accuracy, a device generating the quantity to be measured such as a voltage, a sound tone, or a physical artifact, such as a meter ruler.
The Cambrian is the first geological period of the Paleozoic Era and the Phanerozoic Eon. The Cambrian lasted 51.95 million years from the end of the preceding Ediacaran period 538.8 Ma to the beginning of the Ordovician Period 486.85 Ma.
Capacitance is the ability of an object to store electric charge. It is measured by the change in charge in response to a difference in electric potential, expressed as the ratio of those quantities. Commonly recognized are two closely related notions of capacitance: self capacitance and mutual capacitance. An object that can be electrically charged exhibits self capacitance, for which the electric potential is measured between the object and ground. Mutual capacitance is measured between two components, and is particularly important in the operation of the capacitor, an elementary linear electronic component designed to add capacitance to an electric circuit.
A carcinogen is any agent that promotes the development of cancer. Carcinogens can include synthetic chemicals, naturally occurring substances, physical agents such as ionizing and non-ionizing radiation, and biologic agents such as viruses and bacteria. Most carcinogens act by creating mutations in DNA that disrupt a cell's normal processes for regulating growth, leading to uncontrolled cellular proliferation. This occurs when the cell's DNA repair processes fail to identify DNA damage allowing the defect to be passed down to daughter cells. The damage accumulates over time. This is typically a multi-step process during which the regulatory mechanisms within the cell are gradually dismantled allowing for unchecked cellular division.
Catalysis is the increase in rate of a chemical reaction due to an added substance known as a catalyst. Catalysts are not consumed by the reaction and remain unchanged after the reaction. If the reaction is rapid and the catalyst is recycled quickly, a very small amount of catalyst often suffices; mixing, surface area, and temperature are important factors in reaction rate. Catalysts generally react with one or more reactants to form intermediates that subsequently give the final reaction product, in the process of regenerating the catalyst.
Causality is an influence by which one event, process, state, or subject contributes to the production of another event, process, state, or object where the cause is at least partly responsible for the effect, and the effect is at least partly dependent on the cause. The cause of something may also be described as the reason behind the event or process.
Cavitation in fluid mechanics and engineering normally is the phenomenon in which the static pressure of a liquid reduces to below the liquid's vapor pressure, leading to the formation of small vapor-filled cavities in the liquid. When subjected to higher pressure, these cavities, called "bubbles" or "voids", collapse and can generate shock waves that may damage machinery. As a concrete propeller example: The pressure on the suction side of the propeller blades can be very low and when the pressure falls to that of the vapour pressure of the working liquid, cavities filled with gas vapour can form. The process of the formation of these cavities is referred to as cavitation. If the cavities move into the regions of higher pressure, they will implode or collapse. These shock waves are strong when they are very close to the imploded bubble, but rapidly weaken as they propagate away from the implosion. Cavitation collapse is therefore a significant cause of wear in some engineering contexts. Collapsing voids that implode near to a hard surface cause cyclic stress through repeated implosion. This results in surface fatigue of the material, causing a type of damage also called "cavitation damage" or "cavitation erosion". The most common examples of this kind of wear are to pump impellers, and pipe bends where a sudden change in the direction of fast moving liquid occurs.
Cellulose is an organic compound with the formula (C6H10O5)n, a polysaccharide consisting of a linear chain of several hundred to many thousands of β(1→4) linked D-glucose units. Cellulose is an important structural component of the cell walls of green plants, many forms of algae, and the oomycetes. Some species of bacteria secrete it to form biofilms. Cellulose is the most abundant organic polymer on Earth. The cellulose content of cotton fibre is 90%, that of wood is 40–50%, and that of dried hemp is approximately 57%.
A centrifuge is a device that uses centrifugal force to subject a specimen to a specified constant force – for example, to separate various components of a fluid. This is achieved by spinning the fluid at high speed within a container, thereby separating fluids of different densities or liquids from solids. It works by causing denser substances and particles to move outward in the radial direction. At the same time, objects that are less dense are displaced and moved to the centre. In a laboratory centrifuge that uses sample tubes, the radial acceleration causes denser particles to settle to the bottom of the tube, while low-density substances rise to the top. A centrifuge can be a very effective filter that separates contaminants from the main body of fluid.
A ceramic is any of the various hard, brittle, heat-resistant, and corrosion-resistant materials made by shaping and then firing an inorganic, nonmetallic material, such as clay, at a high temperature. Common examples are earthenware, porcelain, and brick.
Chlorophyll is any of several related green pigments found in cyanobacteria and in the chloroplasts of algae and plants. Its name is derived from the Greek words χλωρός and φύλλον. Chlorophyll allows plants to absorb energy from light. Those pigments are involved in oxygenic photosynthesis, as opposed to bacteriochlorophylls, related molecules found only in bacteria and involved in anoxygenic photosynthesis.
A chromosome is a package of DNA containing part or all of the genetic material of an organism. In most chromosomes, the very long thin DNA fibers are coated with nucleosome-forming packaging proteins; in eukaryotic cells, the most important of these proteins are the histones. Aided by chaperone proteins, the histones bind to and condense the DNA molecule to maintain its integrity. These eukaryotic chromosomes display a complex three-dimensional structure that has a significant role in transcriptional regulation.
In cryptography, a cipher is an algorithm for performing encryption or decryption—a series of well-defined steps that can be followed as a procedure. An alternative, less common term is encipherment. To encipher or encode is to convert information into cipher or code. In common parlance, "cipher" is synonymous with "code", as they are both a set of steps that encrypt a message; however, the concepts are distinct in cryptography, especially classical cryptography.
An electronic circuit is composed of individual electronic components, such as resistors, transistors, capacitors, inductors and diodes, connected by conductive wires or traces through which electric current can flow. It is a type of electrical circuit. For a circuit to be referred to as electronic, rather than electrical, generally at least one active component must be present. The combination of components and wires allows various simple and complex operations to be performed: signals can be amplified, computations can be performed, and data can be moved from one place to another.
Cognitions are mental processes that deal with knowledge. They encompass psychological activities that acquire, store, retrieve, transform, or apply information. Cognitions are a pervasive part of mental life, helping individuals understand and interact with the world.
Coherence is, in general, a state or situation in which all the parts or ideas fit together well so that they form a united whole.
A colloid is a mixture in which one substance, consisting of microscopically dispersed insoluble particles, is suspended throughout another substance. Some definitions specify that the particles must be dispersed in a liquid, while others extend the definition to include substances like aerosols and gels. The term colloidal suspension refers unambiguously to the overall mixture. A colloid has a dispersed phase and a continuous phase.
Combustion, or burning, is a high-temperature exothermic redox chemical reaction between a fuel and an oxidant, usually atmospheric oxygen, that produces oxidized, often gaseous products, in a mixture termed as smoke. Combustion does not always result in fire, because a flame is only visible when substances undergoing combustion vaporize, but when it does, a flame is a characteristic indicator of the reaction. While activation energy must be supplied to initiate combustion, the heat from a flame may provide enough energy to make the reaction self-sustaining. The study of combustion is known as combustion science.
In economics, a commodity is an economic good, usually a resource, that specifically has full or substantial fungibility: that is, the market treats instances of the good as equivalent or nearly so with no regard to who produced them.
A press release is an official statement delivered to members of the news media for the purpose of providing new information, creating an official statement, or making an announcement directed for public release. Press releases are also considered a primary source, meaning they are original informants for information. A press release is traditionally composed of nine structural elements, including a headline, dateline, introduction, body, and other components. Press releases are typically delivered to news media electronically, ready to use, and sometimes subject to "do not use before" time, known as a news embargo.
Conductor or conduction may refer to:.
Conifers are a group of vascular plants and a subset of gymnosperms. They are primarily perennial, woody trees and shrubs, mostly evergreen with a regular branching pattern, reproducing with male and female cones, usually on the same tree. They are wind-pollinated and the seeds are usually dispersed by the wind. Taxonomically, they make up the division Pinophyta, also known as Coniferae. All extant conifers, except for the gnetophytes, are perennial woody plants with secondary growth. There are over 600 living species.
Consensus usually refers to general agreement among a group of people or community. It may also refer to:.
A constellation is an area on the celestial sphere in which a group of visible stars forms a perceived pattern or outline, typically representing an animal, mythological subject, or inanimate object.
Constraint may refer to:Constraint, a demarcation of geometrical characteristics between two or more entities or solid modeling bodies
Constraint (mathematics), a condition of an optimization problem that the solution must satisfy
Constraint (mechanics), a relation between coordinates and momenta
Constraint
Constraint, the degree of statistical dependence between or among variables
Constraints (journal), a scientific journal
Constraint (database), a concept in relational database.
Continuum may refer to:Continuum (measurement), theories or models that explain gradual transitions from one condition to another without abrupt changes.
Convection is single-phase or multiphase fluid flow that occurs spontaneously through the combined effects of material property heterogeneity and body forces on a fluid. When the cause of the convection is unspecified, convection due to the effects of thermal expansion and gravity/buoyancy can be assumed.
Corrosion is a natural process that converts a refined metal into a more chemically stable oxide. It is the gradual deterioration of materials by chemical or electrochemical reaction with their environment. Corrosion engineering is the field dedicated to controlling and preventing corrosion.
Cortex or cortical may refer to:.
Cosmogony, also spelled as cosmogeny, or cosmogenesis, is any model concerning the origin of the cosmos or the universe.
In physics, cryogenics is the production and behaviour of materials at very low temperatures.
Cryptids are animals or other beings whose present existence is disputed or unsubstantiated by science. Cryptozoology, the study of cryptids, is a pseudoscience claiming that such beings may exist somewhere in the wild; it has been widely critiqued by scientists. The subculture is regularly criticized for reliance on anecdotal information and because in the course of investigating animals that most scientists believe are unlikely to have existed, cryptozoologists do not follow the scientific method. Many scientists have criticized the plausibility of cryptids due to lack of physical evidence, likely misidentifications and misinterpretation of stories from folklore. While biologists regularly identify new species following established scientific methodology, cryptozoologists focus on entities mentioned in the folklore record and rumor.
A crystallite is a small or even microscopic crystal which forms, for example, during the cooling of many materials. Crystallites are also referred to as grains.
The cytoplasm is all the material within a eukaryotic or prokaryotic cell, enclosed by the cell membrane, including the organelles and excluding the nucleus in eukaryotic cells. The material inside the nucleus of a eukaryotic cell and contained within the nuclear membrane is termed the nucleoplasm. The main components of the cytoplasm are the cytosol, the cell's internal sub-structures, and various cytoplasmic inclusions. The cytoplasm is about 80% water and is usually colorless.
Darkness is the condition resulting from a lack of illumination, or an absence of visible light.
In computing, dataflow is a broad concept, which has various meanings depending on the application and context. In the context of software architecture, data flow relates to stream processing or reactive programming.
Decay may refer to:.
Decomposition is the process by which dead organic substances are broken down into simpler organic or inorganic matter such as carbon dioxide, water, simple sugars and mineral salts. The process is a part of the nutrient cycle and is essential for recycling the finite matter that occupies physical space in the biosphere. Bodies of living organisms begin to decompose shortly after death. Although no two organisms decompose in the same way, they all undergo the same sequential stages of decomposition. Decomposition can be a gradual process for organisms that have extended periods of dormancy.
Deduction may refer to:.
Deforestation or forest clearance is the removal and destruction of a forest or stand of trees from land that is then converted to non-forest use. Deforestation can involve conversion of forest land to farms, ranches, or urban use. About 31% of Earth's land surface is covered by forests at present. This is one-third less than the forest cover before the expansion of agriculture, with half of that loss occurring in the last century. On average 2,400 trees are cut down each minute. Estimates vary widely as to the extent of deforestation in the tropics. In 2019, nearly a third of the overall tree cover loss, or 3.8 million hectares, occurred within humid tropical primary forests. These are areas of mature rainforest that are especially important for biodiversity and carbon storage.
A deity or god is a supernatural being considered to be sacred and worthy of worship due to having authority over some aspect of the universe and/or life. The Oxford Dictionary of English defines deity as a god or goddess, or anything revered as divine. C. Scott Littleton defines a deity as "a being with powers greater than those of ordinary humans, but who interacts with humans, positively or negatively, in ways that carry humans to new levels of consciousness, beyond the grounded preoccupations of ordinary life".
Demography is the statistical study of human populations: their size, composition, and how they change through the interplay of fertility (births), mortality (deaths), and migration.
A fraction represents a part of a whole or, more generally, any number of equal parts. When spoken in everyday English, a fraction describes how many parts of a certain size there are, for example, one-half, eight-fifths, three-quarters. A common, vulgar, or simple fraction consists of an integer numerator, displayed above a line, and a non-zero integer denominator, displayed below that line. If these integers are positive, then the numerator represents a number of equal parts, and the denominator indicates how many of those parts make up a unit or a whole. For example, in the fraction ⁠3/4⁠, the numerator 3 indicates that the fraction represents 3 equal parts, and the denominator 4 indicates that 4 parts make up a whole. The picture to the right illustrates ⁠3/4⁠ of a cake.
Density is the ratio of a substance's mass to its volume. The symbol most often used for density is ρ, although the Latin letter D can also be used:

where ρ is the density, m is the mass, and V is the volume. In some cases, density is loosely defined as its weight per unit volume, although this is scientifically inaccurate – this quantity is more specifically called specific weight.
Dentition pertains to the development of teeth and their arrangement in the mouth. In particular, it is the characteristic arrangement, type, and number of teeth in a given species at a given age, as well as the morpho-physiology of the animal's teeth.
Deposition may refer to:Deposition (law), taking testimony outside of court
Deposition (politics), the removal of a person of authority from political power
Deposition (university), a widespread initiation ritual for new students practiced from the Middle Ages until the 18th century.
In mathematics, the derivative is a fundamental tool that quantifies the sensitivity to change of a function's output with respect to its input. The derivative of a function of a single variable at a chosen input value, when it exists, is the slope of the tangent line to the graph of the function at that point. The tangent line is the best linear approximation of the function near that input value. The derivative is often described as the instantaneous rate of change, the ratio of the instantaneous change in the dependent variable to that of the independent variable. The process of finding a derivative is called differentiation.
Desalination is the artificial process by which salt water is converted to fresh water.
More generally, desalination is the removal of salts and minerals from a substance.
It is possible to desalinate saltwater, especially sea water, to produce water for human consumption or irrigation, producing brine as a by-product.
Desertification is a type of gradual land degradation of fertile land into arid desert due to a combination of natural processes and human activities.
Determinism is the metaphysical view that all events within the universe can occur only in one possible way. Deterministic theories throughout the history of philosophy have developed from diverse and sometimes overlapping motives and considerations. Like eternalism, determinism focuses on particular events rather than the future as a concept. Determinism is often contrasted with free will, although some philosophers argue that the two are compatible. The antonym of determinism is indeterminism, the view that events are not deterministically caused.
Deviation may refer to:.
A dialect is a variety of language spoken by a particular group of people. This may include dominant and standardized varieties as well as vernacular, unwritten, or non-standardized varieties, such as those used in developing countries or isolated areas. The dialects of the same language are mainly distinguished from each other by differences in linguistic features such as phonology, morphology, syntax and vocabulary.
Diffraction is the deviation of waves from straight-line propagation without any change in their energy due to an obstacle or through an aperture. Diffraction is the same physical effect as interference, but interference is typically applied to superposition of a few waves and the term diffraction is used when many waves are superposed. The term diffraction pattern is used to refer to an image or map of the different directions of the waves after they have been diffracted.
Diffusion is the net movement of anything generally from a region of higher concentration to a region of lower concentration. Diffusion is driven by a gradient in Gibbs free energy or chemical potential. It is possible to diffuse "uphill" from a region of lower concentration to a region of higher concentration, as in spinodal decomposition. Diffusion is a stochastic process due to the inherent randomness of the diffusing entity and can be used to model many real-life stochastic scenarios. Therefore, diffusion and the corresponding mathematical models are used in several fields beyond physics, such as statistics, probability theory, information theory, neural networks, finance, and marketing.
Digestion is the breakdown of large insoluble food compounds into small water-soluble components so that they can be absorbed into the blood plasma. In certain organisms, these smaller substances are absorbed through the small intestine into the blood stream. Digestion is a form of catabolism that is often divided into two processes based on how food is broken down: mechanical and chemical digestion. The term mechanical digestion refers to the physical breakdown of large pieces of food into smaller pieces which can subsequently be accessed by digestive enzymes. Mechanical digestion takes place in the mouth through mastication and in the small intestine through segmentation contractions. In chemical digestion, enzymes break down food into the small compounds that the body can use.
Dinosaurs are a diverse group of reptiles of the clade Dinosauria. They first appeared during the Triassic period, between 243 and 233.23 million years ago (mya), although the exact origin and timing of the evolution of dinosaurs is a subject of active research. They became the dominant terrestrial vertebrates after the Triassic–Jurassic extinction event 201.3 mya and their dominance continued throughout the Jurassic and Cretaceous periods. The fossil record shows that birds are feathered dinosaurs, having evolved from earlier theropods during the Late Jurassic epoch, and are the only dinosaur lineage known to have survived the Cretaceous–Paleogene extinction event approximately 66 mya. Dinosaurs can therefore be divided into avian dinosaurs—birds—and the extinct non-avian dinosaurs, which are all dinosaurs other than birds.
Diplomacy is the communication by representatives of state, intergovernmental, or non-governmental institutions intended to influence events in the international system.
Discourse is a generalization of the notion of a conversation to any form of communication. Discourse is a major topic in social theory, with work spanning fields such as sociology, anthropology, continental philosophy, and discourse analysis. Following work by Michel Foucault, these fields view discourse as a system of thought, knowledge, or communication that constructs our world experience. Since control of discourse amounts to control of how the world is perceived, social theory often studies discourse as a window into power. Within theoretical linguistics, discourse is understood more narrowly as linguistic information exchange and was one of the major motivations for the framework of dynamic semantics. In these expressions, denotations are equated with their ability to update a discourse context.
Displacement may refer to:.
Diversity, diversify, or diverse may refer to:.
Dopamine is a neuromodulatory molecule that plays several important roles in cells. It is an organic chemical of the catecholamine and phenethylamine families. It is an amine synthesized by removing a carboxyl group from a molecule of its precursor chemical, L-DOPA, which is synthesized in the brain and kidneys. Dopamine is also synthesized in plants and most animals. In the brain, dopamine functions as a neurotransmitter—a chemical released by neurons to send signals to other nerve cells. The brain includes several distinct dopamine pathways, one of which plays a major role in the motivational component of reward-motivated behavior. The anticipation of most types of rewards increases the level of dopamine in the brain, and many addictive drugs increase dopamine release or block its reuptake into neurons following release. Other brain dopamine pathways are involved in motor control and in controlling the release of various hormones. These pathways and cell groups form a dopamine system which is neuromodulatory.
A drought is a period of drier-than-normal conditions. A drought can last for days, months or years. Drought often has large impacts on the ecosystems and agriculture of affected regions, and causes harm to the local economy. Annual dry seasons in the tropics significantly increase the chances of a drought developing, with subsequent increased wildfire risks. Heat waves can significantly worsen drought conditions by increasing evapotranspiration. This dries out forests and other vegetation, and increases the amount of fuel for wildfires.
Ductility is the ability of a material to sustain significant plastic deformation before fracture when undergoing tension, i.e. when the relevant elastic modulus is Young's; the equivalent for deforming under bulk compression, i.e. when using the bulk modulus, is malleability. Historically, materials were considered malleable if they were amenable to forming by hammering or rolling. Lead is an example of a material which is substantially more malleable than ductile. Plastic deformation is the permanent distortion of a material under applied stress, as opposed to elastic deformation, which is reversible upon removing the stress. Ductility is a critical mechanical performance indicator, particularly in applications that require materials to bend, stretch, or deform in other ways without breaking. The extent of ductility can be quantitatively assessed using the percent elongation at break, given by the equation:.
Dynamics or dynamic may refer to:.
An ecosystem is a system formed by organisms in interaction with their environment. The biotic and abiotic components are linked together through nutrient cycles and energy flows.
Eddy may refer to:Eddy (surname), surname used by descendants of a number of English, Irish and Scottish families
Eddy, male given name
Eddy, the swirling of a fluid and the reverse current created when the fluid flows past an obstacle
Eddy current, in electromagnetism, loops of electric current induced within conductors by a changing magnetic field.
Eddy current brake, a device used to slow or stop a moving object by generating eddy currents and thus dissipating its kinetic energy as heat.
Eddy (film), a 2015 Italian film
Eddy & The Soul Band, a 1980s Dutch disco group
Eddy, a character on Ed, Edd n Eddy
Eddy covariance, a statistical method used in meteorology
Eddy Test, administered by the US Navy and Marine Corps during and after World War II
Eddy-class tanker, a former British Royal Fleet Auxiliary class.
Egalitarianism is a school of thought within political philosophy that builds on the concept of social equality, prioritizing it for all people. Egalitarian doctrines are generally characterized by the idea that all humans are equal in fundamental worth or moral status. As such, all people should be accorded equal rights and treatment under the law. Egalitarian doctrines have been important in many modern political philosophies and social movements, including the Enlightenment, classical liberalism, libertarianism, feminism, civil rights, and international human rights. Egalitarianism is a major principle of both classical liberalism with its equality of rights, and redistributive left-wing politics with its stress on equality of outcome.
Elasticity often refers to:Elasticity (physics), continuum mechanics of bodies that deform reversibly under stress.
An electrode is an electrical conductor used to make contact with a nonmetallic part of a circuit. In electrochemical cells, electrodes are essential parts that can consist of a variety of materials (chemicals) depending on the type of cell. An electrode may be called either a cathode or anode according to the direction of the electric current, unrelated to the potential difference between electrodes.
In chemistry and manufacturing, electrolysis is a technique that uses direct electric current (DC) to drive an otherwise non-spontaneous biological and physical reaction. Electrolysis is commercially important as a stage in the separation of elements from naturally occurring sources such as ores using an electrolytic cell. The voltage that is needed for electrolysis to occur is called the decomposition potential. The word "lysis" means to separate or break, so in terms, electrolysis would mean "breakdown via electricity.".
An elemental is a mythic supernatural being that is described in occult and alchemical works from around the time of the European Renaissance, and particularly elaborated in the 16th century works of Paracelsus. According to Paracelsus and his subsequent followers, there are four categories of elementals, which are gnomes, undines, sylphs, and salamanders. These correspond to the four Empedoclean elements of antiquity: earth, water, air, and fire, respectively. Terms employed for beings associated with alchemical elements vary by source and gloss.
The elevation of a geographic location is its height above or below a fixed reference point, most commonly a reference geoid, a mathematical model of the Earth's sea level as an equipotential gravitational surface .
The term elevation is mainly used when referring to points on the Earth's surface, while altitude or geopotential height is used for points above the surface, such as an aircraft in flight or a spacecraft in orbit, and depth is used for points below the surface.
Elimination may refer to:.
An emulsion is a mixture of two or more liquids that are normally immiscible owing to liquid-liquid phase separation. Emulsions are part of a more general class of two-phase systems of matter called colloids. Although the terms colloid and emulsion are sometimes used interchangeably, emulsion more narrowly refers to when both phases, dispersed and continuous, are liquids. In an emulsion, one liquid is dispersed in the other. Examples of emulsions include vinaigrettes, homogenized milk, liquid biomolecular condensates, and some cutting fluids for metal working.
The endocrine system is a messenger system in an organism comprising feedback loops of hormones that are released by internal glands directly into the circulatory system and that target and regulate distant organs. In vertebrates, the hypothalamus is the neural control center for all endocrine systems.
An endoskeleton is a structural frame (skeleton) — usually composed of mineralized tissue — on the inside of an animal, overlaid by soft tissues. Endoskeletons serve as structural support against gravity and mechanical loads, and provide anchoring attachment sites for skeletal muscles to transmit force and allow movements and locomotion.
Entropy is a scientific concept, most commonly associated with states of disorder, randomness, or uncertainty. The term and the concept are used in diverse fields, from classical thermodynamics, where it was first recognized, to the microscopic description of nature in statistical physics, and to the principles of information theory. It has found far-ranging applications in chemistry and physics, in biological systems and their relation to life, in cosmology, economics, and information systems including the transmission of information in telecommunication.
An enzyme is a biological macromolecule, usually a protein, that acts as a biological catalyst, accelerating chemical reactions without being consumed in the process. The molecules on which enzymes act are called substrates, which are converted into products. Nearly all metabolic processes within a cell depend on enzyme catalysis to occur at biologically relevant rates. A metabolic pathway is typically composed of a series of enzyme-catalyzed steps. The study of enzymes is known as enzymology, and a related field focuses on pseudoenzymes—proteins that have lost catalytic activity but may retain regulatory or scaffolding functions, often indicated by alterations in their amino acid sequences or unusual 'pseudocatalytic' behavior.
An epidemic is the rapid spread of disease to a large number of hosts in a given population within a short period of time. For example, in meningococcal infections, an attack rate in excess of 15 cases per 100,000 people for two consecutive weeks is considered an epidemic.
Epigenetics is the study of changes in gene expression that occur without altering the DNA sequence. The Greek prefix epi- in epigenetics implies features that are "on top of" or "in addition to" the traditional DNA-sequence-based mechanism of inheritance. Epigenetics usually involves changes that persist through cell division, and affect the regulation of gene expression. Such effects on cellular and physiological traits may result from environmental factors, or be part of normal development.
Equilibrium may refer to:.
Erosion is the action of surface processes that removes soil, rock, or dissolved material from one location on the Earth's crust and then transports it to another location where it is deposited. Erosion is distinct from weathering which involves no movement. Removal of rock or soil as clastic sediment is referred to as physical or mechanical erosion; this contrasts with chemical erosion, where soil or rock material is removed from an area by dissolution. Eroded sediment or solutes may be transported just a few millimetres, or for thousands of kilometres.
An estuary is a partially enclosed coastal body of brackish water where freshwater from rivers or streams meets and mixes with saltwater from the open sea. Estuaries form transition zones between riverine and marine environments and are classified as ecotones, areas where different ecosystems overlap. They are influenced by both marine processes and fluvial processes. The mixing of seawater and freshwater provides high levels of nutrients both in the water column and in sediment, making estuaries among the most productive natural habitats in the world.
Ethnography is a branch of anthropology and the systematic study of individual cultures. It explores cultural phenomena from the point of view of the subject of the study. Ethnography is also a type of social research that involves examining the behavior of the participants in a given social situation and understanding the group members' own interpretation of such behavior.
Etiology is the study of causation or origination. The word is derived from the Greek word αἰτιολογία (aitiología), meaning "giving a reason for". More completely, etiology is the study of the causes, origins, or reasons behind the way that things are, or the way they function, or it can refer to the causes themselves. The word is commonly used in medicine and in philosophy, but also in physics, biology, psychology, political science, geography, cosmology, spatial analysis and theology in reference to the causes or origins of various phenomena.
Evolutionism is a term used to denote the theory of evolution. Its exact meaning has changed over time as the study of evolution has progressed. In the 19th century, it was used to describe the belief that organisms deliberately improved themselves through progressive inherited change (orthogenesis). The teleological belief went on to include cultural evolution and social evolution. In the 1970s, the term "Neo-Evolutionism" was used to describe the idea that "human beings sought to preserve a familiar style of life unless change was forced on them by factors that were beyond their control.".
Excavation may refer to:Archaeological excavation
Excavation (medicine)
Excavation , 2013
Excavation , 2000
Excavation (novel), a 2000 novel by James Rollins
Excavation: A Memoir, a 2014 memoir by Wendy C. Ortiz
Excavation, a 2003 video game by WildTangent.
Excitation, excite, exciting, or excitement may refer to:Excitation (magnetic), provided with an electrical generator or alternator
Exite, a series of racing video games published by Nintendo starting with Excitebike
Excite, web portal owned by IAC
Excite Ballpark, located in San Jose, California
Electron excitation, the transfer of an electron to a higher atomic orbital
More generally, the transfer of energy to a normal mode
Excitement (film), a lost 1924 silent comedy by Robert F. Hill
Sexual excitation
Stimulation or excitation or excitement, the action of various agents on nerves, muscles, or a sensory end organ, by which activity is evoked
"Exciting", a song by Hieroglyphics from the album The Kitchen.
An exoplanet or extrasolar planet is a planet outside of the Solar System. The first confirmed detection of an exoplanet was in 1992 around a pulsar, and the first detection around a main-sequence star was in 1995. A different planet, first detected in 1988, was confirmed in 2003. In 2016, it was recognized that the first possible evidence of an exoplanet had been noted in 1917. As of 26 February 2026, there are 6,128 confirmed exoplanets in 4,560 planetary systems, with 1,038 systems having more than one planet.
Extinction is the termination of a species via the death of its last member. A taxon may become functionally extinct before the death of its last member if it loses the capacity to reproduce and recover. As a species' potential range may be very large, determining this moment is difficult, and is usually done retrospectively. This difficulty leads to phenomena such as Lazarus taxa, where a species presumed extinct abruptly "reappears" after a period of apparent absence.
A famine is a widespread scarcity of food caused by several possible factors, including, but not limited to: war, natural disasters, crop failure, widespread poverty, an economic catastrophe or government policies. This phenomenon is usually accompanied or followed by regional malnutrition, starvation, epidemic, and increased mortality. Every inhabited continent in the world has experienced a period of famine throughout history. During the 19th and 20th centuries, Southeast and South Asia, as well as Eastern and Central Europe, suffered the greatest number of fatalities due to famine. Deaths caused by famine declined sharply beginning in the 1970s, with numbers falling further since 2000. Since 2010, Africa has been the most affected continent in the world by famine. As of 2025, Haiti and Afghanistan are the two countries with the most catastrophic and widespread states of famine, followed by Sudan.
A fandom is a subculture composed of fans characterized by a feeling of camaraderie with others who share a common interest. Fans typically are interested in even minor details of the objects of their fandom and spend a significant portion of their time and energy involved with their interest, often as a part of a social network with particular practices, differentiating fandom-affiliated people from those with only a casual interest.
Fertility in colloquial terms refers the ability to have offspring. In demographic contexts, fertility refers to the actual production of offspring, rather than the physical capability to reproduce, which is termed fecundity. The fertility rate is the average number of children born during an individual's lifetime. In medicine, fertility refers to the ability to have children, and infertility refers to difficulty in reproducing naturally. In general, infertility or subfertility in humans is defined as not being able to conceive a child after one year of unprotected sex. The antithesis of fertility is infertility, while the antithesis of fecundity is sterility.
Fiction is any creative work, chiefly any narrative work, portraying individuals, events, or places that are imaginary or in ways that are imaginary. Fictional portrayals are thus inconsistent with fact, history, or plausibility. In a traditional narrow sense, fiction refers to written narratives in prose – often specifically novels, novellas, and short stories. More broadly, however, fiction encompasses imaginary narratives expressed in any medium, including not just writings but also live theatrical performances, films, television programs, radio dramas, comics, role-playing games, and video games.
Filtration is a physical separation process that separates solid matter and fluid from a mixture using a filter medium that has a complex structure through which only the fluid can pass. Solid particles that cannot pass through the filter medium are described as oversize and the fluid that passes through is called the filtrate. Oversize particles may form a filter cake on top of the filter and may also block the filter lattice, preventing the fluid phase from crossing the filter, known as blinding. The size of the largest particles that can successfully pass through a filter is called the effective pore size of that filter. The separation of solid and fluid is imperfect; solids will be contaminated with some fluid and filtrate will contain fine particles. Filtration occurs both in nature and in engineered systems; there are biological, geological, and industrial forms. In everyday usage the verb "strain" is more often used; for example, using a colander to drain cooking water from cooked pasta.
Fission, a splitting of something into two or more parts, may refer to:.
Flora is all the plant life present in a particular region or time, generally the naturally occurring (indigenous) native plants. The corresponding term for animals is fauna, and for fungi, it is funga. Sometimes bacteria and fungi are also referred to as flora as in the terms gut flora or skin flora for purposes of specificity.
Flotation involves phenomena related to the relative buoyancy of objects.
Flux describes any effect that appears to pass or travel through a surface or substance. Flux is a concept in applied mathematics and vector calculus which has many applications in physics. For transport phenomena, flux is a vector quantity, describing the magnitude and direction of the flow of a substance or property. In vector calculus, flux is a scalar quantity, defined as the surface integral of the perpendicular component of a vector field over a surface.
A leaf is a principal appendage of the stem of a vascular plant, usually borne laterally above ground and specialized for photosynthesis. Leaves are collectively called foliage, as in "autumn foliage", while the leaves, stem, flower, and fruit collectively form the shoot system. In most leaves, the primary photosynthetic tissue is the palisade mesophyll and is located on the upper side of the blade or lamina of the leaf, but in some species, including the mature foliage of Eucalyptus, palisade mesophyll is present on both sides and the leaves are said to be isobilateral. The leaf is an integral part of the stem system, and most leaves are flattened and have distinct upper (adaxial) and lower (abaxial) surfaces that differ in color, hairiness, the number of stomata, the amount and structure of epicuticular wax, and other features. Leaves are mostly green in color due to the presence of a compound called chlorophyll, which is essential for photosynthesis as it absorbs light energy from the Sun. A leaf with lighter-colored or white patches or edges is called a variegated leaf.
Forensic science, often confused with criminalistics, is the application of science principles and methods to support decision-making related to rules or law, generally criminal and civil law.
In speech science and phonetics, a formant is the broad spectral maximum that results from an acoustic resonance of the human vocal tract. In acoustics, a formant is usually defined as a broad peak, or local maximum, in the spectrum. For harmonic sounds, with this definition, the formant frequency is sometimes taken as that of the harmonic that is most augmented by a resonance. The difference between these two definitions resides in whether "formants" characterise the production mechanisms of a sound or the produced sound itself. In practice, the frequency of a spectral peak differs slightly from the associated resonance frequency, except when, by luck, harmonics are aligned with the resonance frequency, or when the sound source is mostly non-harmonic, as in whispering and vocal fry.
Formation may refer to:.
Fracture is the appearance of a crack or complete separation of an object or material into two or more pieces under the action of stress. The fracture of a solid usually occurs due to the development of certain displacement discontinuity surfaces within the solid. If a displacement develops perpendicular to the surface, it is called a normal tensile crack or simply a crack; if a displacement develops tangentially, it is called a shear crack, slip band, or dislocation.
Friction is the force resisting the relative motion of solid surfaces, fluid layers, and material elements sliding or grinding against each other. Types of friction include dry, fluid, lubricated, skin, and internal – an incomplete list. The study of the processes involved is called tribology, and has a history of more than 2,000 years.
Frost is a layer of ice on a solid surface, which forms from water vapor that deposits onto a freezing surface. Frost forms when the air contains more water vapor than it can normally hold at a specific temperature. The process is similar to the formation of dew, except it occurs below the freezing point of water typically without crossing through a liquid state.
In classical music, a fugue is a contrapuntal, polyphonic compositional technique in two or more voices, built on a subject that is introduced at the beginning in imitation, which recurs frequently throughout the course of the composition. It is not to be confused with a fuguing tune, which is a style of song popularized by and mostly limited to early American music and West Gallery music. A fugue usually has three main sections: an exposition, a development, and a final entry that contains the return of the subject in the fugue's tonic key. Fugues can also have episodes, which are parts of the fugue where new material often based on the subject is heard; a stretto, when the fugue's subject overlaps itself in different voices, or a recapitulation. A popular compositional technique in the Baroque era, the fugue was fundamental in showing mastery of harmony and tonality as it presented counterpoint.
A fungus is any member of the group of eukaryotic organisms that includes microorganisms such as yeasts and molds, as well as the more familiar mushrooms. These organisms are classified in the kingdom Fungi.
Fusion, or synthesis, is the process of combining two or more distinct entities into a new whole.
A galaxy is a system of stars, stellar remnants, interstellar gas, dust, and dark matter bound together by gravity. The word is derived from the Greek galaxias (γαλαξίας), meaning 'milky', a reference to the Milky Way galaxy that contains the Solar System. Galaxies, averaging an estimated 100 million stars, range in size from dwarfs with less than a thousand stars to the largest galaxies known—supergiants with one hundred trillion stars, each orbiting its galaxy's center of mass. Most of the mass in a typical galaxy is in the form of dark matter, with only a few percent of that mass visible in the form of stars and nebulae. Supermassive black holes are a common feature at the centers of galaxies.

Gallium is a chemical element; it has symbol Ga and atomic number 31. Discovered by the French chemist Paul-Émile Lecoq de Boisbaudran in Paris, France, 1875,
elemental gallium is a soft, silvery metal at standard temperature and pressure. In its liquid state, it becomes silvery white. If enough force is applied, solid gallium may fracture conchoidally. Since its discovery in 1875, gallium has widely been used to make alloys with low melting points. It is also used in semiconductors, as a dopant in semiconductor substrates.
Gametogenesis is a biological process by which diploid or haploid precursor cells undergo cell division and differentiation to form mature haploid gametes. Depending on the biological life cycle of the organism, gametogenesis occurs by meiotic division of diploid gametocytes into various gametes, or by mitosis. For example, plants produce gametes through mitosis in gametophytes. The gametophytes grow from haploid spores after sporic meiosis. The existence of a multicellular, haploid phase in the life cycle between meiosis and gametogenesis is also referred to as alternation of generations.
A gantry is an overhead bridge-like structure supporting equipment such as a crane, signals, or cameras.
Gasification is a process that converts biomass- or fossil fuel-based carbonaceous materials into gases, including as the largest fractions: dinitrogen (N2), carbon monoxide (CO), dihydrogen (H2), and carbon dioxide (CO2). This is achieved by reacting the feedstock material at high temperatures (typically >700 °C), without combustion, via controlling the amount of oxygen and/or steam present in the reaction. The resulting gas mixture is called syngas (from synthesis gas) or producer gas and is itself a fuel due to the flammability of the H2 and CO of which the gas is largely composed. Power can be derived from the subsequent combustion of the resultant gas, and is considered to be a source of renewable energy if the gasified compounds were obtained from biomass feedstock.
Gastronomy is the study of the relationship between food and culture, the art of preparing and serving rich or delicate and appetizing food, the cooking styles of particular regions, and the science of good eating. One who is well versed in gastronomy is called a gastronome, while a gastronomist is one who unites theory and practice in the study of gastronomy. Practical gastronomy is associated with the practice and study of the preparation, production, and service of the various foods and beverages, from countries around the world. It is related with a system and process approach, focused on recipes, techniques and cookery books. Food gastronomy is connected with food and beverages and their genesis. Technical gastronomy underpins practical gastronomy, introducing a rigorous approach to evaluation of gastronomic topics.
Genealogy is the study of families, family history, and the tracing of their lineages. Genealogists use oral interviews, historical records, genetic analysis, and other records to obtain information about a family and to demonstrate kinship and pedigrees of its members. The results are often displayed in charts or written as narratives. The field of family history is broader than genealogy, and covers not just lineage but also family and community history and biography.
Geodesy or geodetics is the science of measuring and representing the geometry, gravity, and spatial orientation of the Earth in temporally varying 3D space. It is called planetary geodesy when studying other astronomical bodies, such as planets or circumplanetary systems. Geodetic job titles include geodesist and geodetic surveyor.
A geoglyph is a large design or motif – generally longer than 4 metres (13 ft) – produced on the ground by durable elements of the landscape, such as stones, stone fragments, gravel, or earth. A positive geoglyph is formed by the arrangement and alignment of materials on the ground in a manner akin to petroforms, while a negative geoglyph is formed by removing part of the natural ground surface to create differently coloured or textured ground in a manner akin to petroglyphs.
Geography is the study of the lands, features, inhabitants, and phenomena of Earth. Geography is an all-encompassing discipline that seeks an understanding of Earth and its human and natural complexities—not merely where objects are, but also how they have changed and come to be. While geography is specific to Earth, many concepts can be applied more broadly to other celestial bodies in the field of planetary science. Geography has been called "a bridge between natural science and social science disciplines.".
Geology is a branch of natural science concerned with the Earth and other astronomical bodies, the rocks of which they are composed, and the processes by which they change over time. The name comes from Ancient Greek  γῆ (gê) 'earth' and  λoγία (-logía) 'study of, discourse'. Modern geology significantly overlaps all other Earth sciences, including hydrology. It is integrated with Earth system science and planetary science.
Geometry is a branch of mathematics concerned with properties of space such as the distance, shape, size, and relative position of figures. Geometry is, along with arithmetic, one of the oldest branches of mathematics. A mathematician who works in the field of geometry is called a geometer. Until the 19th century, geometry was almost exclusively devoted to Euclidean geometry, which includes the notions of point, line, plane, distance, angle, surface, and curve, as fundamental concepts.
Geophysics is a physical science concerned with the processes and properties of Earth and its surrounding space environment, studied using quantitative and observational methods. It focuses primarily on Earth’s shape and its gravitational, magnetic, and electromagnetic fields. It also studies internal structure, composition, and dynamics, and their surface expression in tectonics, volcanism, and rock formation. Geophysics also encompasses a broader Earth-system and planetary perspective, including the oceans, atmosphere, cryosphere, ionosphere, magnetosphere, as well as solar–terrestrial interactions and analogous processes on the Moon, other planets, and their satellites.
Germination is the process by which an organism grows from a seed or spore. The term is applied to the sprouting of a seedling from a seed of an angiosperm or gymnosperm, the growth of a sporeling from a spore, such as the spores of fungi, ferns, bacteria, and the growth of the pollen tube from the pollen grain of a seed plant.
A geyser is a spring with an intermittent water discharge ejected turbulently and accompanied by steam. The formation of geysers is fairly rare and is caused by particular hydrogeological conditions that exist only in a few places on Earth.
A glacier is a persistent body of dense ice, a form of rock, that is constantly moving downhill under its own weight. A glacier forms where the accumulation of snow exceeds its ablation over many years, often centuries. It acquires distinguishing features, such as crevasses and seracs, as it slowly flows and deforms under stresses induced by its weight. As it moves, it abrades rock and debris from its substrate to create landforms such as cirques, moraines, or fjords. Although a glacier may flow into a body of water, it forms only on land and is distinct from the much thinner sea ice and lake ice that form on the surface of bodies of water.
Globalism has multiple meanings. In political science, it is used to describe "attempts to understand all of the interconnections of the modern world—and to highlight patterns that underlie them". While primarily associated with world-systems, it can be used to describe other global trends. The concept of globalism is also classically used to focus on ideologies of globalisation instead of its processes ; in this sense, "globalism" is to globalisation what "nationalism" is to nationalisation.
A glyph is any kind of purposeful mark. In typography, a glyph is "the specific shape, design, or representation of a character". It is a particular graphical representation, in a particular typeface, of an element of written language.
Granite is a coarse-grained (phaneritic) intrusive igneous rock composed mostly of quartz, alkali feldspar, mica and plagioclase. It forms from magma with a high content of silica and alkali metal oxides that slowly cools and solidifies underground. It is common in the continental crust of Earth, where it is found in igneous intrusions. These range in size from dikes only a few centimeters across to batholiths exposed over hundreds of square kilometers.
In physics, gravity, also known as gravitation or a gravitational interaction, is a fundamental interaction, which may be described as the force that draws material objects towards each other.
A greenhouse is a structure that is designed to regulate the temperature and humidity of the environment inside. There are different types of greenhouses, but they all have large areas covered with transparent materials that let sunlight pass and block it as heat. The most common materials used in modern greenhouses for walls and roofs are rigid plastic made of polycarbonate, plastic film made of polyethylene, or glass panes. When the inside of a greenhouse is exposed to sunlight, the temperature increases, providing a sheltered environment for plants to grow even in cold weather.
In ecology, habitat refers to the array of resources, biotic factors that are present in an area, such as to support the survival and reproduction of a particular species. A species' habitat can be seen as the physical manifestation of its ecological niche. Thus "habitat" is a species-specific term, fundamentally different from concepts such as environment or vegetation assemblages, for which the term "habitat-type" is more appropriate.
The halogens are a group in the periodic table consisting of six chemically related elements: fluorine (F), chlorine (Cl), bromine (Br), iodine (I), and the radioactive elements astatine (At) and tennessine (Ts), though some authors would exclude tennessine as its chemistry is unknown and is theoretically expected to be more like that of gallium. In the modern IUPAC nomenclature, this group is known as group 17.
In music, harmony is the concept of combining different sounds in order to create new, distinct musical ideas. Theories of harmony seek to describe or explain the effects created by distinct pitches or tones coinciding with one another; harmonic objects such as chords, textures and tonalities are identified, defined, and categorized in the development of these theories. Harmony is broadly understood to involve both a "vertical" dimension (frequency-space) and a "horizontal" dimension (time-space), and often overlaps with related musical concepts such as melody, timbre, and form.
Harvesting is the process of collecting plants, animals, or fish as food, especially the process of gathering mature crops, and "the harvest" also refers to the collected crops. Reaping is the cutting of grain or pulses for harvest, typically using a scythe, sickle, or reaper. On smaller farms with minimal mechanization, harvesting is the most labor-intensive activity of the growing season. On large mechanized farms, harvesting uses farm machinery, such as the combine harvester. Automation has increased the efficiency of both the seeding and harvesting processes. Specialized harvesting equipment, using conveyor belts for gentle gripping and mass transport, replaces the manual task of removing each seedling by hand. The term "harvesting" in general usage may include immediate postharvest handling, including cleaning, sorting, packing, and cooling.
Hematology is the branch of medicine concerned with the study of the cause, prognosis, treatment, and prevention of diseases related to blood. It involves treating diseases that affect the production of blood and its components, such as blood cells, hemoglobin, blood proteins, bone marrow, platelets, blood vessels, spleen, and the mechanism of coagulation. Such diseases might include hemophilia, sickle cell anemia, blood clots (thrombus), other bleeding disorders, and blood cancers such as leukemia, multiple myeloma, and lymphoma. The laboratory analysis of blood is frequently performed by a medical technologist or medical laboratory scientist.
A herbivore is an animal anatomically and physiologically evolved to feed on plants, especially upon vascular tissues such as foliage, fruits or seeds, as the main component of its diet. These more broadly also encompass animals that eat non-vascular autotrophs such as mosses, algae and lichens, but do not include those feeding on decomposed plant matters or macrofungi.
A hierarchy is an arrangement of items that are represented as being "above", "below", or "at the same level as" one another. Hierarchy is an important concept in a wide variety of fields, such as architecture, philosophy, design, mathematics, computer science, organizational theory, systems theory, systematic biology, and the social sciences.
Holography is a technique that allows a wavefront to be recorded and later reconstructed. It is best known as a method of generating three-dimensional images, and has a wide range of other uses, including data storage, microscopy, and interferometry. In principle, it is possible to make a hologram for any type of wave.
The Hominidae, whose members are known as the great apes, are a taxonomic family of primates that includes eight extant species in four genera: Pongo ; Gorilla ; Pan ; and Homo, of which only modern humans  remain.
Humidity is the concentration of water vapor present in the air. Water vapor, the gaseous state of water, is generally invisible to the naked eye. Humidity indicates the likelihood for precipitation, dew, or fog to be present.
Hybridization may refer to:Hybridization (biology), the process of combining different varieties of organisms to create a hybrid
Orbital hybridization, in chemistry, the mixing of atomic orbitals into new hybrid orbitals
Nucleic acid hybridization, the process of joining two complementary strands of nucleic acids - RNA, DNA or oligonucleotides
In evolutionary algorithms, the merging two or more optimization techniques into a single algorithm
Memetic algorithm, a common template for hybridization
In linguistics, the process of one variety blending with another variety
The alteration of a vehicle into a hybrid electric vehicle
In globalization theory, the ongoing blending of cultures
Hybridization in political election campaign communication, the combining of campaign techniques developed in different countries
In paleoanthropology, the hypothesis of Neanderthal and human hybridization.
Hydration may refer to:Hydrate, a substance that contains water
Hydration enthalpy, energy released through hydrating a substance
Hydration reaction, a chemical addition reaction where a hydroxyl group and proton are added to a compound
Hydration shell, a type of solvation shell
Hydration system, an apparatus that helps its user drink enough liquid while engaged in physical activity
Hydration pack, a type of hydration system composed of a carry-on pack used for hydration
Mineral hydration, an inorganic chemical reaction where water is added to the crystal structure of a mineral
Drinking in general, including:
Fluid replacement, the medical practice of replenishing bodily fluid
Oral rehydration therapy, hydration as a health treatment
Management of dehydration, medical hydration
Tissue hydration, the supply and retention of adequate water in biological tissues
Water of hydration, water that occurs within crystals
Hydration, the preparation of web page content for user interaction.
Dough hydration, the percentage of water in a dough in relation to the amount of flour.
Hydraulics is a technology and applied science using engineering, chemistry, and other sciences involving the mechanical properties and use of liquids.
In organic chemistry, a hydrocarbon is an organic compound consisting entirely of hydrogen and carbon. Hydrocarbons are examples of group 14 hydrides. Hydrocarbons are generally colourless and hydrophobic; their odor is usually faint, and may be similar to that of gasoline or lighter fluid. They occur in a diverse range of molecular structures and phases: they can be gases, liquids, low melting solids or polymers.
Hydrology is the scientific study of the movement, distribution, and management of water on Earth and other planets, including the water cycle, water resources, and drainage basin sustainability. A practitioner of hydrology is called a hydrologist. Hydrologists are scientists studying earth or environmental science, civil or environmental engineering, and physical geography. Using various analytical methods and scientific techniques, they collect and analyze data to help solve water related problems such as environmental preservation, natural disasters, and water management.
A hypothesis is a proposed explanation for a phenomenon. A scientific hypothesis must be based on observations and make a testable and reproducible prediction about reality, in a process beginning with an educated guess or thought.
If a hypothesis is repeatedly independently demonstrated by experiment to be true, it becomes a scientific theory. In colloquial usage, the words hypothesis and theory are often used interchangeably, but this is incorrect in the context of science.
An iceberg is a piece of fresh water ice more than 15 meters long that has broken off a glacier or an ice shelf and is floating freely in open water. Smaller chunks of floating glacially derived ice are called "growlers" or "bergy bits". Much of an iceberg is below the water's surface, which led to the expression "tip of the iceberg" to illustrate a small part of a larger unseen issue. Icebergs are considered a serious maritime hazard.
Iconography, as a branch of art history, studies the identification, description and interpretation of the content of images: the subjects depicted, the particular compositions and details used to do so, and other elements that are distinct from artistic style. The word iconography comes from the Greek εἰκών ("image") and γράφειν.
An ideology is a set of beliefs or values attributed to a person or group of persons, especially those held for reasons that are not purely about belief in certain knowledge, in which "practical elements are as prominent as theoretical ones". Formerly applied primarily to economic, political, or religious theories and policies, in a tradition going back to Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, more recent use treats the term as mainly condemnatory.
Ignition may refer to:.
Illumination may refer to:.
Imaging is the process of creating visual representations of objects, scenes, or phenomena. The term encompasses both the formation of images through physical processes and the technologies used to capture, store, process, and display them. While traditional imaging relies on visible light, modern imaging systems can visualize information across the electromagnetic spectrum and through other physical phenomena such as sound waves, magnetic fields, and particle emissions, enabling the visualization of subjects invisible to the human eye.
Immigration is the international movement of people to a destination country of which they are not usual residents or where they do not possess nationality in order to settle as permanent residents. Commuters, tourists, and other short-term stays in a destination country do not fall under the definition of immigration or migration; seasonal labour immigration is sometimes included, however.
Immunity may refer to:.
Implosion can refer to:.
The word incubation may refer to:.
Index may refer to:.
Induction or inductive may refer to:.
Inequality may refer to:Inequality (mathematics), a relation between two quantities when they are different.
Economic inequality, difference in economic well-being between population groups
Income inequality, an unequal distribution of income
Wealth inequality, an unequal distribution of wealth
Spatial inequality, the unequal distribution of income and resources across geographical regions
International inequality, economic differences between countries
Social inequality, unequal opportunities and rewards for different social positions or statuses within a group
Gender inequality, unequal treatment or perceptions due to gender
Racial inequality, social distinctions between racial and ethnic groups within a society
Health inequality, differences in the quality of health and healthcare across populations
Educational inequality, the unequal distribution of academic resources
Environmental inequality, unequal environmental harms between different neighborhoods or cities
Urban forest inequity, an unequal distribution of trees
Attention inequality, unequal distribution of attention across users, groups of people, issues in etc. in attention economy
Participation inequality, the phenomenon in which a small percentage of people contributes the majority of information to the total outcome.
Inertia is the natural tendency of objects in motion to stay in motion and objects at rest to stay at rest, unless a force causes its velocity to change. It is one of the fundamental principles in classical physics, and described by Isaac Newton in his first law of motion. It is one of the primary manifestations of mass, one of the core quantitative properties of physical systems. Newton writes:LAW I. Every object perseveres in its state of rest, or of uniform motion in a right line, except insofar as it is compelled to change that state by forces impressed thereon.
Inferences are steps in logical reasoning, moving from premises to logical consequences; etymologically, the word infer means to "carry forward". Inference is theoretically traditionally divided into deduction and induction, a distinction that dates at least to Aristotle. Deduction is inference deriving logical conclusions from premises known or assumed to be true, with the laws of valid inference being studied in logic. Induction is inference from particular evidence to a universal conclusion. A third type of inference is sometimes distinguished, notably by Charles Sanders Peirce, contradistinguishing abduction from induction.
In economics, inflation is an increase in the average price of goods and services in terms of money. This increase is measured using a price index, typically a consumer price index (CPI). When the general price level rises, each unit of currency buys fewer goods and services; consequently, inflation corresponds to a reduction in the purchasing power of money. The opposite of inflation is deflation, a decrease in the general price level of goods and services. The common measure of inflation is the inflation rate, the annualized percentage change in a general price index.
Infrared is electromagnetic radiation (EMR) with wavelengths longer than that of visible light but shorter than microwaves. The infrared spectral band begins with the waves that are just longer than those of red light, so IR is invisible to the human eye. IR is generally understood to include wavelengths from around 780 nm (380 THz) to 1 mm (300 GHz). IR is commonly divided between longer-wavelength thermal IR, emitted from terrestrial sources, and shorter-wavelength IR, or near IR, part of the solar spectrum. Longer IR wavelengths (30–100 μm) are sometimes included as part of the terahertz radiation band. Almost all black-body radiation from objects near room temperature is in the IR band. As a form of EMR, IR carries energy and momentum, exerts radiation pressure, and has properties corresponding to both those of a wave and of a particle, the photon.
In law and conflict of laws, domicile is relevant to an individual's "personal law", which includes the law that governs a person's status and their property. It is independent of a person's nationality. Although a domicile may change from time to time, a person has only one domicile at any point in their life, no matter what their circumstances. Domicile is distinct from habitual residence, where there is less focus on future intent.
Injection or injected may refer to:.
Innovation is the practical implementation of ideas that result in the introduction of new goods or services or improvement in offering goods or services. ISO TC 279 in the standard ISO 56000:2020 defines innovation as "a new or changed entity, realizing or redistributing value". Others have different definitions; a common element in the definitions is a focus on newness, improvement, and spread of ideas or technologies.
Insects are hexapod invertebrates of the class Insecta. They are the largest group within the arthropod phylum. Insects have a chitinous exoskeleton, a three-part body, three pairs of jointed legs, compound eyes, and a pair of antennae. Insects are the most diverse group of animals, with more than a million described species; they represent more than half of all animal species.
Insertion may refer to:Insertion (anatomy), the point of a tendon or ligament onto the skeleton or other part of the body
Insertion (genetics), the addition of DNA into a genetic sequence
Insertion, several meanings in medicine, see ICD-10-PCS
Insertion loss, in electronics
Insertion reaction, a chemical reaction in which one chemical entity interposes itself into an existing bond of a second chemical entity
Insertion sort, a simple computer algorithm for sorting arrays
Local insertion, in broadcasting
Insertion of a character in a string, one of the single-character edits used to define the Levenshtein distance.
Insomnia, also known as sleeplessness, is a sleep disorder causing difficulty falling asleep or staying asleep for as long as desired. Insomnia is typically followed by daytime sleepiness, low energy, irritability, and a depressed mood. It may result in an increased risk of accidents as well as problems focusing and learning. Insomnia can be short-term, lasting for days or weeks, or long-term, lasting more than a month. The concept of the word insomnia has two distinct possibilities: insomnia disorder or insomnia symptoms.
An inspection is, most generally, an organized examination or formal evaluation exercise. In engineering activities inspection involves the measurements, tests, and gauges applied to certain characteristics in regard to an object or activity. The results are usually compared to specified requirements and standards for determining whether the item or activity is in line with these targets, often with a Standard Inspection Procedure in place to ensure consistent checking. Inspections are usually non-destructive.
In dynamical systems instability means that some of the outputs or internal states increase with time, without bounds. Not all systems that are not stable are unstable; systems can also be marginally stable or exhibit limit cycle behavior.
Instrumentation is a collective term for measuring instruments, used for indicating, measuring, and recording physical quantities. It is also a field of study about the art and science about making measurement instruments, involving the related areas of metrology, automation, and control theory. The term has its origins in the art and science of scientific instrument-making.
Insulation may refer to:.
Intensity may refer to:.
Interaction is action that occurs between two or more entities, generally used in philosophy and the sciences. It may refer to:.
Interface or interfacing may refer to:.
Interference is the act of interfering, invading, or poaching. Interference may also refer to:.
The intertidal zone or foreshore is the area above water level at low tide and underwater at high tide; in other words, it is the part of the littoral zone within the tidal range. This area can include several types of habitats with various species of life, such as sea stars, sea urchins, and many species of coral with regional differences in biodiversity. Sometimes it is referred to as the littoral zone or seashore, although those can be defined as a wider region.
Inversion or inversions may refer to:.
Ionization or ionisation is the process by which an atom or a molecule acquires a negative or positive charge by gaining or losing electrons, often in conjunction with other chemical changes. The resulting electrically charged atom or molecule is called an ion. Ionization can result from the loss of an electron after collisions with subatomic particles, collisions with other atoms, molecules, electrons, positrons, protons, antiprotons, and ions, or through the interaction with electromagnetic radiation. Heterolytic bond cleavage and heterolytic substitution reactions can result in the formation of ion pairs. Ionization can occur through radioactive decay by the internal conversion process, in which an excited nucleus transfers its energy to one of the inner-shell electrons causing it to be ejected.

Irradiation is the process by which an object is exposed to radiation. An irradiator is a device used to expose an object to radiation, most often gamma radiation, for a variety of purposes. Irradiators may be used for sterilizing medical and pharmaceutical supplies, preserving foodstuffs, alteration of gemstone colors, studying radiation effects, eradicating insects through sterile male release programs, or calibrating thermoluminescent dosimeters (TLDs).
Irrigation is the practice of applying controlled amounts of water to land to help grow crops, landscape plants, and lawns. Irrigation has been a key aspect of agriculture for over 5,000 years and has been developed by many cultures around the world. Irrigation helps to grow crops, maintain landscapes, and revegetate disturbed soils in dry areas and during times of below-average rainfall. In addition to these uses, irrigation is also employed to protect crops from frost, suppress weed growth in grain fields, and prevent soil consolidation. It is also used to cool livestock, reduce dust, dispose of sewage, and support mining operations. Drainage, which involves the removal of surface and sub-surface water from a given location, is often studied in conjunction with irrigation.
Isobar may refer to:Isobar (meteorology), a line on a map or chart connecting points of equal atmospheric pressure reduced to sea level.
Isobaric process, a process taking place at constant pressure
Isobar (nuclide), one of multiple nuclides with the same mass but with different numbers of protons.
Isotopes are distinct nuclear species of the same chemical element. They have the same atomic number and position in the periodic table, but different nucleon numbers due to different numbers of neutrons in their nuclei. While all isotopes of a given element have virtually the same chemical properties, they have different atomic masses and physical properties.
Iteration means repeating a process to generate a sequence of outcomes. Each repetition of the process is a single iteration, and the outcome of each iteration is the starting point of the next iteration.
Jet streams are fast flowing, narrow air currents in the atmosphere. The main terrestrial jet streams are located near the altitude of the tropopause and are westerly winds, flowing west to east around the globe. The Northern Hemisphere and the Southern Hemisphere each have a polar jet around their respective polar vortex at around 30,000 ft above sea level and typically travelling at around 110 mph (180 km/h) although often considerably faster. Closer to the equator, somewhat higher and somewhat weaker, is a subtropical jet.
Jurisdiction is the legal term for the legal authority held by a legal entity to enact justice. Jurisdiction is rarely claimed to be complete: rather it is limited for example by geography, subject matter, or other factor. It is only within the scope of such jurisdiction that, for example, the parties to a dispute have standing to bring the matter before a judge, who has power to decide it authoritatively.
A karyotype is the general appearance of the complete set of chromosomes in the cells of a species or in an individual organism, mainly including their sizes, numbers, and shapes. Karyotyping is the process by which a karyotype is discerned by determining the chromosome complement of an individual, including the number of chromosomes and any abnormalities.
Kinetics may refer to:.
In Greek mythology, the Labyrinth is an elaborate, confusing structure designed and built by the mythological artificer Daedalus for King Minos of Crete at Knossos. Its function was to hold the Minotaur, the monster eventually killed by the hero Theseus. Daedalus had so cunningly made the Labyrinth that he could barely escape it after he built it.
Lactation describes the secretion of milk from the mammary glands in addition to the period of time that a parent lactates to feed her young. The process can occur with all sexually mature female mammals, although it may predate mammals. The process of feeding milk in all female creatures is called nursing, and in humans it is also called breastfeeding. Newborn infants often produce some milk from their own breast tissue, known colloquially as witch's milk.
Lamination is the technique/process of manufacturing a material in multiple layers, so that the composite material achieves improved strength, stability, sound insulation, appearance, or other properties from the use of the differing materials, such as plastic. A laminate is a layered object or material assembled using heat, pressure, welding, or adhesives. Various coating machines, machine presses and calendering equipment are used.
A landscape is the visible features of an area of land, its landforms, and how they integrate with natural or human-made features, often considered in terms of their aesthetic appeal. A landscape includes the physical elements of geophysically defined landforms such as mountains, hills, water bodies such as rivers, lakes, ponds and the sea, living elements of land cover including indigenous vegetation, human elements including different forms of land use, buildings, and structures, and transitory elements such as lighting and weather conditions. Combining both their physical origins and the cultural overlay of human presence, often created over millennia, landscapes reflect a living synthesis of people and place that is vital to local and national identity.
Landslides, also known as landslips, rockslips or rockslides, are several forms of mass wasting that may include a wide range of ground movements, such as rockfalls, mudflows, shallow or deep-seated slope failures and debris flows. Landslides occur in a variety of environments, characterized by either steep or gentle slope gradients, from mountain ranges to coastal cliffs or even underwater, in which case they are called submarine landslides.
Language is a structured system of communication that consists of grammar and vocabulary. It is the primary means by which humans convey meaning, both in spoken and signed forms, and may also be conveyed through writing. Human language is characterized by its cultural and historical diversity, with significant variations observed between cultures and across time. Human languages possess the properties of productivity and displacement, which enable the creation of an infinite number of sentences, and the ability to refer to objects, events, and ideas that are not immediately present in the discourse. The use of human language relies on social convention and is acquired through learning.
Lattice may refer to:.
In geography, latitude is a geographic coordinate that specifies the north-south position of a point on the surface of the Earth or another celestial body. Latitude is given as an angle that ranges from −90° at the south pole to 90° at the north pole, with 0° at the Equator. Lines of constant latitude, or parallels, run east-west as circles parallel to the equator. Latitude and longitude are used together as a coordinate pair to specify a location on the surface of the Earth.
Lava is molten or partially molten rock (magma) that has been expelled from the interior of a terrestrial planet or a moon onto its surface. Lava may be erupted at a volcano or through a fracture in the crust, on land or underwater, usually at temperatures from 800 to 1,200 °C. Lava may be erupted directly onto the land surface or onto the sea floor or it may be ejected into the atmosphere before falling back down. The solid volcanic rock resulting from subsequent cooling of the molten material is often also called lava.
Layering can refer to:Layering (horticulture), a means of vegetative propagation
Layering (finance), a strategy in high frequency trading
Layering (linguistics), a principle by which grammaticalisation can be detected
Surface layering, a quasi-crystalline structure at the surfaces of liquids
Layering, a compositional technique in photography
Layering, the use of abstraction layers in software and communication protocol design
Layering, a step in the process of money laundering
Layering, wearing layers of lightweight garments for warmth, known as layered clothing.
Leadership, is defined as the ability of an individual, group, or organization to influence, or guide other individuals, teams, or organizations.
Legislation is the process or result of enrolling, enacting, or promulgating laws by a legislature, parliament, or analogous governing body. Before an item of legislation becomes law it may be known as a bill, and may be broadly referred to as "legislation" while it remains under consideration to distinguish it from other business. Legislation can have many purposes: to regulate, to authorize, to outlaw, to provide (funds), to sanction, to grant, to declare, or to restrict. It may be contrasted with a non-legislative act by an executive or administrative body under the authority of a legislative act.
Lenticular is an adjective often relating to lenses. It may refer to:A term used with two meanings in botany: see Glossary of botanical terms § lenticular
Lenticular cloud, a lens-shaped cloud
Lenticular galaxy, a lens-shaped galaxy
Lenticular (geology), adjective describing a formation with a lens-shaped cross-section
Lenticular nucleus, a lens-shaped nucleus in the brain
Lenticular lens, a technology for making moving or 3D images
Lenticular printing, a technology in which lenticular lenses are used in printing specifically
Lenticular truss bridges, a bridge with a lens-shape truss

.
Lepidoptera or lepidopterans are an order of winged insects which include butterflies and moths. About 180,000 species of the Lepidoptera have been described, representing 10% of the total described species of living organisms, making it the second largest insect order with 126 families and 46 superfamilies, and one of the most widespread and widely recognizable insect orders in the world.
A lexicon is the vocabulary of a language or branch of knowledge. In linguistics, a lexicon is a language's inventory of lexemes. The word lexicon derives from Greek word λεξικόν, neuter of λεξικός meaning 'of or for words'.
In lunar astronomy, libration is the cyclic variation in the apparent position of the Moon that is perceived by observers on the Earth and caused by changes between the orbital and rotational planes of the moon. It causes an observer to see slightly different hemispheres of the surface at different times. It is similar in both cause and effect to the changes in the Moon's apparent size because of changes in distance. It is caused by three mechanisms detailed below, two of which cause a relatively tiny physical libration via tidal forces exerted by the Earth. Such true librations are known as well for other moons with locked rotation.
A lichen is a hybrid colony of algae or cyanobacteria living symbiotically among filaments of multiple fungus species, along with bacteria embedded in the cortex or "skin", in a mutualistic relationship. Lichens are the lifeform that first brought the term symbiosis into biological context.
Lifespan or life span may refer to:Lifespan (film), 1976 film starring Klaus Kinski
Lifespan , 1983 Atari 8-bit computer game
Lifespan (album), 2004 album by Kris Davis
Lifespan: Why We Age – and Why We Don't Have To, 2019 book by David Andrew Sinclair
Lifespan.io, non-profit crowdfunding platform of the Lifespan Extension Advocacy Foundation
Lifespan — former name of Brown University Health, a not-for-profit academic health system in Providence, Rhode Island.
A ligament is a type of fibrous connective tissue in the body that connects bones to other bones. It also connects flight feathers to bones, in dinosaurs and birds. All 30,000 species of amniotes have ligaments.
Lignite, often called brown coal, is a soft, brown, combustible sedimentary rock formed from naturally compressed peat. It has a carbon content around 25–35% and is considered the lowest rank of coal due to its relatively low heat content. When removed from the ground, it contains a very high amount of moisture, which partially explains its low carbon content. Lignite is mined all around the world and is used almost exclusively as a fuel for steam-electric power generation.
Limnology is the study of inland aquatic ecosystems. Pronounced, the name comes from Ancient Greek  λίμνη (límnē) 'lake' and  -λογία (-logía) 'study of'. It includes aspects of the biological, chemical, physical, and geological characteristics of fresh and saline, natural and man-made bodies of water. This includes the study of lakes, reservoirs, ponds, rivers, springs, streams, wetlands, and groundwater. Water systems are often categorized as either running (lotic) or standing (lentic).
Linguistics is the scientific study of language. The areas of linguistic analysis are syntax, semantics (meaning), morphology, phonetics, phonology, and pragmatics. Subdisciplines such as biolinguistics and psycholinguistics bridge many of these divisions.
A lithosphere is the rigid outermost rocky shell of a terrestrial planet or natural satellite. On Earth, it is composed of the crust and the lithospheric mantle, the topmost portion of the upper mantle that behaves elastically on time scales of up to thousands of years or more. The crust and upper mantle are distinguished on the basis of chemistry and mineralogy.
Longitude is a geographic coordinate that specifies the east-west position of a point on the surface of the Earth, or another celestial body. It is an angular measurement, usually expressed in degrees and denoted by the Greek letter lambda (λ). Meridians are imaginary semicircular lines running from pole to pole that connect points with the same longitude. The prime meridian defines 0° longitude; by convention the International Reference Meridian for the Earth passes near the Royal Observatory in Greenwich, south-east London on the island of Great Britain. Positive longitudes are east of the prime meridian, and negative ones are west.
Luminosity is an absolute measure of radiated electromagnetic energy per unit time, and is synonymous with the radiant power emitted by a light-emitting object. In astronomy, luminosity is the total amount of electromagnetic energy emitted per unit of time by a star, galaxy, or other astronomical objects.
A lymphocyte is a type of white blood cell (leukocyte) in the immune system of most vertebrates. Lymphocytes include T cells, B cells, and innate lymphoid cells, of which natural killer cells are an important subtype. They are the main type of cell found in lymph, which prompted the name "lymphocyte". Lymphocytes make up between 18% and 42% of circulating white blood cells.
The Fauna is the whole of animal life present in a particular region or time. The corresponding terms for plants and fungi are flora and funga, respectively. Flora, fauna, funga and other forms of life are collectively referred to as biota. Zoologists and paleontologists use fauna to refer to a typical collection of animals found in a specific time or place, e.g. the "Sonoran Desert fauna" or the "Burgess Shale fauna". Paleontologists sometimes refer to a sequence of faunal stages, which is a series of rocks all containing similar fossils. The study of animals of a particular region is called faunistics.
Magnetism is the class of physical attributes that occur through a magnetic field, which allows objects to attract or repel each other. Because both electric currents and magnetic moments of elementary particles give rise to a magnetic field, magnetism is one of two aspects of electromagnetism.
Magnitude may refer to:.
A mammal is a vertebrate animal of the class Mammalia. Mammals are characterised by the presence of milk-producing mammary glands for feeding their young, a broad neocortex region of the brain, fur or hair, and three middle ear bones. These characteristics distinguish them from reptiles and birds, from which their ancestors diverged in the Carboniferous Period over 300 million years ago. Around 6,640 extant species of mammals have been described and divided into 27 orders. The study of mammals is called mammalogy.
In mathematics, a manifold is a topological space that locally resembles Euclidean space near each point. More precisely, an -dimensional manifold, or -manifold for short, is a topological space with the property that each point has a neighborhood that is homeomorphic to an open subset of -dimensional Euclidean space.
A manuscript was, traditionally, any document written by hand or typewritten, as opposed to mechanically printed or reproduced in some indirect or automated way. More recently, the term has come to be understood to further include any written, typed, or word-processed copy of an author's work, as distinguished from the rendition as a printed version of the same.
Maritime may refer to:.
A massacre is an event of killing defenseless human beings or other animals. It is generally used to describe a targeted mass killing of civilians by an armed group. It can also be used figuratively to refer to a one-sided exchange between armed groups. The word is a loan of a French term for "butchery" or "carnage". Other terms with overlapping scope include war crime, pogrom, mass killing, mass murder, and extrajudicial killing.
In philosophy and metaphysics, materialism is a form of monism holding that matter is the fundamental substance of nature, so that all things, including mind and consciousness, arise from material interactions and depend on physical processes, including those of the human brain and nervous system. It contrasts with monistic idealism, which treats consciousness as fundamental, and is related to naturalism, the view that only natural laws and forces operate in the universe, and to physicalism, the view that all that exists is ultimately physical. Physicalism extends materialism by including forms of physicality beyond ordinary matter, and some use the terms interchangeably.
Mechanism may refer to:Mechanism (economics), a set of rules for a game designed to achieve a certain outcome
Mechanism design, the study of such mechanisms
Mechanism (engineering), rigid bodies connected by joints in order to accomplish a desired force and/or motion transmission
Mechanism (biology), explaining how a feature is created
Mechanism (philosophy), a theory that all natural phenomena can be explained by physical causes
Mechanism (sociology), a theory that all social phenomena can be explained by the existence of a deterministic mechanism.
A megalith is a large stone that has been used to construct a prehistoric structure or monument, either alone or together with other stones. More than 35,000 megalithic structures have been identified across Europe, ranging geographically from Sweden in the north to the Mediterranean Sea in the south.
Melanin is a family of biomolecules organized as oligomers or polymers, which among other functions provide the pigments of many organisms. Melanin pigments are produced in a specialized group of cells known as melanocytes.
A membrane is a selective barrier; it allows some things to pass through but stops others. Such things may be molecules, ions, or other small particles. Membranes can be generally classified into synthetic membranes and biological membranes. Biological membranes include cell membranes ; nuclear membranes, which cover a cell nucleus; and tissue membranes, such as mucosae and serosae. Synthetic membranes are made by humans for use in laboratories and industry.
Metabolism refers to the set of life-sustaining chemical reactions that occur within living organisms. The three main functions of metabolism are the conversion of energy in food into a usable form for cellular processes; the conversion of food to building blocks of macromolecules (biopolymers) such as proteins, lipids, nucleic acids, and some carbohydrates; and the excretion of metabolic wastes. These enzyme-catalyzed reactions allow organisms to grow, reproduce, maintain their structures, and respond to their environments. The word metabolism can also refer to all chemical reactions that occur in living organisms, including digestion and the transportation of substances into and between different cells. In a broader sense, the set of reactions occurring within the cells is called intermediary metabolism.
Metallurgy is a domain of materials science and engineering that studies the physical and chemical behavior of metallic elements, their inter-metallic compounds, and their mixtures, which are known as alloys.
A meteorite is a rock that originated in outer space and has fallen to the surface of a planet or moon. When the original object enters the atmosphere, various factors such as friction, pressure, and chemical interactions with the atmospheric gases cause it to heat up and radiate energy. It then becomes a meteor and forms a fireball, also known as a shooting star; astronomers call the brightest examples "bolides". Once it settles on the larger body's surface, the meteor becomes a meteorite. Meteorites vary greatly in size. For geologists, a bolide is a meteorite large enough to create an impact crater.
Meteorology is the scientific study of the Earth's atmosphere and short-term atmospheric phenomena, with a focus on weather forecasting. It has applications in the military, aviation, energy production, transport, agriculture, construction, weather warnings, and disaster management.
A microorganism, or microbe, is an organism of microscopic size, which may exist in its single-celled form or as a colony of cells. The possible existence of unseen microbial life was suspected from antiquity, with an early attestation in Jain literature authored in 6th-century BC India. The scientific study of microorganisms began with their observation under the microscope in the 1670s by Anton van Leeuwenhoek. In the 1850s, Louis Pasteur found that microorganisms caused food spoilage, debunking the theory of spontaneous generation. In the 1880s, Robert Koch discovered that microorganisms caused the diseases tuberculosis, cholera, diphtheria, and anthrax.
A microclimate refers to localized atmospheric conditions in the near-surface layer, which includes the air immediately above a surface as well as the shallow soil and water environments below it. A microclimate can range in size from a few meters to at most a few kilometers across. It is characterized by a set of persistent, measurable differences in the climate conditions from those in the adjacent surrounding areas. These differences may be subtle or pronounced when evaluated over a diurnal (day-night) or seasonal cycle.
Microfauna are microscopic animals and organisms that exhibit animal-like qualities and have body sizes that are usually <0.1 mm. Microfauna are represented in the animal kingdom and some other heterotrophic, microscopic eukaryotes. A large amount of microfauna are soil microfauna which includes eukaryotic microbes, rotifers, and nematodes. These types of animal-like eukaryotic microbes and true animals are heterotrophic, largely feeding on bacteria. However, some microfauna can consume other things, making them detritivores, fungivores, or even predators.
Weightlessness is the complete or near-complete absence of the sensation of weight, i.e., zero apparent weight. It is also termed zero g-force, or zero-g or, misleadingly, zero gravity.
Microscopy is the technical field of using microscopes to view subjects too small to be seen with the naked eye. There are three well-known branches of microscopy: optical, electron, and scanning probe microscopy, along with the emerging field of X-ray microscopy.
Migration, migratory, or migrate may refer to:.
A militia is a military or paramilitary force that comprises civilian members, as opposed to a professional standing army of regular, full-time military personnel. Militias may be raised in times of need to support regular troops or serve as a pool of available manpower for regular forces to draw from.
Mineralogy is a subject of geology specializing in the scientific study of the chemistry, crystal structure, and physical properties of minerals and mineralized artifacts. Specific studies within mineralogy include the processes of mineral origin and formation, classification of minerals, their geographical distribution, and their utilization.
In visual arts, music, and other media, minimalism is an art movement that emerged in the post-World War II era in Western art. It is often interpreted as a reaction to abstract expressionism and modernism. The movement anticipated various post-minimalist practices in contemporary art that extended or critically reflected on minimalism's original aims. Minimalism emphasized reducing art to its essentials, focusing on the object itself and the viewer's experience with as little mediation from the artist as possible. Prominent artists associated with minimalism include Donald Judd, Agnes Martin, Dan Flavin, Carl Andre, Robert Morris, Anne Truitt, and Frank Stella.
A mirage is a naturally occurring optical phenomenon in which light rays bend via refraction to produce a displaced image of distant objects or the sky. The word comes to English via the French (se) mirer, from the Latin mirari, meaning "to look at, to wonder at".
Mitosis is a part of the cell cycle in eukaryotic cells in which replicated chromosomes are separated into two new nuclei. Cell division by mitosis is an equational division which gives rise to genetically identical cells in which the total number of chromosomes is maintained. Mitosis is preceded by the S phase of interphase and is followed by telophase and cytokinesis, which divide the cytoplasm, organelles, and cell membrane of one cell into two new cells containing roughly equal shares of these cellular components. This process ensures that each daughter cell receives an identical set of chromosomes, maintaining genetic stability across cell generations. The different stages of mitosis altogether define the mitotic phase of a cell cycle—the division of the mother cell into two daughter cells genetically identical to each other.

In chemistry, a mixture is a material made up of two or more different chemical substances which can be separated by physical method. It is an impure substance made up of 2 or more elements or compounds mechanically mixed together in any proportion. A mixture is the physical combination of two or more substances in which the identities are retained and are mixed in the form of solutions, suspensions or colloids.
Signal modulation is the process of varying one or more properties of a periodic waveform in electronics and telecommunication for the purpose of transmitting information.
In Newtonian mechanics, momentum is the product of the mass and velocity of an object. It is a vector quantity, possessing a magnitude and a direction. If m is an object's mass and v is its velocity, then the object's momentum p is:
In the International System of Units (SI), the unit of measurement of momentum is the kilogram metre per second (kg⋅m/s), which is dimensionally equivalent to the newton-second.
A monolith is a geological feature consisting of a single massive stone or rock, such as some mountains. Erosion usually exposes the geological formations, which are often made of very hard and solid igneous or metamorphic rock. Some monoliths are volcanic plugs, solidified lava filling the vent of an extinct volcano.
A monsoon is traditionally a seasonal reversing wind accompanied by corresponding changes in precipitation but is now used to describe seasonal changes in atmospheric circulation and precipitation associated with annual latitudinal oscillation of the Intertropical Convergence Zone (ITCZ) between its limits to the north and south of the equator. Usually, the term monsoon is used to refer to the rainy phase of a seasonally changing pattern, although technically there is also a dry phase. The term is also sometimes used to describe locally heavy but short-term rains.
Morphology, from the Greek and meaning "study of shape", may refer to:.
Mortality may refer to:Fish mortality, a parameter used in fisheries population dynamics to account for the loss of fish in a fish stock through death
Mortality (book), a 2012 collection of essays by Anglo-American writer Christopher Hitchens
Mortality, a property of a Turing machine if it halts when run on any starting configuration
Mortality rate, a measure for the rate at which deaths occur in a given population
Mortality/differential attrition, an error in the internal validity of a scientific study.
Generally, a motif is a recurring element or theme in a work of art or media.
In biology, a mutation is an alteration in the nucleic acid sequence of the genome of an organism, virus, or extrachromosomal DNA. Mutations result from errors during replication, mitosis, meiosis, or damage to DNA, which then may trigger error-prone repair or cause an error during replication. Mutations may also result from substitution, insertion or deletion of segments of DNA due to mobile genetic elements.
Mycology is the branch of biology concerned with the study of fungi, including their taxonomy, genetics, biochemical properties, and use by humans. Fungi can be a source of tinder, food, traditional medicine, as well as entheogens, poison, and infection. Yeasts are among the most heavily utilized members of the fungus kingdom, particularly in food manufacturing.
Myth is a genre of folklore consisting primarily of narratives that play a fundamental role in a society. For scholars, this is totally different from the ordinary sense of the term myth, meaning a belief that is not true, as the veracity of a piece of folklore is entirely irrelevant to determining whether it constitutes a myth.
Nanofibers are fibers with diameters in the nanometer range. Nanofibers can be generated from different polymers and hence have different physical properties and application potentials. Examples of natural polymers include collagen, cellulose, silk fibroin, keratin, gelatin and polysaccharides such as chitosan and alginate. Examples of synthetic polymers include poly(lactic acid) (PLA), polycaprolactone (PCL), polyurethane (PU), poly(lactic-co-glycolic acid) (PLGA), poly(3-hydroxybutyrate-co-3-hydroxyvalerate) (PHBV), and poly(ethylene-co-vinylacetate) (PEVA). Polymer chains are connected via covalent bonds. The diameters of nanofibers depend on the type of polymer used and the method of production. All polymer nanofibers are unique for their large surface area-to-volume ratio, high porosity, appreciable mechanical strength, and flexibility in functionalization compared to their microfiber counterparts.
A nanoparticle or ultrafine particle is a particle of matter 1 to 100 nanometres (nm) in diameter. The term is sometimes used for larger particles, up to 500 nm, or fibers and tubes that are less than 100 nm in only two directions. At the lowest range, metal particles smaller than 1 nm are usually called atom clusters instead.
Nanotechnology is the manipulation of matter with at least one dimension sized from 1 to 100 nanometers (nm). At this scale, commonly known as the nanoscale, surface area and quantum mechanical effects become important in describing properties of matter. This definition of nanotechnology includes all types of research and technologies that deal with these special properties. It is common to see the plural form "nanotechnologies" as well as "nanoscale technologies" to refer to research and applications whose common trait is scale. An earlier understanding of nanotechnology referred to the particular technological goal of precisely manipulating atoms and molecules for fabricating macroscale products, now referred to as molecular nanotechnology.
A narrative, story, or tale is any account of a series of related events or experiences, whether non-fictional or fictional. Narratives can be presented through a sequence of written or spoken words, through still or moving images, or through any combination of these.
Nationalism is an ideology or movement that holds that the nation should be congruent with the state. As a movement, it presupposes the existence and tends to promote the interests of a particular nation, especially with the aim of gaining and maintaining its sovereignty (self-determination) over its perceived homeland to create a nation-state. It holds that the nation should govern itself, free from outside interference (self-governance), that a nation is a natural and ideal basis for a polity, and that the nation is the only rightful source of political power. It further aims to build, and maintain, a single national identity, based on a combination of shared social characteristics such as culture, ethnicity, homeland, language, politics, religion, traditions, or belief in a shared singular history, and to promote national unity or solidarity. There are various definitions of a "nation", which leads to different types of nationalism. The two main divergent forms are ethnic nationalism and civic nationalism.
Not to be confused with Naturism.
A nebula is a distinct luminescent part of interstellar medium, which can consist of ionized, neutral, or molecular hydrogen and also cosmic dust. Nebulae are often star-forming regions, such as the Pillars of Creation in the Eagle Nebula. In these regions, the formations of gas, dust, and other materials "clump" together to form denser regions, which attract further matter and eventually become dense enough to form stars. The remaining material is then thought to form planets and other planetary system objects.
Necrosis is a form of cell injury which results in the premature death of cells in living tissue by autolysis. The term "necrosis" came about in the mid-19th century and is commonly attributed to German pathologist Rudolf Virchow, who is often regarded as one of the founders of modern pathology. Necrosis is caused by factors external to the cell or tissue, such as infection, or trauma which result in the unregulated digestion of cell components. In contrast, apoptosis is a naturally occurring programmed and targeted cause of cellular death. While apoptosis often provides beneficial effects to the organism, necrosis is almost always detrimental and can be fatal.
The Neolithic or New Stone Age is an archaeological period, the final division of the Stone Age in Mesopotamia, Asia, Europe and Africa. It saw the Neolithic Revolution, a wide-ranging set of developments that appear to have arisen independently in several parts of the world. This "Neolithic package" included the introduction of farming, domestication of animals, and change from a hunter-gatherer lifestyle to one of settlement. The term 'Neolithic' was coined by John Lubbock in 1865 as a refinement of the three-age system.
In common terminology, a baby is the very young offspring of adult human beings, while infant is a formal or specialised synonym. The terms may also be used to refer to juveniles of other organisms. A newborn is, in colloquial use, a baby who is only hours, days, or weeks old; while in medical contexts, a newborn or neonate is an infant in the first 28 days after birth.
Neoteny, also called juvenilization, is the delaying or slowing of the physiological, or somatic, development of an organism, typically an animal. Neoteny in modern humans is more significant than in other primates. In progenesis or paedogenesis, sexual development is accelerated.
Nephrology is a specialty for both adult internal medicine and pediatric medicine that concerns the study of the kidneys, specifically normal kidney function and kidney disease, the preservation of kidney health, and the treatment of kidney disease, from diet and medication to renal replacement therapy. The word "renal" is an adjective meaning "relating to the kidneys", and its roots are French or late Latin. Whereas according to some opinions, "renal" and "nephro-" should be replaced with "kidney" in scientific writings such as "kidney medicine" or "kidney replacement therapy", other experts have advocated preserving the use of renal and nephro- as appropriate including in "nephrology" and "renal replacement therapy", respectively.
Neuralgia is pain in the distribution of a nerve or nerves, as in intercostal neuralgia, trigeminal neuralgia, and glossopharyngeal neuralgia.
A neutrino is an elementary particle that interacts via the weak interaction and gravity. The neutrino is so named because it is electrically neutral and because its rest mass is so small (-ino) that it was long thought to be zero. The rest mass of the neutrino is much smaller than that of the other known elementary particles .
The weak force has a very short range, the gravitational interaction is extremely weak due to the very small mass of the neutrino, and neutrinos do not participate in the electromagnetic interaction or the strong interaction.
Consequently, neutrinos typically pass through normal matter unimpeded and with no detectable effect.
Niche may refer to:.
Nitrate is a polyatomic ion with the chemical formula NO−3. Salts containing this ion are called nitrates. Nitrates are common components of fertilizers and explosives. Almost all inorganic nitrates are soluble in water. An example of an insoluble (inorganic) nitrate is bismuth oxynitrate.
Nitrogen is a chemical element; it has symbol N and atomic number 7. Nitrogen is a nonmetal and the lightest member of group 15 of the periodic table, often called the pnictogens. It is a common element in the universe, estimated at seventh in total abundance in the Milky Way and the Solar System. At standard temperature and pressure, two atoms of the element bond to form N2, a colourless and odourless diatomic gas. N2 forms about 78% of Earth's atmosphere, making it the most abundant chemical species in air. Because of the volatility of nitrogen compounds, nitrogen is relatively rare in the solid parts of the Earth.
Nomads are communities without fixed habitation who regularly move to and from areas. Such groups include hunter-gatherers, pastoral nomads, tinkers and trader nomads. In the twentieth century, the population of nomadic pastoral tribes slowly decreased, reaching an estimated 30–40 million nomads in the world as of 1995.
In linguistics and semiotics, a notation system is a system of graphics or symbols, characters and abbreviated expressions, used in artistic and scientific disciplines to represent technical facts and quantities by convention. Therefore, a notation is a collection of related symbols that are each given an arbitrary meaning, created to facilitate structured communication within a domain knowledge or field of study.
Nucleus is a Latin word for the seed inside a fruit. It most often refers to:Atomic nucleus, the very dense central region of an atom
Cell nucleus, a central organelle of a eukaryotic cell, containing most of the cell's DNA.
A nutrient is a substance used by an organism to survive, grow and reproduce. The requirement for dietary nutrient intake applies to animals, plants, fungi and protists. Nutrients can be incorporated into cells for metabolic purposes or excreted by cells to create non-cellular structures such as hair, scales, feathers, or exoskeletons. Some nutrients can be metabolically converted into smaller molecules in the process of releasing energy such as for carbohydrates, lipids, proteins and fermentation products leading to end-products of water and carbon dioxide. All organisms require water. Essential nutrients for animals are the energy sources, some of the amino acids that are combined to create proteins, a subset of fatty acids, vitamins and certain minerals. Plants require more diverse minerals absorbed through roots, plus carbon dioxide and oxygen absorbed through leaves. Fungi live on dead or living organic matter and meet nutrient needs from their host.
Obsidian is a naturally occurring volcanic glass formed when lava extruded from a volcano cools rapidly with minimal crystal growth. It is an igneous rock. Produced from felsic lava, obsidian is rich in the lighter elements such as silicon, oxygen, aluminium, sodium, and potassium. It is commonly found within the margins of rhyolitic lava flows known as obsidian flows. These flows have a high content of silica, giving them a high viscosity. The high viscosity inhibits the diffusion of atoms through the lava, which inhibits the first step (nucleation) in the formation of mineral crystals. Together with rapid cooling, this results in a natural glass forming from the lava.
Oceanography, also known as oceanology, sea science, ocean science, and marine science, is the scientific study of the ocean, including its physics, chemistry, biology, and geology.
The sense of smell, or olfaction, is the special sense through which smells are perceived. The sense of smell has many functions, including detecting desirable foods, hazards, and pheromones, and plays a role in taste.
Oligarchy is a form of government in which power rests with a small number of people. Leaders of such regimes are often referred to as oligarchs, and generally are characterized by having titles of nobility or high amounts of wealth.
An oligopoly is a market in which pricing control lies in the hands of a few sellers.
An ombudsman is a government official who investigates and tries to resolve complaints, usually through recommendations or mediation. They are usually appointed by the government or by parliament.

Ontology is the philosophical study of being. It is traditionally understood as the subdiscipline of metaphysics focused on the most general features of reality. As one of the most fundamental concepts, being encompasses all of reality and every entity within it. To articulate the basic structure of being, ontology examines the commonalities among all things and investigates their classification into basic types, such as the categories of particulars and universals. Particulars are unique, non-repeatable entities, such as the person Socrates, whereas universals are general, repeatable entities, like the color green. Another distinction exists between concrete objects existing in space and time, such as a tree, and abstract objects existing outside space and time, like the number 7. Systems of categories aim to provide a comprehensive inventory of reality by employing categories such as substance, property, relation, state of affairs, and event.
Opacity is the measure of impenetrability to electromagnetic or other kinds of radiation, especially visible light. In radiative transfer, it describes the absorption and scattering of radiation in a medium, such as a plasma, dielectric, shielding material, glass, etc. An opaque object is translucent. When light strikes an interface between two substances, in general, some may be reflected, some absorbed, some scattered, and the rest transmitted.
In genetics, an operon is a functioning unit of DNA containing a cluster of genes under the control of a single promoter. The genes are transcribed together into an mRNA strand and either translated together in the cytoplasm, or undergo splicing to create monocistronic mRNAs that are translated separately, i.e. several strands of mRNA that each encode a single gene product. The result of this is that the genes contained in the operon are either expressed together or not at all. Several genes must be co-transcribed to define an operon.
Optics is the branch of physics that studies the behaviour, manipulation, and detection of electromagnetic radiation, including its interactions with matter and instruments that use or detect it. Optics usually describes the behaviour of visible, ultraviolet, and infrared light. The study of optics extends to other forms of electromagnetic radiation, including radio waves, microwaves,
and X-rays. The term optics is also applied to technology for manipulating beams of elementary charged particles.
In celestial mechanics, an orbit is the curved trajectory of an object under the influence of an attracting force. Alternatively, it is known as an orbital revolution, because it is a rotation around an axis external to the moving body. Examples for orbits include the trajectory of a planet around a star, a natural satellite around a planet, or an artificial satellite around an object or position in space such as a planet, moon, asteroid, or Lagrange point. Normally, orbit refers to a regularly repeating trajectory, although it may also refer to a non-repeating trajectory. To a close approximation, planets and satellites follow elliptic orbits, with the center of mass being orbited at a focal point of the ellipse, as described by Kepler's laws of planetary motion.
An organism is any living thing that functions as an individual. Such a definition raises more problems than it solves, not least because the concept of an individual is also difficult. Several criteria, few of which are widely accepted, have been proposed to define what constitutes an organism. Among the most common is that an organism has autonomous reproduction, growth, and metabolism. This would exclude viruses, even though they evolve like organisms.
Osmosis is the spontaneous net movement of solvent molecules through a selectively permeable membrane from a region of high water potential to a region of low water potential, in the direction that tends to equalize the solute concentrations on the two sides. It may also be used to describe a physical process in which any solvent moves across a selectively permeable membrane separating two solutions of different concentrations. Osmosis can be made to do work. Osmotic pressure is defined as the external pressure required to prevent net movement of solvent across the membrane. Osmotic pressure is a colligative property, meaning that the osmotic pressure depends on the molar concentration of the solute but not on its identity. Osmotic transport occurs through viscous flow of the solvent under a pressure gradient.
In epidemiology, an outbreak is a sudden increase in occurrences of a disease when cases are in excess of normal expectancy for the location or season. It may affect a small and localized group or impact upon thousands of people across an entire continent. The number of cases varies according to the disease-causing agent, and the size and type of previous and existing exposure to the agent. Outbreaks include many epidemics, which is a term normally only used for infectious diseases, as well as diseases with an environmental origin, such as a water or foodborne disease. They may affect a region in a country or a group of countries. Pandemics are near-global disease outbreaks when multiple and various countries around the Earth are soon infected.
Redox is a type of chemical reaction in which the oxidation states of the reactants change. Oxidation is the loss of electrons or an increase in the oxidation state, while reduction is the gain of electrons or a decrease in the oxidation state. The oxidation and reduction processes occur simultaneously in the chemical reaction.
Paleoclimatology is the scientific study of climates predating the invention of meteorological instruments, when no direct, artificial measurement data were available. As instrumental records only span a tiny part of Earth's history, the reconstruction of ancient climate is important to understand natural variation and the evolution of the current climate.
Palaeography (UK) or paleography (US) is the study and academic discipline of historical writing systems. It encompasses the historicity of manuscripts and texts, subsuming deciphering and dating of historical manuscripts, as well as the analysis of historic penmanship, handwriting scripts, signification, and printed media.
Paleontology or palaeontology is the scientific study of the life of the past, mainly but not exclusively through the study of fossils. Paleontologists use fossils as a means to classify organisms, measure geologic time, and assess the interactions between prehistoric organisms and their natural environment. While paleontological observations are known from at least the 6th century BC, the foundation of paleontology as a science dates back to the work of Georges Cuvier in 1796. Cuvier demonstrated evidence for the concept of extinction and how the life of the past was not necessarily the same as that of the present. The field developed rapidly over the course of the following decades, and the French word paléontologie was introduced for the study in 1822, which was derived from the Ancient Greek word for 'ancient' and words describing relatedness and a field of study. Further advances in the field accompanied the work of Charles Darwin who popularized the concept of evolution. Together, evolution and extinction can be understood as complementary processes that shaped the history of life.
A pandemic is an epidemic of an infectious disease that has a sudden increase in cases and spreads across a large region, for instance multiple continents or worldwide, affecting a substantial portion of the human population. Widespread endemic diseases with a stable number of infected individuals such as recurrences of seasonal influenza are generally excluded as they occur simultaneously in large regions of the globe rather than being spread worldwide.
A panorama is any wide-angle view or representation of a physical space, whether in painting, drawing, photography, film, seismic images, or 3D modeling. The word was coined in the 18th century by the English painter Robert Barker to describe his panoramic paintings of Edinburgh and London. The motion-picture term panning is derived from panorama.
A paradox is a logically self-contradictory statement or a statement that runs contrary to one's expectation. It is a statement that, despite apparently valid reasoning from true or apparently true premises, leads to a seemingly self-contradictory or a logically unacceptable conclusion. A paradox usually involves contradictory-yet-interrelated elements that exist simultaneously and persist over time. They result in "persistent contradiction between interdependent elements" leading to a lasting "unity of opposites".
Parallax is a displacement or difference in the apparent position of an object viewed along two different lines of sight and is measured by the angle or half-angle of inclination between those two lines. Due to foreshortening, nearby objects show a larger parallax than farther objects, so parallax can be used to determine distances.
Parasitism is a close relationship between species, where one organism, the parasite, lives on or inside another organism, the host, causing it some harm, and is adapted structurally to this way of life. The entomologist E. O. Wilson characterised parasites' way of feeding as "predators that eat prey in units of less than one". Parasites include single-celled protozoans such as the agents of malaria, sleeping sickness, and amoebic dysentery; animals such as hookworms, lice, mosquitoes, and vampire bats; fungi such as honey fungus and the agents of ringworm; and plants such as mistletoe, dodder, and the broomrapes.
In the physical sciences, a particle is a small localized object which can be described by several physical or chemical properties, such as volume, density, or mass. They vary greatly in size or quantity, from subatomic particles like the electron, to microscopic particles like atoms and molecules, to macroscopic particles like powders and other granular materials. Particles can also be used to create scientific models of even larger objects depending on their density, such as humans moving in a crowd or celestial bodies in motion.
In biology, a pathogen, in the oldest and broadest sense, is any organism, agent or micro-organism that can produce disease. A pathogen may also be referred to as an infectious agent, or simply a germ.
Pathology is the study of disease. The word pathology also refers to the study of disease in general, incorporating a wide range of biology research fields and medical practices. However, when used in the context of modern medical treatment, the term is often used in a narrower fashion to refer to processes and tests that fall within the contemporary medical field of "general pathology", an area that includes a number of distinct but inter-related medical specialties that diagnose disease, mostly through analysis of tissue and human cell samples. Pathology is a significant field in modern medical diagnosis and medical research. A physician practicing pathology is called a pathologist.
Pedagogy, most commonly understood as the approach to teaching, is the theory and practice of learning, and how this process influences, and is influenced by, the social, political, and psychological development of learners. Pedagogy, taken as an academic discipline, is the study of how knowledge and skills are imparted in an educational context, and it considers the interactions that take place during learning. Both the theory and practice of pedagogy vary greatly as they reflect different social, political, and cultural contexts.
A peninsula is a landform that extends from a mainland, is connected to the mainland on only one side, and is mostly surrounded by water. Peninsulas exist on each continent. The largest peninsula in the world is the Arabian Peninsula.
In geometry, a pentagon is any five-sided polygon or 5-gon. The sum of the internal angles in a simple pentagon is 540°.
Peptides are short chains of amino acids linked by peptide bonds. A polypeptide is a longer, continuous, unbranched peptide chain. Polypeptides that have a molecular mass of 10,000 Da or more are called proteins. Chains of fewer than twenty amino acids are called oligopeptides, and include dipeptides, tripeptides, and tetrapeptides. Proteins are polypeptides, i.e. large peptides.
Perception is the organization, identification, and interpretation of sensory information, in order to represent and understand the presented information or environment. All perception involves signals that go through the nervous system, which in turn result from physical or chemical stimulation of the sensory system. Vision involves light striking the retina of the eye; smell is mediated by odor molecules; and hearing involves pressure waves.
In physics, chemistry, and materials science, percolation refers to the movement and filtering of fluids through porous materials. It is not described by Darcy's law. Broader applications have since been developed that cover connectivity of many systems modeled as lattices or graphs, analogous to connectivity of lattice components in the filtration problem that modulates capacity for percolation.
Permafrost is soil or underwater sediment which continuously remains below 0 °C (32 °F) for two years or more; the oldest permafrost has been continuously frozen for around 700,000 years. Whilst the shallowest permafrost has a vertical extent of below a meter (3 ft), the deepest is greater than 1,500 m (4,900 ft). Similarly, the area of individual permafrost zones may be limited to narrow mountain summits or extend across vast Arctic regions. The ground beneath glaciers and ice sheets is not usually defined as permafrost, so on land, permafrost is generally located beneath a so-called active layer of soil which freezes and thaws depending on the season.
Permeability, permeable, and semipermeable may refer to:.
In mathematics, a permutation of a set can mean one of two different things:an arrangement of its members in a sequence or linear order, or
the act or process of changing the linear order of an ordered set.
Pesticides are substances that are used to control pests. They include herbicides, insecticides, nematicides, fungicides, and many others. The most common of these are herbicides, which account for approximately 50% of all pesticide use globally. Most pesticides are used as plant protection products, which in general protect plants from weeds, fungi, or insects.
Petrology is the branch of geology that studies rocks, their mineralogy, composition, texture, structure and the conditions under which they form. Petrology has three subdivisions: igneous, metamorphic, and sedimentary petrology. Igneous and metamorphic petrology are commonly taught together because both make heavy use of chemistry, chemical methods, and phase diagrams. Sedimentary petrology is commonly taught together with stratigraphy because it deals with the processes that form sedimentary rock. Modern sedimentary petrology is making increasing use of chemistry.
Phagocytes are cells that protect the body by ingesting harmful foreign particles, bacteria, and dead or dying cells. They include monocytes, macrophages, neutrophils, tissue dendritic cells, and mast cells. Their name comes from the Greek phagein, "to eat" or "devour", and "-cyte", the suffix in biology denoting "cell", from the Greek kutos, "hollow vessel". They are essential for fighting infections and for subsequent immunity. Phagocytes are important throughout the animal kingdom and are highly developed within vertebrates. One litre of human blood contains about six billion phagocytes. They were discovered in 1882 by Ilya Ilyich Mechnikov while he was studying starfish larvae. Mechnikov was awarded the 1908 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine for his discovery. Phagocytes occur in many species; some amoebae behave like macrophage phagocytes, which suggests that phagocytes appeared early in the evolution of life.
Pharmacology is the science of drugs and medications, including a substance's origin, composition, pharmacokinetics, pharmacodynamics, therapeutic use, and toxicology. More specifically, it is the study of the interactions that occur between a living organism and chemicals that affect normal or abnormal biochemical function. If substances have medicinal properties, they are considered pharmaceuticals.
In genetics, the phenotype is the set of observable characteristics or traits of an organism. The term covers all traits of an organism other than its genome, however transitory: the organism's morphology, its developmental processes, its biochemical and physiological properties whether reversible or irreversible, and all its behavior, such as a peacock's display.
A phoneme is a set of similar speech sounds that are perceptually regarded by the speakers of a language as a single basic sound—a smallest possible phonetic unit—that helps distinguish one word from another. All languages contain phonemes, and all spoken languages include both consonant and vowel phonemes. Phonemes are studied under phonology, a branch of linguistics.
A photon is an elementary particle that is a quantum of the electromagnetic field, including electromagnetic radiation such as light and radio waves, and the force carrier for the electromagnetic force. Photons are massless particles that can only move at one speed, the speed of light measured in a vacuum. The photon belongs to the class of boson particles.
The photosphere is a star's outer shell from which light is radiated. It extends into a star's surface until the plasma becomes opaque, equivalent to an optical depth of approximately 2⁄3, or equivalently, a depth from which 50% of light will escape without being scattered.
In biology, a phylum is a level of classification, or taxonomic rank, that is below kingdom and above class. Traditionally, in botany the term division has been used instead of phylum, although the International Code of Nomenclature for algae, fungi, and plants accepts the terms as equivalent. Depending on definitions, the animal kingdom Animalia contains about 32 phyla, the plant kingdom Plantae contains about 14 phyla, and the fungus kingdom Fungi contains about eight phyla. Current research in phylogenetics is uncovering the relationships among phyla within larger clades like Ecdysozoa and Embryophyta.
A pinnacle is an architectural element originally forming the cap or crown of a buttress or small turret, but afterwards used on parapets at the corners of towers and in many other situations. The pinnacle looks like a small spire. It was mainly used in Gothic architecture.
A pipeline is a system of pipes for long-distance transportation of a liquid or gas, typically to a market area for consumption. Industry datasets indicate the length of the global trunk/transmission pipeline network is on the order of ~2.19 million km by 2025, with North America accounting for ~44%. The United States had 65%, Russia had 8%, and Canada had 3%, thus 76% of all pipeline were in these three countries. The main attribute to pollution from pipelines is caused by corrosion and leakage.
A piston is a component of reciprocating engines, reciprocating pumps, gas compressors, hydraulic cylinders and pneumatic cylinders, among other similar mechanisms. It is the moving component that is contained by a cylinder and is made gas-tight by piston rings. In an engine, its purpose is to transfer force from expanding gas in the cylinder to the crankshaft via a piston rod and/or connecting rod. In a pump, the function is reversed and force is transferred from the crankshaft to the piston for the purpose of compressing or ejecting the fluid in the cylinder. In some engines, the piston also acts as a valve by covering and uncovering ports in the cylinder.
Plankton are organisms that drift in water but are unable to actively propel themselves against currents. Marine plankton include drifting organisms that inhabit the saltwater of oceans and the brackish waters of estuaries. Freshwater plankton are similar to marine plankton, but are found in lakes and rivers. An individual plankton organism in the plankton is called a plankter. In the ocean plankton provide a crucial source of food, particularly for larger filter-feeding animals, such as bivalves, sponges, forage fish and baleen whales.
In geology and physical geography, a plateau, also called a high plain or a tableland, is an area of highland consisting of flat terrain that is raised sharply above the surrounding area on at least one side. Often one or more sides have deep escarpments or hills. Plateaus can be formed by a number of processes, including upwelling of volcanic magma, extrusion of lava, and erosion by water and glaciers. Plateaus are classified according to their surrounding environment as intermontane, piedmont, or continental. A few plateaus may have a small flat top while others have wider ones.
The Pleistocene is the geological epoch that lasted from c. 2.58 million to 11,700 years ago, spanning the Earth's most recent period of repeated glaciations. Before a change was finally confirmed in 2009 by the International Union of Geological Sciences, the cutoff of the Pleistocene and the preceding Pliocene was regarded as being 1.806 million years Before Present (BP). Publications from earlier years may use either definition of the period. The end of the Pleistocene corresponds with the end of the last glacial period and also with the end of the Paleolithic age used in archaeology. The name comes from Ancient Greek πλεῖστος (pleîstos), meaning "most", and καινός (kainós), meaning "new, recent".
The Pliocene is the epoch in the geologic time scale that extends from 5.33 to 2.58 million years ago (Ma). It is the second and most recent epoch of the Neogene Period in the Cenozoic Era. The Pliocene follows the Miocene Epoch and is followed by the Pleistocene Epoch. Prior to the 2009 revision of the geologic time scale, which placed the four most recent major glaciations entirely within the Pleistocene, the Pliocene also included the Gelasian Stage, which lasted from 2.59 to 1.81 Ma, and is now included in the Pleistocene.
Plutonium is a chemical element; it has symbol Pu and atomic number 94. It is a silvery-gray actinide metal that tarnishes when exposed to air, and forms a dull coating when oxidized. The element normally exhibits six allotropes and four oxidation states. It reacts with carbon, halogens, nitrogen, silicon and hydrogen. When exposed to moist air, it forms oxides and hydrides that can expand the sample up to 70% in volume, which in turn flake off as a powder that is pyrophoric. It is radioactive and can accumulate in bones, which makes the handling of plutonium dangerous.
Pneumatics is the use of gas or pressurized air to create mechanical motion in mechanical systems.
Polarization or polarisation may refer to:.
A polymer is a substance or material that consists of very large molecules, or macromolecules, that are constituted by many repeating subunits derived from one or more species of monomers. Due to their broad spectrum of properties, both synthetic and natural polymers play essential and ubiquitous roles in everyday life. Polymers range from familiar synthetic plastics such as polystyrene to natural biopolymers such as DNA and proteins that are fundamental to biological structure and function. Polymers, both natural and synthetic, are created via polymerization of many small molecules, known as monomers. Their consequently large molecular mass, relative to small molecule compounds, produces unique physical properties including toughness, high elasticity, viscoelasticity, and a tendency to form amorphous and semicrystalline structures rather than crystals.
In biology, a population of organisms is a group of individuals of the same species, defined by a discontinuity or disjunction from other groups of individuals in certain characteristics, such as living area, genetic attributes, demographic structure. Among biologists, the term definition varies, in some cases significantly, and sometimes those variations can be confusing. There are also plenty of other terms to describe groups of individuals if no clear disjunction is present. Commonly, a population can be described by what individuals constitute the population, its size, a geographical area it occupies, and the time within which the population is examined. In qualitative terms, it is usually defined like "a group of organisms of the same species occupying a particular space at a particular time".
Porosity or void fraction is a measure of the void spaces in a material, and is a fraction of the volume of voids over the total volume, between 0 and 1, or as a percentage between 0% and 100%. Strictly speaking, some tests measure the "accessible void", the total amount of void space accessible from the surface.
Portfolio may refer to:.
Positioning may refer to:Positioning (marketing), creating an identity in the minds of a target market
Positioning theory, a theory in social psychology
Positioning, reader context
Positioning (telecommunications), a technology to approximate where a mobile phone temporarily resides
Grappling position, the positioning and holds of combatants engaged in grappling
Geopositioning, determining the location of an object in space.
Pottery is the process and the products of forming vessels and other objects with clay and other raw materials, which are fired at high temperatures to give them a hard and durable form. The place where such wares are made by a potter is also called a pottery. The definition of pottery, used by the ASTM International, is "all fired ceramic wares that contain clay when formed, except technical, structural, and refractory products". End applications include tableware, decorative ware, sanitary ware, and in technology and industry such as electrical insulators and laboratory ware. In art history and archaeology, especially of ancient and prehistoric periods, pottery often means only vessels, and sculpted figurines of the same material are called terracottas.
In an aqueous solution, precipitation is the "sedimentation of a solid material from a liquid solution". The solid formed is called the precipitate. In case of an inorganic chemical reaction leading to precipitation, the chemical reagent causing the solid to form is called the precipitant.
Prehistory, sometimes referred to as pre-literary history, is the period of human history between the first known use of stone tools by hominins c. 3.3 million years ago and the beginning of recorded history with the invention of writing systems. The use of symbols, marks, and images appears very early among humans, but the earliest known writing systems appeared c. 5,200 years ago. The adoption of writing across the globe has been a slow process, so that the end of prehistory occurred at different times in different places, and the term is less often used in discussing societies where prehistory ended relatively recently. The period when a culture is written about by others, but has not developed its own writing system, is often known as the protohistory of the culture.
Pressure is the force applied perpendicular to the surface of an object per unit area over which that force is distributed. Gauge pressure is the pressure relative to the ambient pressure.
Primatology is the scientific study of primates. Unlike branches of zoology focused on specific animal groups, primatology – and the primate order — includes both human and nonhuman animals. Thus, the field entails significant overlap with anthropology, the study of humans, and related sciences.
Probability concerns events and numerical descriptions of how likely they are to occur. The probability of an event is a number between 0 and 1; the larger the probability, the more likely an event is to occur. This number is often expressed as a percentage (%), ranging from 0% to 100%. A simple example is the tossing of a fair (unbiased) coin. Since the coin is fair, the two outcomes are both equally probable; the probability of "heads" equals the probability of "tails"; and since no other outcomes are possible, the probability of either "heads" or "tails" is 1/2.
Procedure may refer to:Medical procedure
Instructions or recipes, a set of commands that show how to achieve some result, such as to prepare or make something
Procedure (business), specifying parts of a business process
Standard operating procedure, a step-by-step instruction to achieve some result, used in industry and military
Legal procedure, the body of law and rules used in the administration of justice in the court system, including:
Civil procedure
Criminal procedure
Administrative procedure
Parliamentary procedure, a set of rules governing meetings
Procedure, also termed a subroutine, function, or subprogram
Stored procedure, a subroutine in the data dictionary of a relational database
The Procedure, an American hardcore band

.
Propagation can refer to:Chain propagation in a chemical reaction mechanism
Crack propagation, the growth of a crack during the fracture of materials
Propaganda, non-objective information used to further an agenda
Reproduction, and other forms of multiplication or increase
Plant propagation, the production of more plants
Propagation of schema, in artificial reproduction
Software propagation, the distribution of free software
Wave propagation, the motion of a wave
Radio propagation, the application of wave propagation to radio communicationsIn musicPropagation (album)
"Propagation", a song by Lower Dens from the album Nootropics
"Propagation", a song by Com Truise from the album Iteration

.
Proteins are large biomolecules and macromolecules that comprise one or more long chains of amino acid residues. Proteins perform a vast array of functions within organisms, including catalysing metabolic reactions, DNA replication, responding to stimuli, providing structure to cells and organisms, and transporting molecules from one location to another. Proteins differ from one another primarily in their sequence of amino acids, which is dictated by the nucleotide sequence of their genes, and which usually results in protein folding into a specific 3D structure that determines its activity.
Protocol may refer to:.
A proton is a stable subatomic particle, symbol p, H+, or 1H+ with a positive electric charge of +1 e (elementary charge). Its mass is slightly less than the mass of a neutron and approximately 1836 times the mass of an electron (the proton-to-electron mass ratio). Protons and neutrons, each with a mass of approximately one dalton, are jointly referred to as nucleons (particles present in atomic nuclei).
Provenance is the chronology of the ownership, custody or location of a historical object. The term was originally mostly used in relation to works of art, but is now used in similar senses in a wide range of fields, including archaeology, paleontology, archival science, economy, computing, and scientific enquiry in general.
In computer science, pseudocode is a description of the steps in an algorithm using a mix of conventions of programming languages with informal, usually self-explanatory, notation of actions and conditions. Although pseudocode shares features with regular programming languages, it is intended for human reading rather than machine control. Pseudocode typically omits details that are essential for machine implementation of the algorithm, meaning that pseudocode can only be verified by hand. The programming language is augmented with natural language description details, where convenient, or with compact mathematical notation. The reasons for using pseudocode are that it is easier for people to understand than conventional programming language code and that it is an efficient and environment-independent description of the key principles of an algorithm. It is commonly used in textbooks and scientific publications to document algorithms and in planning of software and other algorithms.
Pseudoscience consists of statements, beliefs, or practices that claim to be scientific or factual but are inherently incompatible with the scientific method. Pseudoscience is often characterized by contradictory, exaggerated or unfalsifiable claims; reliance on confirmation bias rather than rigorous attempts at refutation; lack of openness to evaluation by other experts; absence of systematic practices when developing hypotheses; and continued adherence long after the pseudoscientific hypotheses have been experimentally discredited. It is not the same as junk science.
Psychometrics is a field of study within psychology concerned with the theory and technique of measurement. Psychometrics generally covers specialized fields within psychology and education devoted to testing, measurement, assessment, and related activities. Psychometrics is concerned with the objective measurement of latent constructs that cannot be directly observed. Examples of latent constructs include intelligence, personality factors, mental disorders, and educational achievement. The levels of individuals on nonobservable latent variables are inferred through mathematical modeling based on what is observed from individuals' responses to items on tests and scales.
Pterosaurs are an extinct clade of flying reptiles in the order Pterosauria. They existed during most of the Mesozoic: from the Late Triassic to the end of the Cretaceous. Pterosaurs are the earliest vertebrates known to have evolved powered flight. Their wings were formed by a membrane of skin, muscle, and other tissues stretching from the ankles to a dramatically lengthened fourth finger.
A pulley is a wheel on an axle or shaft enabling a taut cable or belt passing over the wheel to move and change direction, or transfer power between itself and a shaft.
In physics, a quantum is the minimum amount of any physical entity involved in an interaction. The fundamental notion that a property can be "quantized" is referred to as "the hypothesis of quantization". This means that the magnitude of the physical property can take on only discrete values consisting of integer multiples of one quantum. For example, a photon is a single quantum of light of a specific frequency. Similarly, the energy of an electron bound within an atom is quantized and can exist only in certain discrete values. Atoms and matter in general are stable because electrons can exist only at discrete energy levels within an atom. Quantization is one of the foundations of the much broader physics of quantum mechanics. Quantization of energy and its influence on how energy and matter interact is part of the fundamental framework for understanding and describing nature.
A quarantine is a restriction on the movement of people, animals, and goods which is intended to prevent the spread of disease or pests. It is often used in connection to disease and illness, preventing the movement of those who may have been exposed to a communicable disease, yet do not have a confirmed medical diagnosis. It is distinct from medical isolation, in which those confirmed to be infected with a communicable disease are isolated from the healthy population.
A quarry is a type of rock and earth materials—like limestone, granite, marble, sand, and gravel—directly from the surface to use in building and construction. The operation of quarries is regulated in some jurisdictions to manage their safety risks and reduce their environmental impact.
A quasar is an extremely luminous active galactic nucleus (AGN). It is sometimes known as a quasi-stellar object, abbreviated QSO. The emission from an AGN is powered by accretion onto a supermassive black hole with a mass ranging from millions to tens of billions of solar masses, surrounded by a gaseous accretion disc. Gas in the disc falling towards the black hole heats up and releases energy in the form of electromagnetic radiation. The radiant energy of quasars is enormous; the most powerful quasars have luminosities thousands of times greater than that of a galaxy such as the Milky Way. Quasars are usually categorized as a subclass of the more general category of AGN. The redshifts of quasars are of cosmological origin.
A quorum is the minimum number of members of a group necessary to constitute the group at a meeting. In a deliberative assembly, a quorum is necessary to conduct the business of that group. In contrast, a plenum is a meeting of the full body. A body, or a meeting or vote of it, is quorate if a quorum is present.
In physics, radiation is the emission or transmission of energy in the form of waves or particles through space or a material medium. This includes:electromagnetic radiation consisting of photons, such as radio waves, microwaves, infrared, visible light, ultraviolet, x-rays, and gamma radiation (γ)
particle radiation consisting of particles of non-zero rest energy, such as alpha radiation (α), beta radiation (β), proton radiation and neutron radiation
acoustic radiation, such as ultrasound, sound, and seismic waves, all dependent on a physical transmission medium
gravitational radiation, in the form of gravitational waves, ripples in spacetime.
Radiometry is a set of techniques for measuring electromagnetic radiation, including visible light. Radiometric techniques in optics characterize the distribution of the radiation's power in space, as opposed to photometric techniques, which characterize the light's interaction with the human eye.
Rainforests are forests characterized by a closed and continuous tree canopy, moisture-dependent vegetation, the presence of epiphytes and lianas and the absence of wildfire. Rainforests can be generally classified as tropical rainforests or temperate rainforests, but other types have been described.
Reaction may refer to a process or to a response to an action, event, or exposure.
Reactor may refer to:.
In chemistry, a reagent or analytical reagent is a substance or compound added to a system to cause a chemical reaction, or test if one occurs. A reactant is a substance or compound that is consumed in a chemical reaction. The terms reactant and reagent are often used interchangeably, but reactant specifies a substance consumed in the course of a chemical reaction; reagent is used in the context of chemical analysis, while reactant is used in the context of reaction itself. Solvents, though involved in the reaction mechanism, are usually not called reactants. Similarly, catalysts are not consumed by the reaction, so they are not reactants. In biochemistry, especially in connection with enzyme-catalyzed reactions, the reactants are commonly called substrates.
In economics, a recession is a business cycle contraction that occurs when there is a period of broad decline in economic activity. Recessions generally occur when there is a widespread drop in spending. This may be triggered by various events, such as a financial crisis, an external trade shock, an adverse supply shock, the bursting of an economic bubble, or a large-scale anthropogenic or natural disaster. There is no official definition of a recession, according to the International Monetary Fund.
Reconstruction may refer to:.
A reef is a ridge or shoal of rock, coral, or similar relatively stable material lying beneath the surface of a natural body of water. Many reefs result from natural, abiotic (non-living) processes such as deposition of sand or wave erosion planing down rock outcrops. However, reefs such as the coral reefs of tropical waters are formed by biotic (living) processes, dominated by corals and coralline algae. Artificial reefs, such as shipwrecks and other man-made underwater structures, may occur intentionally or as the result of an accident. These are sometimes designed to increase the physical complexity of featureless sand bottoms to attract a more diverse range of organisms. They provide shelter to various aquatic animals which help prevent extinction. Another reason reefs are put in place is for aquaculture, and fish farmers who are looking to improve their businesses sometimes invest in them. Reefs are often quite near to the surface, but not all definitions require this.
In physics, refraction is the redirection of a wave as it passes from one medium to another. The redirection can be caused by the wave's change in speed or by a change in the medium. Refraction of light is the most commonly observed phenomenon, but other waves such as sound waves and water waves also experience refraction. How much a wave is refracted is determined by the change in wave speed and the initial direction of wave propagation relative to the direction of change in speed.
Regolith is a blanket of unconsolidated, loose, heterogeneous superficial deposits covering solid rock. It includes dust, broken rocks, and other related materials and is present on Earth, the Moon, Mars, some asteroids, and other terrestrial planets and moons.
Regression or regressions may refer to:.
In behavioral psychology, reinforcement refers to consequences that increase the likelihood of an organism's future behavior, typically in the presence of a particular antecedent stimulus. For example, a rat can be trained to push a lever to receive food whenever a light is turned on; in this example, the light is the antecedent stimulus, the lever pushing is the operant behavior, and the food is the reinforcer. Likewise, a student that receives attention and praise when answering a teacher's question will be more likely to answer future questions in class; the teacher's question is the antecedent, the student's response is the behavior, and the praise and attention are the reinforcements. Punishment is the inverse to reinforcement, referring to any behavior that decreases the likelihood that a response will occur. In operant conditioning terms, punishment does not need to involve any type of pain, fear, or physical actions; even a brief spoken expression of disapproval is a type of punishment.
Relativity may refer to:.
Remedy, Remedies, The Remedy or Remediation may refer to:.
No summary available.
Reproduction is the biological process by which new individual organisms – offspring – are produced from their parent or parents. There are two forms of reproduction: asexual and sexual.
A reservoir is an enlarged lake behind a dam, usually built to store fresh water, often doubling for hydroelectric power generation.
Resonance is a phenomenon that occurs when an object or system is subjected to an external force or vibration whose frequency matches a resonant frequency of the system, defined as a frequency that generates a maximum amplitude response in the system. When this happens, the object or system absorbs energy from the external force and starts vibrating with a larger amplitude. Resonance can occur in various systems, such as mechanical, electrical, or acoustic systems, and it is often desirable in certain applications, such as musical instruments or radio receivers. However, resonance can also be detrimental, leading to excessive vibrations or even structural failure in some cases.
Respiration may refer to:.
Restoration is the act of restoring something to its original state. This may refer to:Conservation and restoration of cultural property
Audio restoration
Conservation and restoration of immovable cultural property
Film restoration
Image restoration
Textile restoration
Ecological restoration.
The retina is the innermost, light-sensitive layer of tissue of the eye of most vertebrates and some molluscs. The optics of the eye create a focused two-dimensional image of the visual world on the retina, which then processes that image within the retina and sends nerve impulses along the optic nerve to the visual cortex to create visual perception. The retina serves a function which is in many ways analogous to that of the film or image sensor in a camera.
In political science, a revolution is a rapid, fundamental transformation of a society's class, state, ethnic or religious structures. According to sociologist Jack Goldstone, all revolutions contain "a common set of elements at their core: (a) efforts to change the political regime that draw on a competing vision of a just order, (b) a notable degree of informal or formal mass mobilization, and (c) efforts to force change through noninstitutionalized actions such as mass demonstrations, protests, strikes, or violence.".
Rheology is the study of the flow of matter, primarily in a fluid state, as well as "soft solids", which experience conditions under which they respond with plastic flow rather than elastic deformation to forces applied to them. Rheology is the branch of physics that deals with the deformation and flow of materials, both solids and liquids.
Otorhinolaryngology is a surgical subspecialty within medicine that deals with the surgical and medical management of conditions of the head and neck. Doctors who specialize in this area are called otorhinolaryngologists, otolaryngologists, head and neck surgeons, or ENT surgeons or physicians.
In geology, a rift is a linear zone where the lithosphere is being pulled apart and is an example of extensional tectonics. Typical rift features are a central linear downfaulted depression, called a graben, or more commonly a half-graben with normal faulting and rift-flank uplifts mainly on one side. Where rifts remain above sea level they form a rift valley, which may be filled by water forming a rift lake. The axis of the rift area may contain volcanic rocks, and active volcanism is a part of many, but not all, active rift systems.
Rigid or rigidity may refer to:.
A streambed or stream bed is the bottom of a stream or river and is confined within a channel or the banks of the waterway. Usually, the bed does not contain terrestrial (land) vegetation and instead supports different types of aquatic vegetation, depending on the type of streambed material and water velocity. Streambeds are what would be left once a stream is no longer in existence. The beds are usually well preserved even if they get buried because the banks and canyons made by the stream are typically hard, although soft sand and debris often fill the bed. Dry, buried streambeds can actually be underground water pockets. During times of rain, sandy streambeds can soak up and retain water, even during dry seasons, keeping the water table close enough to the surface to be obtainable by local people.
A robot is a machine, especially one programmable via a computer, capable of automatically carrying out a complex series of actions. A robot can be guided by an external or internal control device. Robots may be humanoid, but most are task-performing machines prioritizing functionality over aesthetics.
Rotation, rotational or rotary motion is the movement of an object that leaves at least one point unchanged. In 2 dimensions, a plane figure can rotate in either a clockwise or counterclockwise sense around a point called the center of rotation. In 3 dimensions, a solid figure rotates around an imaginary line called an axis of rotation.
Runoff, run-off or RUNOFF may refer to:Runoff (hydrology), the flow of water over land
Channel runoff, the confined flow of water
Surface runoff, the unconfined flow of water over land
Runoff model (reservoir), a mathematical model involving rainfall and runoff
Runoff curve number, an empirical parameter used in hydrology
RUNOFF, the first computer text-formatting program
Runoff or run-off, another name for bleed, printing that lies beyond the edges to which a printed sheet is trimmed
Runoff or run-off, a stock market term
Runoff voting system, also known as the two-round system, a voting system where a second round of voting is used to elect one of the two candidates receiving the most votes in the first round
Instant-runoff voting, an extension or variation of runoff voting where a second round can be rendered unnecessary by voters ranking candidates in order of preference
Run-off area, a racetrack safety feature
Runoff directed by Kimberly Levin.
Sacrifice is an act or offering made to a deity. A sacrifice can serve as propitiation, or a sacrifice can be an offering of praise and thanksgiving.
Salinity is the saltiness or amount of salt dissolved in a body of water, called saline water. It is usually measured in g/L or g/kg.
Sampling may refer to:Sampling, converting a continuous signal into a discrete signal
Sampling (graphics), converting continuous colors into discrete color components
Sampling (music), the reuse of a sound recording in another recording
Sampler, an electronic musical instrument used to record and play back samples
Sampling (statistics), selection of observations to acquire some knowledge of a statistical population
Sampling, selection of cases for single or multiple case studies
Sampling (audit), application of audit procedures to less than 100% of population to be audited
Sampling (medicine), gathering of matter from the body to aid in the process of a medical diagnosis and/or evaluation of an indication for treatment, further medical tests or other procedures.
Sampling, detection of hazardous materials in the workplace
Sampling, taking a representative portion of a material or product to test, typically for the purposes of identification, quality control, or regulatory assessment. See Sample (material).
Sandstone is a clastic sedimentary rock composed mainly of sand-sized silicate grains, cemented together by another mineral. Sandstones comprise about 20–25% of all sedimentary rocks.
Sanitation refers to public health conditions related to clean drinking water and treatment and disposal of human excreta and sewage. Preventing human contact with feces is part of sanitation, as is hand washing with soap. Sanitation systems aim to protect human health by providing a clean environment that will stop the transmission of disease, especially through the fecal–oral route. For example, diarrhea, a main cause of malnutrition and stunted growth in children, can be reduced through adequate sanitation. There are many other diseases which are easily transmitted in communities that have low levels of sanitation, such as ascariasis, cholera, hepatitis, polio, schistosomiasis, and trachoma, to name just a few.
Saturation, saturated, unsaturation or unsaturated may refer to:.
Scaffolding, also called scaffold or staging, is a temporary structure used to support a work crew and materials to aid in the construction, maintenance and repair of buildings, bridges and all other human-made structures. Scaffolds are widely used on site to get access to heights and areas that would be otherwise hard to get to. Unsafe scaffolding has the potential to result in death or serious injury. Scaffolding is also used in adapted forms for formwork and shoring, grandstand seating, concert stages, access/viewing towers, exhibition stands, ski ramps, half pipes and art projects.
In physics, scattering is a wide range of physical processes where moving particles or radiation of some form, such as light or sound, are forced to deviate from a straight trajectory by localized non-uniformities in the medium through which they pass. In conventional use, this also includes deviation of reflected radiation from the angle predicted by the law of reflection. Reflections of radiation that undergo scattering are often called diffuse reflections and unscattered reflections are called specular (mirror-like) reflections. Originally, the term was confined to light scattering. As more "ray"-like phenomena were discovered, the idea of scattering was extended to them, so that William Herschel could refer to the scattering of "heat rays" in 1800. John Tyndall, a pioneer in light scattering research, noted the connection between light scattering and acoustic scattering in the 1870s. Near the end of the 19th century, the scattering of cathode rays and X-rays was observed and discussed. With the discovery of subatomic particles and the development of quantum theory in the 20th century, the sense of the term became broader as it was recognized that the same mathematical frameworks used in light scattering could be applied to many other phenomena.
A schism is a division between people, usually belonging to an organization, movement, or religious denomination. The word is most frequently applied to a split in what had previously been a single religious body, such as the Great East–West Schism or the Western Schism. It is also used of a split within a non-religious organization or movement or, more broadly, of a separation between two or more people, be it brothers, friends, lovers, etc.
Scholasticism was a medieval European philosophical movement or methodology that was the predominant education in Europe from about 1100 to 1700. It is known for employing logically precise analyses toward the goal of reconciling classical philosophy and Catholic Christianity.
The seabed is the bottom of the ocean. Alternatively, it is known as the seafloor, sea floor, ocean floor, or ocean bottom. The floor of all the world's oceans is known as the seabed.
Seagrasses are the only flowering plants which grow in marine environments. There are about 60 species of fully marine seagrasses which belong to four families, all in the order Alismatales. Seagrasses evolved from terrestrial plants which recolonised the ocean 70 to 100 million years ago.
A seamount is a large submarine landform that rises from the ocean floor without reaching the water surface, and thus is not an island, islet, or cliff-rock. Seamounts are typically formed from extinct volcanoes that rise abruptly and are usually found rising from the seafloor to 100–4,000 m (330–13,120 ft) in height. They are defined by oceanographers as independent features that rise to at least 1,000 m (3,281 ft) above the seafloor, characteristically of conical form. The peaks are often found hundreds to thousands of meters below the surface, and are therefore considered to be within the deep sea. During their evolution over geologic time, the largest seamounts may reach the sea surface where wave action erodes the summit to form a flat surface. After they have subsided and sunk below the sea surface, such flat-top seamounts are called "guyots" or "tablemounts".
Secretion is the movement of material from one point to another, such as a secreted chemical substance from a cell or gland. In contrast, excretion is the removal of certain substances or waste products from a cell or organism. The classical mechanism of cell secretion is via secretory portals at the plasma membrane called porosomes. Porosomes are permanent cup-shaped lipoprotein structures embedded in the cell membrane, where secretory vesicles transiently dock and fuse to release intra-vesicular contents from the cell.
Sediment is a solid material made of loose particles that is transported to a new location where it is deposited. It occurs naturally and, through the processes of weathering and erosion, is broken down and subsequently transported by the action of wind, water, or ice or by the force of gravity acting on the particles. For example, sand and silt can be carried in suspension in river water and on reaching the sea bed deposited by sedimentation; if buried, they may eventually become sandstone and siltstone through lithification.
Seismicity is a measure encompassing earthquake occurrences, mechanisms, and magnitude at a given geographical location. As such, it summarizes a region's seismic activity. The term was coined by Beno Gutenberg and Charles Francis Richter in 1941. Seismicity is studied by geophysicists.
Semantics is the study of linguistic meaning. It examines what meaning is, how words get their meaning, and how the meaning of a complex expression depends on its parts. Part of this process involves the distinction between sense and reference. Sense is given by the ideas and concepts associated with an expression while reference is the object to which an expression points. Semantics contrasts with syntax, which studies the rules that dictate how to create grammatically correct sentences, and pragmatics, which investigates how people use language in communication. Semantics, together with syntactics and pragmatics, is a part of semiotics.
Senescence or biological aging is the gradual deterioration of functional characteristics in living organisms. Whole organism senescence involves an increase in death rates or a decrease in fecundity with increasing age, at least in the later part of an organism's life cycle. However, the effects of senescence can be delayed. The 1934 discovery that calorie restriction can extend lifespans by 50% in rats, the existence of species having negligible senescence, and the existence of potentially immortal organisms such as members of the genus Hydra have motivated research into delaying senescence and thus age-related diseases. Rare human mutations can cause accelerated aging diseases.
Sensory may refer to:.
Separation may refer to:.
Serology is the scientific study of serum and other body fluids. In practice, the term usually refers to the diagnostic identification of antibodies in the serum. Such antibodies are typically formed in response to an infection, against other foreign proteins, or to one's own proteins.
Settlement may refer to:Human settlement, a community where people live
Settlement (structural), downward movement of a structure's foundation
Settlement (finance), where securities are delivered against payment of money
Settlement (litigation), a resolution between disputing parties about a legal case
Settlement (trust), a deed whereby property is given by a settlor into trust
Thomson Bay Settlement, Rottnest Island, Western Australia, also known as simply The Settlement
Closing, the final step in executing a real estate transaction.
In computer graphics, a shader is a programmable operation which is applied to data as it moves through the rendering pipeline. Shaders can act on data such as vertices and primitives—to generate or morph geometry—and fragments –to calculate the values in a rendered image.
Shear may refer to:.
Shellfish, in colloquial and fisheries usage, are exoskeleton-bearing aquatic invertebrates used as food, including various species of molluscs, crustaceans, and echinoderms. Although most kinds of shellfish are harvested from saltwater environments, some are found in freshwater. In addition, a few species of land crabs are eaten, for example Cardisoma guanhumi in the Caribbean. Shellfish are among the most common food allergens.
A signal is both the process and the result of transmission of data over some media accomplished by embedding some variation. Signals are important in multiple subject fields, including signal processing, information theory and biology.
A silicate is any member of a family of polyatomic anions consisting of silicon and oxygen, usually with the general formula [SiO(4−2x)−4−x]n, where 0 ≤ x < 2. The family includes orthosilicate SiO4−4, metasilicate SiO2−3, and pyrosilicate Si2O6−7. The name is also used for any salt of such anions, such as sodium metasilicate; or any ester containing the corresponding chemical group, such as tetramethyl orthosilicate. The name "silicate" is sometimes extended to any anions containing silicon, even if they do not fit the general formula or contain other atoms besides oxygen; such as hexafluorosilicate [SiF6]2−. Most commonly, silicates are encountered as silicate minerals.
A simulation is an imitative representation of a process or system that could exist in the real world. In this broad sense, simulation can often be used interchangeably with model. Sometimes a clear distinction between the two terms is made, in which simulations require the use of models; the model represents the key characteristics or behaviors of the selected system or process, whereas the simulation represents the evolution of the model over time. Another way to distinguish between the terms is to define simulation as experimentation with the help of a model. This definition includes time-independent simulations. Often, computers are used to execute the simulation.
Sintering or frittage is the process of compacting and forming a solid mass of material by pressure or heat without melting it to the point of liquefaction. Sintering happens as part of a manufacturing process used with metals, ceramics, plastics, and other materials. The atoms/molecules in the sintered material diffuse across the boundaries of the particles, fusing the particles together and creating a solid piece.
Skepticism (US) or scepticism (UK) is a questioning attitude or doubt toward knowledge claims that are seen as mere belief or dogma. For example, if a person is skeptical about claims made by their government about an ongoing war then the person doubts that these claims are accurate. In such cases, skeptics normally recommend not disbelief but suspension of belief, i.e. maintaining a neutral attitude that neither affirms nor denies the claim. This attitude is often motivated by the impression that the available evidence is insufficient to support the claim. Formally, skepticism is a topic of interest in philosophy, particularly epistemology.
A skylight is a light-permitting structure or window, usually made of transparent or translucent glass, that forms all or part of the roof space of a building for daylighting and ventilation purposes.
Slippage may refer to:Degree of slipping or loosening as result of slipperiness
Slippage (finance), the difference between estimated transaction costs and the amount actually paid
Project slippage, in project planning, the act of missing a deadline
Replication slippage, nucleotide duplications created by DNA polymerase during DNA replication
Bit slip, the loss or gain of a bit or bits, caused by variations in respective clock rates of transmitting and receiving devices.
Snowpack is an accumulation of snow that compresses with time and melts seasonally, often at high elevation or high latitude. Snowpacks are an important water resource that feed streams and rivers as they melt, sometimes leading to flooding. Snowpacks provide water to down-slope communities for drinking and agriculture. High-latitude or high-elevation snowpacks contribute mass to glaciers in their accumulation zones, where annual snow deposition exceeds annual melting.
Sociology is the scientific study of human society that focuses on society, human social behavior, patterns of social relationships, social interaction, and aspects of culture associated with everyday life. The term sociology was coined in the late 18th century to describe the scientific study of society. Regarded as a part of both the social sciences and humanities, sociology uses various methods of empirical investigation and critical analysis to develop a body of knowledge about social order and social change. Sociological subject matter ranges from micro-level analyses of individual interaction and agency to macro-level analyses of social systems and social structure. Applied sociological research may be applied directly to social policy and welfare, whereas theoretical approaches may focus on the understanding of social processes and phenomenological method.
Could not find summary for "Solarwind".
A solstice is the time when the Sun reaches its most northerly or southerly excursion relative to the celestial equator on the celestial sphere. Two solstices occur annually, around 20–22 June and 20–22 December. In many countries, the seasons of the year are defined by reference to the solstices and the equinoxes.
A solvent is a substance that dissolves a solute, resulting in a solution. A solvent is usually a liquid but can also be a solid, a gas, or a supercritical fluid. Water is a solvent for polar molecules, and the most common solvent used by living things; all the ions and proteins in a cell are dissolved in water within the cell.
Sonar is a technique that uses sound propagation to navigate, measure distances (ranging), communicate with or detect objects on or under the surface of the water, such as other vessels.
Sorption is a physical and chemical process by which one substance becomes attached to another. Specific cases of sorption are treated in the following articles:Absorption"the incorporation of a substance in one state into another of a different state" ;
AdsorptionThe physical adherence or bonding of ions and molecules onto the surface of another phase ;
Ion exchangeAn exchange of ions between two electrolytes or between an electrolyte solution and a complex.
A soundscape is the acoustic environment as perceived by humans, in context. The term, originally coined by Michael Southworth, was popularized by R. Murray Schafer. There is a varied history of the use of soundscape depending on discipline, ranging from urban design to wildlife ecology to computer science. An important distinction is to separate soundscape from the broader acoustic environment. The acoustic environment is the combination of all the acoustic resources, natural and artificial, within a given area as modified by the environment. The International Organization for Standardization (ISO) standardized these definitions in 2014.
Sovereignty is generally defined as supreme, independent control and lawmaking authority over a territory. It is expressed through the power to rule and make law. Sovereignty entails hierarchy within a state as well as external autonomy, which refers to the ability of a state to act independently in international affairs. In any state, sovereignty is assigned to the person, body or institution that has the ultimate authority over its citizens and the power to modify existing laws. In political theory, sovereignty is a substantive term designating supreme legitimate authority over some polity. According to international law, sovereign states are all considered equal, and no state has the right to interfere in the internal affairs of another sovereign state. While Article 2(7) of the UN Charter explicitly recognizes the sovereignty of states, and in general there is a principle of non-interference in the domestic affairs of sovereign states, the UN Security Council’s Chapter VII powers clearly contemplate the use of force against a state when necessary to restore peace. Moreover, the recent Responsibility to Protect (R2P) authorizes the United Nations to take action to “avert a humanitarian catastrophe” within a state when that state's government cannot or will not act.
Spectroscopy is the field of study that measures and interprets electromagnetic spectra as it interacts with matter. In narrower contexts, spectroscopy is the precise study of color as generalized from radiated visible light to all bands of the electromagnetic spectrum.
A spectrum is a set of related ideas, objects, or properties whose features overlap such that they blend to form a continuum. The word spectrum was first used scientifically in optics to describe the rainbow of colors in visible light after passing through a prism. In the optical spectrum, light wavelength is viewed as continuous, and spectral colors are seen to blend into one another smoothly when organized in order of their corresponding wavelengths. As scientific understanding of light advanced, the term came to apply to the entire electromagnetic spectrum, including radiation not visible to the human eye.
In finance, speculation is the purchase of an asset with the hope that that asset will become more valuable in a brief amount of time.
The term can also refer to short sales, in which the speculator hopes for a decline in value. Speculation often has a pejorative connotation, as the activity is linked to bubbles, economic downturns, and financial crises.
In mathematics, a spiral is a curve which emanates from a point, moving further away as it revolves around the point. It is a subtype of whorled patterns, a broad group that also includes concentric objects.
In biology, a spore is a unit of sexual or asexual reproduction that may be adapted for dispersal and for survival, often for extended periods of time, in unfavourable conditions. Spores form part of the life cycles of many plants, algae, fungi and protozoa. They were thought to have appeared as early as the mid-late Ordovician period as an adaptation of early land plants.
Stability may refer to:.
A stalagmite
is a type of rock formation that rises from the floor of a cave due to the accumulation of material deposited on the floor from ceiling drippings. Stalagmites are typically composed of calcium carbonate, but may consist of lava, mud, peat, pitch, sand, sinter, and amberat.
A stalactite is a mineral formation that hangs from the ceiling of caves, hot springs, or man-made structures such as bridges and mines. Any material that is soluble and that can be deposited as a colloid, or is in suspension, or is capable of being melted, may form a stalactite. Stalactites may be composed of lava, minerals, mud, peat, pitch, sand, sinter, and amberat. A stalactite is not necessarily a speleothem, though speleothems are the most common form of stalactite because of the abundance of limestone caves.
Standardization or standardisation is the process of implementing and developing technical standards based on the consensus of different parties that include firms, users, interest groups, standards organizations and governments. Standardization can help maximize compatibility, interoperability, safety, repeatability, efficiency, and quality. It can also facilitate a normalization of formerly custom processes.
Starburst most often refers to:Starburst region, a generic term to describe a region of space with a much higher than normal star formation
Starburst galaxy, a galaxy with an exceptionally high rate of star formation
Starburst (candy), a brand of fruit-flavored candy.
A state is a political entity that regulates society and the population within a definite territory. Government is considered to form the fundamental apparatus of contemporary states.
In mathematics and statistics, a stationary process is a stochastic process whose statistical properties, such as mean and variance, do not change over time. More formally, the joint probability distribution of the process remains the same when shifted in time. This implies that the process is statistically consistent across different time periods. Because many statistical procedures in time series analysis assume stationarity, non-stationary data are frequently transformed to achieve stationarity before analysis.
In physical geography, a steppe is an ecoregion characterized by grassland plains without closed forests except near rivers and lakes.
Sterile or sterility may refer to:Asepsis, a state of being free from biological contaminants
Sterile (archaeology), a sediment deposit which contains no evidence of human activity
Sterilization (microbiology), any process that eliminates or kills all forms of life or removes them from an item or a field
Sterility (physiology), an inability of a living organism to effect sexual reproduction
Infertility, a medical condition which prevents a person, an animal or a plant from bearing children, especially through natural means
Sterile Records, a record label which was formed by Nigel Ayers and Caroline K of the post-industrial music group Nocturnal Emissions in London in 1979.
Stimulants are a class of psychoactive drugs that increase alertness. They are used for various purposes, such as enhancing attention, motivation, cognition, mood, and physical performance. Some stimulants occur naturally, while others are exclusively synthetic. Common stimulants include caffeine, nicotine, cocaine, amphetamine/methamphetamine, methylphenidate, and modafinil. Stimulants may be subject to varying forms of regulation, or outright prohibition, depending on jurisdiction. Most stimulants are highly addictive and damage health when addicted.
Stoichiometry is the relationships between the quantities of reactants and products before, during and after chemical reactions.
Stratification may refer to:.
The stratosphere is the second-lowest layer of the atmosphere of Earth, located above the troposphere and below the mesosphere. Pronounced, the name originates from Ancient Greek  στρωτός (strōtós) 'layer, stratum' and  -sphere. The stratosphere is composed of stratified temperature zones, with the warmer layers of air located higher and the cooler layers lower. The increase of temperature with altitude is a result of the absorption of the Sun's ultraviolet (UV) radiation by the ozone layer, where ozone is exothermically photolyzed into oxygen in a cyclical fashion. This temperature inversion is in contrast to the troposphere, where temperature decreases with altitude, and between the troposphere and stratosphere is the tropopause border that demarcates the beginning of the temperature inversion.
Stress may refer to:.
Subduction is a geological process in which the oceanic lithosphere and some continental lithosphere is recycled into the Earth's mantle at the convergent boundaries between tectonic plates. Where one tectonic plate converges with a second plate, the heavier plate dives beneath the other and sinks into the mantle. A region where this process occurs is known as a subduction zone, and its surface expression is known as an arc-trench complex. The process of subduction has created most of the Earth's continental crust. Rates of subduction are typically measured in centimeters per year, with rates of convergence as high as 11 cm/year.
Substrate may refer to:.
Succession is the act or process of following in order or sequence.
A supernova is a powerful and luminous explosion of a star. A supernova occurs during the last evolutionary stages of a massive star, or when a white dwarf is triggered into runaway nuclear fusion. The original object, called the progenitor, either collapses to a neutron star or black hole, or is completely destroyed to form a diffuse nebula. The peak optical luminosity of a supernova can be comparable to that of an entire galaxy before fading over several weeks or months.
Supremacy may refer to:.
A surface, as the term is most generally used, is the outermost or uppermost layer of a physical object. It is the portion or region of the object that can first be observed and with which other objects first interact.
Surge means a sudden transient rush or flood, and may refer to:.
Survival or survivorship, the act of surviving, is the propensity of something to continue existing despite conditions that might kill or destroy it. The concept can be applied to humans and other living things, to a physical object, and to abstract things such as beliefs or ideas. Living things generally have a self-preservation instinct to survive, while objects intended for use in harsh conditions are designed for survivability.
Symbiosis is any close and long-term biological interaction between two organisms of different species. In 1879, Heinrich Anton de Bary defined symbiosis as "the living together of unlike organisms". The term is sometimes more exclusively used in a restricted, mutualistic sense, where both symbionts contribute to each other's subsistence. This means that they benefit each other in some way.
Symmetry in everyday life refers to a sense of harmonious and beautiful proportion and balance. In mathematics, the term has a more precise definition and is usually used to refer to an object that is invariant under some transformations, such as translation, reflection, rotation, or scaling. Although these two meanings of the word can sometimes be told apart, they are intricately related, and hence are discussed together in this article.
Synthesis or synthesize may refer to:.
In classical Greek mythology, Syrinx was an Arcadian nymph and a follower of Artemis, known for her chastity. Being pursued by Pan, she fled into the river Ladon, and at her own request was metamorphosed into a reed from which Pan then made his panpipes.
Taxonomy is a practice and science concerned with classification or categorization. Typically, there are two parts to it: the development of an underlying scheme of classes and the allocation of things to the classes (classification).
Technocracy is an expert-based type of governance. In its strongest sense, it is a form of government in which decisions across all sectors and policy domains follow evidence-based, efficiency-oriented procedures grounded in scientific methods and instrumental rationality. In a weaker sense, the term denotes hybrid models that delegate specific functions to experts or implement expertise-driven decision procedures in areas such as central banking, public health, or environmental regulation.
Telemetry is the in situ collection of measurements or other data at remote points and their automatic transmission to receiving equipment (telecommunication) for monitoring. The word is derived from the Greek roots tele, 'far off', and metron, 'measure'. Systems that need external instructions and data to operate require the counterpart of telemetry: telecommand.
In psychology, temperament broadly refers to consistent individual differences in behavior that are biologically based and are relatively independent of learning, system of values and attitudes.
Temperature is a numerical expression of hotness or coldness. Temperature is measured with a thermometer. It reflects the average kinetic energy of the vibrating and colliding atoms making up a substance.
Tension may refer to:.
Ternary or trinary is an adjective meaning "composed of three items". It can refer to:.
A territory is an area of land, sea, or space, belonging or connected to a particular country, person, or animal.
A tessellation or tiling is the covering of a surface, often a plane, using one or more geometric shapes, called tiles, with no overlaps and no gaps. In mathematics, tessellation can be generalized to higher dimensions and a variety of geometries.
A thermocline is
a distinct layer based on temperature within a large body of fluid with a high gradient of distinct temperature differences associated with depth. In the ocean, the thermocline divides the upper mixed layer from the calm deep water below.
A thermometer is a device that measures temperature or temperature gradient. A thermometer has two important elements: (1) a temperature sensor in which some change occurs with a change in temperature; and (2) some means of converting this change into a numerical value. Thermometers are widely used in technology and industry to monitor processes, in meteorology, in medicine, and in scientific research.
Threshold may refer to:.
Tidal is the adjectival form of tide.
Titration is a common laboratory method of quantitative chemical analysis to determine the concentration of an identified analyte. A reagent, termed the titrant or titrator, is prepared as a standard solution of known concentration and volume. The titrant reacts with a solution of analyte to determine the analyte's concentration. The volume of titrant that reacted with the analyte is termed the titration volume.
Topology is the branch of mathematics concerned with the properties of a geometric object that are preserved under continuous deformations, such as stretching, twisting, crumpling, and bending; that is, without closing holes, opening holes, tearing, gluing, or passing through itself.
A tornado, also known as a twister, is a rapidly rotating column of air that extends vertically from the surface of the Earth to the base of a cumulonimbus or cumulus cloud. Tornadoes are often visible in the form of a condensation funnel originating from the cloud base, with a cloud of rotating debris and dust close to the ground. Most tornadoes have wind speeds less than 180 kilometers per hour, are about 80 meters across, and travel several kilometers before dissipating. The most extreme tornadoes can attain wind speeds of more than 480 kilometers per hour (300 mph), can be more than 3 kilometers (2 mi) in diameter, and can stay on the ground for more than 100 km (62 mi).
Toxicity is the degree to which a chemical substance or a particular mixture of substances can damage an organism. Toxicity can refer to the effect on a whole organism, such as an animal, bacterium, or plant, as well as the effect on a substructure of the organism, such as a cell (cytotoxicity) or an organ such as the liver (hepatotoxicity). Sometimes the word is more or less synonymous with poisoning in everyday usage.
A trajectory is the path an object takes through its motion over time. In classical mechanics, a trajectory is defined by Hamiltonian mechanics via canonical coordinates; hence, a complete trajectory is defined by position and momentum, simultaneously.
Transcription refers to the process of converting sounds into letters or musical notes, or producing a copy of something in another medium, including:.
A transducer is a device that usefully converts energy from one form to another. Usually a transducer converts a signal in one form of energy to a signal in another.
Transducers are often employed at the boundaries of automation, measurement, and control systems, where electrical signals are converted to and from other physical quantities. The process of converting one form of energy to another is known as transduction.
Transfer may refer to:.
Transformation may refer to:.
A transistor is a semiconductor device used to amplify or switch electrical signals and power. It is one of the basic building blocks of modern electronics. It is composed of semiconductor material, usually with at least three terminals for connection to an electronic circuit. A voltage or current applied to one pair of the transistor's terminals controls the current through another pair of terminals. Because the controlled (output) power can be higher than the controlling (input) power, a transistor can amplify a signal. Some transistors are packaged individually, but many more in miniature form are found embedded in integrated circuits. Because transistors are the key active components in practically all modern electronics, many people consider them one of the 20th century's greatest inventions.
Transmutation may refer to:.
Transport or transportation is the intentional movement of humans, animals, and goods from one location to another. Modes of transport include air, land, water, cable, pipelines, and space. The field can be divided into infrastructure, vehicles, and operations. Transport enables human trade, which is essential for the development of civilizations.
A tremor is an involuntary, somewhat rhythmic muscle contraction and relaxation involving oscillations or twitching movements of one or more body parts. It is the most common of all involuntary movements and can affect the hands, arms, eyes, face, head, vocal folds, trunk, and legs. Most tremors occur in the hands. In some people, a tremor is a symptom of another neurological disorder.
A tributary, or an affluent, is a stream or river that flows into a larger stream, river, or a lake. A tributary does not flow directly into a sea or ocean. Tributaries, and the main stem river into which they flow, drain the surrounding drainage basin of its surface water and groundwater, leading the water out into an ocean, another river, or into an endorheic basin.
The tropics are the region of Earth surrounding the equator, where the Sun may shine directly overhead. This contrasts with the temperate or polar regions of Earth, where the Sun can never be directly overhead. Because of Earth's axial tilt, the width of the tropics is twice the tilt. The tropics are also referred to as the tropical zone and the torrid zone.
A tsunami is a series of waves in a water body caused by the displacement of a large volume of water, generally in an ocean or a large lake. Earthquakes, volcanic eruptions and underwater explosions above or below water all have the potential to generate a tsunami. Unlike normal ocean waves, which are generated by wind, or tides, which are in turn generated by the gravitational pull of the Moon and the Sun, a tsunami is generated by the displacement of water from a large event.
In fluid dynamics, turbulence or turbulent flow is fluid motion exhibiting chaotic changes in pressure and flow velocity. It is in contrast to laminar flow, which occurs when a fluid flows in parallel layers with no disruption between those layers.
Ultrasound is sound with frequencies greater than 20 kilohertz. This frequency is the approximate upper audible limit of human hearing in healthy young adults. The physical principles of acoustic waves apply to any frequency range, including ultrasound. Ultrasonic devices operate with frequencies from 20 kHz up to several gigahertz.
Ultraviolet radiation (UV) is electromagnetic radiation of wavelengths of 100–400 nanometers, shorter than that of visible light, but longer than X-rays. Wavelengths between 10 and 100 nanometers are called extreme ultraviolet and share some properties with soft X-rays. UV radiation is present in sunlight and constitutes about 10% of the total electromagnetic radiation output from the Sun. It is also produced by electric arcs, Cherenkov radiation, and specialized lights, such as mercury-vapor lamps, tanning lamps, and black lights.
Uncertainty or incertitude refers to situations involving imperfect or unknown information. It applies to predictions of future events, to physical measurements that are already made, or to the unknown, and is particularly relevant for decision-making. Uncertainty arises in partially observable or stochastic or complex or dynamic environments, as well as due to ignorance, indolence, or both. It arises in any number of fields, including insurance, philosophy, physics, statistics, economics, entrepreneurship, finance, medicine, psychology, sociology, engineering, metrology, meteorology, ecology and information science.
Undercurrent is a flow of water below the surface:In an ocean, a subsurface current, a water current which flows beneath and usually independently of surface currents.
In a river, a subsurface current .
Underground most commonly refers to:Subterranea (geography), the regions beneath the surface of the Earth.
Unification or unification theory may refer to:.
Uplift may refer to:.
Uranium is a chemical element; it has symbol U and atomic number 92. It is a silvery-grey metal in the actinide series of the periodic table. A uranium atom has 92 protons and 92 electrons, of which 6 are valence electrons. Uranium radioactively decays, usually by emitting an alpha particle. The half-life of this decay varies between 159,200 and 4.5 billion years for different isotopes, making them useful for dating the age of the Earth. The most common isotopes in natural uranium are uranium-238 and uranium-235. Uranium has the highest atomic weight of the primordially occurring elements. Its density is about 70% higher than that of lead and slightly lower than that of gold or tungsten. It occurs naturally in low concentrations of a few parts per million in soil, rock and water, and is commercially extracted from uranium-bearing minerals such as uraninite.
Urbanism is the scientific study of how inhabitants of urban areas, such as towns and cities, interact with the built environment. It is a direct component of disciplines such as urban planning, a profession focusing on the design and management of urban areas, and urban sociology, an academic field which studies urban life.
Vacancy or No Vacancy may refer to:.
A vaccine is a biological preparation that provides active acquired immunity to a particular infectious or malignant disease. The safety and effectiveness of vaccines has been widely studied and verified. A vaccine typically contains an agent that resembles a disease-causing microorganism and is often made from weakened or killed forms of the microbe, its toxins, or one of its surface proteins. The agent stimulates the immune system to recognize the agent as a threat, destroy it, and recognize further and destroy any of the microorganisms associated with that agent that it may encounter in the future.
A vacuole is a membrane-bound organelle which is present in plant and fungal cells and some protist, animal, and bacterial cells. Vacuoles are essentially enclosed compartments which are filled with water containing inorganic and organic molecules including enzymes in solution, though in certain cases they may contain solids which have been engulfed. Vacuoles are formed by the fusion of multiple membrane vesicles and are effectively just larger forms of these. The organelle has no basic shape or size; its structure varies according to the requirements of the cell.
Valence or valency may refer to:.
Vaporization of an element or compound is a phase transition from the liquid phase to vapor. There are two types of vaporization: evaporation and boiling. Evaporation is a surface phenomenon, whereas boiling is a bulk phenomenon.
Variable may refer to:.
In probability theory and statistics, variance is the expected value of the squared deviation from the mean of a random variable. The standard deviation is obtained as the square root of the variance. Variance is a measure of dispersion, meaning it is a measure of how far a set of numbers are spread out from their average value. It is the second central moment of a distribution, and the covariance of the random variable with itself, and it is often represented by ⁠⁠, ⁠⁠, ⁠⁠, ⁠⁠, or ⁠⁠.
Vector most often refers to:Disease vector, an agent that carries and transmits an infectious pathogen into another living organism
Euclidean vector, a quantity with a magnitude and a direction.
Velocity is a measurement of speed in a certain direction of motion. It is a fundamental concept in kinematics, the branch of classical mechanics that describes the motion of physical objects. Velocity is a vector quantity, meaning that both magnitude and direction are needed to define it. The scalar absolute value (magnitude) of velocity is called speed, a quantity that is measured in metres per second in the SI (metric) system. For example, "5 metres per second" is a scalar, whereas "5 metres per second east" is a vector. If there is a change in speed, direction or both, then the object is said to be undergoing an acceleration.
Veneer may refer to:.
Ventilation may refer to:Ventilation (physiology), the movement of air between the environment and the lungs via inhalation and exhalation
Mechanical ventilation, in medicine, using artificial methods to assist breathing
Respirator, a machine designed to move breathable air into and out of the lungs
Ventilation (architecture), the process of "changing" or replacing air in any space to provide high indoor air quality
Ventilation (firefighting), the expulsion of heat and smoke from a fire building
Ventilation (mining), flow of air to the underground workings of a mine of sufficient volume to dilute and remove noxious gases.
Vertebrates, also called craniates, are animals with a vertebral column and a cranium. The vertebral column surrounds and protects the spinal cord, while the cranium protects the brain.
In mechanics, vibration is oscillatory motion about an equilibrium point. Vibration may be deterministic if the oscillations can be characterised precisely, or random if the oscillations can only be analysed statistically.
The word Viral means "relating to viruses".
Virulence is a pathogen's or microorganism's ability to cause damage to a host.
When two fluid layers move relative to each other, a friction force develops between them and the slower layer acts to slow down the faster layer. This internal resistance to flow is described by the fluid property called viscosity, which reflects the internal stickiness of the fluid. In liquids, viscosity arises from cohesive molecular forces, while in gases it results from molecular collisions. Except for the case of superfluidity, there is no fluid with zero viscosity, and thus all fluid flows involve viscous effects to some degree.
Volatility or volatile may refer to:.
A volcano is a vent or fissure in the crust of a planetary-mass object, such as Earth, that allows hot lava, volcanic ash, and gases to escape from a magma chamber below the surface.
Voltage, also known as (electrical) potential difference, electric pressure, or electric tension, is the difference in electric potential between two points. In a static electric field, it corresponds to the work needed per unit of charge to move a positive test charge from the first point to the second point. In the International System of Units (SI), the derived unit for voltage is the volt (V).
In fluid dynamics, a vortex is a region in a fluid in which the flow revolves around an axis line, which may be straight or curved. Vortices form in stirred fluids and may be observed in smoke rings, whirlpools in the wake of a boat, and in the winds surrounding a tropical cyclone, tornado, or dust devil.
In physics and mathematics, wavelength or spatial period of a wave or periodic function is the distance over which the wave's shape repeats. In other words, it is the distance between consecutive corresponding points of the same phase on the wave, such as two adjacent crests, troughs, or zero crossings. Wavelength is a characteristic of both traveling waves and standing waves, as well as other spatial wave patterns. The inverse of the wavelength is called the spatial frequency. Wavelength is commonly designated by the Greek letter lambda (λ). For a modulated wave, wavelength may refer to the carrier wavelength of the signal. The term wavelength may also apply to the repeating envelope of modulated waves or waves formed by interference of several sinusoids.
Weathering is the deterioration of rocks, soils and minerals through contact with water, atmospheric gases, sunlight, and biological organisms. It occurs in situ, and so is distinct from erosion, which involves the transport of rocks and minerals by agents such as water, ice, snow, wind, waves and gravity.
A wetland is a distinct semi-aquatic ecosystem whose groundcovers are flooded or saturated in water, either permanently, for years or decades, or only seasonally. Flooding results in oxygen-poor (anoxic) processes taking place, especially in the soils. Wetlands form a transitional zone between waterbodies and dry lands, and are different from other terrestrial or aquatic ecosystems due to their vegetation's roots having adapted to oxygen-poor waterlogged soils. They are considered among the most biologically diverse of all ecosystems, serving as habitats to a wide range of aquatic and semi-aquatic plants and animals, with often improved water quality due to plant removal of excess nutrients such as nitrates and phosphorus.
A whirlpool is a body of rotating water produced by opposing currents or a current running into an obstacle. Miniature whirlpools form when a bath or a sink is draining. More powerful ones formed in seas or oceans may be called maelstroms. Vortex is the proper term for a whirlpool that has a downdraft.
Windfall or Windfalls may refer to:.
A windmill is a machine operated by the force of wind acting on vanes or sails to mill grain (gristmills), pump water, generate electricity, or drive other machinery.
Windmills were used throughout the high medieval and early modern periods; the horizontal or panemone windmill first appeared in Persia during the 9th century, and the vertical windmill first appeared in northwestern Europe in the 12th century. Regarded as an icon of Dutch culture, there are approximately 1,000 windmills in the Netherlands today.
A woodland is, in the broad sense, land covered with woody plants, or in a narrow sense, synonymous with wood, a low-density forest forming open habitats with plenty of sunlight and limited shade. Some savannas may also be woodlands, such as savanna woodland, where trees and shrubs form a light canopy.
In macroeconomics, the workforce or labour force is the sum of people either working or looking for work :.
A xenolith is a rock fragment that becomes enveloped in a larger rock during the latter's development and solidification. In geology, the term xenolith is almost exclusively used to describe inclusions in igneous rock entrained during magma ascent, emplacement and eruption. Xenoliths may be engulfed along the margins of a magma chamber, torn loose from the walls of an erupting lava conduit or explosive diatreme or picked up along the base of a flowing body of lava on the Earth's surface. A xenocryst is an individual foreign crystal included within an igneous body. Examples of xenocrysts are quartz crystals in a silica-deficient lava and diamonds within kimberlite diatremes. Xenoliths can be non-uniform within individual locations, even in areas which are spatially limited, e.g. rhyolite-dominated lava of Niijima volcano (Japan) contains two types of gabbroic xenoliths which are of different origin - they were formed in different temperature and pressure conditions.
Xenon is a chemical element; it has symbol Xe and atomic number 54. It is a dense, colorless, odorless noble gas found in Earth's atmosphere in trace amounts. Although generally unreactive, it can undergo a few chemical reactions such as the formation of xenon hexafluoroplatinate, the first noble gas compound to be synthesized.
Yield may refer to:.
Zeolites are a group of several microporous, crystalline aluminosilicate minerals commonly used as commercial adsorbents and catalysts. They mainly consist of silicon, aluminium, and oxygen, and have the general formula Mn+1/n(AlO2)−(SiO2)x･yH2O where Mn+1/n is either a metal ion or H+.
In European tradition, a zephyr is a light wind or a west wind, named after Zephyrus, the Greek god or personification of the west wind.
Could not find summary for "Zonation".
Zoology is the scientific study of animals. Its studies include the structure, embryology, classification, habits, and distribution of all animals, both living and extinct, and how they interact with their ecosystems. Zoology is one of the primary branches of biology. The term is derived from Ancient Greek  ζῷον (zôion) 'animal' and  λόγος (lógos) 'study of'.
Abbot is an ecclesiastical title given to the head of an independent monastery for men in various Western Christian traditions. The name is derived from abba, the Aramaic form of the Hebrew ab, and means "father". The female equivalent is abbess.
An abdomen is the front part of the torso between the thorax (chest) and pelvis in humans and in other vertebrates. The area occupied by the abdomen is called the abdominal cavity. In arthropods, it is the posterior tagma of the body; it follows the thorax or cephalothorax.
Abjuration is the solemn repudiation, abandonment, or renunciation by or upon oath, often the renunciation of citizenship or some other right or privilege. The term comes from the Latin abjurare, "to forswear".
Abolitionism, or the abolitionist movement, is the political movement to end slavery and liberate enslaved individuals around the world. It gained momentum in the western world in the late 18th and 19th centuries.
An abscess is a collection of pus that has built up within the tissue of the body, usually caused by bacterial infection. Signs and symptoms of abscesses include redness, pain, warmth, and swelling. The swelling may feel fluid-filled when pressed. The area of redness often extends beyond the swelling. Carbuncles and boils are types of abscess that often involve hair follicles, with carbuncles being larger. A cyst is related to an abscess, but it contains a material other than pus, and a cyst has a clearly defined wall. Abscesses can also form internally on internal organs and after surgery.
Absorption may refer to:.
Abundance may refer to:.
Abyss may refer to:.
An acetate is a salt formed by the combination of acetic acid with a base. "Acetate" also describes the conjugate base or ion typically found in aqueous solution and written with the chemical formula C2H3O−2. The neutral molecules formed by the combination of the acetate ion and a positive ion are also commonly called "acetates". The simplest of these is hydrogen acetate with corresponding salts, esters, and the polyatomic anion CH3CO−2, or CH3COO−.
Acidification may refer to:Ocean acidification, decrease in the pH of the Earth's oceans
Freshwater acidification, atmospheric depositions and soil leaching of SOx and NOx
Soil acidification, buildup of hydrogen cations, which reduces the soil pH
Souring, a cooking technique

.
An acropolis was the settlement of an upper part of an ancient Greek city, especially a citadel, and frequently a hill with precipitous sides, mainly chosen for purposes of defense. The term is typically used to refer to the Acropolis of Athens, yet nearly every Greek city had an acropolis of its own. Acropolises were used as religious centers and places of worship, forts, and places in which the royal and high-status resided. Acropolises became the nuclei of large cities of classical ancient times, and served as important centers of a community. Some well-known acropolises have become the centers of tourism in the present day, and they are a rich source of archaeological information of ancient Greece, especially, the Acropolis of Athens.
Acuity may refer to:.
Additive may refer to:.
Adjudication is the legal process by which an arbiter or judge reviews evidence and argumentation, including legal reasoning set forth by opposing parties or litigants, to come to a decision which determines rights and obligations between the parties involved.
Admiralty most often refers to:Admiralty, Hong Kong
Admiralty, military department in command of the Royal Navy from 1707 to 1964
The rank of admiral
Admiralty law.
Adrenaline, also known as epinephrine and alternatively spelled adrenalin, is a hormone and medication which is involved in regulating visceral functions. It appears as a white microcrystalline granule. Adrenaline is normally produced by the adrenal glands and by a small number of neurons in the medulla oblongata. It plays an essential role in the fight-or-flight response by increasing blood flow to muscles, heart output by acting on the SA node, pupil dilation response, and blood sugar level. It does this by binding to alpha and beta receptors. It is found in many animals, including humans, and some single-celled organisms. It has also been isolated from the plant Scoparia dulcis found in Northern Vietnam.
Aerospace refers to the technology and industry involved with the atmosphere and outer space collectively. Aerospace activity is very diverse, with a multitude of commercial, industrial, and military applications. Aerospace engineering consists of aeronautics and astronautics. Aerospace organizations research, design, manufacture, operate, maintain, and repair both aircraft and spacecraft.
Aesthetics is the branch of philosophy that studies beauty, taste, and related phenomena. In a broad sense, it includes the philosophy of art, which examines the nature of art, artistic creativity, the meanings of artworks, and audience appreciation.
Afforestation is the establishment of a forest or stand of trees in an area where there was no recent tree cover. There are three types of afforestation: natural regeneration, agroforestry and tree plantations. In the context of climate change, afforestation can be helpful for climate change mitigation through the route of carbon sequestration. Afforestation can also improve the local climate through increased rainfall and by being a barrier against high winds. The additional trees can also prevent or reduce topsoil erosion, floods and landslides. Finally, additional trees can be a habitat for wildlife, and provide employment and wood products.
In seismology, an aftershock is a smaller earthquake that follows a larger earthquake, in the same area of the main shock, caused as the displaced crust adjusts to the effects of the main shock. Large earthquakes can have hundreds to thousands of instrumentally detectable aftershocks, which steadily decrease in magnitude and frequency according to a consistent pattern. In some earthquakes the main rupture happens in two or more steps, resulting in multiple main shocks. These are known as doublet earthquakes, and in general can be distinguished from aftershocks in having similar magnitudes and nearly identical seismic waveforms.
Agility or nimbleness is an ability to change the body's position quickly and requires the integration of isolated movement skills using a combination of balance, coordination, speed, reflexes, strength, and endurance. More specifically, it is dependent on these six skills:Balance – The ability to maintain equilibrium when stationary or moving through the coordinated actions of our sensory functions ;
Static balance – The ability to retain the center of mass above the base of support in a stationary position;
Dynamic balance – The ability to maintain balance with body movement; an equal distribution of weight;
Speed – The ability to move all or part of the body quickly;
Strength – The ability of a muscle or muscle group to overcome a resistance; and lastly,
Coordination – The ability to control the movement of the body in co-operation with the body's sensory functions.
An agonist is a chemical that activates a receptor to produce a biological response. Receptors are cellular proteins whose activation causes the cell to modify what it is currently doing. In contrast, an antagonist blocks the action of the agonist, while an inverse agonist causes an action opposite to that of the agonist.
Agrarian means pertaining to agriculture, farmland, or rural areas.
An airship, dirigible balloon or dirigible is a type of aerostat (lighter-than-air) aircraft that can navigate through the air flying under its own power. Aerostats use buoyancy from a lifting gas that is less dense than the surrounding air to achieve the lift needed to stay airborne.
Albedo is the fraction of sunlight that is diffusely reflected by a body. It is measured on a scale from 0 to 1. Surface albedo is defined as the ratio of radiosity Je to the irradiance Ee received by a surface. The proportion reflected is not only determined by properties of the surface itself, but also by the spectral and angular distribution of solar radiation reaching the Earth's surface. These factors vary with atmospheric composition, geographic location, and time.
Alchemy is an ancient branch of natural philosophy, a philosophical and protoscientific tradition that was historically practised in China, India, the Muslim world, and Europe. In its Western form, alchemy is first attested in a number of pseudepigraphical texts written in Greco-Roman Egypt during the first few centuries AD. Greek-speaking alchemists often referred to their craft as "the Art" (τέχνη) or "Knowledge" (ἐπιστήμη), and it was often characterised as mystic (μυστική), sacred (ἱɛρά), or divine (θɛíα).
Algae is an informal umbrella term for any organisms from a large and diverse group of photosynthetic autotrophs/mixotrophs that are not plants (embryophytes), and includes species from numerous distinctly unrelated clades. Such organisms range from microscopic unicellular microalgae, which include cyanobacteria and phytoplankton such as Chlorella, Porphyridium and diatoms; to multicellular macroalgae such as ulvophytes, nori and kelp, which may grow up to 50 metres (160 ft) in length. Most algae are aquatic organisms, some in cohesive colonies, and macroscopic marine algae with complex, multicellular colonial structures are called seaweeds. The most complex freshwater algae are the Charophyta, a division of green algae which includes Spirogyra and stoneworts, the latter of which morphologically resemble aquatic grass. Most algae are planktons carried passively by water, although some macroalgae have developed holdfast structures that provide sessile anchorage. Algae exhibit a wide range of reproductive strategies, from simple asexual mitotic proliferation to complex forms of sexual reproduction via spores.
Algorithmic may refer to:Algorithm, step-by-step instructions for a calculation
Algorithmic art, art made by an algorithm
Algorithmic composition, music made by an algorithm
Algorithmic trading, trading decisions made by an algorithm
Algorithmic patent, an intellectual property right in an algorithm
Algorithmics, the science of algorithms
Algorithmica, an academic journal for algorithm research
Algorithmic efficiency, the computational resources used by an algorithm
Algorithmic information theory, study of relationships between computation and information
Algorithmic mechanism design, the design of economic systems from an algorithmic point of view
Algorithmic number theory, algorithms for number-theoretic computation
Algorithmic game theory, game-theoretic techniques for algorithm design and analysis
Algorithmic cooling, a phenomenon in quantum computation
Algorithmic probability, a universal choice of prior probabilities in Solomonoff's theory of inductive inference.
As a literary device or artistic form, an allegory is a narrative or visual representation in which a character, place, or event can be interpreted to represent a meaning with moral or political significance. Authors have used allegory throughout history in all forms of art to illustrate or convey complex ideas and concepts in ways that are comprehensible or striking to its viewers, readers, or listeners.
An alliance is a relationship among people, groups, or states that have joined together for mutual benefit or to achieve some common purpose, whether an explicit agreement has been worked out among them. Members of an alliance are called allies. Alliances form in many settings, including political alliances, military alliances, and business alliances.
Alluvium is loose clay, silt, sand, or gravel that has been deposited by running water in a stream bed, on a floodplain, in an alluvial fan or beach, or in similar settings. Alluvium is also sometimes called alluvial deposit. Alluvium is typically geologically young and is not consolidated into solid rock. Sediments deposited underwater, in seas, estuaries, lakes, or ponds, are not described as alluvium.
Floodplain alluvium can be highly fertile, and supported some of the earliest human civilizations.
An almanac is a regularly published listing of a set of current information about one or multiple subjects. It includes information like weather forecasts, farmers' planting dates, tide tables, and other tabular data often arranged according to the calendar. Celestial figures and various statistics are found in almanacs, such as the rising and setting times of the Sun and Moon, dates of eclipses, hours of high and low tides, and religious festivals. The set of events noted in an almanac may be tailored for a specific group of readers, such as farmers, sailors, or astronomers.
Altruism is concern for the well-being, the life, of others independently of personal benefit or reciprocity.
Amalgam most commonly refers to:Amalgam (chemistry), mercury alloy
Amalgam (dentistry), material of silver tooth fillings
Bonded amalgam, used in dentistry.
An ambassador is an official envoy, especially a high-ranking diplomat who represents a state and is usually accredited to another sovereign state or to an international organization as the resident representative of their own government or sovereign; or appointed for a special and often temporary diplomatic assignment. The word is also used informally for people who are known, without national appointment, to represent certain professions, activities, and fields of endeavor, such as sales.
Ambiguity is a state in which the meaning of a phrase, statement, situation, or resolution is not explicitly defined, making for several plausible interpretations. It arises when available information lacks sufficient context or a shared frame, so people cannot reliably determine what the problem is, what matters, what causes what, or what solution would count as correct. As a result, interpretation depends heavily on prior experience, assumptions, and imagination.
Ammonoids are extinct, typically coiled-shelled cephalopods composing the subclass Ammonoidea. They are more closely related to living octopuses, squid, and cuttlefish than they are to nautiluses, which they resemble. The earliest ammonoids appeared during the Emsian stage of the Early Devonian, around 410-408 million years ago, with the last species vanishing during or soon after the Cretaceous–Paleogene extinction event approximately 66 million years ago. They are often called ammonites, which is most frequently used for members of the order Ammonitida, the only remaining group of ammonoids from the Jurassic up until their extinction.
Amnesty is defined as "A pardon extended by a government to a group or class of people, usually for a political offense; the act of a sovereign power officially forgiving certain classes of people who are subject to trial but have not yet been convicted." Though the term general pardon has a similar definition, an amnesty constitutes more than a pardon, in so much as it obliterates all legal remembrance of the offense. Amnesty is increasingly used to express the idea of "freedom" and to refer to when prisoners can go free.
An amphitheatre is an open-air venue used for entertainment, performances, and sports. The term derives from the ancient Greek ἀμφιθέατρον, from ἀμφί, meaning "on both sides" or "around" and θέατρον, meaning "place for viewing".
The amplitude of a periodic variable is a measure of its change in a single period. The amplitude of a non-periodic signal is its magnitude compared with a reference value. There are various definitions of amplitude, which are all functions of the magnitude of the differences between the variable's extreme values. In older texts, the phase of a periodic function is sometimes called the amplitude.

Anarchy is a form of society without rulers. As a type of stateless society, it is commonly contrasted with states, which are polities that claim a monopoly on violence over a permanent territory. Beyond a lack of government, it can more precisely refer to societies that lack any form of authority or hierarchy. While viewed positively by anarchists, the primary advocates of anarchy, it is viewed negatively by advocates of statism, who see it in terms of social disorder.
Anemia is a blood disorder in which the blood has a reduced ability to carry oxygen. This can be due to a lower than normal number of red blood cells, a reduction in the amount of hemoglobin available for oxygen transport, or abnormalities in hemoglobin that impair its function. The name is derived from Ancient Greek  ἀν- (an-) 'not' and  αἷμα (haima) 'blood'.
Flowering plants are plants that bear flowers and fruits, and form the clade Angiospermae. The term angiosperm is derived from the Greek words ἀγγεῖον and σπέρμα, meaning that the seeds are enclosed within a fruit. The group was formerly called Magnoliophyta.
Anguish is "extreme unhappiness caused by physical or mental suffering." The feeling of anguish is typically preceded by a tragedy or event that has a profound meaning to the being in question. Anguish can be felt physically or mentally.
Anhydrite, or anhydrous calcium sulfate, is a mineral with the chemical formula CaSO4. It is in the orthorhombic crystal system, with three directions of perfect cleavage parallel to the three planes of symmetry. It is not isomorphous with the orthorhombic barium (baryte) and strontium (celestine) sulfates, as might be expected from the chemical formulas. Distinctly developed crystals are somewhat rare, the mineral usually presenting the form of cleavage masses. The Mohs hardness is 3.5, and the specific gravity is 2.9. The color is white, sometimes greyish, bluish, or purple. On the best developed of the three cleavages, the lustre is pearly; on other surfaces it is glassy. When exposed to water, anhydrite readily transforms to the more commonly occurring gypsum, (CaSO4·2H2O) by the absorption of water. This transformation is reversible, with gypsum or calcium sulfate hemihydrate forming anhydrite by heating to around 200 °C (400 °F) under normal atmospheric conditions. Anhydrite is commonly associated with calcite, halite, and sulfides such as galena, chalcopyrite, molybdenite, and pyrite in vein deposits.
In particle physics, annihilation is the process that occurs when a subatomic particle collides with its respective antiparticle to produce other particles, such as an electron colliding with a positron to produce two photons. The total energy and momentum of the initial pair are conserved in the process and distributed among a set of other particles in the final state. Antiparticles have exactly opposite additive quantum numbers from particles, so the sums of all quantum numbers of such an original pair are zero. Hence, any set of particles may be produced whose total quantum numbers are also zero as long as conservation of energy, conservation of momentum, and conservation of spin are obeyed.
Annulus or annular indicates a ring- or donut-shaped area or structure. It may refer to:.
Anomaly, The Anomaly or Anomalies may refer to:.
Anorexia nervosa (AN), often referred to simply as anorexia, is an eating disorder characterized by predominant food restriction, body image disturbance, fear of gaining weight, and an overwhelming desire to be thin. These characteristics often means individuals undergo severe malnutrition as a result of the disorder.
The Antarctic is the polar region of Earth that surrounds the South Pole, lying within the Antarctic Circle. It is diametrically opposite of the Arctic region around the North Pole.
An antibody (Ab), or immunoglobulin (Ig), is a large protein belonging to the immunoglobulin superfamily which is used by the immune system to identify and neutralize antigens such as those that exist on bacteria and virus cells, including those that cause disease. Each individual antibody recognizes one or more specific antigens, and antigens of virtually any size and chemical composition can be recognized. Each of the branching chains comprising the "Y" of an antibody contains a paratope that specifically binds to one particular epitope on an antigen, allowing the two molecules to bind together with precision. Using this mechanism, antibodies can effectively "tag" the antigen for attack by cells of the immune system, or can neutralize it directly.
Antiquity or Antiquities may refer to:.
The aorta is the main and largest artery in the human body, originating from the left ventricle of the heart, branching upwards immediately after, and extending down to the abdomen, where it splits at the aortic bifurcation into two smaller arteries. The aorta distributes oxygenated blood to all parts of the body through the systemic circulation.
Aphasia, also known as dysphasia, is an impairment in a person's ability to comprehend or formulate language because of dysfunction in specific brain regions. The major causes are stroke and head trauma; prevalence is hard to determine, but aphasia due to stroke is estimated to be 0.1–0.4% in developed countries. Aphasia can also be the result of brain tumors, epilepsy, autoimmune neurological diseases like multiple sclerosis, infection of the brain, or neurodegenerative diseases like dementias.
Aphids are small sap-sucking insects in the family Aphididae. Common names include greenfly and blackfly, although individuals within a species can vary widely in color. The group includes the fluffy white woolly aphids. A typical life cycle involves flightless females giving live birth to female nymphs—who may also be already pregnant, an adaptation scientists call telescoping generations—without the involvement of males. Maturing rapidly, females breed profusely so that the number of these insects multiplies quickly. Winged females may develop later in the season, allowing the insects to colonize new plants. In temperate regions, a phase of sexual reproduction occurs in the autumn, with the insects often overwintering as eggs.
An apsis is the farthest or nearest point in the orbit of a planetary body about its primary body. The line of apsides is the line connecting the two extreme values.
Apothecary is an archaic English term for a medical professional who formulates and dispenses materia medicacode: lat promoted to code: la  ('medicine') to physicians, surgeons and patients. The modern terms pharmacist and, in British English, chemist have taken over this role.
Apparatus may refer to:Technical term for a body of the Soviet and post-Soviet governments
Machine
Equipment
Critical apparatus, the critical and primary source material that accompanies an edition of a text
"Apparatus" (song), a song by Bombus
"Apparatus", a song by Deadguy from the album Fixation on a Co-Worker, 1995
Apparatus (band), an electro-industrial group active during the nineties
Apparatus (album), 1995 release by the band Apparatus
Apparatus (journal), an academic journal on film
In gymnastics, any of the individual events, or the equipment used in performing the event
A piece of laboratory equipment
in anatomy, a group of organs, see Apparatus (anatomy).
Appeasement, in an international context, is a diplomatic negotiation policy of making political, material, or territorial concessions to an aggressive power with intention to avoid conflict. The term is most often applied to the foreign policy between 1935 and 1939 of the British governments of Prime Ministers Ramsay MacDonald, Stanley Baldwin and most notably Neville Chamberlain towards Nazi Germany and Fascist Italy. Under British pressure, appeasement of Nazism and Fascism also played a role in French foreign policy of the period but was always much less popular there than in the United Kingdom.
Appendix may refer to:.
Apprenticeship is a system for training potential new practitioners of a trade or profession with on-the-job training and often some accompanying study. Apprenticeships may also enable practitioners to gain a license to practice in a regulated occupation. Most of their training is done while working for an experienced employer who helps the apprentices learn their trade or profession, in exchange for their continued labor for an agreed period after they have achieved measurable competencies.
An aquifer is an underground layer of water-bearing material consisting of permeable or fractured rock, or of unconsolidated materials. Aquifers vary greatly in their characteristics. The study of water flow in aquifers and the characterization of aquifers is called hydrogeology. Related concepts include aquitard, a bed of low permeability along an aquifer, and aquiclude, a solid and impermeable region underlying or overlying an aquifer, the pressure of which could lead to the formation of a confined aquifer. Aquifers can be classified as saturated versus unsaturated; aquifers versus aquitards; confined versus unconfined; isotropic versus anisotropic; porous, karst, or fractured; and transboundary aquifer.
Arable relates to the growing of crops:Arable farming or agronomy, the cultivation of field crops
Arable land, land upon which crops are cultivated
Arable crops program, a consolidated support system operated under the EU Common Agricultural Policy
Fivehead Arable Fields, a Site of Special Scientific Interest in Somerset, England.
An arbiter or arbitrator is a person by whose decision the parties to a dispute agree to be bound in arbitration.
Arboreal locomotion is the locomotion of animals in trees. In habitats in which trees are present, animals have evolved to move in them. Some animals may scale trees only occasionally (scansorial), but others are exclusively arboreal. The habitats pose numerous mechanical challenges to animals moving through them and lead to a variety of anatomical, behavioral and ecological consequences as well as variations throughout different species. Furthermore, many of these same principles may be applied to climbing without trees, such as on rock piles or mountains.
Arcade most often refers to:Arcade game, a coin-operated video, pinball, electro-mechanical, redemption, etc., game
Arcade video game, a coin-operated video game
Arcade cabinet, housing which holds an arcade video game's hardware
Arcade system board, a standardized printed circuit board
Amusement arcade, a place with arcade games.

The concept of an archetype appears in areas relating to behavior, historical psychology, philosophy and literary analysis.
The Arctic is the polar region of Earth that surrounds the North Pole, lying north of the Arctic Circle. The Arctic region, from the IERS Reference Meridian travelling east, consists of parts of northern Norway, northernmost Sweden, northern Finland, Russia, the United States (Alaska), Canada, Danish Realm (Greenland), and northern Iceland, along with the Arctic Ocean and adjacent seas.
Ardor or Ardour may refer to:Ardor (album), a 1994 album by Love Spirals Downwards
Ardour (album), a 2010 album by instrumental hip hop/electronica producer Teebs
Ardor (film), a 2002 South Korean film, also known as Milae
Ardour (software), a hard disk recorder and digital audio workstation application
Ardour (river), a river in southwestern France
Ardore, a town in Calabria, Italy
Ardor: The Book of the Dead Man, Vol. 2, a book of poems by Marvin Bell
Ada or Ardor: A Family Chronicle, a novel by Vladimir Nabokov.
A cant is the jargon or language of a group, often employed to exclude or mislead people outside the group. It may also be called a cryptolect, argot, pseudo-language, anti-language or secret language. Each term differs slightly in meaning; their uses are inconsistent.
Aridity is the condition of geographical regions which make up approximately 43% of total global available land area, characterized by low annual precipitation, increased temperatures, and limited water availability. These areas tend to fall upon degraded soils, and their health and functioning are key necessities of regulating ecosystems’ atmospheric components.
Aristocracy is a form of government that places power in the hands of a small, privileged ruling class, the aristocrats.
An armistice is a formal agreement of warring parties to stop fighting. It is not necessarily the end of a war, as it may constitute only a cessation of hostilities while an attempt is made to negotiate a lasting peace. It is derived from the Latin arma, meaning "arms" and -stitium, meaning "a stopping".
Aromatherapy is a practice based on the use of aromatic materials, including essential oils and other aroma compounds, with claims for improving psychological well-being. It is used as a complementary therapy or as a form of alternative medicine, and typically is used via inhalation and not by ingestion.
Arrhythmias, also known as cardiac arrhythmias, are irregularities in the heartbeat, including when it is too fast or too slow. Essentially, this is anything but normal sinus rhythm. A resting heart rate that is too fast – above 100 beats per minute in adults – is called tachycardia, and a resting heart rate that is too slow – below 60 beats per minute – is called bradycardia. Some types of arrhythmias have no symptoms. Symptoms, when present, may include palpitations or feeling a pause between heartbeats. In more serious cases, there may be lightheadedness, passing out, shortness of breath, chest pain, or decreased level of consciousness. While most cases of arrhythmia are not serious, some predispose a person to complications such as stroke or heart failure. Others may result in sudden death.
Arsenic is a chemical element; it has the symbol As and atomic number 33. It is a metalloid and one of the pnictogens, and therefore shares many properties with its group 15 neighbors phosphorus and antimony. Arsenic is notoriously toxic. It occurs naturally in many minerals, usually in combination with sulfur and metals, but also as a pure elemental crystal. It has various allotropes, but only the grey form, which has a metallic appearance, is important to industry.
Artifact or artefact may refer to:.
An artisan is a skilled craft worker who makes or creates material objects partly or entirely by hand. These objects may be functional or strictly decorative, for example furniture, decorative art, sculpture, clothing, food items, household items, and tools and mechanisms such as the handmade clockwork movement of a watchmaker. Artisans practice a craft and may through experience and aptitude reach the expressive levels of an artist.
Ascent or The Ascent may refer to:.
An ashram is a spiritual hermitage or a monastery in Hinduism.
Asphalt most often refers to:Bitumen, also known as "liquid asphalt cement" or simply "asphalt", a viscous form of petroleum mainly used as a binder in asphalt concrete
Asphalt concrete, a mixture of bitumen with coarse and fine aggregates, used as a road surface.
Aspiration or aspirations may refer to:.
An assay is an investigative (analytic) procedure in laboratory medicine, mining, pharmacology, environmental biology and molecular biology for qualitatively assessing or quantitatively measuring the presence, amount, or functional activity of a target entity. The measured entity is often called the analyte, the measurand, or the target of the assay. The analyte can be a drug, biochemical substance, chemical element or compound, or cell in an organism or organic sample. An assay usually aims to measure an analyte's intensive property and express it in the relevant measurement unit.
An astrolabe is an astronomical instrument dating to ancient times. It serves as a star chart and physical model of the visible half-dome of the sky. Its various functions also make it an elaborate inclinometer and an analog calculation device capable of working out several kinds of problems in astronomy. In its simplest form it is a metal disc with a pattern of wires, cutouts, and perforations that allows a user to calculate astronomical positions precisely. It is able to measure the altitude above the horizon of a celestial body, day or night; it can be used to identify stars or planets, to determine local latitude given local time, to survey, or to triangulate. It was used in classical antiquity, the Byzantine Empire, the Islamic Golden Age, the European Middle Ages and the Age of Discovery for all these purposes.
Asylum may refer to:.
An atoll is a ring-shaped island, including a coral rim that encircles a lagoon. There may be coral islands or cays on the rim. Atolls are located in warm tropical or subtropical parts of the oceans and seas where corals can develop. Most of the approximately 440 atolls in the world are in the Pacific Ocean.
In physics, attenuation is the gradual loss of flux intensity through a medium. For instance, dark glasses attenuate sunlight, lead attenuates X-rays, and water and air attenuate both light and sound at variable attenuation rates.
An auction is usually a process of buying and selling goods or services by offering them up for bids, taking bids, and then selling the item to the highest bidder or buying the item from the lowest bidder. Some exceptions to this definition exist and are described in the section about different types. The branch of economic theory dealing with auction types and participants' behavior in auctions is called auction theory.
Auditory means of or relating to the process of hearing:Auditory system, the neurological structures and pathways of sound perception
Auditory bulla, part of auditory system found in mammals other than primates
Auditory nerve, also known as the cochlear nerve is one of two parts of a cranial nerve
Auditory ossicles, three bones in the middle ear that transmit sounds
Hearing (sense), the auditory sense, the sense by which sound is perceived
Ear, the auditory end organ
Cochlea, the auditory branch of the inner ear
Sound, the physical signal perceived by the auditory system
External auditory meatus, the ear canal
Primary auditory cortex, the part of the higher-level of the brain that serves hearing
Auditory agnosia
Auditory exclusion, a form of temporary hearing loss under high stress
Auditory feedback, an aid to control speech production and singing
Auditory hallucination, perceiving sounds without auditory stimulus
Auditory illusion, sound trick analogous to an optical illusion
Auditory imagery, hearing in head in the absence of sound
Auditory learning, learning by listening
Auditory phonetics, the science of the sounds of language
Auditory scene analysis, the process by which a scene containing many sounds is perceived
Auditory science, concerning the perception of sound

.
Augury was a Greco-Roman religious practice of observing the behavior of birds, to receive omens. When the individual, known as the augur, read these signs, it was referred to as "taking the auspices". "Auspices" means "looking at birds". Auspex, another word for augur, can be translated to "one who looks at birds". Depending upon the birds, the auspices from the gods could be favorable or unfavorable. Sometimes politically motivated augurs would fabricate unfavorable auspices in order to delay certain state functions, such as elections. Pliny the Elder attributes the invention of auspicy to Tiresias the seer of Thebes.
An aureola or aureole is the radiance of luminous cloud which, in paintings of sacred personages, surrounds the whole figure.
Autarky is the characteristic of self-sufficiency, usually applied to societies, communities, states, and their economic systems.
An autoclave is a machine used to carry out industrial and scientific processes requiring elevated temperature and pressure in relation to ambient pressure and temperature. Autoclaves are found in many medical settings, laboratories, and other places that need to ensure the sterility of an object.
An autopsy is a surgical procedure that consists of a thorough examination of a corpse by dissection to determine the cause, mode, and manner of death; or the exam may be performed to evaluate any disease or injury that may be present for research or educational purposes. The term necropsy is generally used for non-human animals.
Auxins are a class of plant hormones with some morphogen-like characteristics. Auxins play a cardinal role in coordination of many growth and behavioral processes in plant life cycles and are essential for plant body development. The Dutch biologist Frits Warmolt Went first described auxins and their role in plant growth in the 1920s.
Kenneth V. Thimann became the first to isolate one of these phytohormones and to determine its chemical structure as indole-3-acetic acid (IAA). Went and Thimann co-authored a book on plant hormones, Phytohormones, in 1937.
Greed is an insatiable desire for material gain or social value, such as status or power.
Aviation includes the activities surrounding mechanical flight and the aircraft industry. Aircraft include fixed-wing and rotary-wing types, morphable wings, wing-less lifting bodies, as well as lighter-than-air aircraft such as hot air balloons and airships.
Avulsion in general refers to a tearing away. Specifically, it can refer to:Avulsion fracture, when a fragment of bone tears away from the main mass of bone as a result of physical trauma
Avulsion injury, in which a body structure is detached from its normal point of insertion, either torn away by trauma or cut by surgery
Avulsion, the sudden loss of land by the action of water
Avulsion (river), abandonment of an old river channel and the formation of a new one

.
Axial may refer to:one of the anatomical directions describing relationships in an animal body
In geometry:a geometric term of location
an axis of rotationIn chemistry, referring to an axial bond
a type of modal frame, in music
axial-flow, a type of fan
the Axial Age in China, India, etc.
Axial Seamount and submarine volcano off Oregon, USA
Axial, Colorado, a ghost town.
An azimuth is the horizontal angle from a cardinal direction, most commonly north, in a local or observer-centric spherical coordinate system.
A bactericide or bacteriocide, sometimes abbreviated Bcidal, is a substance which kills bacteria. Bactericides are disinfectants, antiseptics, or antibiotics.
However, material surfaces can also have bactericidal properties based solely on their physical surface structure, as for example biomaterials like insect wings.
A bailiff is a manager, overseer or custodian – a legal officer to whom some degree of authority or jurisdiction is given. There are different kinds, and their offices and scope of duties vary.
Bakelite, formally poly­oxy­benzyl­methylen­glycol­anhydride, is a thermosetting phenol formaldehyde resin, formed from a condensation reaction of phenol with formaldehyde. The first plastic made from synthetic components, it was developed by Belgian chemist Leo Baekeland in Yonkers, New York, in 1907, and patented on December 7, 1909.
A balcony is a platform projecting from the wall of a building, supported by columns or console brackets, and enclosed with a balustrade, usually above the ground floor. They are commonly found on multi-level houses, apartments, and cruise ships.
Ballast is dense material used as a weight to provide stability to a vehicle or structure. Ballast, other than cargo, may be placed in a vehicle, often a ship or the gondola of a balloon or airship, to provide stability. A compartment within a boat, ship, submarine, or other floating structure that holds water is called a ballast tank. Water can be moved in and out from the ballast tank to balance the ship. In a vessel that travels on the water, the ballast will be kept below the water level, to counteract the effects of weight above the water level. The ballast may be redistributed in the vessel or disposed of altogether to change its effects on the movement of the vessel.
A banyan, also spelled banian, is a fig that develops accessory trunks from adjacent prop roots, allowing the tree to spread outwards indefinitely. This distinguishes banyans from other trees with a strangler habit that begin life as an epiphyte, i.e. a plant that grows on another plant, when its seed germinates in a crack or crevice of a host tree or edifice. "Banyan" often specifically denotes Ficus benghalensis, which is the national tree of India, though the name has also been generalized to denominate all figs that share a common life cycle and used systematically in taxonomy to denominate the subgenus Urostigma.
Barbarism, barbarity, or barbarous may refer to:Barbarism (linguistics), a non-standard word, expression, or pronunciation
Hybrid words, formerly called "barbarisms"
Any society construed as barbarian
Barbarian invasions, a period of migrations within or into Europe in the middle of the first millennium AD.
A baritone is a type of classical male singing voice whose vocal range lies between the bass and the tenor voice-types. It is the most common male voice. The term originates from the Greek βαρύτονος (barýtonos), meaning "low sounding". Composers typically write music for this voice in the range from the second F below middle C to the F above middle C (i.e. F2–F4) in choral music, and from the second G below middle C to the G above middle C (G2 to G4) in operatic music, but the range can extend at either end. Subtypes of baritone include the baryton-Martin baritone (light baritone), lyric baritone, Kavalierbariton, Verdi baritone, dramatic baritone, baryton-noble baritone, and the bass-baritone.
Barley, a member of the grass family, is a major cereal grain grown in temperate climates globally. One of the first cultivated grains, it was domesticated in the Fertile Crescent around 9000 BC, giving it nonshattering spikelets and making it much easier to harvest. Its use then spread throughout Eurasia by 2000 BC. Barley prefers relatively low temperatures and well-drained soil to grow. It is relatively tolerant of drought and soil salinity, but is less winter-hardy than wheat or rye.
The Baroque is a Western style of architecture, music, dance, painting, sculpture, poetry, and other arts that flourished from the early 17th century until the 1750s. It followed Renaissance art and Mannerism and preceded the Rococo and Neoclassical styles. It was encouraged by the Catholic Church as a means to counter the simplicity and austerity of Protestant architecture, art, and music, though Lutheran Baroque art developed in parts of Europe as well.
A barrister is a type of lawyer in common law jurisdictions that originated from the Inns of Court in the medieval English legal system. Barristers mostly specialise in courtroom advocacy and litigation. Their tasks include arguing cases in courts and tribunals, drafting legal pleadings, researching the law and giving legal opinions.
A basement is any floor of a building that is not above the grade plane. Especially in residential buildings, it often is used as a utility space for a building, where such items as the furnace, water heater, breaker panel or fuse box, car park, and air-conditioning system are located; so also are amenities such as the electrical system and cable television distribution point. In cities with high property prices, such as London, basements are often fitted out to a high standard and used as living space.
In Ancient Roman architecture, a basilica was a large public building with multiple functions that was typically built alongside the town's forum. The basilica was in the Latin West equivalent to a stoa in the Greek East. The building gave its name to the basilica architectural form.
A bastion is a structure projecting outward from the curtain wall of a fortification, most commonly angular in shape and positioned at the corners of the fort. The fully developed bastion consists of two faces and two flanks, with fire from the flanks being able to protect the curtain wall and the adjacent bastions. Compared with the medieval fortified towers they replaced, bastion fortifications offered a greater degree of passive resistance and more scope for ranged defence in the age of gunpowder artillery. As military architecture, the bastion is one element in the style of fortification dominant from the mid 16th to mid 19th centuries.
Bauxite is a sedimentary rock with a relatively high aluminium content. It is the world's main source of aluminium and gallium. Bauxite consists mostly of the aluminium minerals gibbsite, boehmite, and diaspore, mixed with the two iron oxides goethite and hematite, the aluminium clay mineral kaolinite and small amounts of anatase and ilmenite .
Bauxite appears dull in luster and is reddish-brown, white, or tan.
A beacon is an intentionally conspicuous device designed to attract attention to a specific location. A common example is the lighthouse, which draws attention to a fixed point that can be used to navigate around obstacles or into port. More modern examples include a variety of radio beacons that can be read on radio direction finders in all weather, and radar transponders that appear on radar displays.
Beetles are insects that form the order Coleoptera, in the superorder Holometabola. Their front pair of wings are hardened into wing-cases, elytra, distinguishing them from most other insects. The Coleoptera, with about 400,000 described species, is the largest of all orders, constituting almost 40% of described arthropods and 25% of all known animal species; new species are discovered frequently, with estimates suggesting that there are between 0.9 and 2.1 million total species.
The belfry is a structure enclosing bells for ringing as part of a building, usually as part of a bell tower or steeple. It can also refer to the entire tower or building, particularly in continental Europe for such a tower attached to a city hall or other civic building.
A belief is a subjective attitude that something is true or a state of affairs is the case. A subjective attitude is a mental state of having some stance, take, or opinion about something. In epistemology, philosophers use the term belief to refer to attitudes about the world which can be either true or false. To believe something is to take it to be true; for instance, to believe that snow is white is comparable to accepting the truth of the proposition "snow is white". However, holding a belief does not require active introspection. For example, few individuals carefully consider whether or not the sun will rise the next morning, simply assuming that it will. Moreover, beliefs need not be occurrent, but can instead be dispositional.
The benthic zone is the ecological region at the lowest level of a body of water such as an ocean, lake, or stream, including the sediment surface and some sub-surface layers. The name comes from the Ancient Greek word βένθος (bénthos), meaning "the depths". Organisms living in this zone are called benthos and include microorganisms as well as larger invertebrates, such as crustaceans and polychaetes.
Beryl ( BERR-əl) is a mineral composed of beryllium aluminium silicate with the chemical formula Be3Al2(SiO3)6. Well-known varieties of beryl include emerald and aquamarine. Naturally occurring hexagonal crystals of beryl can be up to several meters in size, but terminated crystals are relatively rare. Pure beryl is colorless, but it is frequently tinted by impurities; possible colors are green, blue, yellow, pink, and red (the rarest). It is an ore source of beryllium.
Bifurcation or bifurcated may refer to:.
In European militaries, a billet is a living-quarters to which a soldier is assigned to sleep. In American usage, it refers to a specific personnel position, assignment, or duty station to which a soldier can be assigned. Historically, a billet was a private dwelling that was required to accept a soldier.
Biomechanics is the study of the structure, function and motion of the mechanical aspects of biological systems, at any level from whole organisms to organs, cells and cell organelles, and even proteins using the methods of mechanics. Biomechanics is a branch of biophysics.
A biopsy is a medical test commonly performed by a surgeon, an interventional radiologist, or an interventional cardiologist. The process involves the extraction of sample cells or tissues for examination to determine the presence or extent of a disease. The tissue is then fixed, dehydrated, embedded, sectioned, stained and mounted before it is generally examined under a microscope by a pathologist; it may also be analyzed chemically. When an entire lump or suspicious area is removed, the procedure is called an excisional biopsy. An incisional biopsy or core biopsy samples a portion of the abnormal tissue without attempting to remove the entire lesion or tumor. When a sample of tissue or fluid is removed with a needle in such a way that cells are removed without preserving the histological architecture of the tissue cells, the procedure is called a needle aspiration biopsy. Biopsies are most commonly performed for insight into possible cancerous or inflammatory conditions.
Birth rate, also known as natality and crude birth rate, is the total number of live human births per 1,000 population for a given period divided by the length of the period in years. The number of live births is normally taken from a universal registration system for births, or population counts from a census. The birth rate is used to calculate population growth. The estimated average population may be taken as the mid-year population.
In church governance, a diocese or bishopric is the ecclesiastical district under the jurisdiction of a bishop.
Bitumen is an immensely viscous constituent of petroleum. Depending on its exact composition, it can be a sticky, black liquid or an apparently solid mass that behaves as a liquid over very large time scales. In American English, the material is commonly referred to as asphalt. Whether found in natural deposits or refined from petroleum, the substance is classed as a pitch. Prior to the 20th century, the term asphaltum was in general use. The word derives from the Ancient Greek word ἄσφαλτος (ásphaltos), which referred to natural bitumen or pitch. The largest natural deposit of bitumen in the world is the Pitch Lake of southwest Trinidad, which is estimated to contain 10 million tons.
Blight is a specific symptom affecting plants in response to infection by a pathogenic organism.
A blizzard is a severe snowstorm characterized by strong sustained winds and low visibility, lasting for a prolonged period of time—typically at least three or four hours. A ground blizzard is a weather condition where snow that has already fallen is being blown by wind. Blizzards can have an immense size and usually stretch to hundreds or thousands of kilometres.
A blockade is the act of actively preventing a country or region from receiving or sending out food, supplies, weapons, or communications, and sometimes people, by military force.
A blockade differs from an embargo or sanction, which are legal barriers to trade rather than physical barriers. It is also distinct from a siege in that a blockade is usually directed at an entire country or region, rather than a fortress or city and the objective may not always be to conquer the area.
Bloom or blooming may refer to:.
In Buddhism, a bodhisattva is a person who has attained, or is striving towards, bodhi or Buddhahood. Often, the term specifically refers to a person who forgoes or delays personal nirvana or bodhi in order to compassionately help other individuals reach Buddhahood.
Bole may refer to:.
Bondage may refer to:.
A borough is an administrative division in various English-speaking countries. In principle, the term borough designates a self-governing walled town, although in practice, official use of the term varies widely.
A botnet is a group of Internet-connected devices, each of which runs one or more bots. Botnets can be used to perform distributed denial-of-service (DDoS) attacks, steal data, send spam, and allow the attacker to access the device and its connection. The owner can control the botnet using command and control (C&C) software. The word "botnet" is a portmanteau of the words "robot" and "network". The term is usually used with a negative or malicious connotation.
In geology, a boulder is a rock fragment with size greater than 25.9 cm (10.2 in) in diameter. Smaller pieces are called cobbles and pebbles. While a boulder may be small enough to move or roll manually, others are extremely massive. In common usage, a boulder is too large for a person to move. Smaller boulders are usually just called rocks or stones.
Bounty or bounties commonly refers to:Bounty (reward), an amount of money or other reward offered by an organization for a specific task done with a person or thing.
Bovidae is the biological family of cloven-hoofed, ruminant mammals that includes cattle, bison, buffalo, antelopes, and goat-antelopes such as sheep and goats. There are 143 extant species and 300 known extinct species of bovids, which are divided into either 11 major subfamilies, or two subfamilies with thirteen tribes. The earliest known bovid had evolved by 20 million years ago, in the early Miocene.
In botany, a bract is a modified or specialized leaf, associated with a reproductive structure such as a flower, inflorescence axis or cone scale.
Bracts are usually different from foliage leaves in size, color, shape or texture. They also look different from the parts of the flower, such as the petals or sepals.
Brass is an alloy of copper and zinc, in proportions which can be varied to achieve different colours and mechanical, electrical, acoustic, and chemical properties, but copper typically has the larger proportion, generally 2⁄3 copper and 1⁄3 zinc. In use since prehistoric times, it is a substitutional alloy; atoms of the two constituents may replace each other within the same crystal structure.
Breach, Breached, or The Breach may refer to:.
Brevity is concision or brevitas, the quality of being brief or concise, or:Brevity , a comic strip created by Guy Endore-Kaiser and Rodd Perry
Brevity code, a vocal word replacement system
Operation Brevity, a World War II battle

.
A brigade is a major tactical military formation that typically comprises three to six battalions plus supporting elements. It is roughly equivalent to an enlarged or reinforced regiment. Two or more brigades may constitute a division.
Brine is a high-concentration solution of salt in water. In diverse contexts, brine may refer to the salt solutions ranging from about 3.5% up to about 26%. Brine forms naturally due to evaporation of ground saline water but it is also generated in the mining of sodium chloride. Brine is used for food processing and cooking, for de-icing of roads and other structures, and in a number of technological processes. It is also a by-product of many industrial processes, such as desalination, so it requires wastewater treatment for proper disposal or further utilization.
A bristle is a stiff hair or feather, either on an animal, such as a pig, a plant, or on a tool such as a brush or broom.
A bronchus is a passage or airway in the lower respiratory tract that conducts air into the lungs. The first or primary bronchi to branch from the trachea at the carina are the right main bronchus and the left main bronchus. These are the widest bronchi, and enter the right lung, and the left lung at each hilum. The main bronchi branch into narrower secondary bronchi or lobar bronchi, and these branch into narrower tertiary bronchi or segmental bronchi. Further divisions of the segmental bronchi are known as 4th order, 5th order, and 6th order segmental bronchi, or grouped together as subsegmental bronchi.
The bronchi, when too narrow to be supported by cartilage, are known as bronchioles. No gas exchange takes place in the bronchi.
Bronze is an alloy consisting primarily of copper, commonly with about 12–12.5% tin and often with the addition of other metals and sometimes non-metals or metalloids. These additions produce a range of alloys some of which are harder than copper alone or have other useful properties, such as strength, ductility, or machinability.
Brotherhood or The Brotherhood may refer to:.
Bureau may refer to:.
Burgundy is a historical region in France, encompassing the territory of the former administrative region of the same name, that existed from 1982 to 2015, and was merged since 1 January 2016 into the newly created administrative region of Bourgogne-Franche-Comté, encompassing its western half. In historical terms, that region was formed as the Duchy of Burgundy, which existed between the 10th and the 18th century. During the late medieval and early modern periods, the region was of great political importance, being the core of the Valois-Burgundian State, and also becoming a focal point of diplomacy and courtly culture that set the fashion for European royal houses and their courts. The regional capital, Dijon, was wealthy and powerful, being a major European centre of art and science, and of Western Monasticism.
Burial, also known as interment or inhumation, is a method of final disposition whereby a dead body is placed into the ground, sometimes with objects. This is usually accomplished by excavating a pit or trench, placing the deceased and objects in it, and covering it over. A funeral is a ceremony that accompanies the final disposition.
Hessian, burlap in North America, or crocus in The Caribbean, is a woven fabric made of vegetable fibres: usually the skin of the jute plant, or sisal leaves. It is generally used for rough handling, such as to make sacks in which to ship farm products and sandbags, and for wrapping tree-root balls. However, this dense woven fabric, historically coarse, is also recently being produced in a more refined state—where it is known simply as jute—so as to provide an eco-friendly material for bags, rugs, and other products.
A bushel is an imperial and US customary unit of volume, based upon an earlier measure of dry capacity. The old bushel was used mostly for agricultural products, such as wheat: in modern usage, the volume is nominal, with bushels denoting a mass defined differently for each commodity.
In geomorphology, a butte is an isolated hill with steep, often vertical sides and a small, relatively flat top; buttes are smaller landforms than mesas, plateaus, and tablelands. The word butte comes from the French word butte, meaning 'knoll' ; its use is prevalent in the Western United States, including the Southwest, where mesa is used for the larger landform.
A by-law, is a set of rules or law established by an organization or community so as to regulate itself, as allowed or provided for by some higher authority. The higher authority, generally a legislature or some other government body, establishes the degree of control that the by-laws may exercise. By-laws may be established by entities such as a business corporation, a neighbourhood association, or depending on the jurisdiction, a municipality.
A cabal is a group of people who are united in some close design, usually to promote their private views or interests in an ideology, a state, or another community, often by intrigue and usually without the knowledge of those who are outside their group. The use of this term usually carries negative connotations of political purpose, conspiracy and secrecy. It can also refer to a secret plot or a clique, or it may be used as a verb.
Cache, caching, or caché may refer to:.
A cadastre or cadaster is a comprehensive recording of the real estate or real property's metes-and-bounds of a country.
Often it is represented graphically in a cadastral map.
The caduceus is the staff carried by Hermes in Greek mythology and consequently by Hermes Trismegistus in Greco-Egyptian mythology. The same staff was borne by other heralds like Iris, the messenger of Hera. The short staff is entwined by two serpents, sometimes surmounted by wings. In Roman iconography, it was depicted being carried in the left hand of Mercury, the messenger of the gods.
A caesura, also written cæsura and cesura, is a metrical pause or break in a verse where one phrase ends and another phrase begins. It may be expressed by a comma (,), a tick (✓), or two lines, either slashed (//) or upright (||). In time value, this break may vary between the slightest perception of silence all the way up to a full pause.

A cairn is a human-made pile of stones raised for a purpose, usually as a marker or as a burial mound. The word cairn comes from the Irish: carn.
Calamity may refer to:.
Calcite is a carbonate mineral and the most stable polymorph of calcium carbonate (CaCO3). It is a very common mineral, particularly as a component of limestone. Calcite defines hardness 3 on the Mohs scale of mineral hardness, based on scratch hardness comparison. Large calcite crystals are used in optical equipment, and limestone composed mostly of calcite has numerous uses.
A caldera is a large cauldron-like hollow that forms shortly after the emptying of a magma chamber in a volcanic eruption. The ejection of large volumes of magma in a short time can upset the integrity of a magma chamber's structure by in effect removing much of the chamber's filling material. The walls and ceiling of a chamber may now not be able to support its own weight and any substrate or rock resting above. The ground surface then collapses into the emptied or partially emptied magma chamber, leaving a large depression at the surface that may have a diameter of dozens of kilometers. Although sometimes described as a crater, the feature is actually a type of sinkhole, as it is formed through subsidence and collapse rather than an explosion or impact. Compared to the thousands of volcanic eruptions that occur over the course of a century, the formation of a caldera is a rare event, occurring only a few times within a given window of 100 years. Only nine caldera-forming collapses are known to have occurred between 1911 and 2022, with the caldera collapses at Kīlauea, Hawaii, in 2018 and Hunga Tonga–Hunga Haʻapai in 2022 being the most recent. Volcanoes that have formed a caldera are sometimes described as "caldera volcanoes".
A caliphate is an institution or public office under the leadership of an Islamic steward with the title of caliph, a person considered a political–religious successor to the Islamic prophet Muhammad and a leader of the entire Muslim world (ummah). Historically, the caliphates were polities based on Islam which developed into multi-ethnic trans-national empires.
Calligraphy is fine handwriting taken to the level of visual art. It involves the design and execution of lettering or characters using a pen, ink brush, or other writing instruments. Classical calligraphy differs from type design and non-classical hand-lettering, though some calligraphers may practice both.
The calorie is a unit of energy that originated from the caloric theory of heat. The small calorie or gram calorie is defined as the amount of heat needed to raise the temperature of one milliliter of water by one degree Celsius (or one kelvin). The large calorie, calorie of food, dietary calorie, kilogram calorie, or kilocalorie (kcal) is defined as the amount of heat needed to raise the temperature of one liter of water by one degree Celsius. Thus, 1 large calorie is equal to 1,000 small calories (1 kcal = 1000 cal).
Calyx or calyce, from the Latin calix which itself comes from the Ancient Greek κάλυξ (kálux) meaning "husk" or "pod", may refer to:.
A cambium, in plants, is a tissue layer that provides partially undifferentiated cells for plant growth. It is found in the area between xylem and phloem. A cambium can also be defined as a cellular plant tissue from which phloem, xylem, or cork grows by division, resulting in secondary thickening. It forms parallel rows of cells, which result in secondary tissues.
Camelidae is a family of mammals belonging to the ungulate order Artiodactyla and the only living family in the suborder Tylopoda. The seven extant species of camelid are divided into two tribes, Camelini, including dromedary camels, Bactrian camels and wild Bactrian camels, and Lamini, including llamas, alpacas, vicuñas, and guanacos.
A bell tower is a tower that contains one or more bells, or that is designed to hold bells even if it has none. Such a tower commonly serves as part of a Christian church, and will contain church bells, but there are also many secular bell towers, often part of a municipal building, an educational establishment, or a tower built specifically to house a carillon. Church bell towers often incorporate clocks, and secular towers usually do, as a public service.
Canidae is a biological family of caniform carnivorans, constituting a clade. A member of this family is a canid, colloquially referred to as dogs. The family includes three subfamilies: the Caninae, and the extinct Borophaginae and Hesperocyoninae. The Caninae are the canines, and include domestic dogs, wolves, coyotes, raccoon dogs, foxes, jackals and other species.
A canoe is a lightweight, narrow water vessel, typically pointed at both ends and open on top, propelled by one or more seated or kneeling paddlers facing the direction of travel and using paddles.
In the context of Christian liturgy, a canticle is a psalm-like song with biblical lyrics taken from elsewhere than the Book of Psalms, but included in psalters and books such as the breviary. Of special importance to the Divine Office are three New Testament Canticles that are the climaxes of the Offices of Lauds, Vespers and Compline; these are respectively Benedictus, Magnificat and Nunc dimittis. There are also a number of Canticles taken from the Old Testament.
A capillary is a small blood vessel, from 5 to 10 micrometres in diameter, and is part of the microcirculation system. Capillaries are microvessels and the smallest blood vessels in the body. They are composed of only the tunica intima, consisting of a thin wall of simple squamous endothelial cells. They are the site of the exchange of many substances from the surrounding interstitial fluid, and they convey blood from the smallest branches of the arteries (arterioles) to those of the veins (venules). Other substances which cross capillaries include water, oxygen, carbon dioxide, urea, glucose, uric acid, lactic acid and creatinine. Lymph capillaries connect with larger lymph vessels to drain lymphatic fluid collected in microcirculation.
Capstone may refer to:.
A carapace is a dorsal (upper) section of the exoskeleton or shell in a number of animal groups, including arthropods, such as crustaceans and arachnids, as well as vertebrates, such as turtles and tortoises. In turtles and tortoises, the underside is called the plastron.
Caravan or caravans may refer to:.
In chemistry, a carbide usually describes a compound composed of carbon and a metal. In metallurgy, carbiding or carburizing is the process for producing carbide coatings on a metal piece.
Carcinoma is a malignancy that develops from epithelial cells. Specifically, a carcinoma is a cancer that begins in a tissue that lines the inner or outer surfaces of the body, and that arises from cells originating in the endodermal, mesodermal or ectodermal germ layer during embryogenesis.
Cardinal or The Cardinal most commonly refers toCardinal, a senior official of the Catholic Church
Member of the College of Cardinals
Cardinal number in mathematics
Large cardinal
Cardinal direction, one of the primary directions: north, south, east, and west.
Caretaker may refer to:.
A carillon ( KARR-ə-lon, kə-RIL-yən) is a pitched percussion instrument that is played with a keyboard and consists of at least 23 bells. The bells are cast in bronze, hung in fixed suspension, and tuned in chromatic order so that they can be sounded harmoniously together. They are struck with clappers connected to a keyboard of wooden batons played with the hands and pedals played with the feet. Often housed in bell towers, carillons are usually owned by churches, universities, or municipalities. They can include an automatic system through which the time is announced and simple tunes are played throughout the day.
A carnivore, or meat-eater, is an animal or plant whose nutrition and energy requirements are met by consumption of animal tissues as food, whether through predation or scavenging.
Gynoecium is most commonly used as a collective term for the parts of a flower that produce ovules and ultimately develop into the fruit and seeds. The gynoecium is the innermost whorl of a flower; it consists of pistils and is typically surrounded by the pollen-producing reproductive organs, the stamens, collectively called the androecium. The gynoecium is often referred to as the "female" portion of the flower, although rather than directly producing female gametes, the gynoecium produces megaspores, each of which develops into a female gametophyte which then produces egg cells.
A carriage is a two- or four-wheeled horse-drawn vehicle for passengers. In Europe they were a common mode of transport for the wealthy during the Roman Empire, and then again from around 1600 until they were replaced by the motor car around 1900. They were generally owned by the rich, but second-hand private carriages became common public transport, the equivalent of modern cars used as taxis. Carriage suspensions are by leather strapping or, on those made in recent centuries, steel springs. There are numerous names for different types. Two-wheeled carriages are usually owner-driven.
A cartel is a group of independent market participants who collaborate with each other and avoid competing with each other in order to improve their profits and dominate the market. They seek to limit competition, fix prices, and increase prices by creating artificial shortages through low production quotas, stockpiling, and marketing quotas. Jurisdictions frequently consider cartelization to be anti-competitive behavior, leading them to outlaw or curtail cartel practices. Anti-trust law targets cartel behavior in markets.
Cartography is the study and practice of making and using maps. Combining science, aesthetics and technique, cartography builds on the premise that reality can be modeled in ways that communicate spatial information effectively.
Cascade, or Cascading may refer to:.
A castellan, or constable, was the governor of a castle in medieval Europe. Its surrounding territory was referred to as the castellany.
Castor most commonly refers to:Castor (star), a star in the Gemini constellation
Castor, a genus name of the beaver
Castor, one of the Dioscuri/Gemini twins Castor and Pollux in Greco-Roman mythology
Caster or castor, a small undriven wheel.
Catalpa, commonly also called catawba, is a genus of flowering plants in the family Bignoniaceae, native to warm temperate and subtropical regions of North America, the Caribbean, and East Asia.
A catapult is a ballistic device used to launch a projectile at a great distance without the aid of gunpowder or other propellants – particularly various types of ancient and medieval siege engines. A catapult uses the sudden release of stored potential energy to propel its payload. Most convert tension or torsion energy that was more slowly and manually built up within the device before release, via springs, bows, twisted rope, elastic, or any of numerous other materials and mechanisms which allow the catapult to launch a projectile such as rocks, cannon balls, or debris.
In physics and geometry, a catenary is the curve that an idealized hanging chain or cable assumes under its own weight when supported only at its ends in a uniform gravitational field.
A cathedral is a church that contains the cathedra of a bishop, thus serving as the central church of a diocese, conference, or episcopate. Churches with the function of "cathedral" are usually specific to those Christian denominations with an episcopal hierarchy, such as the Catholic, Eastern Orthodox, Anglican, and some Lutheran churches. Church buildings embodying the functions of a cathedral first appeared in Italy, Gaul, Spain, and North Africa in the 4th century, but cathedrals did not become universal within the Western Catholic Church until the 12th century, by which time they had developed architectural forms, institutional structures, and legal identities distinct from parish churches, monastic churches, and episcopal residences. The cathedral is more important in the hierarchy than the church because it is from the cathedral that the bishop governs the area under their administrative authority.
An ion is an atom or molecule with a net electrical charge. The charge of an electron is considered to be negative by convention and this charge is equal and opposite to the charge of a proton, which is considered to be positive by convention. The net charge of an ion is not zero because its total number of electrons is unequal to its total number of protons.
A caucus is a group or meeting of supporters or members of a specific political party or movement. The exact definition varies between different countries and political cultures.
Causation may refer to:.
Historically, cavalry are groups of soldiers or warriors who fight mounted on horseback. Until the 20th century, cavalry were the most mobile of the combat arms, operating as light cavalry in the roles of reconnaissance, screening, and skirmishing, or as heavy cavalry for decisive economy of force and shock attacks. An individual soldier in the cavalry is known by a number of designations depending on era and tactics, such as a cavalryman, horseman, trooper, cataphract, knight, drabant, hussar, uhlan, mamluk, cuirassier, lancer, dragoon, samurai or horse archer. The designation of cavalry was not usually given to any military forces that used other animals or platforms for mounts, such as chariots, camels or elephants. Infantry who moved on horseback, but dismounted to fight on foot, were known in the early 17th to the early 18th century as dragoons, a class of mounted infantry which in most armies later evolved into standard cavalry while retaining their historic designation.
Caves and caverns are natural voids under the surface of the Earth and have been observed in other rocky worlds also. Caves often form by the weathering of rock and can extend deep underground. Exogene caves are smaller openings that extend a relatively short distance underground. Caves which extend farther underground than the opening is wide are called endogene caves.
Cedar may refer to:.
Celadon is a term for pottery denoting both wares glazed in the jade green celadon color, also known as greenware or "green ware", and a type of transparent glaze, often with small cracks, that was first used on greenware, but later used on other porcelains. Celadon originated in China, though the term is purely European, and notable kilns such as the Longquan kiln in Zhejiang province are renowned for their celadon glazes. Celadon production later spread to other parts of East Asia, such as Japan and Korea, as well as Southeast Asian countries, such as Thailand. Eventually, European potteries produced some pieces, but it was never a major element there. Finer pieces are in porcelain, but both the color and the glaze can be produced in stoneware and earthenware. Most of the earlier Longquan celadon is on the border of stoneware and porcelain, meeting the Chinese but not the European definitions of porcelain.
A censer, incense burner, perfume burner or pastille burner is a vessel made for burning incense or perfume in some solid form. They vary greatly in size, form, and material of construction, and have been in use since ancient times throughout the world. They may consist of simple earthenware bowls or fire pots to intricately carved silver or gold vessels, small table top objects a few centimetres tall to as many as several metres high. Many designs use openwork to allow a flow of air. In many cultures, burning incense has spiritual and religious connotations, and this influences the design and decoration of the censer.
A census is the procedure of systematically acquiring, recording, and calculating information about the members of a given population, which are then usually displayed through statistics. This term is used mostly in connection with national population and housing censuses; other common censuses include censuses of agriculture, traditional culture, business, supplies, and traffic censuses. The United Nations (UN) defines the essential features of population and housing censuses as "individual enumeration, universality within a defined territory, simultaneity and defined periodicity", and recommends that population censuses be taken at least every ten years. UN recommendations also cover census topics to be collected, official definitions, classifications, and other useful information to coordinate international practices.
A ceremony is a unified ritualistic event with a purpose, usually consisting of a number of artistic components, performed on a special occasion.
Earwax, also known by the medical term cerumen, is a waxy substance secreted in the ear canal of humans and other mammals. Earwax can be many colors, including brown, orange, red, yellowish, and gray. Earwax protects the skin of the human ear canal, assists in cleaning and lubrication, and provides protection against bacteria, fungi, particulate matter, and water.
No summary available.
A chalice is a drinking cup raised on a stem with a foot or base. Although it is a technical archaeological term, in modern parlance the word is now used almost exclusively for the cups used in Christian liturgy as part of a service of the Eucharist, such as a Catholic mass. These are normally made of metal, but neither the shape nor the material is a requirement. Most have no handles, and in recent centuries the cup at the top has usually been a simple flared shape.
Chamberlain may refer to:.
In church architecture, the chancel is the space around the altar, including the choir and the sanctuary, at the liturgical east end of a traditional Christian church building. It may terminate in an apse.
Chandler or The Chandler may refer to:.
A chant is the iterative speaking or singing of words or sounds, often primarily on one or two main pitches called reciting tones. Chants may range from a simple melody involving a limited set of notes to highly complex musical structures, often including a great deal of repetition of musical subphrases, such as Great Responsories and Offertories of Gregorian chant. Chant may be considered speech, music, or a heightened or stylized form of speech. In the Late Middle Ages, some religious chant evolved into song.
Chaparral is a shrubland plant community found primarily in California, southern Oregon, and northern Baja California, part of the California floristic province. It is shaped by a Mediterranean climate and infrequent, high-intensity crown fires. Many chaparral shrubs have hard sclerophyllous evergreen leaves, as contrasted with the associated soft-leaved, drought-deciduous, scrub community of coastal sage scrub, found often on drier, southern-facing slopes.
Charcoal is a lightweight black carbon residue produced by strongly heating wood in minimal oxygen to remove all water and volatile constituents. In the traditional version of this pyrolysis process, called charcoal burning, often by forming a charcoal kiln, the heat is supplied by burning part of the starting material itself, with a limited supply of oxygen. The material can also be heated in a closed retort. Modern charcoal briquettes used for outdoor cooking may contain many other additives, e.g. coal.
Charisma is a personal quality of magnetic charm, persuasion, or appeal.
A charter is the grant of authority or rights, stating that the granter formally recognizes the prerogative of the recipient to exercise the rights specified. It is implicit that the granter retains superiority, and that the recipient admits a limited status within the relationship, and it is within that sense that charters were historically granted, and it is that sense which is retained in modern usage of the term. In early medieval Britain, charters transferred land from donors to recipients.
In geology, a rift is a linear zone where the lithosphere is being pulled apart and is an example of extensional tectonics. Typical rift features are a central linear downfaulted depression, called a graben, or more commonly a half-graben with normal faulting and rift-flank uplifts mainly on one side. Where rifts remain above sea level they form a rift valley, which may be filled by water forming a rift lake. The axis of the rift area may contain volcanic rocks, and active volcanism is a part of many, but not all, active rift systems.
A chassis, is the load-bearing framework of a manufactured object, which structurally supports the object in its construction and function. An example of a chassis is a vehicle frame, the underpart of a motor vehicle, on which the body is mounted; if the running gear such as wheels and transmission, and sometimes even the driver's seat, are included, then the assembly is described as a rolling chassis.
Chert is a hard, fine-grained sedimentary rock composed of microcrystalline or cryptocrystalline quartz, the mineral form of silicon dioxide (SiO2). Chert is characteristically of biological origin, but may also occur inorganically as a chemical precipitate or a diagenetic replacement, as in petrified wood. Where chert occurs in chalk or marl, it is usually called flint.
A tribal chief, chieftain, or headman is a political leader of a social group commonly described as a tribe, band, or confederation of tribes. Chiefs’ authority varies widely by society and context, and in many cases depends on consensus and customary legitimacy rather than coercive power. In anthropology, terms such as tribe, chief, and chiefdom have been used in comparative models of sociopolitical organization, but the analytic use of tribe has also been widely criticized as imprecise and historically burdened. In some contemporary states, forms of chiefly authority are formally recognized or regulated by constitutions and statutes.
Chimera, Chimaera, or Chimaira originally referred to:Chimera (mythology), a fire-breathing monster of ancient Lycia said to combine parts from multiple animals
Mount Chimaera, a fire-spewing region of Lycia or Cilicia typically considered the inspiration for the myth.
The term chloride refers to a compound or molecule that contains either a chlorine anion, which is a negatively charged chlorine atom, or a non-charged chlorine atom covalently bonded to the rest of the molecule by a single bond. The pronunciation of the word "chloride" is.
A choir, also known as a chorale or chorus, is a musical ensemble of singers. Choral music, in turn, is the music written specifically for such an ensemble to perform or in other words is the music performed by the ensemble. Choirs may perform music from the classical music repertoire, which spans from the medieval era to the present, or popular music repertoire. Most choirs are led by a conductor, who leads the performances with arm, hand, and facial gestures.
A chordate is a bilaterian animal belonging to the phylum Chordata. All chordates possess, at some point during their larval or adult stages, five distinctive physical characteristics (synapomorphies) that distinguish them from other taxa: a notochord, a hollow dorsal nerve cord, an endostyle or thyroid, pharyngeal slits, and a post-anal tail.
Chromite is a crystalline mineral composed primarily of iron(II) oxide and chromium(III) oxide compounds. It can be represented by the chemical formula of FeCr2O4. It is an oxide mineral belonging to the spinel group. The element magnesium can substitute for iron in variable amounts as it forms a solid solution with magnesiochromite (MgCr2O4). Substitution of the element aluminium can also occur, leading to hercynite (FeAl2O4). Chromite today is mined particularly to make stainless steel through the production of ferrochrome (FeCr), which is an iron-chromium alloy.
A chronicle is a historical account of events arranged in chronological order, as in a timeline. Typically, equal weight is given for historically important events and local events, the purpose being the recording of events that occurred, seen from the perspective of the chronicler. A chronicle which traces world history is a universal chronicle. This is in contrast to a narrative or history, in which an author chooses events to interpret and analyze and excludes those the author does not consider important or relevant.
A pupa is the life stage of insects from the Holometabola clade undergoing transformation between immature and mature stages. Insects that go through a pupal stage are holometabolous: they go through four distinct stages in their life cycle, the stages thereof being egg, larva, pupa, and imago. The processes of entering and completing the pupal stage are controlled by the insect's hormones, especially juvenile hormone, prothoracicotropic hormone, and ecdysone. The act of becoming a pupa is called pupation, and the act of emerging from the pupal case is called eclosion or emergence.
Cinchona is a genus of flowering plants in the family Rubiaceae containing at least 23 species of trees and shrubs. All are native to the tropical Andean forests of western South America. A few species are reportedly naturalized in Central America, Jamaica, French Polynesia, Sulawesi, Saint Helena in the South Atlantic, and São Tomé and Príncipe off the coast of tropical Africa, and others have been cultivated in India and Java, where they have formed hybrids.
Cinder or Cinders may refer to:.
In cryptography, ciphertext or cyphertext is the result of encryption performed on plaintext using an algorithm, called a cipher. Ciphertext is also known as encrypted or encoded information because it contains a form of the original plaintext that is unreadable by a human or computer without the proper cipher to decrypt it. This process prevents the loss of sensitive information via hacking. Decryption, the inverse of encryption, is the process of turning ciphertext into readable plaintext. Ciphertext is not to be confused with codetext, because the latter is a result of a code, not a cipher.
A circlet is a piece of headwear that is similar to a diadem or a corolla. The word 'circlet' is also used to refer to the base of a crown or a coronet, with or without a cap. Diadem and circlet are often used interchangeably, and 'open crowns' with no arches have also been referred to as circlets. In Greek this is known as stephanos, and in Latin as corona aperta, although stephanos is associated more with laurel wreaths and the crown of thorns said to have been placed on the head of Jesus.
A cistern is a waterproof receptacle for holding liquids, usually water. Cisterns are often built to catch and store rainwater. To prevent leakage, the interior of the cistern is often lined with hydraulic plaster.
A citadel is the most fortified area of a town or city. It may be a castle, fortress, or fortified center. The term is a diminutive of city, meaning "little city", because it is a smaller part of the city of which it is the defensive core.
Civility may denote orderly behavior and politeness. Historically, civility also meant training in the humanities.
Cladistics is an approach to biological classification in which organisms are categorized in groups ("clades") based on hypotheses of most recent common ancestry. The evidence for hypothesized relationships is typically shared derived characteristics (synapomorphies) that are not present in more distant groups and ancestors. However, from an empirical perspective, common ancestors are inferences based on a cladistic hypothesis of relationships of taxa whose character states can be observed. Theoretically, a last common ancestor and all its descendants constitute a (minimal) clade. Importantly, all descendants stay in their overarching ancestral clade. For example, if the terms worms or fishes were used within a strict cladistic framework, these terms would include humans. Many of these terms are normally used paraphyletically, outside of cladistics, e.g. as a 'grade', which are fruitless to precisely delineate, especially when including extinct species. Radiation results in the generation of new subclades by bifurcation, but in practice sexual hybridization may blur very closely related groupings.
Clergy are leaders within established religions. Their roles and functions vary in different religious traditions, but usually involve presiding over specific rituals and teaching their religion's doctrines and practices. Some of the terms used for individual clergy are clergyman, clergywoman, clergyperson, churchman, cleric, ecclesiastic, and vicegerent while clerk in holy orders has a long history but is rarely used.
Cliffside may refer to:Cliffside, a historic home
Cliffside, a historic home
Cliffside, North Carolina, United States, an unincorporated community
Cliffside, Texas, United States, an unincorporated community
Cliffside, Toronto, Canada, a neighborhood.
Clinker may refer to:Cement clinker, a kilned then quenched cement product
Clinker, construction method for wooden boats
Clinker (waste), waste from industrial processes, particularly coal burning
Clinkers (album), a 1978 album by saxophonist Steve Lacy
Clinker brick, rough dark-coloured bricks
Clinker Peak, a volcanic peak in British Columbia, Canada
Clinker Ridge, a mountain ridge in British Columbia. Canada
Gary James Joynes, a.k.a. Clinker
Mount Price, formerly known as Clinker Mountain.
Cloture, closure or, informally, a guillotine, is a motion or process in parliamentary procedure aimed at bringing debate to a quick end.
Clovis may refer to:.
A coalition is formed when two or more people or groups temporarily work together to achieve a common goal. The term is most frequently used to denote a formation of power in political, military, or economic spaces.
A coast is the land next to the sea or the line that forms the boundary between the land and the ocean or a lake. Coasts are influenced by the topography of the surrounding landscape and by aquatic erosion, such as that caused by waves. The geological composition of rock and soil dictates the type of shore that is created. Earth has about 620,000.0 km (385,250.1 mi) of coastline.
Cobalt is a chemical element; it has symbol Co and atomic number 27. As with nickel, cobalt is found in the Earth's crust only in a chemically combined form, save for small deposits found in alloys of natural meteoric iron. The free element, produced by reductive smelting, is a hard, lustrous, somewhat brittle, gray metal.
Cocoon may refer to:Cocoon (silk), a pupal casing made by moth caterpillars and other insect larvae.
The codex was the historical ancestor format of the modern book. Technically, the vast majority of modern books use the codex format, of a stack of pages bound at one edge. However, the term codex is now reserved for older manuscript books, which mostly used sheets of vellum, parchment, or papyrus, rather than paper.
Coercion involves compelling a party to act in an involuntary manner through the use of threats, including threats to use force against that party. It involves a set of forceful actions which violate the free will of an individual in order to induce a desired response. These actions may include extortion, blackmail, or even torture and sexual assault. Common-law systems codify the act of violating a law while under coercion as a duress crime.
Cohesion may refer to:Cohesion (chemistry), the intermolecular attraction between like-molecules
Cohesion, a measure of how well the lines of source code within a module work together
Cohesion (geology), the part of shear strength that is independent of the normal effective stress in mass movements
Cohesion (linguistics), the linguistic elements that make a discourse semantically coherent
Cohesion, the bonds between members of a community or society and life
Cohesion (album), the fourth studio album by Australian band Gyroscope.
The Colosseum is an elliptical amphitheatre in the centre of the city of Rome, Italy, just east of the Roman Forum. It is the largest ancient amphitheatre ever built, and is the largest standing amphitheatre in the world. Construction began under the Emperor Vespasian in 72 and was completed in AD 80 under his successor and heir, Titus. Further modifications were made during the reign of Domitian. The three emperors who were patrons of the work are known as the Flavian dynasty, and the amphitheatre was named the Flavian Amphitheatre by later classicists and archaeologists for its association with their family name (Flavius).
Collagen is the main structural protein in the extracellular matrix of the connective tissues of many animals. It is the most abundant protein in mammals, making up 25% to 35% of protein content. Amino acids are bound together to form a triple helix of elongated fibril known as a collagen helix. It is mostly found in cartilage, bones, tendons, ligaments, and skin. Vitamin C is vital for collagen synthesis.
Colloquy may refer to:Colloquy (religious), a meeting to settle differences of doctrine or dogma
Colloquy (company), a loyalty marketing company based in Milford, Ohio
Colloquy (law), a legal term
Colloquy, an IRC client for Mac OS X and iOS
Colloquy, a set of scripted dialogues intended for practice in learning Latin or Ancient Greek, effectively a form of "language textbook.".
In classical architecture, a colonnade is a long sequence of columns joined by their entablature, often free-standing, or part of a building. Paired or multiple pairs of columns are normally employed in a colonnade which can be straight or curved. The space enclosed may be covered or open. In St. Peter's Square in Rome, Bernini's great colonnade encloses a vast open elliptical space.
A colony is a territory subject to a form of foreign rule, which rules the territory and its indigenous peoples separated from the foreign rulers, the colonizer, and their metropole. This separated rule was often organized into colonial empires, with their metropoles at their centers, making colonies neither annexed or even integrated territories, nor client states. Particularly new imperialism and its colonialism advanced this separated rule and its lasting coloniality. Colonies were most often set up and colonized for exploitation and possibly settlement by colonists.
A comet is an icy, small Solar System body or interstellar object that warms and begins to release gases when passing close to the Sun, a process called outgassing. This produces an extended, gravitationally unbound atmosphere or coma surrounding the nucleus, and sometimes a tail of gas and dust gas blown out from the coma. These phenomena are due to the effects of solar radiation and the outstreaming solar wind plasma acting upon the nucleus of the comet. Comet nuclei range from a few hundred meters to tens of kilometers across and are composed of loose collections of ice, dust, and small rocky particles. The coma may be up to 15 times Earth's diameter, while the tail may stretch beyond one astronomical unit. If sufficiently close and bright, a comet may be seen from Earth without the aid of a telescope and can subtend an arc of up to 30° across the sky. Comets have been observed and recorded since ancient times by many cultures and religions.
A commune is an alternative term for an intentional community. Commune or comună or comune or other derivations may also refer to:.
A compendium is a comprehensive collection of information and analysis pertaining to a body of knowledge. A compendium may concisely summarize a larger work. In most cases, the body of knowledge will concern a specific field of human interest or endeavor, while a general encyclopedia can be referred to as a "compendium of all human knowledge". The word compendium arrives from the Latin word compeneri, meaning "to weigh together or balance". The 21st century has seen the rise of democratized, online compendia in various fields.
Compost is a mixture of ingredients used as plant fertilizer and to improve soil's physical, chemical, and biological properties. It is commonly prepared by decomposing plant and food waste, recycling organic materials, and manure. The resulting mixture is rich in plant nutrients and beneficial organisms, such as bacteria, protozoa, nematodes, and fungi. Compost improves soil fertility in gardens, landscaping, horticulture, urban agriculture, and organic farming, reducing dependency on commercial chemical fertilizers. The benefits of compost include providing nutrients to crops as fertilizer, acting as a soil conditioner, increasing the humus or humic acid contents of the soil, and introducing beneficial microbes that help to suppress pathogens in the soil and reduce soil-borne diseases.
A conclave is a gathering of the College of Cardinals convened to appoint the pope of the Catholic Church. Catholics consider the pope to be the apostolic successor of Saint Peter and the earthly head of the Catholic Church.
Conduit may refer to:.
A conflagration is a particularly large and destructive fire. In the built environment, this may describe a fire that spreads via structure to structure, ignition due to radiant or convective heat, or ember transmission. Conflagrations often damage human life, animal life, health, and/or property. A conflagration can begin accidentally or be intentionally created (arson). A very large fire can produce a firestorm, in which the central column of rising heated air induces strong inward winds, which supply oxygen to the fire. Conflagrations can cause casualties including deaths or injuries from burns, collapse of structures and attempts to escape, and smoke inhalation.
In geography, a confluence occurs where two or more watercourses join to form a single channel. A confluence can occur in several configurations: at the point where a tributary joins a larger river ; or where two streams meet to become the source of a river of a new name ; or where two separated channels of a river rejoin downstream from their point of separation.
Conglomerate or conglomeration may refer to:Conglomerate (company)
Conglomerate (geology)
Conglomerate (mathematics).
Conifers are a group of vascular plants and a subset of gymnosperms. They are primarily perennial, woody trees and shrubs, mostly evergreen with a regular branching pattern, reproducing with male and female cones, usually on the same tree. They are wind-pollinated and the seeds are usually dispersed by the wind. Taxonomically, they make up the division Pinophyta, also known as Coniferae. All extant conifers, except for the gnetophytes, are perennial woody plants with secondary growth. There are over 600 living species.
In mathematics, a conjecture is a proposition that is proffered on a tentative basis without proof. Some conjectures, such as the Riemann hypothesis or Fermat's conjecture, have shaped much of mathematical history as new areas of mathematics are developed in order to prove them.
A connotation is a commonly understood cultural or emotional association that any given word or phrase carries, in addition to its explicit or literal meaning, which is its denotation.
Consensus usually refers to general agreement among a group of people or community. It may also refer to:.
A consulate is the office of a consul. A type of mission, it is usually subordinate to the state's main representation in the capital of that foreign country, usually an embassy. The term "consulate" may refer not only to the office of a consul, but also to the building occupied by the consul and the consul's staff. The consulate primarily serves its visiting nationals to the region in which it is based, and prospective visitors, commercial entities, or regional governments, who wish access or connections to the consulate's home country. There is usually also consular services in the capital too, and in those cases, the consulate may share premises with the embassy itself.
Contagion may refer to:.
Continuity or continuous may refer to:.


Contraband is any item that, relating to its nature, is illegal to be possessed or sold. It comprises goods that by their nature are considered too dangerous or offensive in the eyes of the legislator—termed contraband in se—and forbidden.
A conurbation is a region consisting of a number of metropolises, cities, large towns, and other urban areas which, through population growth and physical expansion, have merged to form one continuous urban or industrially developed area. In most cases, a conurbation is a polycentric urbanised area in which transportation has developed to link areas. They create a single urban labour market or travel to work area.
Convection is single-phase or multiphase fluid flow that occurs spontaneously through the combined effects of material property heterogeneity and body forces on a fluid. When the cause of the convection is unspecified, convection due to the effects of thermal expansion and gravity/buoyancy can be assumed.
A convoy is a group of vehicles, typically motor vehicles or ships, traveling together for mutual support and protection. Often, a convoy is organized with armed defensive support and can help maintain cohesion within a unit. It may also be used in a non-military sense, for example when driving through remote areas.
Coppicing is the traditional method in woodland management of cutting down a tree to a stump, which in many species encourages new shoots to grow from the stump or roots, thus ultimately regrowing the tree. A forest or grove that has been subject to coppicing is called a copse or coppice, in which young tree stems are repeatedly cut down to near ground level. The resulting living stumps are called stools. New growth emerges, and after a number of years, the coppiced trees are harvested, and the cycle begins anew. Pollarding is a similar process carried out at a higher level on the tree in order to prevent grazing animals from eating new shoots. Daisugi is a similar Japanese technique.
In architecture, a corbel is a structural piece of stone, wood or metal keyed into and projecting from a wall to carry a bearing weight, a type of bracket. A corbel is a solid piece of material in the wall, whereas a console is a piece applied to the structure. A piece of timber projecting in the same way was called a "tassel" or a "bragger" in England.
Cordage may refer to:Rigging, cords and ropes attached to masts and sails on a ship or boat
Rope, yarns, plies or strands twisted or braided together into a larger form.
In architecture, a cornice  is generally any horizontal decorative moulding that crowns a building or furniture element—for example, the cornice over a door or window, around the top edge of a pedestal, or along the top of an interior wall. A simple cornice may be formed with a crown, as in crown moulding atop an interior wall or above kitchen cabinets or a bookcase.
Corolla may refer to:Toyota Corolla, an automobile model name
Corolla (botany), the petals of a flower, considered as a unit
Corolla (headgear), an ancient headdress in the form of a circlet or crown
Corolla (gastropod), a genus of molluscs
Corolla, North Carolina, a town in the United States

.
In British heraldry, a coronet is a type of crown that is a mark of rank of non-reigning members of the royal family and peers. In other languages, this distinction is not made, and usually the same word for crown is used irrespective of rank In this use, the English coronet is a purely technical term for all heraldic images of crowns not used by a sovereign. A coronet is another type of crown, but is reserved for the nobility: dukes, marquesses, earls, viscounts and barons. The specific design and attributes of the crown or coronet signifies the hierarchy and ranking of its owner.
Corpus is Latin for "body". It may refer to:.
Corridor or The Corridor may refer to:.
Cortex or cortical may refer to:.
Cosmology is the study of the nature of the universe, the cosmos. The term cosmology was first used in English in 1656 in Thomas Blount's Glossographia, with the meaning of "a speaking of the world". In 1731, German philosopher Christian Wolff used the term cosmology in Latin (cosmologia) to denote a branch of metaphysics that deals with the general nature of the physical world. Cosmology is investigated by scientists, including astronomers and physicists, as well as philosophers, such as metaphysicians, philosophers of physics, and philosophers of space and time. Because of this shared scope with philosophy, theories in physical cosmology may include both scientific and non-scientific propositions and may depend upon assumptions that cannot be tested. Religious or mythological cosmology is a body of beliefs based on mythological, religious, and esoteric literature and traditions of creation myths and eschatology.
Coterie may refer to:A clique
The Coterie, a British society
Coterie (band), an Australian-New Zealand band
Coterie (company), an American baby care brand based in New York City
a family group of black-tailed and Mexican prairie dogs
in computer science, an antichain of sets which are pairwise intersecting
A literary coterie or circle

.
A cottage, during England's feudal period, was the holding by a cottager of a small house with enough garden to feed a family and in return for the cottage, the cottager had to provide some form of service to the manorial lord. However, in time cottage just became the general term for a small house. In modern usage, a cottage is usually a modest, often cosy dwelling, typically in a rural or semi-rural location and not necessarily in England. The cottage orné, often quite large and grand residences built by the nobility, dates back to a movement of "rustic" stylised cottages of the late 18th and early 19th century during the Romantic movement.
The coulomb is the unit of electric charge in the International System of Units (SI). It is defined to be equal to the electric charge delivered by a 1 ampere current in 1 second, with the elementary charge e as a defining constant in the SI.
Covenant may refer to:.
In probability theory and statistics, covariance is a measure of the joint variability of two random variables. The sign of the covariance shows the tendency in the linear relationship between the variables. Covariance is positive when variables tend to show similar behavior and negative when variables tend to show opposite behavior. The magnitude of the covariance is the geometric mean of the variances that are shared for the two random variables, where a larger magnitude means two variables more strongly depend on each other.
Cowrie or cowry is the common name for a group of small to large sea snails in the family Cypraeidae.

The coxswain is the person in charge of a boat, particularly its navigation and steering. The etymology of the word gives a literal meaning of "boat servant" since it comes from cock, referring to the cockboat, a type of ship's boat, and swain, an Old English term derived from the Old Norse sveinn meaning boy or servant. In 1724, a "cockswain" was defined as "An officer of a ship who takes care of the cockboat, barge or shallop, with all its furniture, and is in readiness with his crew to man the boat on all occasions." When the term "cockboat" became obsolete, the title of coxswain as the person in charge of a ship's boat remained.
Crag may refer to:Crag (climbing), a cliff or group of cliffs, in any location, which is or may be suitable for climbing
Crag, a dice game played with three dice
Crag, Arizona, US
Crag, West Virginia, US
Crag and tail, a geological formation caused by the passage of a glacier over an area of hard rock
Crag Group, a geological group outcropping in East Anglia, UK
Coralline Crag Formation
Norwich Crag Formation
Red Crag Formation
Wroxham Crag Formation, see Cromer Forest Bed
Crag Hotel, Penang, Malaysia
Crag Jones, Welsh climber
USS Crag (AM-214), a 1943 US Navy Admirable-class minesweeper
The Crag, the final event in the Nickelodeon Guts action sports program
Club de Radioaficionados de Guatemala, an amateur radio organization in Guatemala
Constitutional Reform and Governance Act 2010, concerning United Kingdom constitutional law
CRAG stands for Corrective Retrieval Augmented Generation.
A crater is a landform consisting of a hole or depression on a planetary surface, usually caused either by an object hitting the surface, or by geological activity on the planet. A crater has classically been described as: "a bowl-shaped pit that is formed by a volcano, an explosion, or a meteorite impact". On Earth, craters are "generally the result of volcanic eruptions", while "meteorite impact craters are common on the Moon, but are rare on Earth".
A battlement, in defensive architecture, such as that of city walls or castles, comprises a parapet, in which gaps or indentations, which are often rectangular, occur at intervals to allow for the launch of arrows or other projectiles from within the defences. These gaps are termed embrasures, also called crenels or crenelles, and a wall or building with them is described as crenellated; alternative older terms are castellated and embattled. The act of adding crenels to a previously unbroken parapet is termed crenellation.
Creole may refer to:.
In music, the dynamics of a piece are the variation in loudness between notes or phrases. Dynamics are indicated by specific musical notation, often in some detail. However, dynamics markings require interpretation by the performer depending on the musical context: a specific marking may correspond to a different volume between pieces or even sections of one piece. The execution of dynamics also extends beyond loudness to include changes in timbre and sometimes tempo rubato.
Crest or CREST may refer to:.
Crinoids are marine invertebrates that make up the class Crinoidea. Crinoids that remain attached to the sea floor by a stalk in their adult form are commonly called sea lilies, while the unstalked forms, called feather stars or comatulids, are members of the largest crinoid order, Comatulida. Crinoids are echinoderms in the phylum Echinodermata, which also includes the starfish, brittle stars, sea urchins, and sea cucumbers. They live in both shallow water and at depths over 9,000 m (30,000 ft).
Criterion may refer to:.
Agricultural land is typically land devoted to agriculture, the systematic and controlled use of other forms of life—particularly the rearing of livestock and production of crops—to produce food for humans. It is generally synonymous with both farmland or cropland, as well as pasture or rangeland.
A crossbow is a ranged weapon using an elastic launching device consisting of a bow-like assembly called a prod, mounted horizontally on a main frame called a tiller, which is hand-held in a similar fashion to the stock of a long gun. Crossbows shoot arrow-like projectiles called bolts or quarrels. A person who shoots crossbow is called a crossbowman, an arbalister or an arbalist.
A crucible is a container in which metals or other substances may be melted or subjected to very high temperatures. Although crucibles have historically tended to be made out of clay, they can be made from any material that withstands temperatures high enough to melt or otherwise alter its contents.
Crustaceans are mandibulate arthropods that are traditionally a part of the paraphyletic subphylum Crustacea. Crustaceans are mainly aquatic, including decapods, seed shrimps, branchiopods, fish lice, krill, remipedes, isopods, barnacles, copepods, opossum shrimps, amphipods and mantis shrimp. It is now well accepted that hexapods are cladistically crustaceans, with the two groups now combined in the monophyletic clade Pancrustacea. The three classes Cephalocarida, Branchiopoda, and Remipedia are more closely related to the hexapods than they are to any other crustaceans.
A crypt is a stone chamber beneath the floor of a church, above ground within a cemetery’s mausoleum or a free-standing outdoor memorial tomb. It typically contains coffins, sarcophagi, or religious relics and sometimes cremation urns.
A cuirass is a piece of armour that covers the torso, formed of one or more pieces of metal or other rigid material.
A cultivar is a kind of cultivated plant that people have selected for desired traits and which retains those traits when propagated. Methods used to propagate cultivars include division, root and stem cuttings, offsets, grafting, tissue culture, or carefully controlled seed production. Most cultivars arise from deliberate human manipulation, but some originate from wild plants that have distinctive characteristics. Cultivar names are chosen according to rules of the International Code of Nomenclature for Cultivated Plants (ICNCP), and not all cultivated plants qualify as cultivars. Horticulturists generally believe the word cultivar was coined as a term meaning "cultivated variety".
Cumulus clouds are clouds that have flat bases and are often described as puffy, cotton-like, or fluffy in appearance. Their name derives from the Latin cumulus, meaning "heap" or "pile". Cumulus clouds are low-level clouds, generally less than 2,000 m (6,600 ft) in altitude unless they are the more vertical cumulus congestus form. Cumulus clouds may appear by themselves, in lines, or in clusters.
A curator is a manager or overseer. When working with cultural organizations, a curator is typically a "collections curator" or an "exhibitions curator", and has multifaceted tasks dependent on the particular institution and its mission. The term "curator" may designate the head of any given division, not limited to museums. Curator roles include "community curators", "literary curators", "digital curators", and "biocurators".
A curfew is an order that imposes certain regulations during specified hours. Typically, curfews order all people affected by them to remain indoors during the evening and nighttime hours. Such an order is most often issued by public authorities, but may also be given by the owner of a house to those living in the household. For instance, children are often given curfews by their parents, and an au pair is traditionally given a curfew by which time they must return to their host family's home. Some jurisdictions have juvenile curfews which affect all persons under a certain age not accompanied by an adult or engaged in certain approved activities.
Currant may refer to:.
In chemistry, cyanide is an inorganic chemical compound that contains a C≡N functional group. This group, known as the cyano group, consists of a carbon atom triple-bonded to a nitrogen atom.
In geometry, a cycloid is the curve traced by a point on a circle as it rolls along a straight line without slipping. A cycloid is a specific form of trochoid and is an example of a roulette, a curve generated by a curve rolling on another curve.
A cyst is a closed sac, having a distinct envelope and division compared with the nearby tissue. Hence, it is a cluster of cells that have grouped together to form a sac ; however, the distinguishing aspect of a cyst is that the cells forming the "shell" of such a sac are distinctly abnormal when compared with all surrounding cells for that given location. A cyst may contain air, fluids, or semi-solid material. A collection of pus is called an abscess, not a cyst. Once formed, a cyst may resolve on its own. When a cyst fails to resolve, it may need to be removed surgically, but that would depend upon its type and location.
Dactyl may refer to:Dactyl (mythology), a legendary being
Dactyl (poetry), a metrical unit of verse
Dactyl Foundation, an arts organization
Finger, a part of the hand also known as a "dactyl".
Dactylus, part of a decapod crustacean
"-dactyl", a suffix used in taxonomy
Dactyl (moon), a moon of asteroid 243 Ida.
A dais or daïs is a raised platform at the front of a room or hall, usually for one or more speakers or honored guests.
Damnation is the concept of divine punishment after death for sins, or good actions not done, on Earth.
Taraxacum is a genus of flowering plants in the family Asteraceae, which consists of species commonly known as dandelions. The scientific and hobby study of the genus is known as taraxacology. The genus has a near-cosmopolitan distribution, absent only from tropical and polar areas. Two of the most common species worldwide, T. officinale and T. erythrospermum, are European species introduced into North America, where they are non-native. Dandelions thrive in temperate regions and can be found in yards, gardens, sides of roads, among crops, and in many other habitats.
Dapple may refer to:Dapple, a book by Eleanor Arnason
DAPPLE Project, a pollution study
Dapple gray, a type of coat colour seen on horses
Silver dapple gene, also known as the "Z" gene, that dilutes the black base coat color in horses
Merle, a pattern called "dapple" in the Dachshund dog breed
"Dapple" is also a common English translation of the Spanish name of Sancho Panza's donkey in Don Quixote; however, the Spanish name "Rucio" is perhaps more accurately translated as "gray-beige" or "taupe".

.
Dartmoor is an upland area in southern Devon, South West England. The moorland and surrounding land has been protected by National Park status since 1951. Dartmoor National Park covers 954 km2 (368 sq mi).
Daybreak most commonly refers to:Dawn, the beginning of the twilight before sunrise
Sunrise, when the upper edge of the Sun appears over the horizon.
A deacon is a member of the diaconate, an office in Christian churches that is generally associated with service of some kind, but which varies among theological and denominational traditions.
Deadlock commonly refers to:Deadlock, a situation where two or more processes are each waiting for the other to take action
Deadlock (locksmithing) or deadbolt, a physical door locking mechanism
Political deadlock or gridlock, a situation of difficulty passing laws that satisfy the needs of the people
Negotiation deadlock or an impasse, a situation where two sides bargaining can't reach an agreement
Tie (draw), in competitive sports, identical or inconclusive results.
Debris is rubble, wreckage, ruins, litter and discarded garbage/refuse/trash, scattered remains of something destroyed, or, as in geology, large rock fragments left by a melting glacier, etc. Depending on context, debris can refer to a number of different things. The first apparent use of the French word in English is in a 1701 description of the army of Prince Rupert upon its retreat from a battle with the army of Oliver Cromwell, in England.
The decibel is a relative unit of measurement equal to one tenth of a bel (B). It expresses the ratio of two values of a power or root-power quantity on a logarithmic scale. Two signals whose levels differ by one decibel have a power ratio of 101/10 or root-power ratio of 101/20.
In the fields of horticulture and botany, the term deciduous means "falling off at maturity" and "tending to fall off", in reference to trees and shrubs that seasonally shed leaves, usually in the autumn; to the shedding of petals, after flowering; and to the shedding of ripe fruit. The antonym of deciduous in the botanical sense is evergreen.
A decree is a legal proclamation, usually issued by a head of state, judge, royal figure, or other relevant authorities, according to certain procedures. These procedures are usually defined by the constitution, Legislative laws, or customary laws of a government.
Dedication often refers to various religious and secular ceremonies and practices such as:Dedication (ritual) the ritual or ceremonial establishment of a purpose for a person, place, or thing
Dedication of churches
Child dedication, a Christian ceremony
Pariṇāmanā (Sanskrit), commonly rendered in English as Dedication
Hanukkah, a Jewish holiday commemorating the Maccabean Revolt
Dedication stone
Date stone, sometimes also referred to as a dedication stone.
Defile may refer to:To make dirty or impure
Defile (geography), in geography, a narrow pass or gorge between mountains
Defile (military), to march off in a line
The Defile, a pass between Suess Glacier and Nussbaum Riegel in Victoria Land, Antarctica
Battle of the Defile or Battle of the Pass, 731 battle between the Umayyads and Turks.
A deity or god is a supernatural being considered to be sacred and worthy of worship due to having authority over some aspect of the universe and/or life. The Oxford Dictionary of English defines deity as a god or goddess, or anything revered as divine. C. Scott Littleton defines a deity as "a being with powers greater than those of ordinary humans, but who interacts with humans, positively or negatively, in ways that carry humans to new levels of consciousness, beyond the grounded preoccupations of ordinary life".
A deluge is a large downpour of rain, often a flood.
A demesne or domain was all the land retained and managed by a lord of the manor under the feudal system for his own use, occupation, or support. This distinguished it from land subinfeudated by him to others as sub-tenants. In contrast, the entire territory controlled by a monarch both directly and indirectly via their tenant lords would typically be referred to as their realm. The concept originated in the Kingdom of France and found its way to foreign lands influenced by it or its fiefdoms.
Demise is an Anglo-Norman legal term for the transfer of an estate, especially by lease. It has an operative effect in a lease, implying a covenant "for quiet enjoyment".
Demography is the statistical study of human populations: their size, composition, and how they change through the interplay of fertility (births), mortality (deaths), and migration.
"Demurrage" in vessel chartering is the amount of liquidated damages owed by a charterer to a shipowner when the charterer remained in possession of the vessel for the purpose of loading and unloading (laytime) beyond the time allowed by contract. That is, demurrage describes the charges that the charterer pays to the ship owner for its delayed operations of loading or unloading. Officially, demurrage is a form of liquidated damages for breaching the laytime as it is stated in the governing contract. The demurrage sometimes causes a loss to the seller as it increases cost of the total freight.
Denim is a sturdy cotton warp-faced textile in which the weft passes under two or more warp threads. This twill weave produces a diagonal ribbing that distinguishes it from cotton duck. Denim, as it is recognised today, was first produced in Nîmes, France.
Denizen may refer to:.
Dentition pertains to the development of teeth and their arrangement in the mouth. In particular, it is the characteristic arrangement, type, and number of teeth in a given species at a given age, as well as the morpho-physiology of the animal's teeth.
Deposition may refer to:Deposition (law), taking testimony outside of court
Deposition (politics), the removal of a person of authority from political power
Deposition (university), a widespread initiation ritual for new students practiced from the Middle Ages until the 18th century.
In mathematics, the derivative is a fundamental tool that quantifies the sensitivity to change of a function's output with respect to its input. The derivative of a function of a single variable at a chosen input value, when it exists, is the slope of the tangent line to the graph of the function at that point. The tangent line is the best linear approximation of the function near that input value. The derivative is often described as the instantaneous rate of change, the ratio of the instantaneous change in the dependent variable to that of the independent variable. The process of finding a derivative is called differentiation.
Despot may refer to:Despot, a Byzantine court title
Despotism, a form of government in which power is concentrated in the hands of one individual
Despot (rapper), rapper Alec Reinstein's stage name
Šifra Despot, a TV series
Despot (vehicle), armoured multifunctional vehicle.
In biology, detritus is organic matter made up of the decomposing remains of organisms and plants, and also of feces. Detritus usually hosts communities of microorganisms that colonize and decompose (remineralise) it. Such microorganisms may be decomposers, detritivores, or coprophages.
Deviance may refer to:Deviance (sociology), actions or behaviors that violate social norms
Deviancy amplification spiral, a cognitive bias and a deviancy amplification term used by interactionist sociologists
Deviance (statistics), a quality of fit statistic for a model
Positive deviance, an approach to behavioral and social change
Sexual deviance or paraphilia, recurring or intense sexual arousal to atypical things
Deviance or bid'ah, innovations and deviant acts or groups from orthodox Islamic law (Sharia).

Fine motor skill or dexterity is the coordination of small muscles in movement with the eyes, hands and fingers. The complex levels of manual dexterity that humans exhibit can be related to the nervous system. Fine motor skills aid in the growth of intelligence and develop continuously throughout the stages of human development.
A diadem is a crown, specifically an ornamental headband worn by monarchs and others as a badge of royalty.
Dialectic, also known as the dialectical method, refers originally to dialogue between people holding different points of view about a subject but wishing to arrive at the truth through reasoned argument. Dialectic resembles debate, but the concept excludes subjective elements such as emotional appeal and rhetoric; the object is more an eventual and commonly held truth than the 'winning' of an competition. It has its origins in ancient philosophy and continued to be developed in the Middle Ages.
Diaphragm may refer to:.
A diaspora is a population dispersed across multiple regions outside its geographic place of origin, typically comprising people who continue to identify—culturally, politically, religiously, or emotionally—with a particular homeland while residing elsewhere. The term originates from the ancient Greek διασπορά, which was first used in reference to the Jewish exile following the Babylonian captivity. The term now broadly encompasses communities formed through voluntary migration as well as through forced displacement caused by conquest, persecution, enslavement, famine, or war.
A diatribe, also known less formally as rant, is a lengthy oration, though often reduced to writing, made in criticism of someone or something, often employing humor, sarcasm, and appeals to emotion.
A dictatorship is a form of government which is characterized by a leader who holds absolute or near-absolute political power. Politics in a dictatorship are controlled by a dictator, and they are facilitated through an inner circle of elites that includes advisers, generals, and other high-ranking officials. The dictator maintains control by influencing and appeasing the inner circle and repressing any opposition, which may include rival political parties, armed resistance, or disloyal members of the dictator's inner circle. Dictatorships can be formed by a military coup that overthrows the previous government through force or they can be formed by a self-coup in which elected leaders make their rule permanent. Dictatorships are authoritarian or totalitarian, and they can be classified as military dictatorships, one-party dictatorships, and personalist dictatorships.
Diffusion is the net movement of anything generally from a region of higher concentration to a region of lower concentration. Diffusion is driven by a gradient in Gibbs free energy or chemical potential. It is possible to diffuse "uphill" from a region of lower concentration to a region of higher concentration, as in spinodal decomposition. Diffusion is a stochastic process due to the inherent randomness of the diffusing entity and can be used to model many real-life stochastic scenarios. Therefore, diffusion and the corresponding mathematical models are used in several fields beyond physics, such as statistics, probability theory, information theory, neural networks, finance, and marketing.
Digraph, often misspelled as diagraph, may refer to:Digraph (orthography), a pair of characters used together to represent a single sound, such as "ch" in English
Ligature (writing), the joining of two letters as a single glyph, such as "æ"
Digraph (computing), a group of two characters in computer source code to be treated as a single character
A directed graph, in graph theory
Digraph, a component of a CIA cryptonym, a covert code name
Digraph, a two-letter ISO 639-1 language code.
Dilution may refer to:Reducing the concentration of a chemical
Serial dilution, stepwise
Homeopathic dilution
Dilution (equation), an equation to calculate the rate a gas dilutes
Trademark dilution, weakening of a trademark by unauthorised use
Stock dilution, issuing of new company shares
Dilution gene, lightening animal coat color
Dilution ratio
Hemodynamics#Hemodilution, of blood
Dilution refrigerator, cryogenic device.
In physics and mathematics, the dimension of a mathematical space is informally defined as the minimum number of coordinates needed to specify any point within it. Thus, a line has a dimension of one (1D) because only one coordinate is needed to specify a point on it – for example, the point at 5 on a number line. A surface, such as the boundary of a cylinder or sphere, has a dimension of two (2D) because two coordinates are needed to specify a point on it – for example, both a latitude and longitude are required to locate a point on the surface of a sphere. A two-dimensional Euclidean space is a two-dimensional space on the plane. The inside of a cube, a cylinder or a sphere is three-dimensional (3D) because three coordinates are needed to locate a point within these spaces.
A diorama is a replica of a scene, typically a three-dimensional model either full-sized or miniature. Sometimes dioramas are enclosed in a glass showcase at a museum. Dioramas are often built by hobbyists as part of related hobbies like military vehicle modeling, miniature figure modeling, or aircraft modeling.
A diplomat is a person appointed by a state, intergovernmental, or nongovernmental institution to conduct diplomacy with one or more other states or international organizations.
An airship, dirigible balloon or dirigible is a type of aerostat (lighter-than-air) aircraft that can navigate through the air flying under its own power. Aerostats use buoyancy from a lifting gas that is less dense than the surrounding air to achieve the lift needed to stay airborne.
A disaster is an event that causes such serious harm to people, buildings, economies, or the environment that the affected community cannot manage without external assistance or relief. The United Nations Office for Disaster Risk Reduction defines a disaster as "a serious disruption of the functioning of a community or a society at any scale due to hazardous events interacting with conditions of exposure, vulnerability and capacity, leading to one or more of the following: human, material, economic and environmental losses and impacts". Natural disasters like avalanches, floods, earthquakes, and wildfires are caused by natural hazards. Human-made disasters like oil spills, terrorist attacks and power outages are caused by people. It may be difficult to separate natural and human-made disasters because human actions can make natural disasters worse. Climate change also affects how often disasters due to extreme weather hazards happen.
Discipline is the self-control that is gained by requiring that rules or orders be obeyed, and the ability to keep working at something that is difficult. Disciplinarians believe that such self-control is of the utmost importance and enforce a set of rules that aim to develop such behavior. Such enforcement is sometimes based on punishment, although there is a clear difference between the two. One way to convey such differences is through the root meaning of each word: discipline means "to teach", while punishment means "to correct or cause pain". Both punishment and discipline aim to correct harmful actions and teach about consequences, instilling responsibility, boundaries, and self-control. They share the goal of modifying behavior to promote respect for rules and others, however Punishment mainly focuses on making someone suffer for past misbehavior through penalties like restrictions or reprimands, while discipline teaches skills for better future choices via guidance and understanding consequences.
Discourse is a generalization of the notion of a conversation to any form of communication. Discourse is a major topic in social theory, with work spanning fields such as sociology, anthropology, continental philosophy, and discourse analysis. Following work by Michel Foucault, these fields view discourse as a system of thought, knowledge, or communication that constructs our world experience. Since control of discourse amounts to control of how the world is perceived, social theory often studies discourse as a window into power. Within theoretical linguistics, discourse is understood more narrowly as linguistic information exchange and was one of the major motivations for the framework of dynamic semantics. In these expressions, denotations are equated with their ability to update a discourse context.
Disparity and disparities may refer to:.
Dissection is the dismembering of the body of a deceased animal or plant to study its anatomical structure. Autopsy is used in pathology and forensic medicine to determine the cause of death in humans. Less extensive dissection of plants and smaller animals preserved in a formaldehyde solution is typically carried out or demonstrated in biology and natural science classes in middle school and high school, while extensive dissections of cadavers of adults and children, both fresh and preserved are carried out by medical students in medical schools as a part of the teaching in subjects such as anatomy, pathology and forensic medicine. Consequently, dissection is typically conducted in a morgue or in an anatomy lab.
Dissolution may refer to:.
Distemper may refer to:.
The Intertropical Convergence Zone, known by sailors as the doldrums or the calms because of its monotonous windless weather, is the area where the northeast and the southeast trade winds converge. It encircles Earth near the thermal equator, though its specific position varies seasonally. When it lies near the geographic equator, it is called the near-equatorial trough. Where the ITCZ is drawn into and merges with a monsoonal circulation, it is sometimes referred to as a monsoon trough.
A dolphin is any one of the 40 extant species of aquatic mammal from the cetacean families Delphinidae, Platanistidae, Iniidae, Pontoporiidae, and the probably extinct Lipotidae. All these families belong to the parvorder Odontoceti, i.e., toothed whales, which also include the closely related families Monodontidae and Phocoenidae (porpoises), as well as the more distant families Physeteroidea and Ziphiidae.
Domestication is a multi-generational mutualistic relationship in which an animal species, such as humans or leafcutter ants, takes over control and care of another species, such as sheep or fungi, to obtain from them a steady supply of resources, such as meat, milk, or labor. The process is gradual and geographically diffuse, based on trial and error. Domestication affects genes for behavior in animals, making them less aggressive. In plants, domestication affects genes for morphology, such as increasing seed size and stopping the shattering of cereal seedheads. Such changes both make domesticated organisms easier to handle and reduce their ability to survive in the wild.
A dominion was a self-governing country that was part of the British Empire and then the British Commonwealth of Nations, especially in the first half of the 20th century. The dominions in 1926 were Australia, Canada, the Irish Free State, New Zealand, Newfoundland, and South Africa; in 1948 Ceylon, and in 1947 India and Pakistan. In the years following the Second World War, the British Empire was refashioned into the more modern Commonwealth of Nations. By the time this transition was formally finalised, in 1949, the old dominions had become more autonomous and independent nation states, each in their own right, either as a Commonwealth republic or a Commonwealth realm.
Dormancy is a period in an organism's life cycle when growth, development, and physical activity are temporarily stopped. This minimizes metabolic activity and therefore helps an organism to conserve energy. Dormancy tends to be closely associated with environmental conditions. Organisms can synchronize entry to a dormant phase with their environment through predictive or consequential means.
A dossier is a collection of papers or other sources, containing detailed information about a particular person or subject.
A dovecote or dovecot, doocot (Scots) or columbarium is a structure intended to house pigeons or doves. Dovecotes may be free-standing structures in a variety of shapes, or built into the end of a house or barn. They generally contain pigeonholes for the birds to nest. Pigeons and doves were an important food source historically in the Middle East and Europe and were kept for their eggs and dung.
A dowry is a payment such as land, property, money, livestock, or a commercial asset that is paid by the bride's (woman's) family to the groom (man) or his family at the time of marriage.
Driftwood is a wood that has been washed onto a shore or beach of a sea, lake, or river by the action of winds, tides or waves. It is part of beach wrack.
The dromedary, also known as the dromedary camel, Arabian camel and one-humped camel, is a large camel of the genus Camelus with one hump on its back. It is the tallest of the three camel species; adult males stand 1.8–2.4 m at the shoulder, while females are 1.7–1.9 m tall. Males typically weigh between 400 and 690 kg, and females weigh between 300 and 540 kg .
The dromedary's distinctive features include its long, curved neck, narrow chest, a single hump, and long hairs on the throat, shoulders, and hump. The coat is generally a shade of brown. The hump, 20 cm (7.9 in) tall or more, is made of fat bound together by fibrous tissue.
A drought is a period of drier-than-normal conditions. A drought can last for days, months or years. Drought often has large impacts on the ecosystems and agriculture of affected regions, and causes harm to the local economy. Annual dry seasons in the tropics significantly increase the chances of a drought developing, with subsequent increased wildfire risks. Heat waves can significantly worsen drought conditions by increasing evapotranspiration. This dries out forests and other vegetation, and increases the amount of fuel for wildfires.
A druid was a member of the high-ranking priestly class in ancient Celtic cultures. The druids were religious leaders as well as legal authorities, adjudicators, lorekeepers, medical professionals and political advisors. Druids left no written accounts. While they were reported to have been literate, they are believed to have been prevented by doctrine from recording their knowledge in written form. Their beliefs and practices are attested in some detail by their contemporaries from other cultures, such as the Romans and the Greeks.
The word duct is derived from the Latin word for led/leading. It may refer to:Duct (anatomy), various ducts in anatomy and physiology
Tear duct, which carry tears to the eyes
Duct (HVAC), for transfer of air between spaces in a structure
Duct tape, a kind of adhesive tape
Ducted fan, motor for aircraft
Electrical bus duct, a metal enclosure for busbars
Duct, industrial exhaust duct system designed for low pressure-pneumatic convey of gas, fumes, dusts, shavings, and other pollutants from works space to atmosphere after cleaning and removal of contaminants
Atmospheric duct, a horizontal layer in the lower atmosphere in which the vertical refractive index gradients are such that radio signals (a) are guided or ducted, (b) tend to follow the curvature of the Earth, and (c) experience less attenuation in the ducts than they would if the ducts were not present
Tropospheric ducting, a type of radio propagation in the troposphere that allows signals to travel unusually long distances
Earth–ionosphere waveguide, a type of atmospheric duct
Surface duct, a sound propagation phenomenon at sea
Duct Publishing, an imprint of the German group VDM Publishing devoted to the reproduction of Wikipedia content
Dispatchable Unit Control Table (DUCT) in z/Architecture
Flexible Ducting.
A dune is a landform composed of wind- or water-driven sand. It typically takes the form of a mound, ridge, or hill. An area with dunes is called a dune system or a dune complex. A large dune complex is called a dune field, while broad, flat regions covered with wind-swept sand or dunes, with little or no vegetation, are called ergs or sand seas. Dunes occur in different shapes and sizes, but most kinds of dunes are longer on the stoss (upflow) side, where the sand is pushed up the dune, and have a shorter slip face in the lee side. The valley or trough between dunes is called a dune slack.
A dynamo is an electrical generator that creates direct current using a commutator. Dynamos employed electromagnets for self-starting by using residual magnetic field left in the iron cores of electromagnets. If a dynamo were never run before, it was usual to use a separate battery to excite or flash the field of the electromagnets to enable self-starting. Dynamos were the first practical electrical generators capable of delivering power for industry, and the foundation upon which many other later electric-power conversion devices were based, including the electric motor, the alternating-current alternator, and the rotary converter.
Eagle is the common name for certain large birds of prey within the family of the Accipitridae. While on a genetic level, only the subfamily Aquilinae comprises "true eagles", many other species are commonly referred to as eagles, such as the bald eagle, and the term generally carries no taxonomic weight. Most of the 68 species of eagles are from Eurasia and Africa. Outside this area, just 14 species can be found—two in North America, nine in Central and South America, and three in Australia.
Earthenware is glazed or unglazed nonvitreous pottery that has normally been fired below 1,200 °C (2,190 °F). Basic earthenware, often called terracotta, absorbs liquids such as water. However, earthenware can be made impervious to liquids by coating it with a ceramic glaze, and such a process is used for the great majority of modern domestic earthenware. The main other important types of pottery are porcelain, bone china, and stoneware, all fired at high enough temperatures to vitrify. End applications include tableware and decorative ware such as figurines.
Echelon may refer to:.
Eclogite is a metamorphic rock containing garnet (almandine-pyrope) hosted in a matrix of sodium-rich pyroxene (omphacite). Accessory minerals include kyanite, rutile, quartz, lawsonite, coesite, amphibole, phengite, paragonite, zoisite, dolomite, corundum and, rarely, diamond. The chemistry of primary and accessory minerals is used to classify three types of eclogite. The broad range of eclogitic compositions has led to a longstanding debate on the origin of eclogite xenoliths as subducted, altered oceanic crust.
An eclipse is an astronomical event which occurs when an astronomical object or spacecraft is temporarily obscured, by passing into the shadow of another body or by having another body pass between it and the viewer. This alignment of three celestial objects is known as a syzygy. An eclipse is the result of either an occultation or a transit. A "deep eclipse" is when a small astronomical object is behind a bigger one.
Ecstasy most often refers to:Ecstasy (emotion), a trance or trance-like state in which a person transcends normal consciousness
Religious ecstasy, a state of consciousness, visions or absolute euphoria
Ecstasy (philosophy), to be or stand outside oneself
Ecstasy (drug), colloquial term for MDMA in tablet form, an empathogenic drug.
An edict is a decree or announcement of a law, often associated with monarchies, but it can be under any official authority. Synonyms include "dictum" and "pronouncement". Edict derives from the Latin edictum.
An effigy is a sculptural representation, often life-size, of a specific person or a prototypical figure. The term is mostly used for the makeshift dummies used for symbolic punishment in political protests and for the figures burned in certain traditions around New Year, Carnival and Easter. In European cultures, effigies were used in the past for punishment in formal justice when the perpetrator could not be apprehended, and in popular justice practices of social shaming and exclusion. Additionally, "effigy" is used for certain traditional forms of sculpture, namely tomb effigies, funeral effigies and coin effigies.
Effluent is wastewater from sewers or industrial outfalls that flows directly into surface waters, either untreated or after being treated at a facility. The term has slightly different meanings in certain contexts, and may contain various pollutants depending on the source.
Egress may refer to:Ingress, egress, and regress, legal terms referring to an individual's right to travel or move
Egress, the passage of electromagnetic fields through the shield of a coaxial cable
Egress filtering, in computer networking, monitoring and/or restricting the flow of outbound information
Egress Software, a British provider of data security services
Interior and exterior egress, two of the four contacts observed during an astronomical transit.
The eiders are large seaducks in the genus Somateria. The three extant species all breed in the cooler latitudes of the Northern Hemisphere.
In ancient Greek literature, an eidolon is a spirit-image of a living or dead person; a shade or phantom look-alike of the human form. In the Homeric epic, it plays two functions: one as an image of the dead; and, as the deceased in propria persona.
Ejecta are particles ejected from an area. In volcanology, in particular, the term refers to particles including pyroclastic materials (tephra) that came out of a volcanic explosion and magma eruption volcanic vent, or crater, has traveled through the air or water, and fell back to the ground surface or ocean floor.
Elasmobranchii is a subclass of Chondrichthyes or cartilaginous fish, including modern sharks, and batomorphs. Members of this subclass are characterised by having five to seven pairs of gill slits opening individually to the exterior, rigid dorsal fins and small placoid scales on the skin. The teeth are in several series; the upper jaw is not fused to the cranium, and the lower jaw is articulated with the upper. The details of this jaw anatomy vary between species, and help distinguish the different elasmobranch clades. The pelvic fins in males are modified to create claspers for the transfer of sperm. There is no swim bladder; instead, these fish maintain buoyancy with large livers rich in oil.
An elder is a person who is of greater age or authority.
An elegy is a poem of serious reflection, and in English literature usually a lament for the dead. However, according to The Oxford Handbook of the Elegy, "for all of its pervasiveness ... the 'elegy' remains remarkably ill defined: sometimes used as a catch-all to denominate texts of a somber or pessimistic tone, sometimes as a marker for textual monumentalizing, and sometimes strictly as a sign of a lament for the dead".
The elevation of a geographic location is its height above or below a fixed reference point, most commonly a reference geoid, a mathematical model of the Earth's sea level as an equipotential gravitational surface .
The term elevation is mainly used when referring to points on the Earth's surface, while altitude or geopotential height is used for points above the surface, such as an aircraft in flight or a spacecraft in orbit, and depth is used for points below the surface.
An elixir is a sweet liquid used for medical purposes, to be taken orally and intended to cure one's illness. When used as a pharmaceutical preparation, an elixir contains at least one active ingredient designed to be taken orally.
In mathematics, an ellipse is a plane curve surrounding two focal points, such that for all points on the curve, the sum of both distances to the two focal points is a constant. It generalizes a circle, which is the special type of ellipse in which the two focal points are the same. The elongation of an ellipse is measured by its eccentricity , a number ranging from  to .
Elocution is the study of formal speaking in pronunciation, grammar, style, and tone as well as the idea and practice of effective speech and its forms. It stems from the idea that while communication is symbolic, sounds are final and compelling.
Embankment may refer to:.
A diplomatic mission or foreign mission is a group of people from a state or organization present in another state to represent the sending state or organization officially in the receiving or host state. In practice, the phrase usually denotes an embassy or high commission, which is the main office of a country's diplomatic representatives to another country; it is usually, but not necessarily, based in the receiving state's capital city.
An ember, also called a hot coal, is a hot lump of smouldering solid fuel, typically glowing, composed of greatly heated wood, coal, or other carbon-based material. Embers can exist within, remain after, or sometimes precede, a fire. Embers are, in some cases, as hot as the fire which created them. They radiate a substantial amount of heat long after the fire has been extinguished, and if not taken care of properly can rekindle a fire that is thought to be completely extinguished and can pose a fire hazard. In order to avoid the danger of accidentally spreading a fire, many campers pour water on the embers or cover them in dirt. Alternatively, embers can be used to relight a fire after it has gone out without the need to rebuild the fire – in a conventional fireplace, a fire can easily be relit up to 12 hours after it goes out, provided that there is enough space for air to circulate between the embers and the introduced fuel.
An emblem is an abstract or representational pictorial image that represents a concept, like a moral truth, or an allegory, or a person, like a monarch or saint. The use of emblems is first recorded in 10th and 11th-century Spain, appearing on stone carvings, ivories, and textiles. Motifs featuring combatant animals were particularly prevalent on artifacts commissioned by Vizier al-Mansur and his son Abd al-Malik, such as marble troughs.
Emigration is the act of leaving a resident country or place of residence with the intent to settle elsewhere. Conversely, immigration describes the movement of people into one country from another. A migrant emigrates from their old country, and immigrates to their new country. Thus, both emigration and immigration describe migration, but from different countries' perspectives.
An emulsion is a mixture of two or more liquids that are normally immiscible owing to liquid-liquid phase separation. Emulsions are part of a more general class of two-phase systems of matter called colloids. Although the terms colloid and emulsion are sometimes used interchangeably, emulsion more narrowly refers to when both phases, dispersed and continuous, are liquids. In an emulsion, one liquid is dispersed in the other. Examples of emulsions include vinaigrettes, homogenized milk, liquid biomolecular condensates, and some cutting fluids for metal working.
An enclave is a territory that is entirely surrounded by the territory of only one other state or entity. An enclave can be an independent territory or part of a larger one. Enclaves may also exist within territorial waters. Enclave is sometimes used improperly to denote a territory that is only partly surrounded by another state. Enclaves that are not part of a larger territory are not exclaves, for example Lesotho, San Marino and Vatican City are enclaved sovereign states.
Endemism is the state of a species being found only in a single defined geographic location, such as an island, state, nation, country or other defined zone; organisms that are indigenous to a place are not endemic to it if they are also found elsewhere. For example, the Cape sugarbird is found exclusively in southwestern South Africa and is therefore said to be endemic to that particular part of the world. An endemic species can also be referred to as an endemism or, in scientific literature, as an endemite.
Endowment may refer to:.
Enigma may refer to:Riddle, someone or something that is mysterious or puzzling.
Ensign most often refers to:Ensign (flag), a flag flown on a vessel to indicate nationality
Ensign (rank), a navy officer rank.
An entablature is the superstructure of moldings and bands which lies horizontally above columns, resting on their capitals. Entablatures are major elements of classical architecture, and are commonly divided into the architrave, the frieze, and the cornice. The Greek and Roman temples are believed to be based on wooden structures, the design transition from wooden to stone structures being called petrification.
Enterprise may refer to:.
Entitled or Entitlement may refer to:.
An entourage is an informal group or band of people who are closely associated with a (usually) famous, notorious, or otherwise notable individual. The word can also refer to:.
An enzyme is a biological macromolecule, usually a protein, that acts as a biological catalyst, accelerating chemical reactions without being consumed in the process. The molecules on which enzymes act are called substrates, which are converted into products. Nearly all metabolic processes within a cell depend on enzyme catalysis to occur at biologically relevant rates. A metabolic pathway is typically composed of a series of enzyme-catalyzed steps. The study of enzymes is known as enzymology, and a related field focuses on pseudoenzymes—proteins that have lost catalytic activity but may retain regulatory or scaffolding functions, often indicated by alterations in their amino acid sequences or unusual 'pseudocatalytic' behavior.
Epaulette is a type of ornamental shoulder piece or decoration used as insignia of rank by armed forces and other organizations. Flexible metal epaulettes are referred to as shoulder scales.
The épée, also rendered as epee in English, is the largest and heaviest of the three weapons used in the sport of fencing. The modern épée derives from the 19th-century épée de combat, a weapon which itself derives from the French small sword.
Ephemera are items which were not originally designed to be retained or preserved, but have been collected or retained. The word is both plural and singular.
Epidote is a calcium aluminium iron sorosilicate mineral.
Epiphany may refer to:.
In chronology and periodization, an epoch or reference epoch is an instant in time chosen as the origin of a particular calendar era. The "epoch" serves as a reference point from which time is measured.
A solar equinox is a moment in time when the Sun appears directly above the equator, rather than to its north or south. On the day of the equinox, the Sun appears to rise directly east and set directly west. This occurs twice each year, around 20 March and 23 September.
Equity may refer to:.
The word "eradication" is derived from Latin word "radix" which means "root". It may refer to:Eradication of infectious diseases, the reduction of the global incidence of an infectious disease in its host population to zero
Extirpation, or intentional local extinction, of an introduced species
Genocide, the deliberate, systematic destruction of an ethnic, religious or national group of people
Intentional extermination of a population of insects or vermin as part of pest control
A heraldic term denoting a tree that has been uprooted; see eradication (heraldry)
Total removal of a given pathogen from an individual, also known as clearance of an infection, particularly in the context of HIV
A song on the album The Price of Existence performed by the death metal band All Shall Perish.
Ermine may refer to three species of mustelid in the genus Mustela, or their fur:Stoat or Eurasian ermine, Mustela erminea, found throughout Eurasia and northern North America
American ermine, Mustela richardsonii, found throughout North America aside from most of Alaska and the Arctic
Haida ermine, Mustela haidarum, endemic to Haida Gwaii and the Alexander Archipelago on the Pacific Northwest coast of North America.
An escarpment is a steep slope or long cliff that forms as a result of faulting or erosion and separates two relatively level areas having different elevations.
Escutcheon may refer to:Escutcheon (heraldry), a shield or shield-shaped emblem, displaying a coat of arms
Escutcheon (furniture), a metal plate that surrounds a keyhole or lock cylinder on a door
Escutcheon, the pattern of growth of pubic hair
Escutcheon, decorated discs supporting the handles/hooks on hanging bowls

.
An esplanade or promenade is a long, open, level area, usually next to a river or large body of water, where people may walk. The historical definition of esplanade was a large, open, level area outside fortress or city walls to provide clear fields of fire for the fortress's guns. In modern usage, the space allows the area to be paved as a pedestrian walk; esplanades are often on sea fronts and allow walking whatever the state of the tide, without having to walk on the beach.
Essence has various meanings and uses for different thinkers and in different contexts. It is used in philosophy and theology as a designation for the property or set of properties or attributes that make an entity the entity it is or, expressed negatively, without which it would lose its identity. Essence is contrasted with accident, which is a property or attribute the entity has accidentally or contingently, but upon which its identity does not depend.
An estuary is a partially enclosed coastal body of brackish water where freshwater from rivers or streams meets and mixes with saltwater from the open sea. Estuaries form transition zones between riverine and marine environments and are classified as ecotones, areas where different ecosystems overlap. They are influenced by both marine processes and fluvial processes. The mixing of seawater and freshwater provides high levels of nutrients both in the water column and in sediment, making estuaries among the most productive natural habitats in the world.
Ethanol is an organic compound with the chemical formula CH3CH2OH. It is an alcohol, with its formula also written as C2H5OH, C2H6O or EtOH, where Et is the pseudoelement symbol for ethyl. Ethanol is a volatile, flammable, colorless liquid with a pungent taste. As a psychoactive depressant, it is the active ingredient in alcoholic beverages, and the second most consumed drug globally behind caffeine.
Ethnology is an academic field and discipline that compares and analyzes the characteristics of different peoples and the relationships between them.
Etiquette can be defined as a set of norms of personal behavior in polite society, usually occurring in the form of an ethical code of the expected and accepted social behaviors that accord with the conventions and norms observed and practiced by a society, a social class, or a social group. In modern English usage, the French word étiquette dates from the year 1750 and also originates from the French word for "ticket," possibly symbolizing a person's entry into society through proper behavior. There are many important historical figures that have helped to shape the meaning of the term as well as provide varying perspectives.
A eulogy is a speech or writing in praise of a person, especially one who recently died or retired, or as a term of endearment.


Phonaesthetics is the study of the beauty and pleasantness associated with the sounds of certain words or parts of words. The term was first used in this sense, perhaps by J. R. R. Tolkien, during the mid-20th century and derives from Ancient Greek  φωνή (phōnḗ) 'voice, sound' and  αἰσθητική (aisthētikḗ) 'aesthetics'. Speech sounds have many aesthetic qualities, some of which are subjectively regarded as euphonious (pleasing) or cacophonous (displeasing). Phonaesthetics remains a budding and often subjective field of study, with no scientifically or otherwise formally established definition; today, it mostly exists as a marginal branch of psychology, phonetics, or poetics.
Eutrophication is a general term describing a process in which nutrients accumulate in a body of water, resulting in an increased growth of organisms that may deplete the oxygen in the water; ie. the process of too many plants growing on the surface of a river, lake, etc., often because chemicals that are used to help crops grow have been carried there by rain. Eutrophication may occur naturally or as a result of human actions. Manmade, or cultural, eutrophication occurs when sewage, industrial wastewater, fertilizer runoff, and other nutrient sources are released into the environment. Such nutrient pollution usually causes algal blooms and bacterial growth, resulting in the depletion of dissolved oxygen in water and causing substantial environmental degradation. Many policies have been introduced to combat eutrophication, including the United Nations Development Program (UNDP)'s sustainability development goals.
Evaporation is a type of vaporization that occurs on the surface of a liquid as it changes into the gas phase. A high concentration of the evaporating substance in the surrounding gas significantly slows down evaporation, such as when humidity affects rate of evaporation of water. When the molecules of the liquid collide, they transfer energy to each other based on how they collide. When a molecule near the surface absorbs enough energy to overcome the vapor pressure, it will escape and enter the surrounding air as a gas. When evaporation occurs, the energy removed from the vaporized liquid will reduce the temperature of the liquid, resulting in evaporative cooling.
In botany, an evergreen is a plant which has foliage that remains green and functional throughout the year. This contrasts with deciduous plants, which lose their foliage completely during the winter or dry season. Consisting of many different species, the unique feature of evergreen plants lends itself to various environments and purposes.
An exarch is an official in various jurisdictions both historical and modern.
Excavators are heavy construction equipment primarily consisting of a boom, dipper, bucket, and cab on a rotating platform known as the "house".
The UK Exchequer is defined as 'the legal and accounting entities which support the UK’s spending and revenue activities'. The term is used for the accounting process of central government, and as such it appears in various financial documents. The Consolidated Fund account at the Bank of England is officially termed the 'The Account of His Majesty's Exchequer'.
Exegesis is a critical explanation or interpretation of a text. The term is traditionally applied to the interpretation of Biblical works. In modern usage, exegesis can involve critical interpretations of virtually any text, including not just religious texts but also philosophy, literature, or virtually any other genre of writing. The phrase Biblical exegesis can be used to distinguish studies of the Bible from other critical textual explanations.
An exemplar is a person, a place, an object, or some other entity that serves as a predominant example of a given concept. It may also refer to:.
Exile or banishment is primarily penal expulsion from one's native country, and secondarily expatriation or prolonged absence from one's homeland under either the compulsion of circumstance or the rigors of some high purpose. Usually persons and peoples suffer exile, but sometimes social entities like institutions are forced from their homeland.
An exoskeleton is a skeleton that is on the exterior of an animal in the form of hardened integument, which both supports the body's shape and protects the internal organs, in contrast to an internal endoskeleton which is enclosed underneath other soft tissues. Some large, hard and non-flexible protective exoskeletons are known as shell or armour.
Expanse or The Expanse may refer to:.
An expense is an item requiring an outflow of money, or any form of fortune in general, to another person or group as payment for an item, service, or other category of costs. For a tenant, rent is an expense. For students or parents, tuition is an expense. Buying food, clothing, furniture, or an automobile is often referred to as an expense. An expense is a cost that is "paid" or "remitted", usually in exchange for something of value. Something that seems to cost a great deal is "expensive". Something that seems to cost little is "inexpensive". "Expenses of the table" are expenses for dining, refreshments, a feast, etc.
Expletive may refer to:Expletive (linguistics), a word or phrase that is not needed to express the basic meaning of the sentence
Expletive pronoun, a pronoun used as subject or other verb argument that is meaningless but syntactically required
Expletive attributive, a word that contributes nothing to meaning but suggests the strength of feeling of the speaker
Profanity or swear word, a word or expression that is strongly impolite or offensive.
In mathematics, exponentiation, denoted bn, is an operation involving two numbers: the base, b, and the exponent or power, n. When n is a positive integer, exponentiation corresponds to repeated multiplication of the base: that is, bn is the product of multiplying n bases:
In particular, .
Exposure or Exposures may refer to:.
In anatomy, extension is a movement of a joint that increases the angle between two bones or body surfaces at a joint. Extension usually results in straightening of the bones or body surfaces involved. For example, extension is produced by extending the flexed (bent) elbow. Straightening of the arm would require extension at the elbow joint. If the head is tilted all the way back, the neck is said to be extended.
Extrusion is a process used to create objects of a fixed cross-sectional profile by pushing material through a die of the desired cross-section. Its two main advantages over other manufacturing processes are its ability to create very complex cross-sections; and to work materials that are brittle, because the material encounters only compressive and shear stresses. It also creates excellent surface finish and gives considerable freedom of form in the design process.
Fable is a literary genre defined as a succinct fictional story, in prose or verse, that features animals, legendary creatures, plants, inanimate objects, or forces of nature that are anthropomorphised, and that illustrates or leads to a particular moral lesson, which may at the end be added explicitly as a concise maxim or saying.
A façade or facade is the front part or exterior of a building. It is a loanword from the French façade, which means "frontage" or "face".
Faction or factionalism may refer to:.
Fallow is a farming technique in which arable land is left without sowing for one or more vegetative cycles. The goal of fallowing is to allow the land to recover and store organic matter while retaining moisture and disrupting pest life cycles and soil-borne pathogens by temporarily removing their hosts. Crop rotation systems typically called for some of a farmer's fields to be left fallow each year.
A famine is a widespread scarcity of food caused by several possible factors, including, but not limited to: war, natural disasters, crop failure, widespread poverty, an economic catastrophe or government policies. This phenomenon is usually accompanied or followed by regional malnutrition, starvation, epidemic, and increased mortality. Every inhabited continent in the world has experienced a period of famine throughout history. During the 19th and 20th centuries, Southeast and South Asia, as well as Eastern and Central Europe, suffered the greatest number of fatalities due to famine. Deaths caused by famine declined sharply beginning in the 1970s, with numbers falling further since 2000. Since 2010, Africa has been the most affected continent in the world by famine. As of 2025, Haiti and Afghanistan are the two countries with the most catastrophic and widespread states of famine, followed by Sudan.
A fanfare is a short musical flourish which is typically played by trumpets, French horns or other brass instruments, often accompanied by percussion. It is a "brief improvised introduction to an instrumental performance". A fanfare has also been defined in The Golden Encyclopedia of Music as "a musical announcement played on brass instruments before the arrival of an important person", such as heralding the entrance of a monarch. Historically, fanfares were usually played by trumpet players, as the trumpet was associated with royalty. Bugles are also mentioned. The melody notes of fanfare are often based around the major triad, often using "heroic dotted rhythms".
Faro may refer to:.
A fascia is a generic term for macroscopic membranous bodily structures. Fasciae are classified as superficial, visceral or deep, and further designated according to their anatomical location.
A fastener or fastening is a hardware device that mechanically joins or affixes two or more objects together. In general, fasteners are used to create non-permanent joints; that is, joints that can be removed or dismantled without damaging the joining components.
A fathom is a unit of length in the imperial and U.S. customary systems equal to 6 feet (1.8288 m), used especially for measuring the depth of water. The fathom is neither an international standard (SI) unit, nor an internationally accepted non-SI unit. Historically, it was the maritime measure of depth in the English-speaking world but, apart from within the US, charts now use metres.
The Fauna is the whole of animal life present in a particular region or time. The corresponding terms for plants and fungi are flora and funga, respectively. Flora, fauna, funga and other forms of life are collectively referred to as biota. Zoologists and paleontologists use fauna to refer to a typical collection of animals found in a specific time or place, e.g. the "Sonoran Desert fauna" or the "Burgess Shale fauna". Paleontologists sometimes refer to a sequence of faunal stages, which is a series of rocks all containing similar fossils. The study of animals of a particular region is called faunistics.
Feldspar is a group of rock-forming aluminium tectosilicate minerals, also containing other cations such as sodium, calcium, potassium, or barium. The most common members of the feldspar group are the plagioclase (sodium-calcium) feldspars and the alkali (potassium-sodium) feldspars. Feldspars make up about 60% of the Earth's crust and 41% of the Earth's continental crust by weight.
A fellow is a title and form of address for distinguished, learned, or skilled individuals in academia, medicine, research, and industry. The exact meaning of the term differs in each field. In learned or professional societies, the term refers to a privileged member who is specially elected in recognition of their work and achievements. Within institutions of higher education, a fellow is a member of a highly ranked group of teachers at a particular college or university or a member of the governing body in some universities. It can also be a specially selected postgraduate student who has been appointed to a post granting a stipend, research facilities and other privileges for a fixed period in order to undertake some advanced study or research, often in return for teaching services. In the context of medical education in North America, a fellow is a doctor who is undergoing a supervised, sub-specialty medical training (fellowship) after having completed a specialty training program (residency). Lastly, In large, R&D-intensive institutions, the term denotes a small number of senior scientists and engineers.
A feral animal or plant is one that lives in the wild but is descended from domesticated individuals. As with an introduced species, the introduction of feral animals or plants to non-native regions may disrupt ecosystems and has, in some cases, contributed to extinction of indigenous species. The removal of feral species is a major focus of island restoration.
A ferry is a boat or ship that transports passengers, and occasionally vehicles and cargo, across a body of water. A small passenger ferry with multiple stops, like those in Venice, Italy, is sometimes referred to as a water taxi or water bus.
Fervor may refer to:enthusiasm
Fervor Records, an independent record label
Fervor EP, an album by Jason & The Scorchers

.
Festuca (fescue) is a genus of flowering plants belonging to the grass family Poaceae. They are evergreen or herbaceous, perennial, tufted grasses with a height range of 10–200 cm (4–79 in) and a cosmopolitan distribution, occurring on every continent except Antarctica. The genus is closely related to ryegrass (Lolium), and recent evidence from phylogenetic studies using DNA sequencing of plant mitochondrial DNA shows that the genus lacks monophyly. As a result, plant taxonomists have moved several species, including the forage grasses tall fescue and meadow fescue, from the genus Festuca into the genus Lolium or alternatively into the segregated genus Schedonorus.
Fetish may refer to:.
A fief was a central element in medieval contracts based on feudal law. It consisted of a form of property holding or other rights granted by an overlord to a vassal, who held it in fealty or "in fee" in return for a form of feudal allegiance, services or payments. The fees were often lands, land revenue or revenue-producing real property like a watermill, held in feudal land tenure: these are typically known as fiefs or fiefdoms. However, not only land but anything of value could be held in fee, including governmental office, rights of exploitation such as hunting, fishing or felling trees, monopolies in trade, money rents and tax farms. There never existed a standard feudal system, nor did there exist only one type of fief. Over the ages, depending on the region, there was a broad variety of customs using the same basic legal principles in many variations.
In physical geography, a fjord is a long, narrow sea inlet with steep sides or cliffs in a valley created by a former glacier, which has since become inundated with water. They are the glacial equivalent of drowned river valleys, known as rias. Fjords exist on the coasts of Antarctica, the Arctic, and surrounding landmasses of the northern and southern hemispheres. Areas with extensive fjords demonstrate an extreme example of the coastline paradox; Norway's coastline is estimated to be 29,000 km (18,000 mi) long with its nearly 1,200 fjords, but only 2,500 km (1,600 mi) long when excluding the fjords.
A flagon is a large leather, metal, glass, plastic or ceramic vessel, used for storing and pouring drink, whether this be water, ale, or another liquid. They are generally not intended to be drunk from directly, like a cup or tankard. A flagon is typically of about 2 imperial pints (1.1 L) in volume, and it has either a handle, or one or two rings at the neck. Sometimes the neck has a large flange at the top rather than rings. The neck itself may or may not be formed into one, two or three spouts. The name comes from the same origin as the word "flask".
Flax, also known as common flax or linseed, is a flowering plant, Linum usitatissimum, in the family Linaceae. It is cultivated as a food and fiber crop in regions of the world with temperate climates. In 2022, France produced 75% of the world's supply of flax.
Fledgling or Fledglings may refer to:.
An ice floe is a segment of floating ice defined as a flat piece at least 20 metres (66 ft) across at its widest point, and up to more than 10 kilometres across. Drift ice is a floating field of sea ice composed of several ice floes. They may cause ice jams on freshwater rivers, and in the open ocean may damage the hulls of ships.
Flora is all the plant life present in a particular region or time, generally the naturally occurring (indigenous) native plants. The corresponding term for animals is fauna, and for fungi, it is funga. Sometimes bacteria and fungi are also referred to as flora as in the terms gut flora or skin flora for purposes of specificity.
A flotilla, or naval flotilla, is a formation of small ships that may be part of a larger fleet.
A flume is a human-made channel for water, in the form of an open declined gravity chute whose walls are raised above the surrounding terrain, in contrast to a trench or ditch. Flumes are not to be confused with aqueducts, which are built to transport water; flumes use flowing water to transport materials. Flumes route water from a diversion dam or weir to a desired materiel collection location. Flumes are usually made up of wood, metal or concrete.
A magnetometer is a device that measures magnetic field or magnetic dipole moment. Different types of magnetometers measure the direction, strength, or relative change of a magnetic field at a particular location. A compass is one such device, one that measures the direction of an ambient magnetic field, in this case, the Earth's magnetic field. Other magnetometers measure the magnetic dipole moment of a magnetic material such as a ferromagnet, for example by recording the effect of this magnetic dipole on the induced current in a coil.
A leaf is a principal appendage of the stem of a vascular plant, usually borne laterally above ground and specialized for photosynthesis. Leaves are collectively called foliage, as in "autumn foliage", while the leaves, stem, flower, and fruit collectively form the shoot system. In most leaves, the primary photosynthetic tissue is the palisade mesophyll and is located on the upper side of the blade or lamina of the leaf, but in some species, including the mature foliage of Eucalyptus, palisade mesophyll is present on both sides and the leaves are said to be isobilateral. The leaf is an integral part of the stem system, and most leaves are flattened and have distinct upper (adaxial) and lower (abaxial) surfaces that differ in color, hairiness, the number of stomata, the amount and structure of epicuticular wax, and other features. Leaves are mostly green in color due to the presence of a compound called chlorophyll, which is essential for photosynthesis as it absorbs light energy from the Sun. A leaf with lighter-colored or white patches or edges is called a variegated leaf.
In metal typesetting, a font is a particular size, weight, and style of a typeface, defined as the set of fonts that share an overall design.
For instance, the typeface Bauer Bodoni includes fonts "Roman", "bold" and "italic"; each of these exists in a variety of sizes. In traditional printing, fonts were physically created using metal or wood type, with a font for each size.
A footbridge is a bridge designed solely for pedestrians. While the primary meaning for a bridge is a structure which links "two points at a height above the ground", a footbridge can also be a lower structure, such as a boardwalk, that enables pedestrians to cross wet, fragile, or marshy land. Bridges range from stepping stones–possibly the earliest man-made structure to "bridge" water–to elaborate steel structures. Another early bridge would have been simply a fallen tree. In some cases a footbridge can be both functional and artistic.
Forage is a plant material eaten by grazing livestock. Historically, the term forage has meant only plants eaten by the animals directly as pasture, crop residue, or immature cereal crops, but it is also used more loosely to include similar plants cut for fodder and carried to the animals, especially as hay or silage.
Foraminifera are single-celled organisms, members of a phylum or class of Rhizarian protists characterized by streaming granular ectoplasm for catching food and other uses; and commonly an external shell called a test of diverse forms and materials. Tests of chitin are believed to be the most primitive type. Most foraminifera are marine, the majority of which live on or within the seafloor sediment, while a smaller number float in the water column at various depths, which belong to the suborder Globigerinina. Fewer are known from freshwater or brackish conditions, and some very few (nonaquatic) soil species have been identified through molecular analysis of small subunit ribosomal DNA.
Forestry is the science and craft of creating, managing, planting, using, conserving and repairing forests and woodlands for associated resources for human and environmental benefits. Forestry is practiced in plantations and natural stands. The science of forestry has elements that belong to the biological, physical, social, political and managerial sciences. Forest management plays an essential role in the creation and modification of habitats and affects ecosystem services provisioning. A practitioner of forestry is known as a forester.
A forge is a type of hearth used for heating metals, or the workplace (smithy) where such a hearth is located. The forge is used by the smith to heat a piece of metal to a temperature at which it becomes easier to shape by forging, or to the point at which work hardening no longer occurs. The metal is transported to and from the forge using tongs, which are also used to hold the workpiece on the smithy's anvil while the smith works it with a hammer. Sometimes, such as when hardening steel or cooling the work so that it may be handled with bare hands, the workpiece is transported to the slack tub, which rapidly cools the workpiece in a large body of water. However, depending on the metal type, it may require an oil quench or a salt brine instead; many metals require more than plain water hardening. The slack tub also provides water to control the fire in the forge.
Formaldehyde ( for-MAL-di-hide, fər-) (systematic name methanal) is an organic compound with the chemical formula CH2O and structure H2C=O. It is a pungent, colorless gas that spontaneously polymerizes into paraformaldehyde. It is stored as a ~37% aqueous solution (formalin), which consists mainly of the hydrate CH2(OH)2. It is the simplest of the aldehydes (R−CHO). As a precursor to many other materials and chemical compounds, in 2024 the global production of formaldehyde was estimated at 26 million tons per year. It is mainly used in the production of industrial resins, e.g., for particle board and coatings, plastics, pulp, paper, synthetic fibers, and textiles. A ~5% solution of formaldehyde is used as a disinfectant and fumigant in industrial, agricultural, and healthcare settings, and formalin is used to preserve tissue samples.
A fortification is a military construction designed for the defense of territories in warfare, and is used to establish rule in a region during peacetime. The term is derived from Latin fortis ("strong") and facere.
Forum or The Forum may refer to:.
A fossil is any preserved remains, impression, or trace of any once-living thing from a past geological age. Examples include bones, shells, exoskeletons, stone imprints of animals or microbes, objects preserved in amber, hair, petrified wood and DNA remnants. The totality of fossils is known as the fossil record. Though the fossil record is incomplete, numerous studies have demonstrated that there is enough information available to give a good understanding of the pattern of diversification of life on Earth. In addition, the record can predict and fill gaps such as the discovery of Tiktaalik in the arctic of Canada.
A lobby is a room in a building used for entry from the outside, sometimes referred to as a foyer, entryway, reception area or entrance hall. It is often a large room or complex of rooms in a large building such as a theatre, opera house, or movie theater adjacent to the auditorium. It may be a repose area for spectators, especially used before performance and during intermissions, but can also be a place of celebrations or festivities after performance. In other buildings, such as office buildings or condominiums, lobbies can function as gathering spaces between the entrance and elevators to other floors.
Franchise may refer to:.
Fratricide is the act of killing one's own brother.
Fresco is a technique of mural painting executed upon freshly laid ("wet") lime plaster. Water is used as the vehicle for the dry-powder pigment to merge with the plaster, and with the setting of the plaster, the painting becomes an integral part of the wall. The word fresco is derived from the Italian adjective fresco meaning "fresh", and may thus be contrasted with fresco-secco or secco mural painting techniques, which are applied to dried plaster, to supplement painting in fresco. The fresco technique has been employed since antiquity and is closely associated with Italian Renaissance painting.
A frigate is a type of warship.
A frond is a large, divided leaf. In both common usage and botanical nomenclature, the leaves of ferns are referred to as fronds and some botanists restrict the term to this group. Other botanists allow the term frond to also apply to the large leaves of cycads, as well as palms (Arecaceae) and various other flowering plants, such as mimosa or sumac. "Frond" is commonly used to identify a large, compound leaf, but if the term is used botanically to refer to the leaves of ferns and algae it may be applied to smaller and undivided leaves.
Frostbite is an injury to skin or other living tissue that is allowed to freeze, especially affecting the fingers, toes, nose, ears, cheeks and chin. Most often, frostbite occurs in the hands and feet, often preceded by frostnip, a paling or reddening of a body part as its blood vessels constrict that tingles, feels very cold, or simply feels numb. This may be followed by the clumsiness and white or bluish, waxy-looking skin that evidence full-blown frostbite. Swelling or blistering may occur following treatment. Complications may include hypothermia or compartment syndrome.
A fugitive or runaway is a person who is fleeing from custody, whether it be from jail, a government arrest, government or non-government questioning, vigilante violence, or outraged private individuals. A fugitive from justice, also known as a wanted person, can be a person who is either convicted or accused of a crime and hiding from law enforcement in the state or taking refuge in a different country in order to avoid arrest.
A fumarole is a vent through the surface of Earth or another terrestrial planet from which hot volcanic gases and vapors are emitted, without any accompanying liquids or solids. Fumaroles are characteristic of the late stages of volcanic activity, but fumarole activity can also precede a volcanic eruption and has been used for eruption prediction. Most fumaroles die down within a few days or weeks of the end of an eruption, but a few are persistent, lasting for decades or longer. An area containing fumaroles is known as a fumarole field.
Furnace may refer to:.
The fuselage is an aircraft's main body section. It holds crew, passengers, or cargo. In single-engine aircraft, it will usually contain an engine as well, although in some amphibious aircraft the single engine is mounted on a pylon attached to the fuselage, which in turn is used as a floating hull. The fuselage also serves to position the control and stabilization surfaces in specific relationships to lifting surfaces, which is required for aircraft stability and maneuverability.
A gable is the generally triangular portion of a wall between the edges of intersecting roof pitches. The shape of the gable and how it is detailed depends on the structural system used, which reflects climate, material availability, and aesthetic concerns. The term gable wall or gable end more commonly refers to the entire wall, including the gable and the wall below it. Some types of roof do not have a gable. One common type of roof with gables, the 'gable roof', is named after its prominent gables.
Could not find summary for "Gadgetry".
Gaelic is an adjective that means "pertaining to the Gaels". It may refer to:.
Galleons were large, multi-decked sailing ships developed in Spain and Portugal. They were first used as armed cargo carriers by Europeans from the 16th to 18th centuries during the Age of Sail, and they were the principal vessels drafted for use as warships until the Anglo-Dutch Wars of the mid-17th century. Galleons generally carried three or more masts with a lateen fore-and-aft rig on the rear masts, were carvel built with a prominent squared off raised stern, and used square-rigged sail plans on their fore-mast and main-masts.
Gallery or The Gallery may refer to:.
A galley is a type of ship optimised for propulsion by oars. Galleys were historically used for warfare, trade, and piracy mostly in the seas surrounding Europe. It developed in the Mediterranean world during antiquity and continued to exist in various forms until the early 19th century. It typically had a long, slender hull, shallow draft, and often a low freeboard. Most types of galleys also had sails that could be used in favourable winds, but they relied primarily on oars to move independently of winds and currents or in battle. The term "galley" originated from a Greek term for a small type of galley and came in use in English from about 1300. It has occasionally been used for unrelated vessels with similar military functions as galley but which were not Mediterranean in origin, such as medieval Scandinavian longships, 16th-century Acehnese ghalis and 18th-century North American gunboats.
A gambit is a chess opening in which a player sacrifices material with the aim of achieving a subsequent positional advantage.
In color reproduction and colorimetry, a gamut, or color gamut, is a convex set containing the colors that can be accurately represented, i.e. reproduced by an output device or measured by an input device. Devices with a larger gamut can represent more colors. Similarly, gamut may also refer to the colors within a defined color space, which is not linked to a specific device. A trichromatic gamut is often visualized as a color triangle. A less common usage defines gamut as the subset of colors contained within an image, scene or video.
A gantry is an overhead bridge-like structure supporting equipment such as a crane, signals, or cameras.
Garnets are a group of silicate minerals that have been used since the Bronze Age as gemstones and abrasives.
A garrison is a body of troops stationed in a particular location, originally to guard it and/or facilities that constitute a military base or fortified military headquarters. A garrison is usually in a city, town, fort, castle, ship, or similar site. "Garrison town" is a common expression for any town that has a military base nearby.
Gastronomy is the study of the relationship between food and culture, the art of preparing and serving rich or delicate and appetizing food, the cooking styles of particular regions, and the science of good eating. One who is well versed in gastronomy is called a gastronome, while a gastronomist is one who unites theory and practice in the study of gastronomy. Practical gastronomy is associated with the practice and study of the preparation, production, and service of the various foods and beverages, from countries around the world. It is related with a system and process approach, focused on recipes, techniques and cookery books. Food gastronomy is connected with food and beverages and their genesis. Technical gastronomy underpins practical gastronomy, introducing a rigorous approach to evaluation of gastronomic topics.
A gavel is a small ceremonial mallet/hammer commonly made of hardwood, typically fashioned with a handle. It can be used to call for attention or to punctuate rulings and proclamations and is a symbol of the authority and right to act officially in the capacity of a presiding officer. It is often struck against a sound block, a striking surface typically also made of hardwood, to enhance its sounding qualities. It is primarily used in live auctions.
A gazebo is a pavilion structure, sometimes octagonal or turret-shaped, often built in a park, garden, or spacious public area. Some are used on occasions as bandstands.
A gazette is an official journal, a newspaper of record, or simply a newspaper.
Geisha (芸者), also known as geiko  or geigi (芸妓), are female Japanese performing artists and entertainers trained in traditional Japanese performing arts styles, such as dance, music and singing, as well as being proficient conversationalists and hosts. Their distinct appearance is characterised by long, trailing kimono, traditional hairstyles and oshiroi make-up. Geisha entertain at parties known as ozashiki, often for the entertainment of wealthy clientele, as well as performing on stage and at festivals.
A gemstone is a piece of mineral crystal which, when cut or polished, is used to make jewelry or other adornments. Certain rocks and occasionally organic materials that are not minerals may also be used for jewelry and are therefore often considered to be gemstones as well. Most gemstones are hard, but some softer minerals such as brazilianite may be used in jewelry because of their color or luster or other physical properties that have aesthetic value. However, generally speaking, soft minerals are not typically used as gemstones by virtue of their brittleness and lack of durability.
Genealogy is the study of families, family history, and the tracing of their lineages. Genealogists use oral interviews, historical records, genetic analysis, and other records to obtain information about a family and to demonstrate kinship and pedigrees of its members. The results are often displayed in charts or written as narratives. The field of family history is broader than genealogy, and covers not just lineage but also family and community history and biography.
The genotype of an organism is its complete set of genetic material. Genotype can also be used to refer to the alleles or variants an individual carries in a particular gene or genetic location. The number of alleles an individual can have in a specific gene depends on the number of copies of each chromosome found in that species, also referred to as ploidy. In diploid species like humans, two full sets of chromosomes are present, meaning each individual has two alleles for any given gene. If both alleles are the same, the genotype is referred to as homozygous. If the alleles are different, the genotype is referred to as heterozygous.
Gentry are "well-born, genteel and well-bred people" of high social class, especially in the past. Gentry, in its widest connotation, refers to people of good social position connected to landed estates, upper levels of the clergy, or long established "gentle" families of noble descent, some of whom in some cases never obtained the official right to bear a coat of arms. The gentry largely consisted of landowners who could support themselves entirely from rental income or at least had a country estate; some were gentleman farmers.
A geode is a geological secondary formation within sedimentary and volcanic rocks. Geodes are hollow, vaguely spherical rocks, in which masses of mineral matter are secluded.
A geyser is a spring with an intermittent water discharge ejected turbulently and accompanied by steam. The formation of geysers is fairly rare and is caused by particular hydrogeological conditions that exist only in a few places on Earth.
Gillie or ghillie is an ancient Gaelic term for a person who acts as a servant or attendant on a fishing, hunting, deer stalking or hawking expedition, primarily in the Scottish Highlands or on a river such as the River Spey. In origin it referred especially to someone who attended on behalf of his male employer or guests.
A belt without a buckle, especially if a cord or rope, is called a girdle in various contexts, especially historical ones, where girdles were a very common part of everyday clothing from antiquity until perhaps the 15th century, especially for women. Most girdles were practical pieces of costume to hold other pieces in place, but some were loose and essentially for decoration. Among the elite these might include precious metals and jewels.
A glacier is a persistent body of dense ice, a form of rock, that is constantly moving downhill under its own weight. A glacier forms where the accumulation of snow exceeds its ablation over many years, often centuries. It acquires distinguishing features, such as crevasses and seracs, as it slowly flows and deforms under stresses induced by its weight. As it moves, it abrades rock and debris from its substrate to create landforms such as cirques, moraines, or fjords. Although a glacier may flow into a body of water, it forms only on land and is distinct from the much thinner sea ice and lake ice that form on the surface of bodies of water.
A gland is a cell or an organ in an animal's body that produces and secretes different substances that the organism needs, either into the bloodstream or into a body cavity or outer surface. A gland may also function to remove unwanted substances such as urine from the body.
Glimmer may refer to:GLIMMER, a gene prediction software package.
Could not find summary for "Glisten".
The glockenspiel or bells is a percussion instrument consisting of pitched aluminum or steel bars arranged in a keyboard layout. This makes the glockenspiel a type of metallophone, similar to the vibraphone.
Gneiss is a common and widely distributed type of metamorphic rock. It is formed by high-temperature and high-pressure metamorphic processes acting on formations composed of igneous or sedimentary rocks. This rock is formed under pressures ranging from 2 to 15 kbar, sometimes even more, and temperatures over 300 °C (572 °F). Gneiss nearly always shows a banded texture characterized by alternating darker and lighter colored bands and without a distinct cleavage.
A gnomon is the part of a sundial that casts a shadow. The term is used for a variety of purposes in mathematics and other fields, typically to measure directions, position, or time.
The gondola is a traditional, flat-bottomed Venetian rowing boat, well suited to the conditions of the Venetian lagoon. It is typically propelled by a gondolier, who uses a rowing oar, which is not fastened to the hull, in a sculling manner, and also acts as the rudder. The uniqueness of the gondola includes its being asymmetrical along the length, making the single-oar propulsion more efficient.
Pocket gophers, commonly referred to simply as gophers, are burrowing rodents of the family Geomyidae. The roughly 41 species are all endemic to North and Central America. They are commonly known for their extensive tunneling activities and their ability to damage farms and gardens.
A canyon, gorge or chasm, is a deep cleft between escarpments or cliffs resulting from weathering and the erosive activity of a river over geologic time scales. Rivers have a natural tendency to cut through underlying surfaces, eventually wearing away rock layers as sediments are removed downstream. A river bed will gradually reach a baseline elevation, which is the same elevation as the body of water into which the river drains. The processes of weathering and erosion will form canyons when the river's headwaters and estuary are at significantly different elevations, particularly through regions where softer rock layers are intermingled with harder layers more resistant to weathering.
Gossamer most commonly refers to:Fine spider silk used by spiderlings for ballooning or kiting
Gossamer (fabric), very light, sheer, gauze-like fabric.
Gourds include the fruits of some flowering plant species in the family Cucurbitaceae, particularly Cucurbita and Lagenaria. The term refers to a number of species and subspecies, many with hard shells, and some without. Many gourds have large, bulbous bodies and long necks, such as Dipper Gourds, many variations of Bottle Gourd and caveman club gourds. One of the earliest domesticated types of plants, subspecies of the bottle gourd, Lagenaria siceraria, have been discovered in archaeological sites dating from as early as 13,000 BC. Gourds have had numerous uses throughout history, including as tools, musical instruments, objects of art, film, and food.
In vector calculus, the gradient of a scalar-valued differentiable function  of several variables is the vector field  whose value at a point  gives the direction and the rate of fastest increase. The gradient transforms like a vector under change of basis of the space of variables of . If the gradient of a function is non-zero at a point , the direction of the gradient is the direction in which the function increases most quickly from , and the magnitude of the gradient is the rate of increase in that direction, the greatest absolute directional derivative. Further, a point where the gradient is the zero vector is known as a stationary point. The gradient thus plays a fundamental role in optimization theory, machine learning, and artificial intelligence, where it is used to minimize a function by gradient descent. In coordinate-free terms, the gradient of a function  may be defined by:.
Graffiti is writing or drawings made on a wall or other surface, usually without permission and within public view. Graffiti ranges from simple written "monikers" to elaborate wall paintings, and has existed since ancient times, with examples dating back to ancient Egypt, ancient Greece, and the Roman Empire.
A granary, also known as a grain house and historically as a granarium in Latin, is a post-harvest storage building primarily for grains or seeds. Granaries are typically built above the ground to prevent spoilage and protect the stored grains or seeds from rodents, pests, floods, and adverse weather conditions. They also assist in drying the grains to prevent mold growth. Modern granaries may incorporate advanced ventilation and temperature control systems to preserve the quality of the stored grains.
A granule is a large particle or grain. It can refer to:Granule, any of several submicroscopic structures, some with explicable origins, others noted only as cell type-specific features of unknown function
Azurophilic granule, a structure characteristic of the azurophil eukaryotic cell type
Chromaffin granule, a structure characteristic of the chromophil eukaryotic cell type.
Astrophysics and geology:
Granule, a visible structure in the photosphere of the Sun arising from activity in the Sun's convective zone
Martian spherules, spherical granules of material found on the surface of the planet Mars
Granule (geology), a specified particle size of 2–4 millimetres
Granule, in pharmaceutical terms, small particles gathered into a larger, permanent aggregate in which the original particles can still be identified
Granule, a unit of contiguously allocated virtual memory
Granular synthesis of sound.
In linguistics, a grapheme is the smallest functional unit of a writing system. The word grapheme is derived from Ancient Greek's gráphō ('write'), and the suffix -eme. The study of graphemes is called graphemics. The concept of a grapheme is abstract; it is similar to the notion of a character in computing. In orthographic and linguistic notation, a particular glyph (character) is represented as a grapheme by enclosing it within angle brackets: e.g. ⟨a⟩.
A gravestone or tombstone is a marker, usually stone, that is placed over a grave. A marker set at the head of the grave may be called a headstone. An especially old or elaborate stone slab may be called a funeral stele, stela, or slab. The use of such markers is traditional for Chinese, Jewish, Christian, and Islamic burials, as well as other traditions. In East Asia, the tomb's spirit tablet is the focus for ancestral veneration and may be removable for greater protection between rituals. Ancient grave markers typically incorporated funerary art, especially details in stone relief. With greater literacy, more markers began to include inscriptions of the deceased's name, date of birth, and date of death, often along with a personal message or prayer. The presence of a frame for photographs of the deceased is also increasingly common.
A greenhouse is a structure that is designed to regulate the temperature and humidity of the environment inside. There are different types of greenhouses, but they all have large areas covered with transparent materials that let sunlight pass and block it as heat. The most common materials used in modern greenhouses for walls and roofs are rigid plastic made of polycarbonate, plastic film made of polyethylene, or glass panes. When the inside of a greenhouse is exposed to sunlight, the temperature increases, providing a sheltered environment for plants to grow even in cold weather.
Gridiron may refer to:.
A grimoire, also known as a book of spells, magic book, or a spellbook, is a textbook of magic, typically including instructions on how to create magical objects like talismans and amulets; how to perform magical spells, charms, and divination; and how to summon or invoke supernatural entities such as angels, spirits, deities, and demons. In many cases, the books themselves are believed to be imbued with magical powers. The only contents found in a grimoire are information on spells, rituals, the preparation of magical tools, and lists of ingredients and their magical correspondences. In this manner, while all books on magic could be thought of as grimoires, not all magical books should be thought of as grimoires.
A grotto or grot is a natural or artificial cave or covered recess. Naturally occurring grottoes are typically small coastal caves associated with bodies of water and may be partially or fully submerged at high tide. Artificial grottoes have also been constructed as garden features, particularly in landscape design from the Renaissance onward. Well‑known natural examples include the Grotta Azzurra on Capri and the grotto at Tiberius’ Villa Jovis in the Bay of Naples.
Grove may refer to:Grove (nature), a small group of trees.
Guano is the accumulated excrement of seabirds or bats. Guano is a highly effective fertiliser due to the high content of nitrogen, phosphate, and potassium, all key nutrients essential for plant growth. Guano was also, to a lesser extent, sought for the production of gunpowder and other explosive materials.
Guerrilla warfare is a type of unconventional warfare in which small groups of irregular military, such as rebels, partisans, paramilitary personnel or armed civilians, which may include children in the military, use ambushes, sabotage, terrorism, raids, petty warfare or hit-and-run tactics in a rebellion, in a violent conflict, in a war or in a civil war to fight against regular military, police or rival insurgent forces.
A guild is a professional association of artisans and merchants who oversee the practice of their craft/trade in a particular territory. The word derived from medieval Europe where guilds were probably at their most extensive, but it has been used to describe similar groups before and after that period and in other parts of the world. Typically the key "privilege" was that only guild members were allowed to sell their goods or practice their skill within a city. There might be controls on minimum or maximum prices, hours of trading, numbers of apprentices, and many other things. Critics argued that these rules reduced free competition, but defenders maintained that they protected professional standards.
A gully is a landform created by running water, mass movement, or both, which erodes soil to a sharp angle, typically on a hillside or in river floodplains or terraces.
Gumshoe is a term for a rubber-soled shoe, one form of which is the galosh.
Gypsum is a soft sulfate mineral composed of calcium sulfate dihydrate, with the chemical formula CaSO4·2H2O. It is widely mined and is used as a fertilizer and as the main constituent in many forms of plaster, drywall and blackboard or sidewalk chalk. Gypsum also crystallizes as translucent crystals of selenite. It forms as an evaporite mineral and as a hydration product of anhydrite. The Mohs scale of mineral hardness defines gypsum as hardness value 2 based on scratch hardness comparison.
In British English, a haberdasher is a business or person who sells small articles for sewing, dressmaking and knitting, such as buttons, ribbons and zips; in the United States, the term refers instead to a men's clothing store that sells suits, shirts, neckties, men's dress shoes and other items.
A hacienda is an estate, similar to a Roman latifundium, in Spain and the former Spanish Empire. With origins in Andalusia, haciendas were variously plantations, mines or factories, with many haciendas combining these activities. The word is derived from Spanish hacer and haciendo (making), referring to productive business enterprises.
Hail is a form of solid precipitation. It is distinct from ice pellets, though the two are often confused. It consists of balls or irregular lumps of ice, each of which is called a hailstone. Ice pellets generally fall in cold weather, while hail growth is greatly inhibited during low surface temperatures.
A halberd is a two-handed polearm that was in prominent use from the 13th to 16th centuries. The halberd consists of an axe blade topped with a spike mounted on a long shaft. It may have a hook or thorn on the back of the axe blade for grappling mounted combatants and protecting allied soldiers, typically musketeers. The halberd was usually 1.5 to 1.8 metres long.
A hallmark is an official mark or series of marks struck on items made of metal, mostly to certify the content of noble metals—such as platinum, gold, silver and in some nations, palladium. In a more general sense, the term hallmark is used to refer to any standard of quality. Not to be confused with responsibility marks that are the marks of the maker.
A halophyte is a salt-tolerant plant that grows in soil or waters of high salinity, coming into contact with saline water through its roots or by salt spray, such as in saline semi-deserts, mangrove swamps, marshes and sloughs, and seashores. The word derives from Ancient Greek ἅλας (halas) 'salt' and φυτόν (phyton) 'plant'. Halophytes have different anatomy, physiology and biochemistry than glycophytes. An example of a halophyte is the salt marsh grass Spartina alterniflora. Relatively few plant species are halophytes—perhaps only 2% of all plant species.
A hammock, from Spanish hamaca, borrowed from Taíno and Arawak hamaka, is a sling made of fabric, rope, or netting, suspended between two or more points, used for swinging, sleeping, or resting. It normally consists of one or more cloth panels, or a woven network of twine or thin rope stretched with ropes between two firm anchor points such as trees or posts. Hammocks were developed by native inhabitants of the Americas for sleeping, as well as the English. Later, they were used aboard ships by sailors to enable comfort and maximize available space, by explorers or soldiers travelling in wooded regions and eventually by parents in the early 1920s for containing babies just learning to crawl. Today they are popular around the world for relaxation; they are also used as a lightweight bed on camping trips. The hammock is often seen as a symbol of summer, leisure, relaxation and simple, easy living.
A harbinger is a forerunner or forewarning, but may also refer to:.
A harbor, or harbour, is a sheltered body of water where ships, boats, and barges can be moored. The term harbor is often used interchangeably with port, which is a man-made facility built for loading and unloading vessels and dropping off and picking up passengers. Harbors usually include one or more ports. Alexandria Port in Egypt, meanwhile, is an example of a port with two harbors.
In soil science, agriculture and gardening, hardpan or soil pan is a dense layer of soil, usually found below the uppermost topsoil layer. There are different types of hardpan, all sharing the general characteristic of being a distinct soil layer that is largely impervious to water. Some hardpans are formed by deposits in the soil that fuse and bind the soil particles. These deposits can range from dissolved silica to matrices formed from iron oxides and calcium carbonate. Others are man-made, such as hardpan formed by compaction from repeated plowing, particularly with moldboard plows, or by heavy traffic or pollution.
The harmonica, also known as a French harp or mouth organ, is a free reed wind instrument used worldwide in many musical genres, notably in blues, American folk music, classical music, jazz, country, and rock. The many types of harmonica include diatonic, chromatic, tremolo, octave, orchestral, and bass versions. The harmonica is played by using the lips and tongue to direct air into or out of one holes along a mouthpiece. Behind each hole is a chamber containing at least one reed. The most common type of harmonica is a
diatonic Richter-tuned instrument with ten air passages and twenty reeds, often called a blues harp. The harmonica reed is a flat, elongated spring typically made of brass, stainless steel, or bronze, which is secured at one end over a slot that serves as an airway. When the free end is made to vibrate by the player's air, the reed alternately blocks and unblocks the airway to produce sound.
A harpsichord is a keyboard instrument that makes its sound by plucking a set of strings. In a harpsichord, depressing a key raises its back end within the instrument, which in turn lifts one or more jacks, each a thin strip of wood holding a small plectrum made from quill or plastic; each plectrum plucks a single string. The strings are under tension on a soundboard, which is mounted in a wooden case; the soundboard amplifies the vibrations from the strings so that the listeners can hear them. Harpsichord often include more than one choir of strings. Various devices are used to select which choir will sound when playing; these can include simple levers, or in more elaborate instruments the deployment of more than one keyboard.
The Opiliones are an order of arachnids,
colloquially known as harvestmen, harvesters, daddy long legs, or granddaddy long legs. Over 6,650 species of harvestmen have been discovered worldwide, although the total number of extant species may exceed 10,000. The order Opiliones includes five suborders: Cyphophthalmi, Eupnoi, Dyspnoi, Laniatores, and Tetrophthalmi, which were named in 2014.
A hatchery is a facility where eggs are hatched under artificial conditions, especially those of fish, poultry or even turtles. It may be used for ex situ conservation purposes, i.e. to breed rare or endangered species under controlled conditions; alternatively, it may be for economic reasons.
A hauberk or byrnie is a mail shirt. The term is usually used to describe a shirt reaching at least to mid-thigh and including sleeves. A haubergeon refers to a smaller mail shirt, that was sometimes sleeveless, but the terms are occasionally used interchangeably. Mail armor, likely invented by the Celts, became widely adopted for its flexibility and spread throughout Europe and Asia, becoming a staple in Roman legions and medieval warfare. By the 11th century, the hauberk evolved into a knee-length, sleeved mail shirt, as depicted in the Bayeux Tapestry and it remained in use in Europe until the Renaissance despite the rise of plate armor.
A haversack, musette bag, or small pack is a bag with a single shoulder strap. Although similar to a backpack, the single shoulder strap differentiates this type from other backpacks. There are exceptions to this general rule.
Hawthorn or Hawthorns may refer to:.
The haystack is a type of construction which is a feature typical of the calid European countries. It consists of a central wooden pole with stacked hay layers around it, forming a heap for later transfer to the barn.
A headland, also known as a head, is a coastal landform, a point of land usually high and often with a sheer drop, that extends into a body of water. It is a type of promontory. A headland of considerable size often is called a cape. Headlands are characterised by high, breaking waves, rocky shores, intense erosion, and steep sea cliff.
A heath is a shrubland habitat found mainly on free-draining infertile, acidic soils and is characterised by open, low-growing woody vegetation. Moorland is generally related to high-ground heaths with—especially in Great Britain—a cooler and damper climate.
Hegemony is the political, economic, and military predominance of one state over other states, either regional or global.
In popular usage, an heirloom is something that has been passed down for generations through family members. Examples are a family bible, antiques, weapons or jewellery.
A helix is a shape like a cylindrical coil spring or the thread of a machine screw. It is a type of smooth skew curve with tangent lines at a constant angle to a fixed axis. Helices are important in biology, as the DNA molecule is formed as two intertwined helices, and many proteins have helical substructures, known as alpha helices. The word helix comes from the Greek word ἕλιξ, "twisted, curved".
A "filled-in" helix – for example, a "spiral" (helical) ramp – is a surface called a helicoid.
Hemisphere may refer to:.
A henge can be one of three related types of Neolithic earthwork. The essential characteristic of all three is that they feature a ring-shaped bank and ditch, with the ditch inside the bank. Because the internal ditches would have served defensive purposes poorly, henges are not considered to have been defensive constructions.
Heraldry is a discipline relating to the design, display, study and transmission of armorial bearings. A full heraldic achievement may include a coat of arms on a shield, helmet and crest, together with accompanying devices, such as supporters, badges, heraldic banners and mottoes. Heraldic achievements are formally described in a blazon.
A herbarium is a collection of preserved plant specimens and associated data used for scientific study.
Heritage is anything that preserves history:.
Hermitage, The Hermitage or L'Hermitage may refer to:.
A heterotroph is an organism that cannot produce its own food, instead taking nutrition from other sources of organic carbon, mainly matter from other organisms. In the food chain, heterotrophs are primary, secondary and tertiary consumers, but not producers. Living organisms that are heterotrophic include most animals, all fungi, some bacteria and protists, and many parasitic plants. The term heterotroph arose in microbiology in 1946 as part of a classification of microorganisms based on their type of nutrition. The term is now used in many fields, such as ecology, in describing the food chain. Heterotrophs occupy the second and third trophic levels of the food chain while autotrophs occupy the first trophic level.
In geometry, a hexagon is a six-sided polygon. The total of the internal angles of any simple (non-self-intersecting) hexagon is 720°.
Hinterland is the area under the influence of a particular human settlement.
Hippodrome is a term sometimes used for public entertainment venues of various types. A modern example is the Hippodrome which opened in London in 1900 "combining circus, hippodrome, and stage performances".
A hive may refer to a beehive, an enclosed structure in which some honey bee species live and raise their young.
A handgun holster is a device used to hold or restrict the undesired movement of a handgun, most commonly in a location where it can be easily withdrawn for immediate use. Holsters are often attached to a belt or waistband, but they may be attached to other locations of the body. Holsters vary in the degree to which they secure or protect the firearm. Some holsters for law enforcement officers have a strap over the top of the holster to make the handgun less likely to fall out of the holster or harder for another person to grab the gun. Some holsters have a flap over the top to protect the gun from the elements.
The Hominini (hominins) form a taxonomic tribe of the subfamily Homininae (hominines). They comprise two extant genera: Homo (humans) and Pan, and in standard usage exclude the genus Gorilla (gorillas), which is grouped separately within the subfamily Homininae.
Mellite, also called honeystone, is an unusual mineral being also an organic chemical. It is chemically identified as an aluminium salt of mellitic acid, and specifically as aluminium benzenehexacarboxylate hexadecahydrate, with the chemical formula Al2C6(COO)6·16H2O.
Most commonly, the horizon is the border between the surface of a celestial body and its sky when viewed from the perspective of an observer on or above the surface of the celestial body. This concept is further refined as -.
Hornblende is a complex inosilicate series of minerals. It is not a recognized mineral in its own right, but the name is used as a general or field term, to refer to a dark amphibole. Hornblende minerals are common in igneous and metamorphic rocks.
Horticulture is the science and art of growing fruits, vegetables, flowers, or ornamental plants. Horticulture is different from general agriculture, agronomy, and gardening in that it involves specialization and controlled cultivation and management of plants and their ecosystems. It can be distinguished by its subfields and or unique botanical expressions. There are various divisions of horticulture because plants are grown for a variety of purposes. These divisions include, but are not limited to: propagation, arboriculture, landscaping, floriculture and turf maintenance. For each of these, there are various professions, aspects, tools used and associated challenges -- each requiring highly specialized skills and knowledge on the part of the horticulturist.
A hostel is a form of low-cost, short-term shared sociable lodging where guests can rent a bed, usually a bunk bed in a dormitory sleeping 4–20 people, with shared use of a lounge and usually a kitchen. Rooms can be private or shared - mixed or single-sex - and have private or shared bathrooms. Food and beverage, laundry services, luggage storage, and lockers may also be available.
Hotspot, Hot Spot or Hot spot may refer to:.
In geology, a hummock is a small knoll or mound above ground. They are typically less than 15 meters (50 ft) in height and tend to appear in groups or fields. Large landslide avalanches that typically occur in volcanic areas are responsible for formation of hummocks. From the initiation of the landslide to the final formation, hummocks can be characterized by their evolution, spatial distribution, and internal structure. As the movement of landslide begins, the extension faulting results in formation of hummocks with smaller ones at the front of the landslide and larger ones in the back. The size of the hummocks is dependent on their position in the initial mass. As this mass spreads, the hummocks further modify to break up or merge to form larger structures. It is difficult to make generalizations about hummocks because of the diversity in their morphology and sedimentology. An extremely irregular surface may be called hummocky.
A tropical cyclone is a rapidly rotating storm system with a low-pressure area, a closed low-level atmospheric circulation, strong winds, and a spiral arrangement of thunderstorms that produce heavy rain and squalls. Depending on its location and strength, a tropical cyclone is called a hurricane, typhoon, tropical storm, cyclonic storm, tropical depression, or simply cyclone. A hurricane is a strong tropical cyclone that occurs in the Atlantic Ocean or northeastern Pacific Ocean. A typhoon is the same thing which occurs in the northwestern Pacific Ocean. In the Indian Ocean and South Pacific, comparable storms are referred to as "tropical cyclones". In modern times, on average around 80 to 90 named tropical cyclones form each year around the world, over half of which develop hurricane-force winds of 65 kn or more.
In botany, a husk is the outer shell or coating of a seed. In the United States, the term husk often refers to the leafy outer covering of an ear of maize (corn) as it grows on the plant. Literally, a husk or hull includes the protective outer covering of a seed, fruit, or vegetable.
Hybrid may refer to:.
A hydrant is an outlet from a fluid main often consisting of an upright pipe with a valve attached, from which fluid can be tapped.
A hydrofoil is a lifting surface, or foil, that operates in water. It is similar in appearance and purpose to aerofoils used by airplanes. Boats that use hydrofoil technology are also simply termed hydrofoils. As a craft gains speed, the hydrofoils lift the boat's hull out of the water, decreasing drag and allowing greater speeds.
A hymn is a type of song, and partially synonymous with devotional song, specifically written for the purpose of adoration or prayer, and typically addressed to a deity or deities, or to a prominent figure or personification. The word hymn derives from Greek ὕμνος (hymnos), which means "a song of praise". A writer of hymns is known as a hymnist. The singing or composition of hymns is called hymnody. Collections of hymns are known as hymnals or hymn books. Hymns may or may not include instrumental accompaniment. Polyhymnia is the Greek goddess of hymns.
Hypoxia means a lower than normal level of oxygen, and may refer to:.
An icon is a religious work of art, most commonly a painting, in the cultures of the Eastern Orthodox, Oriental Orthodox, Catholic, and Lutheran churches. The most common subjects include Jesus, Mary, saints, and angels. Although especially associated with portrait style images concentrating on one or two main figures, the term also covers most of the religious images in a variety of artistic media produced by Eastern Christianity, including narrative scenes, usually from the Bible or The lives of saints.
An ideogram or ideograph is a symbol that is used within a given writing system to represent an idea or concept in a given language. Some ideograms are more arbitrary than others: some are only meaningful assuming preexisting familiarity with some convention; others more directly resemble their signifieds. Ideograms that represent physical objects by visually illustrating them are called pictograms.Numerals and mathematical symbols are ideograms, for example ⟨1⟩ 'one', ⟨2⟩ 'two', ⟨+⟩ 'plus', and ⟨=⟩ 'equals'.
The ampersand ⟨&⟩ is used in many languages to represent the word and, originally a stylized ligature of the Latin word et.
Other typographical examples include ⟨§⟩ 'section', ⟨€⟩ 'euro', ⟨£⟩ 'pound sterling', and ⟨©⟩ 'copyright'.
An idiom is a phrase or expression that largely or exclusively carries a figurative or non-literal meaning, rather than making any literal sense. Categorized as formulaic language, an idiomatic expression's meaning is different from the literal meanings of each word inside it.
Idol or Idols may refer to:.
Igneous rock, or magmatic rock, is one of the three main rock types, the others being sedimentary and metamorphic. Igneous rocks are formed through the cooling and solidification of magma or lava.
Ignition may refer to:.
An illusion is a distortion of the senses, which can reveal how the mind normally organizes and interprets sensory stimulation. Although illusions distort the human perception of reality, they are generally shared by most people.
Impetus may refer to:A source of motivation
Theory of impetus, a concept similar to inertia and momentum
Impetus (album), a 1997 re-release of the EP Passive Restraints
Impetus (waltz), a ballroom dance step

.
Incense is an aromatic biotic material that releases fragrant smoke when burnt. The term is used for either the material or the aroma. Incense is used for aesthetic reasons, religious worship, aromatherapy, meditation, and ceremonial reasons. It may also be used as a simple deodorant or insect repellent.
Incision may refer to:Cutting, the separation of an object, into two or more portions, through the application of an acutely directed force
A type of open wound caused by a sharp-edged object such as a knife, razor, or glass fragment
Surgical incision, a cut made through the skin and soft tissue to facilitate an operation or procedure
River incision, in geomorphology
Incisions (album), by American deathcore band Oceano
Incision (band), a Dutch hard rock band
Incision, a fictional character

.
Incline, inclined, inclining, or inclination may refer to:Grade (slope), the tilt, steepness, or angle from horizontal of a topographic feature or constructed element
Slope, the tilt, steepness, or angle from horizontal of a line .
Inclusion or Include may refer to:.
An incubator is anything that performs or facilitates various forms of incubation, and may refer to:.
In contract law, an indemnity is a contractual obligation of one party to compensate the loss incurred by another party due to the relevant acts of the indemnitor or any other party. The duty to indemnify is usually, but not always, coextensive with the contractual duty to "hold harmless" or "save harmless". In contrast, a "guarantee" is an obligation of one party to another party to perform the promise of a relevant other party if that other party defaults.
In semiotics, linguistics, anthropology, and philosophy of language, indexicality is the phenomenon of a sign pointing to some element in the context in which it occurs. A sign that signifies indexically is called an index or, in philosophy, an indexical.
Indigo is a term used for a number of hues in the region of blue. The word comes from the ancient dye of the same name. The term "indigo" can refer to the color of the dye, various colors of fabric dyed with indigo dye, a spectral color, one of the seven colors of the rainbow as described by Isaac Newton, or a region on the color wheel, and can include various shades of blue, ultramarine, and green-blue. Since the web era, the term has also been used for various purple and violet hues identified as "indigo", based on use of the term "indigo" in HTML web page specifications.
Infantry, or infantryman are a type of soldier who specialize in ground combat, typically fighting dismounted. Historically the term was used to describe foot soldiers, i.e. those who march and fight on foot. In modern usage, the term broadly encompasses a wide variety of subspecialties, including light infantry, irregular infantry, heavy infantry, mountain infantry, motorized infantry, mechanized infantry, airborne infantry, air assault infantry, and naval infantry. Other subtypes of infantry, such as line infantry and mounted infantry, were once commonplace but fell out of favor in the 19th century with the invention of more accurate and powerful weapons.
Inferno may refer to:Hell, an afterlife place of suffering
Conflagration, a large uncontrolled fire.
Influx or in flux may refer to:Flux (biology) of ions, molecules or other substances from the extracellular space to the intracellular space
Influx, a 2014 science-fiction novel by Daniel Suarez
Influx (album), an album by Janus
In Flux, a 1005 album by Ravi Coltrane
"Influx", a song by Higher Intelligence Agency from their Colourform album
InfluxDB, an open-source time series database
Influx Press, an independent British publishing company.
An ingot is a piece of relatively pure material, usually metal, that is cast into a shape suitable for further processing. In steelmaking, it is the first step among semi-finished casting products. Ingots usually require a second procedure of shaping, such as cold/hot working, cutting, or milling to produce a useful final product. Non-metallic and semiconductor materials prepared in bulk form may also be referred to as ingots, particularly when cast by mold based methods. Precious metal ingots can be used as currency, or as a currency reserve, as with gold bars.
In law and conflict of laws, domicile is relevant to an individual's "personal law", which includes the law that governs a person's status and their property. It is independent of a person's nationality. Although a domicile may change from time to time, a person has only one domicile at any point in their life, no matter what their circumstances. Domicile is distinct from habitual residence, where there is less focus on future intent.
Inheritance is the practice of receiving private property, titles, debts, entitlements, privileges, rights, and obligations upon the death of an individual. The rules of inheritance differ among societies and have changed over time. In legal terms, succession refers to the process by which a deceased person’s rights and property are transferred to their heirs, while inheritance refers to the actual property or assets that those heirs receive.
Initiation is a rite of passage marking entrance or acceptance into a group or society. It could also be a formal admission to adulthood in a community or one of its formal components. In an extended sense, it can also signify a transformation in which the initiate is 'reborn' into a new role. Examples of initiation ceremonies might include Christian baptism or confirmation, Jewish bar or bat mitzvah, acceptance into a fraternal organization, secret society or religious order, or graduation from school or recruit training. A person taking the initiation ceremony in traditional rites, such as those depicted in these pictures, is called an initiate.
An inkwell is a small jar or container, often made of glass, porcelain, silver, brass, or pewter, used for holding ink in a place convenient for the person who is writing. The artist or writer dips the brush, quill, or dip pen into the inkwell as needed or uses the inkwell as the source for filling the reservoir of a fountain pen. An inkwell usually has a lid to prevent contamination, evaporation, accidental spillage, and excessive exposure to air. A type known as the travelling inkwell was fitted with a secure screw lid so a traveller could carry a supply of ink in their luggage without the risk of leakage.
An inlet is a typically long and narrow indentation of a shoreline such as a small arm, cove, bay, sound, fjord, lagoon or marsh, that leads to an enclosed larger body of water such as a lake, estuary, gulf or marginal sea.
In biology, inoculum refers to the source material used for inoculation. Inoculum may refer to:In medicine, material that is the source of the inoculation in a vaccine
In microbiology, propagules: cells, tissue, or viruses that are used to inoculate a new culture
Microbial inoculant, the beneficial introduction of microbes to improve plant health
A method of propagation of fungal plant disease transmission
Fermentation starter, in food production.
An inquest is a judicial inquiry in common law jurisdictions, particularly one held to determine the cause of a person's death. Conducted by a judge, jury, or government official, an inquest may or may not require an autopsy carried out by a coroner or medical examiner. Generally, inquests are conducted only when deaths are sudden or unexplained. An inquest may be called at the behest of a coroner, judge, prosecutor, or, in some jurisdictions, upon a formal request from the public. A coroner's jury may be convened to assist in this type of proceeding. Inquest can also mean such a jury and the result of such an investigation. In general usage, inquest is also used to mean any investigation or inquiry.
An insignia is a sign or mark distinguishing a group, grade, rank, or function. It can be a symbol of personal power or that of an official group or governing body.
Solar irradiance is the power per unit area received from the Sun in the form of electromagnetic radiation in the wavelength range of the measuring instrument.
Solar irradiance is measured in watts per square metre (W/m2) in SI units.
Instinct is the inherent inclination of a living organism towards a particular complex behaviour, containing innate (inborn) elements. The simplest example of an instinctive behaviour is a fixed action pattern (FAP), in which a very short to medium length sequence of actions, without variation, are carried out in response to a corresponding clearly defined stimulus.
Insula is the Latin word for "island" and may refer to:Insula, a block in a Roman city plan surrounded by four streets
Insula (building), a kind of apartment building in ancient Rome that provided housing for all but the elite
Ínsula Barataria, the governorship assigned to Sancho Panza as a prank in the novel Don Quixote
Insular cortex, a brain structure
"Insula", a 2020 song by Moses Sumney from Græ

.
An insurgency is a violent, armed rebellion by small, lightly armed bands who practice guerrilla warfare against a larger authority. The key descriptive feature of insurgency is its asymmetric nature: small irregular forces face a large, well-equipped, regular military force state adversary. Due to this asymmetry, insurgents avoid large-scale direct battles, opting instead to blend in with the civilian population where they gradually expand territorial control and military forces. Insurgency frequently hinges on control of and collaboration with local populations.
Interlude may refer to:.
Burial, also known as interment or inhumation, is a method of final disposition whereby a dead body is placed into the ground, sometimes with objects. This is usually accomplished by excavating a pit or trench, placing the deceased and objects in it, and covering it over. A funeral is a ceremony that accompanies the final disposition.
The intertidal zone or foreshore is the area above water level at low tide and underwater at high tide; in other words, it is the part of the littoral zone within the tidal range. This area can include several types of habitats with various species of life, such as sea stars, sea urchins, and many species of coral with regional differences in biodiversity. Sometimes it is referred to as the littoral zone or seashore, although those can be defined as a wider region.
Intonation may refer to:Intonation (linguistics), variation of speaking pitch that is not used to distinguish words
Intonation (music), a musician's realization of pitch accuracy, or the pitch accuracy of a musical instrument
Intonation Music Festival, a summer music festival in Chicago.
An intranet is a computer network for sharing information, easier communication, collaboration tools, operational systems, and other computing services within an organization, usually to the exclusion of access by outsiders. The term is used in contrast to public networks, such as the Internet, but uses the same technology based on the Internet protocol suite.
A flood is an overflow of water that submerges land that is usually dry. In the sense of "flowing water", the word may also be applied to the inflow of the tide. Floods are of significant concern in agriculture, civil engineering and public health. Human changes to the environment often increase the intensity and frequency of flooding. Examples for human changes are land use changes such as deforestation and removal of wetlands, changes in waterway course or flood controls such as with levees. Global environmental issues also influence causes of floods, namely climate change which causes an intensification of the water cycle and sea level rise. For example, climate change makes extreme weather events more frequent and stronger. This leads to more intense floods and increased flood risk.
Inversion or inversions may refer to:.
Iodine is a chemical element; it has symbol I and atomic number 53. The heaviest of the stable halogens, it exists at standard conditions as a semi-lustrous, non-metallic solid that melts to form a deep violet liquid at 114 °C (237 °F), and boils to a violet gas at 184 °C (363 °F). The element was discovered by the French chemist Bernard Courtois in 1811 and was named two years later by Joseph Louis Gay-Lussac, after the Ancient Greek Ιώδης, meaning 'violet'.
The ionosphere is the ionized part of the upper atmosphere of Earth, from about 48 km (30 mi) to 965 km (600 mi) above sea level, a region that includes the thermosphere and parts of the mesosphere and exosphere. The ionosphere is ionized by solar radiation. It plays an important role in atmospheric electricity and forms the inner edge of the magnetosphere. It has practical importance because, among other functions, it influences radio propagation to distant places on Earth. Travel through this layer also impacts GPS signals, resulting in effects such as deflection in their path and delay in the arrival of the signal.
Iridescence is the phenomenon of certain surfaces that appear gradually to change colour as the angle of view or the angle of illumination changes. Iridescence is caused by wave interference of light in microstructures or thin films. Examples of iridescence include soap bubbles, feathers, butterfly wings and seashell nacre, and minerals such as opal. Pearlescence is a related effect where some or most of the reflected light is white. The term pearlescent is used to describe certain paint finishes, usually in the automotive industry, which actually produce iridescent effects.
Ironwood is a common name for many woods that have a reputation for hardness, or specifically a wood density that is denser than water, although usage of the name ironwood in English may or may not indicate a tree that yields such heavy wood.
Isobar may refer to:Isobar (meteorology), a line on a map or chart connecting points of equal atmospheric pressure reduced to sea level.
Isobaric process, a process taking place at constant pressure
Isobar (nuclide), one of multiple nuclides with the same mass but with different numbers of protons.
In chemistry, isomers are molecules or polyatomic ions with an identical molecular formula – that is, the same number of atoms of each element – but distinct arrangements of atoms in space. Isomerism refers to the existence or possibility of isomers.
Isotherm may refer to:Isotherm – a type of equal temperature at a given date or time on a geographic map
Isotherm – in thermodynamics, a curve on a p-V diagram for an isothermal process
Moisture sorption isotherm – a curve giving the functional relationship between humidity and equilibrium water content of a material for a constant temperature
Sorption isotherm – a curve giving the functional relationship between adsorbate and adsorbent in a constant-temperature adsorption process

.
Ivory is a hard, white material from the tusks and teeth of animals, that consists mainly of dentin, one of the physical structures of teeth and tusks. The chemical structure of the teeth and tusks of mammals is the same, regardless of the species of origin, but ivory contains structures of mineralised collagen. The trade in certain teeth and tusks other than elephant is well established and widespread; therefore, "ivory" can correctly be used to describe any mammalian teeth or tusks of commercial interest which are large enough to be carved or scrimshawed.
Jade is an umbrella term for two different types of decorative rocks used for jewelry or ornaments. Jade is often referred to by either of two different silicate mineral names: nephrite, or jadeite. Nephrite is typically green, although may be yellow, white or black. Jadeite varies from white or near-colorless, through various shades of green, to lavender, yellow, orange, brown and black. Rarely it may be blue.
Both of these names refer to their use as gemstones, and each has a mineralogically more specific name. Both the amphibole jade (nephrite) and pyroxene jade are mineral aggregates (rocks) rather than mineral species.
In architecture, a jamb, is the side-post or lining of a doorway or other aperture. The jambs of a window outside the frame are called reveals. Small shafts to doors and windows with caps and bases are called jamb-shafts; when in the inside arris of the jamb of a window, they are sometimes called scoinsons.
Jargon, or technical language, is the specialized terminology associated with a particular field or area of activity. Jargon is normally employed in a particular communicative context and may not be well understood outside that context. The context is usually a particular occupation, but any ingroup can have jargon. The key characteristic that distinguishes jargon from the rest of a language is its specialized vocabulary, which includes terms and definitions of words that are unique to the context, and terms used in a narrower and more exact sense than when used in colloquial language. This can lead outgroups to misunderstand communication attempts. Jargon is sometimes understood as a form of technical slang and then distinguished from the official terminology used in a particular field of activity.
A javelin is a light spear designed primarily to be thrown, historically as a ranged weapon. Today, the javelin is predominantly used for sporting purposes such as the javelin throw. The javelin is nearly always thrown by hand, unlike the sling, bow, and crossbow, which launch projectiles with the aid of a hand-held mechanism. However, devices do exist to assist the javelin thrower in achieving greater distances, such as spear-throwers or the amentum.
Jellyfish, also known as sea jellies or simply jellies, are the medusa-phase of certain gelatinous members of the subphylum Medusozoa, which is a major part of the phylum Cnidaria. Jellyfish are mainly free-swimming marine animals, although a few are anchored to the seabed by stalks rather than being motile. They are made of an umbrella-shaped main body made of mesoglea, known as the bell, and a collection of trailing tentacles on the underside.
A jetty is a man-made structure that protrudes from land out into water. A jetty may serve as a breakwater, as a walkway, or both; or, in pairs, as a means of constricting a channel. The term derives from the French word jetée, 'thrown', signifying something thrown out.
Jigsaw may refer to:Jigsaw (tool), a reciprocating saw that can cut irregular curves
Jigsaw puzzle, a tiling puzzle that requires the assembly of interlocking pieces.
A jubilee is often used to refer to a celebration, commemoration, or anniversary. "Jubilation" for joyful celebration comes from "jubilee". The term comes from the Hebrew Bible, initially concerning a recurring religious observance involving a set number of years, that notably involved freeing of debt slaves. Emperors of ancient Rome customarily marked anniversaries of their rule with celebrations, although they did not use the term "jubilee." Jubilee is also a term used in Roman Catholicism for special years. The term came into English usage from translation of the Bible, together with customary celebration of a reign, and at least since the 19th century is regularly used to denote the celebrations associated with the reign of monarchs after a milestone number of years have passed.
Juncture, in linguistics, is the manner of moving (transition) between two successive syllables in speech. An important type of juncture is the suprasegmental phonemic cue by means of which a listener can distinguish between two otherwise identical sequences of sounds that have different meanings.
A jurist is a person with expert knowledge of law; someone who analyzes and comments on law. This person is usually a specialist legal scholar, mostly with a formal education in law and often a legal practitioner.
A kaleidoscope is an optical instrument with two or more reflecting surfaces tilted to each other at an angle, so that one or more objects on one end of these mirrors are shown as a symmetrical pattern when viewed from the other end, due to repeated reflection. These reflectors are often enclosed in a tube, usually containing on one end a cell with loose, colored pieces of glass or other transparent materials to be reflected into the viewed pattern. Rotation of the cell causes motion of the materials, resulting in an ever-changing view being presented.
Karst is a topography formed from the dissolution of soluble carbonate rocks such as limestone and dolomite. It is characterized by features like poljes above and drainage systems with sinkholes and caves underground. There is some evidence that karst may occur in more weathering-resistant rocks such as quartzite given the right conditions.
Keepsake may refer to:Souvenir, an object a person acquires for the memories the owner associates with it
Gift book, a 19th-century decorated book which collected essays, short fiction, and poetry
Keepsake (band), an American emo/screamo band
Keepsake (quartet), an American barbershop quartet
Keepsake , 2006
Keepsake , 2019
Keepsake, a 2017 album by Heavy Heart
Keepsake, a 2010 album by Kathy and Carol
Keepsakes (album), by All About Eve, 2006
"Keepsake", a song by The Gaslight Anthem from the 2012 album Handwritten
The Keepsake, a literary annual 1828–1857.
The kelvin is the base unit for temperature in the International System of Units (SI). The Kelvin scale is an absolute temperature scale that starts at the lowest possible temperature, taken to be 0 K. By definition, the Celsius scale and the Kelvin scale have the same magnitude; that is, a rise of 1 K is equal to a rise of 1 °C and vice versa, and any temperature in degrees Celsius can be converted to kelvin by adding 273.15.
Kernel may refer to:.
The term kestrel is the common name given to several species of predatory birds from the falcon genus Falco. Kestrels are most easily distinguished by their typical hunting behaviour which is to hover at a height of around 10–20 metres (35–65 ft) over open country and swoop down on ground prey, usually small mammals, lizards or large insects, while other falcons are more adapted for active hunting during flight.
A kiln is a thermally insulated chamber, a type of oven, that produces temperatures sufficient to complete some process, such as hardening, drying, or chemical changes. Kilns have been used for millennia to turn objects made from clay into pottery, tiles and bricks. Various industries use rotary kilns for pyroprocessing and to transform many other materials.
Kindling may refer to:Kindling, material for firelighting.
Historically, a kiosk was a small garden pavilion open on some or all sides common in Persia, the Indian subcontinent, and in the Ottoman Empire from the 13th century onward. Today, several examples of this type of kiosk still exist in and around the Topkapı Palace in Istanbul, and they can be seen in Balkan countries.
A kite is a tethered heavier-than-air craft with wing surfaces that react against the air to create lift and drag forces. A kite consists of wings, tethers and anchors. Kites often have a bridle and tail to guide the face of the kite so the wind can lift it. Some kite designs do not need a bridle; box kites can have a single attachment point. A kite may have fixed or moving anchors that can balance the kite. The name is derived from the kite, the hovering bird of prey. There are several kite shapes, including the popular delta kite and diamond kite.
A knight is a person granted an honorary title of a knighthood by a head of state or representative for service to the monarch, the church, or the country, especially in a military capacity.
In geography, knoll is another term for a knowe or hillock, a small, low, round natural hill or mound.
Kodiak may refer to:.
A kurgan is a type of tumulus constructed over a grave, often characterized by containing a single human body along with grave vessels, weapons, and horses. Originally in use on the Pontic–Caspian steppe, kurgans spread into much of Central Asia and Eastern, Southeast, Western, and Northern Europe during the third millennium BC.
In Greek mythology, the Labyrinth is an elaborate, confusing structure designed and built by the mythological artificer Daedalus for King Minos of Crete at Knossos. Its function was to hold the Minotaur, the monster eventually killed by the hero Theseus. Daedalus had so cunningly made the Labyrinth that he could barely escape it after he built it.
Lacquer is a type of hard and usually shiny coating or finish applied to materials such as wood or metal. It is most often made from tree sap and wax and has been in use since antiquity.
Lactose is a disaccharide composed of galactose and glucose and has the molecular formula C12H22O11. Lactose makes up around 2–8% of milk (by mass). The name comes from lac (gen. lactis), the Latin word for milk, plus the suffix -ose used to name sugars. The compound is a white, water-soluble, non-hygroscopic solid with a mildly sweet taste. It is used in the food industry.
A lagoon is a shallow body of water separated from a larger body of water by a narrow landform, such as a reef, a barrier island or islands, a barrier peninsula, or an isthmus. Lagoons are commonly divided into coastal lagoons and atoll lagoons. They have also been identified as occurring on mixed-sand and gravel coastlines. There is an overlap between bodies of water classified as coastal lagoons and bodies of water classified as estuaries. Lagoons are common coastal features around many parts of the world.
Lair may refer to:Lair (novel), a 1979 novel by James Herbert
Lair , a 2007 video game
The Lair, a 2007–2008 American gay-themed vampire television series
The Lair , a 2022 action horror film
The Lair (Dreamworld), an exotic animal exhibit at the Dreamworld theme park on the Gold Coast, Australia.
Lamina may refer to:.
Lampreys are a group of jawless fish composing the order Petromyzontiformes, sole order in the class Petromyzontida. The adult lamprey is characterized by a toothed, funnel-like sucking mouth. The common name "lamprey" is probably derived from Latin lampetra, which may mean "stone licker", though the etymology is uncertain. "Lamprey" is sometimes seen for the plural form.
Landslides, also known as landslips, rockslips or rockslides, are several forms of mass wasting that may include a wide range of ground movements, such as rockfalls, mudflows, shallow or deep-seated slope failures and debris flows. Landslides occur in a variety of environments, characterized by either steep or gentle slope gradients, from mountain ranges to coastal cliffs or even underwater, in which case they are called submarine landslides.
A lanyard is a length of cord, webbing, or strap that may serve any of various functions, which include a means of attachment, restraint, retrieval, activation, and deactivation. A lanyard is also a piece of rigging used to secure or lower objects aboard a ship.
Lapidary is the practice of shaping stone, minerals, or gemstones into decorative items such as cabochons, engraved gems, and faceted designs. A person who practices lapidary techniques of cutting, grinding, and polishing is known as a lapidary or lapidarist. Hardstone carving requires specialized carving techniques.
A lasso or lazo, also called reata or la reata in Mexico, and in the United States riata or lariat, is a loop of rope designed as a restraint to be thrown around a target and tightened when pulled. It is a well-known tool of the Mexican and South American cowboys, which was then adopted from the Mexicans by the cowboys of the United States. The word is also a verb; to lasso is to throw the loop of rope around something.
The larynx, commonly called the voice box, is an organ in the top of the neck involved in respiration, producing sound and protecting the trachea against food aspiration. The opening of the larynx into the pharynx, known as the laryngeal inlet, is about 4–5 centimeters in diameter. The larynx houses the vocal cords, and manipulates pitch and volume, which is essential for phonation. It is situated just below where the tract of the pharynx splits into the trachea and the esophagus.
Lattice may refer to:.
Laureate, meaning "crowned with laurel", signifies eminence or association with literary awards or military decoration. The term is used for recipients of the Nobel Prize, the Gandhi Peace Award, the Student Peace Prize, distinguished poets, and for former music directors of orchestras who retain some level of involvement.
Could not find summary for "Lavaflow".
A leachate is any liquid that, in the course of passing through matter, extracts soluble or suspended solids, or any other component of the material through which it has passed.
Leaflet may refer to:Leaflet (botany), part of a compound leaf
Leaflet (software), a JavaScript library for interactive maps
Pamphlet, a type of publication sometimes described as a folded leaflet
Flyer (pamphlet)
Airborne leaflet propaganda
Cusps of heart valves, also known as leaflets
Any of two layers of lipid bilayer, including biological membrane

.
A ledger is a book or collection of accounts in which accounting transactions are recorded. Each account has:an opening or brought-forward balance;
a list of transactions, each recorded as either a debit or credit in separate columns
and an ending or closing, or carry-forward, balance.
In geography and seamanship, windward and leeward are directions relative to the wind. Windward is upwind from the point of reference, i.e., towards the direction from which the wind is coming; leeward is downwind from the point of reference, i.e., along the direction towards which the wind is going.
Legacy or Legacies may refer to:.
Legumes are plants in the pea family Fabaceae, or the fruit or seeds of such plants. When used as a dry grain for human consumption, the seeds are also called pulses. Legumes are grown agriculturally, primarily for human consumption, but also as livestock forage and silage, and as soil-enhancing green manure. Legumes produce a botanically unique type of fruit – a simple dry fruit that develops from a simple carpel and usually dehisces on two sides.
Leisure has often been defined as a quality of experience or as free time. Free time is time spent away from business, work, job hunting, domestic chores, and education, as well as necessary activities such as eating and sleeping. Leisure as an experience usually emphasizes dimensions of perceived freedom and choice. It is done for "its own sake", for the quality of experience and involvement. Other classic definitions include Thorstein Veblen's (1899) of "nonproductive consumption of time." Free time is not easy to define due to the multiplicity of approaches used to determine its essence. Different disciplines have definitions reflecting their common issues: for example, sociology on social forces and contexts and psychology as mental and emotional states and conditions. From a research perspective, these approaches have an advantage of being quantifiable and comparable over time and place.
The lentil is an annual legume grown for its lens-shaped edible seeds or pulses, also called lentils. It is about 40 cm (16 in) tall, and the seeds grow in pods, usually with two seeds in each.
The leopard is one of the five extant cat species in the genus Panthera. It has a pale yellowish to dark golden fur with dark spots grouped in rosettes. Its body is slender and muscular, reaching a length of 92–183 cm (36–72 in) with a 66–102 cm (26–40 in) long tail and a shoulder height of 60–70 cm (24–28 in). Males typically weigh 30.9–72 kg (68–159 lb), and females 20.5–43 kg (45–95 lb).
A levee, is an elevated ridge alongside the banks of a river, often intended to protect against flooding of the area adjoining the river. Alternatively, it is called a dike, dyke, floodbank, or stop bank. It is a type of embankment. A levee, natural or artificial, is usually earthen and often runs parallel to the course of a river in its floodplain or along low-lying coastlines.
A lexicon is the vocabulary of a language or branch of knowledge. In linguistics, a lexicon is a language's inventory of lexemes. The word lexicon derives from Greek word λεξικόν, neuter of λεξικός meaning 'of or for words'.
Ley lines are straight alignments drawn between various historic structures, prehistoric sites, and prominent landmarks. The idea was developed in early 20th-century Europe, with ley line believers arguing that these alignments were recognised by ancient societies that deliberately erected structures along them. Since the 1960s, members of the Earth Mysteries movement and other esoteric traditions have commonly believed that such ley lines demarcate "earth energies" and serve as guides for alien spacecraft. Archaeologists and scientists regard ley lines as an example of pseudoarchaeology and pseudoscience.
A lichen is a hybrid colony of algae or cyanobacteria living symbiotically among filaments of multiple fungus species, along with bacteria embedded in the cortex or "skin", in a mutualistic relationship. Lichens are the lifeform that first brought the term symbiosis into biological context.
Lifeboat or Lifeboats may refer to:.
Lifeline or Lifelines may refer to:.
Lignite, often called brown coal, is a soft, brown, combustible sedimentary rock formed from naturally compressed peat. It has a carbon content around 25–35% and is considered the lowest rank of coal due to its relatively low heat content. When removed from the ground, it contains a very high amount of moisture, which partially explains its low carbon content. Lignite is mined all around the world and is used almost exclusively as a fuel for steam-electric power generation.
Limestone is a type of carbonate sedimentary rock which is the main source of the material lime. It is composed mostly of the minerals calcite and aragonite, which are different crystal forms of calcium carbonate CaCO3. Limestone forms when these minerals precipitate out of water containing dissolved calcium. This can take place through both biological and nonbiological processes, though biological processes, such as the accumulation of corals and shells in the sea, have likely been more important for the last 540 million years. Limestone often contains fossils which provide scientists with information on ancient environments and on the evolution of life.
Linguistics is the scientific study of language. The areas of linguistic analysis are syntax, semantics (meaning), morphology, phonetics, phonology, and pragmatics. Subdisciplines such as biolinguistics and psycholinguistics bridge many of these divisions.
A lintel or lintol is a type of beam that spans openings such as portals, doors, windows and fireplaces. It can be a decorative architectural element, or a combined ornamented/structural item. In the case of windows, the bottom span is referred to as a sill, but, unlike a lintel, does not serve to bear a load to ensure the integrity of the wall.
Modern-day lintels may be made using prestressed concrete and are also referred to as beams in beam-and-block slabs or as ribs in rib-and-block slabs. These prestressed concrete lintels and blocks can serve as components that are packed together and propped to form a suspended-floor concrete slab.
Lionfish are venomous marine fish native to the Indo-Pacific. They are characterized by conspicuous warning coloration with red or black bands and ostentatious dorsal fins tipped with venomous spines. Pterois radiata, Pterois volitans, and Pterois miles are the most commonly studied species in the genus. Pterois species are popular aquarium fish. P. volitans and P. miles are recent and significant invasive species in the west Atlantic, Caribbean Sea, and Mediterranean Sea.
A liqueur is an alcoholic drink composed of spirits and additional flavorings such as sugar, fruits, herbs, and spices. Often served with or after dessert, they are typically heavily sweetened and un-aged, beyond a resting period during production, when necessary, for their flavors to mingle.
A livery is an identifying design, such as a uniform, ornament, symbol, or insignia that designates ownership or affiliation, often found on an individual or vehicle. Livery often includes elements of the heraldry relating to the individual or corporate body featured in the livery. Alternatively, some kind of a personal emblem or badge, or a distinctive colour, is featured.
Loam is soil composed mostly of sand, silt, and a smaller amount of clay. By weight, its mineral composition is about 40–40–20% concentration of sand–silt–clay, respectively. These proportions can vary to a degree, however, and result in different types of loam soils: sandy loam, silty loam, clay loam, sandy clay loam, silty clay loam, and loam.
In anatomy, a lobe is a clear anatomical division or extension of an organ that can be determined without the use of a microscope at the gross anatomy level. This is in contrast to the much smaller lobule, which is a clear division only visible under the microscope.
Locomotion means the act or ability of something to transport or move itself from place to place.
Lodestones are naturally magnetized pieces of the mineral magnetite. They are naturally occurring magnets, which can attract iron. The property of magnetism was first discovered in antiquity through lodestones. Pieces of lodestone, suspended so they could turn, were the first magnetic compasses, and their importance to early navigation is indicated by the name lodestone, which in Middle English means "course stone" or "leading stone",
from the now-obsolete meaning of lode as "journey, way".
Loess is a clastic, predominantly silt-sized sediment that is formed by the accumulation of wind-blown dust. Ten percent of Earth's land area is covered by loesses or similar deposits.
A logbook is a record used to record states, events, or conditions applicable to complex machines or the personnel who operate them. Logbooks are commonly associated with the operation of aircraft, nuclear plants, particle accelerators, and ships.
Longships were long clinker-built warships propelled by oars, and later also by sail, used by the Norse and surrounding Germanic tribes from at least the 4th century AD and throughout the Viking Age, being part of the Nordic ship building tradition. As the name suggests, they were long slender ships, intended for speed, with the ability to carry a large crew of warriors. They are sometimes called "dragonships" due to a tradition of the fore and aft ends being decorated with a raised dragonhead and tail respectively, with the sail making up the "wing" of the dragon. The largest types were thus called "dragons" (dreki), while smaller types had names such as karve (karfi), snekke (snekkja), and skeid (skeið).
Longitude is a geographic coordinate that specifies the east-west position of a point on the surface of the Earth, or another celestial body. It is an angular measurement, usually expressed in degrees and denoted by the Greek letter lambda (λ). Meridians are imaginary semicircular lines running from pole to pole that connect points with the same longitude. The prime meridian defines 0° longitude; by convention the International Reference Meridian for the Earth passes near the Royal Observatory in Greenwich, south-east London on the island of Great Britain. Positive longitudes are east of the prime meridian, and negative ones are west.
A loom is a device used to weave cloth and tapestry. The basic purpose of any loom is to hold the warp threads under tension to facilitate the interweaving of the weft threads. The precise shape of the loom and its mechanics may vary, but the basic function is the same.
Lore may refer to:.
Lumber, also called timber or fine wood in the United Kingdom, Australia, and New Zealand, is wood that has been processed into uniform and useful sizes, including beams and planks or boards. Lumber is mainly used for construction framing, as well as finishing. Lumber has many uses beyond home building. In some parts of the world, including the United States and Canada, the term timber refers specifically to unprocessed wood fiber, such as cut logs or standing trees that have yet to be cut.
In lunar calendars, a lunar month is the time between two successive syzygies of the same type: new moons or full moons. The precise definition varies, especially for the beginning of the month.
Lupine may be one of several things:.
Lustre or Luster may refer to:.
Lymph is the fluid that flows through the lymphatic system, a system composed of lymph vessels (channels) and intervening lymph nodes whose function, like the venous system, is to return fluid from the tissues to be recirculated. At the origin of the fluid-return process, interstitial fluid—the fluid between the cells in all body tissues—enters the lymph capillaries. This lymphatic fluid is then transported via progressively larger lymphatic vessels through lymph nodes, where substances are removed by tissue lymphocytes and circulating lymphocytes are added to the fluid, before emptying ultimately into the right or the left subclavian vein, where it mixes with central venous blood.
A machine is a thermodynamic system that uses power to apply forces and control movement to perform an action. The term is commonly applied to artificial devices, such as those employing engines or motors, but also to natural biological macromolecules, such as molecular machines. Machines can be driven by animals and people, by natural forces such as wind and water, and by chemical, thermal, or electrical power, and include a system of mechanisms that shape the actuator input to achieve a specific application of output forces and movement. They can also include computers and sensors that monitor performance and plan movement, often called mechanical systems.
A madrigal is a form of secular vocal music most typical of the Renaissance and early Baroque (1580–1650) periods, although revisited by some later European composers. The polyphonic madrigal is unaccompanied, and the number of voices varies from two to eight, but the form usually features three to six voices, whilst the metre of the madrigal varies between two or three tercets, followed by one or two couplets. Unlike verse-repeating strophic forms sung to the same music, most madrigals are through-composed, featuring different music for each stanza of lyrics, whereby the composer expresses the emotions contained in each line and in single words of the poem being sung.
The term magistrate is used in a variety of systems of governments and laws to refer to a civilian officer who administers the law. In ancient Rome, a magistratus was one of the highest ranking government officers, and possessed both judicial and executive powers. In other parts of the world, such as China, magistrate is a word applied to a person responsible for administration over a particular geographic area. Today, in some jurisdictions, a magistrate is a judicial officer who hears cases in a lower court, and typically deals with more minor or preliminary matters. In other jurisdictions, magistrates are typically trained volunteers appointed to deal with criminal and civil matters in their local areas.
Magnetite is a mineral and one of the main iron ores, with the chemical formula Fe2+Fe3+2O4. It is one of the oxides of iron, and is ferrimagnetic; it is attracted to a magnet and can be magnetized to become a permanent magnet itself. With the exception of extremely rare native iron deposits, it is the most magnetic of all the naturally occurring minerals on Earth. Naturally magnetized pieces of magnetite, called lodestone, will attract small pieces of iron, which is how ancient peoples first discovered the property of magnetism.
Magnolia is a large genus of about 210 to 340 flowering plant species in the subfamily Magnolioideae of the family Magnoliaceae. The natural range of Magnolia species is disjunct, with a main center in east, south and southeast Asia and a secondary center in eastern North America, Central America, the West Indies, and some species in South America.
A mainframe computer, informally called a mainframe, maxicomputer, or big iron, is a computer used primarily by large organizations for critical applications like bulk data processing for tasks such as censuses, industry and consumer statistics, enterprise resource planning, and large-scale transaction processing. A mainframe computer is large but not as large as a supercomputer and has more processing power than some other classes of computers, such as minicomputers, workstations, and personal computers. Most large-scale computer-system architectures were established in the 1960s, but they continue to evolve. Mainframe computers are often used as servers.
A mammal is a vertebrate animal of the class Mammalia. Mammals are characterised by the presence of milk-producing mammary glands for feeding their young, a broad neocortex region of the brain, fur or hair, and three middle ear bones. These characteristics distinguish them from reptiles and birds, from which their ancestors diverged in the Carboniferous Period over 300 million years ago. Around 6,640 extant species of mammals have been described and divided into 27 orders. The study of mammals is called mammalogy.
In jawed vertebrates, the mandible, lower jaw, or jawbone is a bone that makes up the lower – and typically more mobile – component of the mouth.
A mandolin is a stringed musical instrument in the lute family and is generally plucked with a pick. It most commonly has four courses of doubled strings tuned in unison, thus giving a total of eight strings. A variety of string types are used, with steel strings being the most common and usually the least expensive. The courses are typically tuned in an interval of perfect fifths, with the same tuning as a violin. Also, like the violin, it is the soprano member of a family that includes the mandola, octave mandolin, mandocello and mandobass.
A mangrove is a shrub or tree that grows mainly in coastal saline or brackish water. Mangroves grow in an equatorial climate, typically along coastlines and tidal rivers. They have particular adaptations to take in extra oxygen and remove salt, allowing them to tolerate conditions that kill most plants. The term is also used for tropical coastal vegetation consisting of such species. Mangroves are taxonomically diverse due to convergent evolution in several plant families. They occur worldwide in tropical and subtropical coastal areas, mainly between latitudes 30° N and 30° S, with the greatest mangrove area within 5° of the equator. Mangrove plant families first appeared during the Late Cretaceous to Paleocene epochs and became widely distributed in part due to the movement of tectonic plates. The oldest known fossils of mangrove palm date to 75 million years ago.
In mathematics, a manifold is a topological space that locally resembles Euclidean space near each point. More precisely, an -dimensional manifold, or -manifold for short, is a topological space with the property that each point has a neighborhood that is homeomorphic to an open subset of -dimensional Euclidean space.
Manor may refer to:.
A mantle is a piece of clothing, a type of cloak. Several other meanings are derived from that.
A manuscript was, traditionally, any document written by hand or typewritten, as opposed to mechanically printed or reproduced in some indirect or automated way. More recently, the term has come to be understood to further include any written, typed, or word-processed copy of an author's work, as distinguished from the rendition as a printed version of the same.
Marble is a metamorphic rock consisting of carbonate minerals (most commonly calcite (CaCO3) or dolomite (CaMg(CO3)2) that have recrystallized under the influence of heat and pressure. It has a crystalline texture, and is typically not foliated (layered), although there are exceptions.
A sailor, seaman, mariner, or seafarer is a person who works aboard a watercraft as part of its crew, and may work in any one of a number of different fields that are related to the operation and maintenance of a ship. While the term sailor has its etymological roots from sailing, that is a time when sailing ships were the main mode of transport at sea, it now refers to the personnel of all watercraft regardless of the type of vessel, boat or ship. It encompasses people who operate ships professionally, be it for a military (navy) or civilian or for sports or recreation. In a navy, there may be further distinctions: sailor may refer to any member of the navy even if they are based on land, while seaman may refer to a specific enlisted rank. Additionally, fisherman are seen as a distinct type of sailor, that is those engaged in fishing.
Marlins are fish from the family Istiophoridae, which includes between 9 and 11 species, depending on the taxonomic authority.
Marmots are large ground squirrels in the genus Marmota, with 15 species living in Asia, Europe, and North America. These herbivores are active during the summer, when they can often be found in groups, but are not seen during the winter, when they hibernate underground. They are the heaviest and largest members of the squirrel family.
Marquee may refer to:Marquee (overhang), a secondary covering attached to the exterior wall of a building
Marquee (structure), a structure placed over the entrance to a hotel, theater, casino, train station, or similar building.
Pole marquee, a large tent, generally used as a temporary building
Marquee , 1979 Canadian drama television series
Marquee Cinemas, a movie theater chain in the United States
Marquee Club, commonly called the Marquee, a rock club in London
Marquee element, an HTML tag that makes text scroll across the page as if on a marquee
Marquee Sports Network, a Chicago-based regional sports cable channel
Marquee Theatre, a concert venue in Tempe, Arizona, US
"Marquee Sign" (song), a 2017 single by Sara Evans
"Marquee", a song by Superchunk from their 1997 album, Indoor Living
Marquee Broadcasting, a small American broadcasting company
The Marquee (mountain), a mountain in New Zealand.
In ecology, a marsh is a wetland that is dominated by herbaceous plants rather than by woody plants. More in general, the word can be used for any low-lying and seasonally waterlogged terrain. In Europe and in agricultural literature low-lying meadows that require draining and embanked polderlands are also referred to as marshes or marshland.
A marten is a weasel-like mammal in the genus Martes within the subfamily Guloninae, in the family Mustelidae. They have bushy tails and large paws with partially retractile claws. The fur varies from yellowish to dark brown, depending on the species; it is valued by animal trappers for the fur trade. Martens are slender, agile animals, which are adapted to living in the taiga, and inhabit coniferous and northern deciduous forests across the Northern Hemisphere.
A martyr is someone who suffers persecution and death for advocating, renouncing, or refusing to renounce or advocate, a religious belief or other cause as demanded by an external party. In colloquial usage, the term can also refer to any person who suffers a significant consequence in protest or support of a cause.
Masonry is the craft of building a structure with brick, stone, or similar material, including mortar plastering, which are often laid in, bound, and pasted together by mortar. The term masonry can also refer to the building units themselves.
A mastodon is a member of the genus Mammut, which was endemic to North America and lived from the late Miocene to the early Holocene. Mastodons belong to the order Proboscidea, the same order as elephants and mammoths. Mammut is the type genus of the extinct family Mammutidae, which diverged from the ancestors of modern elephants at least 28 million years ago, during the Oligocene.
Matriarchy is a social system in which positions of power and privilege are held by women. In a broader sense it can also extend to moral authority, social privilege, and control of property. While those definitions apply in general English, definitions specific to anthropology and feminism differ in some respects.
Matrix or MATRIX may refer to:.
A meadow is an open habitat or field, vegetated by grasses, herbs, and other non-woody plants. Trees or shrubs may sparsely populate meadows, as long as they maintain an open character. Meadows can occur naturally under favourable conditions but are often artificially created from cleared shrub or woodland for the production of hay, fodder or livestock. Meadow habitats as a group are characterized as semi-natural grasslands, meaning that they are largely composed of species native to the region, with only limited human intervention.
A meadery is a typically a dedicated winery which is a producer of mead, or honey wine but may also be produced by a winery or brewery, which sells them commercially. There are craft meaderies emerging all over North America, Canada, Australia and New Zealand where each meadery produces various styles of meads, such as fruit meads, traditional meads, session meads, and braggots.
A meander is one of a series of regular sinuous curves in the channel of a river or other watercourse. It is produced as a watercourse erodes the sediments of an outer, concave bank and deposits sediments on an inner, convex bank which is typically a point bar. The result of this coupled erosion and sedimentation is the formation of a sinuous course as the channel migrates back and forth across the axis of a floodplain.
A mechanic is a skilled tradesperson who uses tools to build, maintain, or repair machinery, especially engines. Formerly, the term meant any member of the handicraft trades, but by the early 20th century, it had come to mean one who works with machinery.
A medal or medallion is a small portable artistic object, a thin disc, normally of metal, carrying a design, usually on both sides. They typically have a commemorative purpose of some kind, and many are presented as awards. They may be intended to be worn, suspended from clothing or jewellery in some way, although this has not always been the case. They may be struck like a coin by dies or die-cast in a mould.
A megalith is a large stone that has been used to construct a prehistoric structure or monument, either alone or together with other stones. More than 35,000 megalithic structures have been identified across Europe, ranging geographically from Sweden in the north to the Mediterranean Sea in the south.
A melody, also tune, voice, or line, is a linear succession of musical tones that the listener perceives as a single entity. In its most literal sense, a melody is a combination of pitch and rhythm, while more figuratively, the term can include other musical elements such as tonal color. It is the foreground to the background accompaniment. A line or part need not be a foreground melody.
A menagerie is a collection of captive animals, frequently exotic, kept for display; or the place where such a collection is kept, a precursor to the modern zoo or zoological garden.
A mercenary is a private individual who joins an armed conflict for personal profit, is otherwise an outsider to the conflict, and is not a member of any other official military. Mercenaries fight for money or other forms of payment rather than for political interests.
Meridian or a meridian line may refer to.
The Merino is a breed or group of breeds of domestic sheep, characterised by very fine soft wool. It was established in the Iberian Peninsula near the end of the Middle Ages, and was for several centuries kept as a strict Spanish monopoly; exports of the breed were not allowed, and those who tried risked capital punishment. During the eighteenth century, flocks were sent to the courts of a number of European countries, including France, Hungary, the Netherlands, Prussia, Saxony and Sweden.
In folklore, a mermaid is an aquatic creature with the head and upper body of a female human and the tail of a fish. Mermaids appear in the folklore of many cultures worldwide, including Europe, Latin America, Asia, and Africa.
A mesa is an isolated, flat-topped elevation, ridge, or hill, bounded from all sides by steep escarpments and standing distinctly above a surrounding plain. Mesas consist of flat-lying soft sedimentary rocks, such as shales, capped by a resistant layer of harder rock, like sandstone or limestone, forming a caprock that protects the flat summit. The caprock may also include dissected lava flows or eroded duricrust.
Mesquite is a common name for some plants in the genera Neltuma and Strombocarpa, which contain over 50 species of spiny, deep-rooted leguminous shrubs and small trees. They are native to dry areas in the Americas. Until 2022, these genera were traditionally included in a broad view of the genus Prosopis, but that genus is now restricted to a few species native to the Old World.
A metaphor is a figure of speech that, for literary effect, refers to one thing by mentioning another. Thus, it invites the audience to make a comparison between two normally unrelated entities or ideas, which may provide clarity or identify hidden similarities between them. Metaphors are usually meant to create a likeness or an analogy.
A meteor, known colloquially as a shooting star, is a glowing streak of a small body going through Earth's atmosphere, after being heated to incandescence by collisions with air molecules in the upper atmosphere, creating a streak of light via its rapid motion and sometimes also by shedding glowing material in its wake. Meteors typically occur in the mesosphere at altitudes from 76–100 kilometres. The root word meteor comes from the Greek μετεωρίτης (meteōrítēs), meaning "high in the air".
In its most common sense, methodology is the study of research methods. However, the term can also refer to the methods themselves or to the philosophical discussion of associated background assumptions. A method is a structured procedure for bringing about a certain goal, like acquiring knowledge or verifying knowledge claims. This normally involves various steps, like choosing a sample, collecting data from this sample, and interpreting the data. The study of methods concerns a detailed description and analysis of these processes. It includes evaluative aspects by comparing different methods. This way, it is assessed what advantages and disadvantages they have and for what research goals they may be used. These descriptions and evaluations depend on philosophical background assumptions. Examples are how to conceptualize the studied phenomena and what constitutes evidence for or against them. When understood in the widest sense, methodology also includes the discussion of these more abstract issues.
A mews is a row or courtyard of stables and carriage houses with living quarters above them, built behind large city houses before motor vehicles replaced horses in the early twentieth century. Mews are usually located in desirable residential areas, having been built to cater for the horses, coachmen and stable-servants of prosperous residents.
A microform is a scaled-down reproduction of a document, typically either photographic film or paper, made for the purposes of transmission, storage, reading, and printing. Three formats are common: microfilm (reels), microfiche, and aperture cards. In addition to filming from original paper documents, equipment is available that accepts a data stream from a computer and directly produces a microform.
A midwife is a health professional who cares for mothers and newborns around childbirth, a specialisation known as midwifery.
Migration, migratory, or migrate may refer to:.
Millstones or mill stones are stones used in gristmills, used for triturating, crushing or, more specifically, grinding wheat or other grains. They are sometimes referred to as grindstones or grinding stones.
Millets are a highly varied group of small-seeded grasses, widely grown around the world as cereal crops or grains for fodder and human food. Most millets belong to the tribe Paniceae.
In evolutionary biology, mimicry is the evolved resemblance of an organism to something else, often another organism of a different species. Mimicry may evolve between different species, or between individuals of the same species. In the simplest case, as in Batesian mimicry, a mimic resembles a model, so as to deceive a dupe, all three being of different species. A Batesian mimic, such as a hoverfly, is harmless, while its model, such as a wasp, is harmful, and is avoided by the dupe, such as an insect-eating bird. Birds hunt by sight, so the mimicry in that case is visual, but in other cases mimicry may make use of any of the senses. Most types of mimicry, including Batesian, are deceptive, as the mimics are not harmful, but Müllerian mimicry, where different harmful species resemble each other, is honest, as when species of wasps and of bees all have genuinely aposematic warning coloration. More complex types may be bipolar, involving only two species, such as when the model and the dupe are the same; this occurs for example in aggressive mimicry, where a predator in wolf-in-sheep's-clothing style resembles its prey, allowing it to hunt undetected. Mimicry is not limited to animals; in Pouyannian mimicry, an orchid flower is the mimic, resembling a female bee, its model; the dupe is the male bee of the same species, which tries to copulate with the flower, enabling it to transfer pollen, so the mimicry is again bipolar. In automimicry, another bipolar system, model and mimic are the same, as when blue lycaenid butterflies have 'tails' or eyespots on their wings that mimic their own heads, misdirecting predator dupes to strike harmlessly. Many other types of mimicry exist.
In geology and mineralogy, a mineral or mineral species is, broadly speaking, a solid substance with a fairly well-defined chemical composition and a specific crystal structure that occurs naturally in pure form.
A minaret is a type of tower typically built into or adjacent to mosques. Minarets are generally used to project the Muslim call to prayer (adhan) from a muezzin, but they also served as landmarks and symbols of Islam's presence. They can have a variety of forms, from thick, squat towers to soaring, pencil-thin spires.
A minstrel was an entertainer, initially in medieval Europe. The term originally described any type of entertainer such as a musician, juggler, acrobat, singer or fool; later, from the sixteenth century, it came to mean a specialist entertainer who sang songs and played musical instruments.
Minting is a village and civil parish in the East Lindsey district of Lincolnshire, England. The village is situated 1 mile (1.6 km) south from the A158 road. The population at the 2011 census was 286.
A mirage is a naturally occurring optical phenomenon in which light rays bend via refraction to produce a displaced image of distant objects or the sky. The word comes to English via the French (se) mirer, from the Latin mirari, meaning "to look at, to wonder at".
A peatland is a type of wetland whose soils consist of organic matter from decaying plants, forming layers of peat. Peatlands arise because of incomplete decomposition of organic matter, usually litter from vegetation, due to water-logging and subsequent anoxia. Peatlands are unusual landforms that derive mostly from biological rather than physical processes, and can take on characteristic shapes and surface patterning.
Mirth may refer to:Gladness and gaiety, especially when expressed by laughter
Mirth Connect, software for conversion between health record standards
Mirth Provisions, a cannabis company based in Longview, Washington
USS Mirth (AM-265), a World War II Admirable-class minesweeper used by the U.S. Navy 1943–1945

.
A misnomer is a name that is incorrectly or unsuitably applied. Misnomers often arise because something was named long before its correct nature was known, or because an earlier form of something has been replaced by a later form to which the name no longer suitably applies. A misnomer may also be a word that is used incorrectly or misleadingly. The word "misnomer" does not mean "misunderstanding" or "popular misconception", and a number of misnomers remain in common usage — which is to say that a word being a misnomer does not necessarily make usage of the word incorrect.
Mitigation is the reduction of something harmful that has occurred or the reduction of its harmful effects. It may refer to measures taken to reduce the harmful effects of hazards that remain in potentia, or to manage harmful incidents that have already occurred. It is a stage or component of emergency management and of risk management. The theory of mitigation is a frequently used element in criminal law and is often used by a judge to try cases such as murder, where a perpetrator is subject to varying degrees of responsibility as a result of one's actions.
Mitosis is a part of the cell cycle in eukaryotic cells in which replicated chromosomes are separated into two new nuclei. Cell division by mitosis is an equational division which gives rise to genetically identical cells in which the total number of chromosomes is maintained. Mitosis is preceded by the S phase of interphase and is followed by telophase and cytokinesis, which divide the cytoplasm, organelles, and cell membrane of one cell into two new cells containing roughly equal shares of these cellular components. This process ensures that each daughter cell receives an identical set of chromosomes, maintaining genetic stability across cell generations. The different stages of mitosis altogether define the mitotic phase of a cell cycle—the division of the mother cell into two daughter cells genetically identical to each other.
A moccasin is a shoe, made of deerskin or other soft leather, consisting of a sole and sides made of one piece of leather, stitched together at the top, and sometimes with a vamp. The sole is soft and flexible and the upper part often is adorned with embroidery or beading. Though sometimes worn inside, it is chiefly intended for outdoor use.
Modality may refer to:.
A modulator-demodulator, commonly referred to as a modem, is a computer hardware device that converts data from a digital format into a format suitable for an analog transmission medium such as telephone or radio. A modem transmits data by modulating one or more carrier wave signals to encode digital information, while the receiver demodulates the signal to recreate the original digital information. The goal is to produce a signal that can be transmitted easily and decoded reliably. Modems can be used with almost any means of transmitting analog signals, from LEDs to radio.
Moiety may refer to:.
A molecule is a group of two or more atoms that are held together by attractive forces known as chemical bonds; depending on context, the term may or may not include ions that satisfy this criterion. In quantum physics, organic chemistry, and biochemistry, the distinction from ions is dropped and molecule is often used when referring to polyatomic ions.
A monastery is a building or complex of buildings comprising the domestic quarters and workplaces of monastics, monks or nuns, whether living in communities or alone. A monastery generally includes a place reserved for prayer which may be a chapel, church, or temple, and may also serve as an oratory, or in the case of communities anything from a single building housing only one senior and two or three junior monks or nuns, to vast complexes and estates housing tens or hundreds. A monastery complex typically comprises a number of buildings which include a church, dormitory, cloister, refectory, library, balneary and infirmary and outlying granges. Depending on the location, the monastic order and the occupation of its inhabitants, the complex may also include a wide range of buildings that facilitate self-sufficiency and service to the community. These may include a hospice, a school, and a range of agricultural and manufacturing buildings such as a barn, a forge, or a brewery.
A monolith is a geological feature consisting of a single massive stone or rock, such as some mountains. Erosion usually exposes the geological formations, which are often made of very hard and solid igneous or metamorphic rock. Some monoliths are volcanic plugs, solidified lava filling the vent of an extinct volcano.
A monsoon is traditionally a seasonal reversing wind accompanied by corresponding changes in precipitation but is now used to describe seasonal changes in atmospheric circulation and precipitation associated with annual latitudinal oscillation of the Intertropical Convergence Zone (ITCZ) between its limits to the north and south of the equator. Usually, the term monsoon is used to refer to the rainy phase of a seasonally changing pattern, although technically there is also a dry phase. The term is also sometimes used to describe locally heavy but short-term rains.
A monument is a type of structure created to commemorate a person or event, or which has become relevant to a social group as a part of their remembrance of historic times or cultural heritage, due to its artistic, historical, political, technical or architectural importance. Examples of monuments include statues, (war) memorials, historical buildings, and cultural assets. If there is a public interest in its preservation, a monument can for example be listed as a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
A moraine is any accumulation of unconsolidated debris, sometimes referred to as glacial till, that occurs in both currently and formerly glaciated regions, and that has been previously carried along by a glacier or ice sheet. It may consist of partly rounded particles ranging in size from boulders down to gravel and sand, in a groundmass of finely divided clayey material sometimes called glacial flour. Lateral moraines are those formed at the side of the ice flow, and terminal moraines are those formed at the foot, marking the maximum advance of the glacier. Other types of moraine include ground moraines and medial moraines.
A mosaic is a pattern or image made of small regular or irregular pieces of colored stone, glass or ceramic, held in place by plaster/mortar, and covering a surface. Mosaics are often used as floor and wall decoration, and were particularly popular in the Ancient Roman world.
Mosses are small, non-vascular flowerless plants in the taxonomic division Bryophyta sensu stricto. Bryophyta may also refer to the parent group bryophytes, which comprise liverworts, mosses, and hornworts. Mosses typically form dense green clumps or mats, often in damp or shady locations. The individual plants are usually composed of simple leaves that are generally only one cell thick, attached to a stem that may be branched or unbranched and has only a limited role in conducting water and nutrients. Although some species have conducting tissues, these are generally poorly developed and structurally different from similar tissue found in vascular plants. Mosses do not have seeds and after fertilisation develop sporophytes with unbranched stalks topped with single capsules containing spores. They are typically 0.2–10 cm (0.1–3.9 in) tall, though some species are much larger. Dawsonia superba, the tallest moss in the world, can grow to 60 cm (24 in) in height. There are approximately 12,000 species.
Moths are a group of insects that includes all members of the order Lepidoptera that are not butterflies. They were previously classified as suborder Heterocera, but the group is paraphyletic with respect to butterflies and neither subordinate taxon is used in modern classifications. Moths make up the vast majority of the order. There are approximately 160,000 species of moth, many of which have yet to be described. Most species of moth are nocturnal, although there are also crepuscular and diurnal species.
A mottle is a pattern of irregular marks, spots, streaks, blotches or patches of different shades or colours. The term commonly describes the surface of plants or the skin of animals. In plants, mottling usually consists of yellowish spots on plants, and is usually a sign of disease or malnutrition. Many plant viruses cause mottling, including Tobacco vein mottling virus and Bean pod mottle virus.
A mound is a heaped pile of earth, gravel, sand, rocks, or debris. Most commonly, mounds are earthen formations such as hills and mountains, particularly if they appear artificial. A mound may be any rounded area of topographically higher elevation on any surface. Artificial mounds have been created for a variety of reasons throughout history, including habitation, ceremonial, burial (tumulus), and commemorative purposes.
A muffler or silencer is a device for reducing the noise emitted by the exhaust of an internal combustion engine—especially a noise-deadening device forming part of the exhaust system of an automobile.
Morus, a genus of flowering plants in the family Moraceae, consists of 19 species of deciduous trees commonly known as mulberries, growing wild and under cultivation in many temperate world regions. Generally, the genus has 64 subordinate taxa, though the three most common are referred to as white, red, and black, originating from the color of their dormant buds and not necessarily the fruit color, with numerous cultivars and some taxa currently unchecked and awaiting taxonomic scrutiny. M. alba is native to South Asia, but is widely distributed across Europe, Southern Africa, South America, and North America. M. alba is also the species most preferred by the silkworm. It is regarded as an invasive species in Brazil, the United States and some states of Australia.
Mullet, mullets, The Mullet or The Mullets may refer to:.
Multitude or multitudes may refer to:Multitude: War and Democracy in the Age of Empire, a 2004 book by Antonio Negri and Michael Hardt
Multitude Media, a British public relations firm
Multitude SE, a payday lender based in Finland
Multitude (album), a 2022 album by Belgian musician, Stromae
Multitudes (album), a 2023 album by Feist
"Multitude", a song by Half Man Half Biscuit from the album Four Lads Who Shook the Wirral
Multitude (philosophy), a philosophical term for a group of people not classed under any other distinct category, except for their shared fact of existence.
A mummy is a dead human or an animal whose soft tissues and organs have been preserved by either intentional or accidental exposure to chemicals, extreme cold, very low humidity, or lack of air, so that the recovered body does not decay further if kept in cool and dry conditions. Some authorities restrict the use of the term to bodies deliberately embalmed with chemicals, but the use of the word to cover accidentally desiccated bodies goes back to at least the early 17th century.
A mural is any piece of graphic artwork that is painted or applied directly to a wall, ceiling or other permanent substrate. Mural techniques include fresco, mosaic, graffiti and marouflage.
Uria is a genus of seabirds in the auk family known in Europe as guillemots, and in North America as murres. These are medium-sized birds with mainly brown or black plumage in the breeding season. They breed on the coasts of the northern Atlantic and Pacific oceans.
Skeletal muscle is one of the three types of vertebrate muscle tissue, the others being cardiac muscle and smooth muscle. They are part of the voluntary muscular system and typically are attached by tendons to bones of a skeleton. The skeletal muscle cells are much longer than in the other types of muscle tissue, and are also known as muscle fibers. The tissue of a skeletal muscle is striated – having a striped appearance due to the arrangement of the sarcomeres.
A mushroom is the fleshy, spore-bearing fruiting body of a fungus, typically produced above ground on soil or another food source. A toadstool generally refers to a poisonous mushroom.
The mustang is a free-roaming horse of the Western United States, descended from horses brought to the Americas by the Spanish conquistadors. Mustangs are often referred to as wild horses, but because they are descended from once-domesticated animals, they are actually feral horses. The original mustangs were Colonial Spanish horses, but many other breeds and types of horses contributed to the modern mustang, now resulting in varying phenotypes. Some free-roaming horses are relatively unchanged from the original Spanish stock, most strongly represented in the most isolated populations.
In biology, a mutation is an alteration in the nucleic acid sequence of the genome of an organism, virus, or extrachromosomal DNA. Mutations result from errors during replication, mitosis, meiosis, or damage to DNA, which then may trigger error-prone repair or cause an error during replication. Mutations may also result from substitution, insertion or deletion of segments of DNA due to mobile genetic elements.
Mycelium is a root-like structure of a fungus consisting of a mass of branching, thread-like hyphae. Its normal form is that of branched, slender, entangled, anastomosing, hyaline threads. Fungal colonies composed of mycelium are found in and on soil and many other substrates. A typical single spore germinates into monokaryotic mycelium, which cannot reproduce sexually; when two compatible monokaryotic mycelia join and form dikaryotic mycelium, that mycelium may form fruiting bodies such as mushrooms. Mycelium may be minute, forming a colony that is too small to see, or may grow to span thousands of acres as in Armillaria.
In the context of numeric naming systems for powers of ten, myriad is the quantity ten thousand (10,000). Idiomatically, in English, myriad is an adjective used to mean that a group of things has indefinitely large quantity.
Myrtle may refer to:.
Nacre, also known as mother-of-pearl, is an organic–inorganic composite material produced by some molluscs as an inner shell layer. It is also the material of which pearls are composed. It is strong, resilient, and iridescent.
The nadir is the direction pointing directly below a particular location; that is, it is one of two vertical directions at a specified location, orthogonal to a horizontal flat surface.
In Greek mythology, the naiads, sometimes also hydriads, are a type of female spirit, or nymph, presiding over fountains, wells, springs, streams, brooks and other bodies of fresh water.
The term narcotic originally referred medically to any psychoactive compound with numbing or paralyzing properties. In the United States, it has since become associated with opiates and opioids, commonly morphine and heroin, as well as derivatives of many of the compounds found within raw opium latex.
The narthex is an architectural element typical of early Christian and Byzantine basilicas and churches consisting of the entrance or vestibule, located at the west end of the nave, opposite the church's main altar. Traditionally the narthex was a part of the church building, but was not considered part of the church proper.
Natron is a naturally occurring mixture of sodium carbonate decahydrate (Na2CO3·10H2O, a kind of soda ash) and around 17% sodium bicarbonate (also called baking soda, NaHCO3) along with small quantities of sodium chloride and sodium sulfate. Natron is white to colourless when pure, varying to gray or yellow with impurities. Natron deposits are sometimes found in saline lake beds which arose in arid environments. Throughout history natron has had many practical applications that continue today in the wide range of modern uses of its constituent mineral components.
A nautilus is any of the various species within the cephalopod family Nautilidae. This is the sole extant family of the infraorder Nautilaceae and the suborder Nautilina.
Nectar is a viscous, sugar-rich liquid produced by plants in glands called nectaries, either within the flowers with which it attracts pollinating animals, or by extrafloral nectaries, which provide a nutrient source to animal mutualists, which in turn provide herbivore protection. Common nectar-consuming pollinators include mosquitoes, hoverflies, wasps, bees, butterflies and moths, hummingbirds, honeyeaters and bats.
Nectar is an economically important substance as it is the sugar source for honey.
Needlework refers to decorative sewing and other textile handicrafts that involve the use of a needle. Needlework may also include related textile crafts like crochet, or tatting,.
In common terminology, a baby is the very young offspring of adult human beings, while infant is a formal or specialised synonym. The terms may also be used to refer to juveniles of other organisms. A newborn is, in colloquial use, a baby who is only hours, days, or weeks old; while in medical contexts, a newborn or neonate is an infant in the first 28 days after birth.
A neophyte is a recent initiate or convert to a subject or belief.
A neoplasm is a type of abnormal and excessive growth of tissue. The process that occurs to form or produce a neoplasm is called neoplasia. The growth of a neoplasm is uncoordinated with that of the normal surrounding tissue, and persists in growing abnormally, even if the original trigger is removed. This abnormal growth usually forms a mass, which may be called a tumour or tumor.
Nephrite is a variety of the calcium, magnesium, and iron-rich amphibole minerals tremolite or actinolite (aggregates of which also make up one form of asbestos). The chemical formula for nephrite is Ca2(Mg, Fe)5Si8O22(OH)2. It is one of two different mineral species called jade. The other mineral species known as jade is jadeite, which is a variety of pyroxene. While nephrite jade possesses mainly grays and greens (and occasionally yellows, browns, black or whites), jadeite jade, which is rarer, can also contain blacks, reds, pinks and violets. Nephrite jade is an ornamental stone used in carvings, beads, or cabochon cut gemstones. Nephrite is also the official state mineral of Wyoming.
Birds are a group of warm-blooded theropod dinosaurs constituting the class Aves, characterised by feathers, toothless beaked jaws, the laying of hard-shelled eggs, a high metabolic rate, a four-chambered heart, and a strong yet lightweight skeleton. Birds live worldwide and range in size from the 5.5 cm (2.2 in) bee hummingbird to the 2.8 m common ostrich. There are over 11,000 living species and they are split into 44 orders. More than half are passerine or "perching" birds. Birds have wings whose development varies according to species; the only known groups without wings are the extinct moa and elephant birds. Wings, which are modified forelimbs, gave birds the ability to fly, although further evolution has led to the loss of flight in some birds, including ratites, penguins, and diverse endemic island species. The digestive and respiratory systems of birds are also uniquely adapted for flight. Some bird species of aquatic environments, particularly seabirds and some waterbirds, have further evolved for swimming. The study of birds is called ornithology.
Netherworld may refer to:.
A neutron is a subatomic particle, symbol n or n0, that has no electric charge, and a mass slightly greater than that of a proton. The neutron was discovered by James Chadwick in 1932, leading to the discovery of nuclear fission in 1938, the first self-sustaining nuclear reactor, and the first nuclear weapon.
Nexus is a Latin word for connection, usually where multiple elements meet. It may refer to:.
Niche may refer to:.
Nickel is a chemical element; it has symbol Ni and atomic number 28. It is a silvery-white lustrous metal with a slight golden tinge. Nickel is a hard and ductile transition metal. Pure nickel is chemically reactive, but large pieces are slow to react with air under standard conditions because a passivation layer of nickel oxide that prevents further corrosion forms on the surface. Even so, pure native nickel is found in Earth's crust only in tiny amounts, usually in ultramafic rocks, and in the interiors of larger nickel–iron meteorites that were not exposed to oxygen when outside Earth's atmosphere.
Solanaceae, commonly known as the nightshades, is a family of flowering plants in the order Solanales. The family contains approximately 2,700 species, several of which are used as agricultural crops, medicinal plants, and ornamental plants. Many members of the family have high alkaloid contents, making some highly toxic, but many—such as tomatoes, potatoes, eggplants, and peppers—are commonly used in food.
Nimbus, from the Latin for "dark cloud", is an outdated term for the type of cloud now classified as the nimbostratus cloud. Nimbus also may refer to:.
Nitrate is a polyatomic ion with the chemical formula NO−3. Salts containing this ion are called nitrates. Nitrates are common components of fertilizers and explosives. Almost all inorganic nitrates are soluble in water. An example of an insoluble (inorganic) nitrate is bismuth oxynitrate.
Nobility is a social class found in many societies that have an aristocracy. It is normally appointed by and ranked immediately below royalty. Nobility has often been an estate of the realm with many exclusive functions and characteristics. The characteristics associated with nobility may constitute substantial advantages over or relative to non-nobles or simply formal functions, and vary by country and by era. Membership in the nobility, including rights and responsibilities, is typically hereditary and patrilineal.
Nomads are communities without fixed habitation who regularly move to and from areas. Such groups include hunter-gatherers, pastoral nomads, tinkers and trader nomads. In the twentieth century, the population of nomadic pastoral tribes slowly decreased, reaching an estimated 30–40 million nomads in the world as of 1995.
Nomenclature is a system of names or terms, or the rules for forming these terms in a particular field of arts or sciences. The theoretical field studying nomenclature is sometimes referred to as onymology or taxonymy. The principles of naming vary from the relatively informal conventions of everyday speech to the internationally agreed principles, rules, and recommendations that govern the formation and use of the specialist terminology used in scientific and any other disciplines.
Noodles are a type of food typically made from unleavened dough which is rolled flat and cut, stretched, or extruded into long strips or strings. Noodles are a staple food in many cultures and made into a variety of shapes. The most common noodles are those derived from Chinese cuisine or Italian cuisine. Italian noodles are generally referred to as pasta. In Chinese cuisine, the overarching term for noodles is 面, which refers specifically to dough-based noodles made from wheat or other grain-based dough. Chinese noodles also include another category, called 粉 (fěn), which are not made by kneading dough but from a starch slurry, such as rice noodles, and cellophane noodles. These are not made from wheat dough, but are still regarded as noodles in English due to their physical form and culinary role.
Nodule may refer to:Nodule (geology), a small rock or mineral cluster
Manganese nodule, a metallic concretion found on the seafloor
Nodule (medicine), a small aggregation of cells
Root nodule, a growth on the roots of legumes
A feature of mollusc sculpture
Nodule of vermis, an external feature of the cerebellum

.

The noosphere is a philosophical concept developed and popularized by the biogeochemist Vladimir Vernadsky and philosopher and Jesuit priest Pierre Teilhard de Chardin. Vernadsky defined the noosphere as the new state of the biosphere, and described it as the planetary "sphere of reason". The noosphere represents the highest stage of biospheric development, that of humankind's rational activities.
A noria is a hydropowered scoop wheel used to lift water into a small aqueduct, either for the purpose of irrigation or to supply water to cities and villages.
Norman or Normans may refer to:.
A notary is a person authorised to perform acts in legal affairs, in particular witnessing signatures on documents. The form that the notarial profession takes varies with local legal systems.
Notion or Notions may refer to:.
A novella is a book of narrative prose fiction whose length is shorter than most novels, but longer than most novelettes and short stories. The English word "novella" derives from the Italian novella meaning a short story related to true facts.
In physics and chemistry, a nucleon is either a proton or a neutron, considered in its role as a component of an atomic nucleus. The number of nucleons in a nucleus defines the atom's mass number.
Nugget may refer to:.
Nutation is a rocking, swaying, or nodding motion in the axis of rotation of a largely axially symmetric object, such as a gyroscope, planet, or bullet in flight, or as an intended behaviour of a mechanism.
In ecology, an oasis is a fertile area of a desert or semi-desert environment that sustains plant life and provides habitat for animals. Surface water may be present, or water may only be accessible from wells or underground channels created by humans. In geography, an oasis may be a current or past rest stop on a transportation route, or less-than-verdant location that nonetheless provides access to underground water through deep wells created and maintained by humans. Although they depend on a natural condition, such as the presence of water that may be stored in reservoirs and used for irrigation, most oases, as we know them, are artificial.
An obelisk, less often spelled obelisque, is a tall, slender, tapered monument with four sides and a pyramidal or pyramidion top. Originally constructed by Ancient Egyptians and called tekhenu, the Greeks used the Greek term obeliskos to describe them, and this word passed into Latin and ultimately English. Though William Thomas used the term correctly in his Historie of Italie of 1549, by the late sixteenth century, Shakespeare failed to distinguish between pyramids and obelisks in his plays and sonnets. Ancient obelisks are monolithic and consist of a single stone; most modern obelisks are made of several stones.
Obsidian is a naturally occurring volcanic glass formed when lava extruded from a volcano cools rapidly with minimal crystal growth. It is an igneous rock. Produced from felsic lava, obsidian is rich in the lighter elements such as silicon, oxygen, aluminium, sodium, and potassium. It is commonly found within the margins of rhyolitic lava flows known as obsidian flows. These flows have a high content of silica, giving them a high viscosity. The high viscosity inhibits the diffusion of atoms through the lava, which inhibits the first step (nucleation) in the formation of mineral crystals. Together with rapid cooling, this results in a natural glass forming from the lava.
The occult is a category of esoteric or supernatural beliefs and practices which generally fall outside the scope of organized religion and science, encompassing phenomena involving a 'hidden' or 'secret' agency, such as magic and mysticism. It can also refer to paranormal ideas such as extra-sensory perception and parapsychology.
In geometry, an octagon is an eight-sided polygon or 8-gon.
Oculus, may refer to the following:.
An odometer or odograph is an instrument used for measuring the distance traveled by a vehicle, such as a bicycle or car. The device may be electronic, mechanical, or a combination of the two (electromechanical). The noun derives from ancient Greek ὁδόμετρον, hodómetron, from ὁδός, hodós and μέτρον, métron ('measure'). Early forms of the odometer existed in the ancient Greco-Roman world as well as in ancient China. In countries using Imperial units or US customary units it is sometimes called a mileometer or milometer, the former name especially being prevalent in the United Kingdom and among members of the Commonwealth.
Oeuvre(s) or Œuvre(s) may refer to:A work of art; or, more commonly, the body of work of a creator.
Offshoot may refer to:Offshoot, a newer name for the Transformers character "Firebolt", who is Targetmaster partner to Hot Rod/Rodimus
Offshoot Films, a digital media company
Offshoot (plant), a concept in botany.
Oligarch may refer to:.
The mineral olivine is a magnesium iron silicate with the chemical formula (Mg,Fe)2SiO4. It is a type of nesosilicate or orthosilicate. The primary component of the Earth's upper mantle, it is a common mineral in Earth's subsurface, but weathers quickly on the surface. Olivine has many uses, such as the gemstone peridot, as well as industrial applications like metalworking processes.
Omnibus may refer to:.
Oncology is a branch of medicine that deals with the study, treatment, diagnosis, and prevention of cancer. A medical professional who practices oncology is an oncologist.
Onyx is a typically black-and-white banded variety of agate, a silicate mineral. The bands can also be monochromatic with alternating light and dark bands. Sardonyx is a variety with red to brown bands alternated with black or white bands. The name "onyx" is also frequently used for level-banded (parallel-banded) agates, but in proper usage it refers to color pattern not band structure. Onyx, as a descriptive term, has also been incorrectly applied to parallel-banded varieties of alabaster, marble, calcite, obsidian, and opal, and misleadingly to materials with contorted banding, such as "cave onyx" and "Mexican onyx".
Oolite or oölite is a sedimentary rock formed from ooids, spherical grains composed of concentric layers. Strictly, oolites consist of ooids of diameter 0.25–2 millimetres; rocks composed of ooids larger than 2 mm are called pisolites. The term oolith can refer to oolite or individual ooids.
Opacity is the measure of impenetrability to electromagnetic or other kinds of radiation, especially visible light. In radiative transfer, it describes the absorption and scattering of radiation in a medium, such as a plasma, dielectric, shielding material, glass, etc. An opaque object is translucent. When light strikes an interface between two substances, in general, some may be reflected, some absorbed, some scattered, and the rest transmitted.
Opal is a hydrated amorphous form of silica (SiO2·nH2O); its water content may range from 3% to 21% by weight, but is usually between 6% and 10%. Due to the amorphous (chemical) physical structure, it is classified as a mineraloid, unlike crystalline forms of silica, which are considered minerals. It is deposited at a relatively low temperature and may occur in the fissures of almost any kind of rock, being most commonly found with limonite, sandstone, rhyolite, marl, and basalt.
Opera is a form of Western theatre in which music is a fundamental component and dramatic roles are taken by singers. Such a "work" is typically a collaboration between a composer and a librettist and incorporates a number of the performing arts, such as acting, scenery, costume, and sometimes dance or ballet. The performance is typically given in an opera house, accompanied by an orchestra or smaller musical ensemble, which since the early 19th century has been led by a conductor. Although musical theatre is closely related to opera, the two are considered to be distinct from one another.
Operetta is a form of theatre and a genre of light opera. It includes spoken dialogue, songs and including dances. It is lighter than opera in terms of its music, orchestral size, and length of the work. Apart from its shorter length, the operetta is usually of a light and amusing character. The subject matter may portray "lovers' spats, mistaken identities, sudden reversals of fortune, and glittering parties". It sometimes also includes satirical commentaries.
An ophiolite is a section of Earth's oceanic crust and the underlying upper mantle that has been uplifted and exposed, and often emplaced onto continental crustal rocks.
An oracle is a person or thing considered to provide insight, wise counsel or prophetic predictions, most notably including precognition of the future, inspired by deities. If done through occultic means, it is a form of divination.
In celestial mechanics, an orbit is the curved trajectory of an object under the influence of an attracting force. Alternatively, it is known as an orbital revolution, because it is a rotation around an axis external to the moving body. Examples for orbits include the trajectory of a planet around a star, a natural satellite around a planet, or an artificial satellite around an object or position in space such as a planet, moon, asteroid, or Lagrange point. Normally, orbit refers to a regularly repeating trajectory, although it may also refer to a non-repeating trajectory. To a close approximation, planets and satellites follow elliptic orbits, with the center of mass being orbited at a focal point of the ellipse, as described by Kepler's laws of planetary motion.
An orchard is an intentional plantation of trees or shrubs that is maintained for food production. Orchards comprise fruit- or nut-producing trees that are generally grown for commercial production. Orchards are also sometimes a feature of large gardens, where they serve an aesthetic as well as a productive purpose. A fruit garden is generally synonymous with an orchard, although it is set on a smaller, non-commercial scale and may emphasize berry shrubs in preference to fruit trees. Most temperate-zone orchards are laid out in a regular grid, with a grazed or mown grass or bare soil base that makes maintenance and fruit gathering easy.
In mathematics, the abscissa and the ordinate are respectively the first and second coordinate of a point in a Cartesian coordinate system:abscissa -axis (horizontal) coordinate
ordinate -axis (vertical) coordinate.
Organza is a thin, plain weave, sheer fabric traditionally made from silk. Many modern organzas are woven with synthetic filament fibers such as polyester or nylon. Silk organza is woven by a number of mills along the Yangtze River and in the province of Zhejiang in China. A coarser silk organza is woven in the Bangalore area of India. Deluxe silk organzas are woven in France and Italy. Organza is distinguished by its crisp hand, stiffness relative to weight, and slippery surface texture.
An ornament is something used for decoration.
Ornithology is a branch of zoology dedicated to the study of birds. Several aspects of ornithology differ from related disciplines, due partly to the high visibility and the aesthetic appeal of birds. It has also been an area with a large contribution made by amateurs in terms of time, resources, and financial support. Studies on birds have helped develop key concepts in biology including evolution, behaviour and ecology such as the definition of species, the process of speciation, instinct, learning, ecological niches, guilds, insular biogeography, phylogeography, and conservation.
Orogeny is a mountain-building process that takes place at a convergent plate margin when plate motion compresses the margin. An orogenic belt or orogen develops as the compressed plate crumples and is uplifted to form one or more mountain ranges. This involves a series of geological processes collectively called orogenesis. These include both structural deformation of existing continental crust and the creation of new continental crust through volcanism. Magma rising in the orogen carries less dense material upwards while leaving more dense material behind, resulting in compositional differentiation of Earth's lithosphere. A synorogenic process or event is one that occurs during an orogeny.
An ossuary is a chest, box, building, well, or site made to serve as the final resting place of human skeletal remains. They are frequently used where burial space is scarce. A body is first buried in a temporary grave, then after some years the skeletal remains are removed and placed in an ossuary. The greatly reduced space taken up by an ossuary means that it is possible to store the remains of many more people in a single tomb than possible in coffins. The practice is sometimes known as grave recycling.
An ostracon is a piece of pottery, usually broken off from a vase or other earthenware vessel. In an archaeological or epigraphical context, ostraca refer to sherds or even small pieces of stone that have writing scratched into them. Usually these are considered to have been broken off before the writing was added; ancient people used the cheap, plentiful, and durable broken pieces of pottery around them as a convenient medium to write on for a wide variety of purposes, mostly very short inscriptions, but in some cases very long.
An outcrop or rocky outcrop is a visible exposure of bedrock or ancient superficial deposits on the surface of the Earth and other terrestrial planets.
Outpost or outposts may refer to:.
In mining, overburden is the material that lies above an area that lends itself to economical exploitation, such as the rock, soil, and ecosystem that lies above a coal seam or ore body. Overburden is distinct from tailings, the material that remains after economically valuable components have been extracted from the generally finely milled ore. Overburden is removed during surface mining, but is typically not contaminated with toxic components. Overburden may also be used to restore an exhausted mining site during reclamation.
In biology, the canopy is the aboveground portion of a plant cropping or crop, formed by the collection of individual plant crowns. In forest ecology, the canopy is the upper layer or habitat zone, formed by mature tree crowns and including other biological organisms. The communities that inhabit the canopy layer are thought to be involved in maintaining forest diversity, resilience, and functioning. Shade trees normally have a dense canopy that blocks light from lower growing plants.
An oxide is a chemical compound containing at least one oxygen atom and one other element in its chemical formula. "Oxide" itself is the dianion of oxygen, an O2− ion with oxygen in the oxidation state of −2. Most of the Earth's crust consists of oxides. Even materials considered pure elements often develop an oxide coating. For example, aluminium foil develops a thin skin of Al2O3 that protects the foil from further oxidation.
Oxygenation may refer to:Oxygenation (environmental), a measurement of dissolved oxygen concentration in soil or water
Oxygen saturation (medicine), The percent of hemoglobin saturated by oxygen, usually in arterial blood.
Water oxygenation, the process of increasing the oxygen saturation of the water
Great Oxygenation Event, an ancient event that led to the rise of oxygen within our atmosphere.
Oyster is the common name for a number of different families of salt-water bivalve molluscs that live in marine or brackish habitats. In some species, the valves are highly calcified, and many are somewhat irregular in shape. Many, but not all oysters, are in the superfamily Ostreoidea.
A paddock is a small enclosure for horses. This term also applies to a trackside area for a motor racing competition, particularly Formula One, and is synonymous with the competing field.
A pagoda is a tiered tower with multiple eaves, common across Asia. Most pagodas were built to have a religious function, most often Buddhist, but sometimes Taoist or Hindu, and were often in or near viharas. The pagoda traces its origins to the stupa, while its design was developed in ancient India. Chinese pagodas are a traditional part of Chinese architecture. In addition to religious use, since ancient times Chinese pagodas have been valued for the spectacular views they offer, and many classical poems attest to the joy of scaling pagodas.
A palisade, sometimes called a stakewall or a paling, is typically a row of closely placed, high vertical standing tree trunks or wooden or iron stakes used as a fence for enclosure or as a defensive wall. Palisades can form a stockade.
Palladium is a chemical element; it has the symbol Pd and atomic number 46. It is a rare and lustrous silvery-white metal discovered in 1802 by the English chemist William Hyde Wollaston. He named it after the asteroid Pallas, which was itself named after the epithet of the Greek goddess Athena, acquired by her when she slew Pallas. Palladium, platinum, rhodium, ruthenium, iridium and osmium form together a group of elements referred to as the platinum group metals. They have similar chemical properties, but palladium has the lowest melting point and is the least dense of them.
Palmetto may refer to:.
The pancreas is an organ of the digestive system and endocrine system of vertebrates. In humans, it is located in the abdomen behind the stomach and functions as a gland. The pancreas is a mixed or heterocrine gland, i.e., it has both an endocrine and a digestive exocrine function. Ninety-nine percent of the pancreas is exocrine and 1% is endocrine. As an endocrine gland, it functions mostly to regulate blood sugar levels, secreting the hormones insulin, glucagon, somatostatin and pancreatic polypeptide. As a part of the digestive system, it functions as an exocrine gland secreting pancreatic juice into the duodenum through the pancreatic duct. This juice contains bicarbonate, which neutralizes acid entering the duodenum from the stomach; and digestive enzymes, which break down carbohydrates, proteins and fats in food entering the duodenum from the stomach.
Pandæmonium, Pandemonium or Pandamonium may refer to:.
A panorama is any wide-angle view or representation of a physical space, whether in painting, drawing, photography, film, seismic images, or 3D modeling. The word was coined in the 18th century by the English painter Robert Barker to describe his panoramic paintings of Edinburgh and London. The motion-picture term panning is derived from panorama.
Pantheon may refer to:Pantheon (religion), a set of gods belonging to a particular religion or tradition, and a temple or sacred building
Pantheon, Rome, Italy, a Catholic church and former Roman temple.
Papyrus is a material similar to thick paper that was used in ancient times as a writing material. It was made from the pith of the papyrus plant, Cyperus papyrus, a wetland sedge. Papyrus can also refer to a document written on sheets of such material, joined side by side and rolled up into a scroll, an early form of a book.
A parable is a succinct, didactic story, in prose or verse, that illustrates one or more instructive lessons or principles. It differs from a fable in that fables employ animals, plants, inanimate objects, or forces of nature as characters, whereas parables have human characters. A parable is a type of metaphorical analogy.
Paragon may refer to:.
A parapet is a barrier that is an upward extension of a wall at the edge of a roof, terrace, balcony, walkway or other structure. The word derives from the Italian parapetto. Where extending above a roof, a parapet may simply be the portion of an exterior wall that continues above the edge line of the roof surface, or may be a continuation of a vertical feature beneath the roof such as a fire wall or party wall. Parapets were originally used to defend buildings from military attack, but today they are primarily used as guard rails, to conceal rooftop equipment, reduce wind loads on the roof, and to prevent the spread of fires.
An umbrella is a folding canopy supported by wooden or metal ribs that is mounted on a wooden, metal, or plastic pole. It is usually designed to protect a person against sun or rain. Initially they were used in warmer countries for shade from the sun, but in modern times they evolved to also be used for protection from rain. Etymologically, the term umbrella is to be used when protecting from the sun, but is also commonly used when protecting from rain. Some countries specifically use the words parasol and parapluie to differentiate based on their use. There are also combinations of parasol and parapluie that are called en-tout-cas. A modern hand-held umbrella or parasol may have a black exterior canopy and a silver inner coating, for better protection from both the sun and ultraviolet rays, and may be water-resistant.
A parish is a territorial entity in many Christian denominations, constituting a division within a diocese. A parish is under the pastoral care and clerical jurisdiction of a priest, often termed a parish priest, who might be assisted by one or more curates, and who operates from a parish church. In England, a parish historically often covered the same geographical area as a manor. Its association with the parish church remains paramount.
A parody is a creative work designed to imitate, comment on, and/or mock its subject by means of satirical or ironic imitation. Often its subject is an original work or some aspect of it, but a parody can also be about a real-life person, event, or movement. Literary scholar Professor Simon Dentith defines parody as "any cultural practice which provides a relatively polemical allusive imitation of another cultural production or practice". The literary theorist Linda Hutcheon said "parody ... is imitation, not always at the expense of the parodied text."
Parody may be found in art or culture, including literature, music, theater, television and film, animation, and gaming.
Parquet is a geometric mosaic of wood pieces used for decorative effect in flooring.
The parsnip is a root vegetable closely related to carrot and parsley, all belonging to the flowering plant family Apiaceae. It is a biennial plant usually grown as an annual. Its long taproot has cream-colored skin and flesh, and, left in the ground to mature, becomes sweeter in flavor after winter frosts. In its first growing season, the plant has a rosette of pinnate, mid-green leaves. If unharvested, it produces a flowering stem topped by an umbel of small yellow flowers in its second growing season, later producing pale brown, flat, winged seeds. By this time, the stem has become woody, and the taproot inedible.
The Parthenon is a former temple on the Athenian Acropolis, Greece, that was dedicated to the goddess Athena. Its decorative sculptures are considered some of the high points of classical Greek art, and the Parthenon is considered an enduring symbol of ancient Greece, Western civilisation, and democracy.
Particulate matter (PM) or particulates are microscopic particles of solid or liquid matter suspended in the air. An aerosol is a mixture of particulates and air, as opposed to the particulate matter alone, though it is sometimes defined as a subset of aerosol terminology. Sources of particulate matter can be natural or anthropogenic. Particulates have impacts on climate and precipitation that adversely affect human health.
Passage, The Passage or Le Passage may refer to:.
Pasture is land used for grazing.
Patina is a thin layer that variously forms on the surface of copper, brass, bronze, and similar metals and metal alloys, or certain stones and wooden furniture, or any similar acquired change of a surface through age and exposure.
The highest-ranking bishops in Eastern Orthodoxy, Oriental Orthodoxy, the Roman Catholic Church, the Hussite Church, Church of the East, and some Independent Catholic Churches are termed patriarchs.
Patrimony may refer to:.
In architecture, pavilion has several meanings;It may be a subsidiary building that is either positioned separately or as an attachment to a main building. Often it is associated with pleasure. In palaces and traditional mansions of Asia, there may be pavilions that are either freestanding or connected by covered walkways, as in the Forbidden City, Topkapi Palace in Istanbul, and in Mughal buildings like the Red Fort.
As part of a large palace, pavilions may be symmetrically placed building blocks that flank a main building block or the outer ends of wings extending from both sides of a central building block, the corps de logis. Such configurations provide an emphatic visual termination to the composition of a large building, akin to bookends.
Peat is an accumulation of partially decayed vegetation or organic matter. It is unique to natural areas called peatlands, bogs, mires, moors, or muskegs. Sphagnum moss, also called peat moss, is one of the most common components in peat, although many other plants can contribute. The biological features of sphagnum mosses act to create a habitat aiding peat formation, a phenomenon termed 'habitat manipulation'. Soils consisting primarily of peat are known as histosols. Peat forms in wetland conditions, where flooding or stagnant water obstructs the flow of oxygen from the atmosphere, slowing the rate of decomposition. Peat properties such as organic matter content and saturated hydraulic conductivity can exhibit high spatial heterogeneity.
Pectoral may refer to:The chest region and anything relating to it.
Pectoral cross, a cross worn on the chest
a decorative, usually jeweled version of a gorget
Pectoral, a type of jewelry worn in ancient Egypt
Pectoralis major muscle, commonly referred to as "pectorals" or "pecs"
Pectoralis minor muscle
Pectoral fins of an aquatic animal, such as a whale or fish, located on both sides of the body
Pectoral sandpiper, a bird

.
A pedestal, or plinth is a support at the bottom of a statue, vase, column, or certain altars. Smaller pedestals, especially if round in shape, may be called socles. In civil engineering, it is also called basement. The minimum height of the plinth is usually kept as 45 cm. It transmits loads from superstructure to the substructure and acts as the retaining wall for the filling inside the plinth or raised floor.
Pediments are a form of gable in classical architecture, usually of a triangular shape. Pediments are placed above the horizontal structure of the cornice, or entablature if supported by columns. In ancient architecture, a wide and low triangular pediment typically formed the top element of the portico of a Greek temple, a style continued in Roman temples. But large pediments were rare on other types of building before Renaissance architecture. For symmetric designs, it provides a center point and is often used to add grandness to entrances.
Pelicans are a genus of large water birds that make up the family Pelecanidae. They are characterized by a long beak and a large throat pouch used for catching prey and draining water from the scooped-up contents before swallowing. They have predominantly pale plumage, except for the brown and Peruvian pelicans. The bills, pouches, and bare facial skin of all pelicans become brightly coloured before the breeding season.
A fur is a soft, thick growth of hair that covers the skin of almost all mammals. It consists of a combination of oily guard hair on top and thick underfur beneath. The guard hair keeps moisture from reaching the skin; the underfur acts as an insulating blanket that keeps the animal warm.
Pemmican is a mixture of tallow, dried meat, and sometimes dried berries. A calorie-rich food, it can be used as a key component in prepared meals such as stews or eaten raw. Historically, it was an important part of indigenous cuisine in certain parts of North America and it is still prepared today.
A pendulum is a device made of a weight suspended from a pivot so that it can swing freely. When a pendulum is displaced sideways from its resting, equilibrium position, it is subject to a restoring force due to gravity that will accelerate it back toward the equilibrium position. When released, the restoring force acting on the pendulum's mass causes it to oscillate about the equilibrium position, swinging back and forth. The time for one complete cycle, a left swing and a right swing, is called the period. The period depends on the length of the pendulum and also to a slight degree on the amplitude, the width of the pendulum's swing. The SI unit of the period of a pendulum is the second (s).
A peninsula is a landform that extends from a mainland, is connected to the mainland on only one side, and is mostly surrounded by water. Peninsulas exist on each continent. The largest peninsula in the world is the Arabian Peninsula.
A pentagram is a regular five-pointed star polygon, formed from the diagonal line segments of a convex regular pentagon. Drawing a circle around the five points creates a similar symbol referred to as the pentacle, which is used widely by Wiccans and in paganism, or as a sign of life and connections.
The peony or paeony is any flowering plant in the genus Paeonia, the only genus in the family Paeoniaceae. Peonies are native to Asia, Europe, and Western North America. Scientists differ on the number of species that can be distinguished, ranging from 25 to 40, although the current consensus describes 33 known species. The relationships between the species need to be further clarified.
Perch is a common name for freshwater fish from the genus Perca, which belongs to the family Percidae of the large order Perciformes. The name comes from Greek: πέρκη, romanized: perke, meaning the type species of this genus, the European perch.
In botany, the term perennial is used to differentiate a plant from shorter-lived annuals and biennials. It has thus been defined as a plant that lives more than 2 years. The term is also loosely used to distinguish plants with little or no woody growth from trees and shrubs, which are also technically perennials. An estimated 94% of plant species are perennials.
Perfume is a mixture of fragrant essential oils or aroma compounds (fragrances), fixatives and solvents, usually in liquid form, used to give the human body, animals, food, objects, and living-spaces an agreeable scent. Perfumes can be defined as substances that emit and diffuse a pleasant and fragrant odor. They consist of artificial mixtures of aromatic chemicals and essential oils. The 1939 Nobel Laureate for Chemistry, Leopold Ružička stated in 1945 that "right from the earliest days of scientific chemistry up to the present time, perfumes have substantially contributed to the development of organic chemistry as regards methods, systematic classification, and theory.".
Peridot, sometimes called chrysolite, is a yellow-green transparent variety of olivine. Peridot is one of the few gemstones that occur in only one color.
A perimeter is the length of a closed boundary that encompasses, surrounds, or outlines either a two-dimensional shape or a one-dimensional line. The perimeter of a circle or an ellipse is called its circumference.
A periscope is an device for observation over, around or through an object, obstacle or condition that prevents direct line-of-sight observation from an observer's current position.
Permafrost is soil or underwater sediment which continuously remains below 0 °C (32 °F) for two years or more; the oldest permafrost has been continuously frozen for around 700,000 years. Whilst the shallowest permafrost has a vertical extent of below a meter (3 ft), the deepest is greater than 1,500 m (4,900 ft). Similarly, the area of individual permafrost zones may be limited to narrow mountain summits or extend across vast Arctic regions. The ground beneath glaciers and ice sheets is not usually defined as permafrost, so on land, permafrost is generally located beneath a so-called active layer of soil which freezes and thaws depending on the season.
Peroxides are a group of molecules with the structure R−O−O−R, where each R represents a radical and the O's are single oxygen atoms. Oxygen atoms are joined to each other and to adjacent elements through single covalent bonds, denoted by dashes or lines. The O−O group in a peroxide is often called the peroxide group, though some nomenclature discrepancies exist. This linkage is recognized as a common polyatomic ion, and exists in many molecules.
A mortar and pestle is a set of two simple tools used to prepare ingredients or substances by crushing and grinding them into a fine paste or powder in the kitchen, laboratory, and pharmacy. The mortar is characteristically a bowl, typically made of hardwood, metal, ceramic, or hard stone such as granite. The pestle is a blunt, club-shaped object. The substance to be ground, which may be wet or dry, is placed in the mortar where the pestle is pounded, pressed, or rotated into the substance until the desired texture is achieved.
Petiole may refer to:Petiole (botany), the stalk of a leaf, attaching the blade to the stem
Petiole, the narrow waist of some hymenopteran insects

.
The phalanx was a rectangular mass military formation, usually composed entirely of heavy infantry armed with spears, pikes, sarissas, or similar polearms tightly packed together. The term is used today to describe the use of this formation in ancient Greek warfare, but ancient Greek writers used it more broadly to describe any massed infantry formation regardless of its equipment. In Greek texts, the phalanx may be deployed for battle, on the march, or even camped, thus describing the mass of infantry or cavalry that would deploy in line during battle. They marched forward as one entity.
Pharmacy is the science and practice of discovering, producing, preparing, dispensing, reviewing and monitoring medications, aiming to ensure the safe, effective, and affordable use of medicines. It is a miscellaneous science as it links health sciences with pharmaceutical sciences and natural sciences. The professional practice is becoming more clinically oriented as most of the drugs are now manufactured by pharmaceutical industries. Based on the setting, pharmacy practice is either classified as community or institutional pharmacy. Providing direct patient care in the community of institutional pharmacies is considered clinical pharmacy.
Phenol is an aromatic organic compound with the molecular formula C6H5OH. It is a white crystalline solid that is volatile and can catch fire.
Phloem is the living tissue in vascular plants that transports the soluble organic compounds made during photosynthesis and known as photosynthates, in particular the sugar sucrose, to the rest of the plant. This transport process is called translocation. In trees, the phloem is the innermost layer of the bark, hence the name, derived from the Ancient Greek word φλοιός (phloiós), meaning "bark". The term was introduced by Carl Nägeli in 1858. Different types of phloem can be distinguished. The early phloem formed in the growth apices is called protophloem. Protophloem eventually becomes obliterated once it connects to the durable phloem in mature organs, the metaphloem. Further, secondary phloem is formed during the thickening of stem structures.
Phonology is the branch of linguistics that studies how languages systematically organize their phonemes or, for sign languages, their constituent parts of signs. The term can also refer specifically to the sound or sign system of a particular language variety. At one time, the study of phonology related only to the study of the systems of phonemes in spoken languages, but now it may relate to any linguistic analysis either:.
A phosphor is a substance that exhibits the phenomenon of luminescence; it emits light when exposed to some type of radiant energy. The term is used both for fluorescent or phosphorescent substances which glow on exposure to ultraviolet or visible light, and cathodoluminescent substances which glow when struck by an electron beam in a cathode-ray tube.
In biology, phototropism, formerly called heliotropism, is the growth of an organism in response to a light stimulus. Phototropism is most often observed in plants, but can also occur in other organisms such as fungi. The cells on the plant that are farthest from the light contain a hormone called auxin that reacts when phototropism occurs. This causes the plant to have elongated cells on the furthest side from the light. Phototropism is one of the many plant tropisms, or movements, which respond to external stimuli. Growth towards a light source is called positive phototropism, while growth away from light is called negative phototropism. Negative phototropism is not to be confused with skototropism, which is defined as the growth towards darkness, whereas negative phototropism can refer to either the growth away from a light source or towards the darkness. Most plant shoots exhibit positive phototropism, and rearrange their chloroplasts in the leaves to maximize photosynthetic energy and promote growth. Some vine shoot tips exhibit negative phototropism, which allows them to grow towards dark, solid objects and climb them. The combination of phototropism and gravitropism allow plants to grow in the correct direction.
Phylactery may refer to:Amulet, an object believed to confer protection or grace upon its possessor
Phylactery , a Dungeons & Dragons element
Reliquary, a container for relics
Speech scroll, an illustrative device denoting speech, song, or other types of sound
Tefillin, a set of small black leather boxes with leather straps containing scrolls of parchment inscribed with verses from the Torah.
Physique may refer to:The natural constitution, or physical structure, of a person
In bodybuilding, the trained muscular structure of a person's body
Physical fitness, a general state of health and well-being and, the ability to perform aspects of a sport or occupation
Physical strength, the ability of an animal or human to exert force on physical objects using muscles
Physical attractiveness, the degree to which a person's physical traits are considered aesthetically pleasing or beautiful
Physique 57, New York City based fitness company
Physique TV, Dubai based television channel dedicated to physical fitness.
A town square, also called a plaza or piazza, is an open public space commonly found in the heart of a traditional town or city, and which is used for community gatherings. Related concepts are the civic center, the market square and the village green.
A pictogram is a graphic symbol that conveys meaning through its visual resemblance to a physical object. Pictograms are used in systems of writing and visual communication. A pictography is a writing system which uses pictograms. Some pictograms, such as hazard pictograms, may be elements of formal languages.
Piedmont is one of the 20 regions of Italy, located in the Northwest of the country. It borders the Liguria region to the south, the Lombardy and Emilia-Romagna regions to the east, and the Aosta Valley region to the northwest. Piedmont also borders Switzerland to the north and France to the west.
Piety is a virtue which may include religious devotion or spirituality. A common element in most conceptions of piety is a duty of respect. In a religious context, piety may be expressed through pious activities or devotions, which may vary among countries and cultures.
A pigment is a chemical compound that gives a substance or organism color, or is used by humans to add or alter color or change visual appearance. Pigments are completely or nearly insoluble and chemically unreactive in water or another medium; in contrast, dyes are colored substances which are soluble or go into solution at some stage in their use. Dyes are often organic compounds whereas pigments are often inorganic. Pigments of prehistoric and historic value include ochre, charcoal, and lapis lazuli. Biological pigments are compounds produced by living organisms that provide coloration.
A pinnacle is an architectural element originally forming the cap or crown of a buttress or small turret, but afterwards used on parapets at the corners of towers and in many other situations. The pinnacle looks like a small spire. It was mainly used in Gothic architecture.
Pinnipeds, commonly known as seals, are a widely distributed and diverse clade of carnivorous, fin-footed, semiaquatic, mostly marine mammals. They comprise the extant families Odobenidae, Otariidae, and Phocidae, with 34 extant species and more than 50 extinct species described from fossils. While seals were historically thought to have descended from two ancestral lines, molecular evidence supports them as a monophyletic group. Pinnipeds belong to the suborder Caniformia of the order Carnivora; their closest living relatives are musteloids, having diverged about 50 million years ago.
Pioneer commonly refers to a person who is among the first at something that is new to a community.
Gynoecium is most commonly used as a collective term for the parts of a flower that produce ovules and ultimately develop into the fruit and seeds. The gynoecium is the innermost whorl of a flower; it consists of pistils and is typically surrounded by the pollen-producing reproductive organs, the stamens, collectively called the androecium. The gynoecium is often referred to as the "female" portion of the flower, although rather than directly producing female gametes, the gynoecium produces megaspores, each of which develops into a female gametophyte which then produces egg cells.
Pitchstone is a dark coloured, glassy volcanic rock formed when felsic lava or magma cools quickly. Since it is a volcanic glass, pitchstone may have a conchoidal fracture. Pitchstones may also contain phenocrysts, in which case it is a form of vitrophyre. Pitchstone has a resinous lustre, or silky in some cases, and a variable composition. Its colour may be mottled, streaked, or uniform brown, red, green, gray, or black. It is an extrusive rock that is very resistant to erosion.
Pittance is a gift to the members of a religious house for masses, consisting usually of an extra allowance of food or wine on occasions such as the anniversary of the donor's death, festivals, or other similar occasions. The word was early transferred to a charitable donation and to any small gift of food or money.
The placenta is a temporary embryonic and later fetal organ that begins developing from the blastocyst shortly after implantation. It plays critical roles in facilitating nutrient, gas, and waste exchange between the physically separate maternal and fetal circulations, and is an important endocrine organ, producing hormones that regulate both maternal and fetal physiology during pregnancy. The placenta connects to the fetus via the umbilical cord, and on the opposite aspect to the maternal uterus in a species-dependent manner. In humans, a thin layer of maternal decidual (endometrial) tissue comes away with the placenta when it is expelled from the uterus following birth. Placentas are a defining characteristic of placental mammals, but are also found in marsupials and some non-mammals with varying levels of development.
Plainsong or plainchant is a body of chants used in the liturgies of the Western Church. When referring to the term plainsong, it is those sacred pieces that are composed in Latin text. Plainsong was the exclusive form of the Western Christian church music until the ninth century and the introduction of polyphony.
According to the International Astronomical Union (IAU), a minor planet is an astronomical object in direct orbit around the Sun that is exclusively classified as neither a planet nor a comet. Before 2006, the IAU officially used the term minor planet, but that year's meeting reclassified minor planets and comets into small Solar System bodies (SSSBs) and dwarf planets, including into the respective categories comets and Pluto, which were generally not considered minor planets. In contrast to the eight official planets of the Solar System, all minor planets fail to clear their orbital neighborhood.
Plankton are organisms that drift in water but are unable to actively propel themselves against currents. Marine plankton include drifting organisms that inhabit the saltwater of oceans and the brackish waters of estuaries. Freshwater plankton are similar to marine plankton, but are found in lakes and rivers. An individual plankton organism in the plankton is called a plankter. In the ocean plankton provide a crucial source of food, particularly for larger filter-feeding animals, such as bivalves, sponges, forage fish and baleen whales.
Plasma or plasm may refer to:.
Platelets or thrombocytes are a part of blood whose function is to react to bleeding from blood vessel injury by clumping to form a blood clot. Platelets have no cell nucleus; they are fragments of cytoplasm from megakaryocytes which reside in bone marrow or lung tissue, and then enter the circulation. Platelets are found only in mammals, whereas in other vertebrates, thrombocytes circulate as intact mononuclear cells.
Platinum is a chemical element; it has symbol Pt and atomic number 78. It is a dense, malleable, ductile, highly unreactive, precious, silverish-white transition metal. Its name originates from Spanish platina, a diminutive of plata "silver".
A plectrum is a small flat tool used for plucking or strumming of a stringed instrument. For hand-held instruments such as guitars and mandolins, the plectrum is often called a pick and is held as a separate tool in the player's hand. In harpsichords, the plectra are attached to the jack mechanism.
The Pleiades, also known as Seven Sisters and Messier 45 (M45), is an asterism of an open star cluster containing young B-type stars in the northwest of the constellation Taurus. At a distance of about 444 light-years, it is among the nearest star clusters to Earth and the nearest Messier object to Earth, being the most obvious star cluster to the naked eye in the night sky. It contains the reflection nebulae NGC 1432, an HII region, and NGC 1435, known as the Merope Nebula. Around 2330 BC the Pleiades marked the vernal point. Due to the brightness of its stars, the Pleiades is viewable from most areas on Earth, even in locations with significant light pollution.
Flexibility may refer to:Flexibility (anatomy), the distance of motion of a joint, which may be increased by stretching
Flexibility (engineering), in the field of engineering systems design, designs that can adapt when external changes occur
Flexibility (personality), the range of different appropriate behavioural responses a person can make in situations that they face.
Cognitive flexibility, the ability to switch between thinking about two different concepts, and to think about multiple concepts simultaneously
Labour market flexibility
"Flexibility", a song by Miss Kittin & The Hacker first published as the seventh song of their 2001 album First Album
Flexibility, a property of some non-associative algebras
Flexural rigidity, the resistance offered by a structure while undergoing bending.
A pedestal, or plinth is a support at the bottom of a statue, vase, column, or certain altars. Smaller pedestals, especially if round in shape, may be called socles. In civil engineering, it is also called basement. The minimum height of the plinth is usually kept as 45 cm. It transmits loads from superstructure to the substructure and acts as the retaining wall for the filling inside the plinth or raised floor.
Plovers are members of a widely distributed group of wading birds of the subfamily Charadriinae. The term "plover" applies to all the members of the subfamily, though only about half of them include it in their name.
Plume or plumes may refer to:.
A plutocracy or plutarchy is a society that is ruled or controlled by people of great wealth or income. It can be considered a form of oligarchy where the ruling few are wealthy. The first known use of the term in English dates from 1631. It is not rooted in any established political philosophy.
Pneumonia is an inflammatory condition of the lung primarily affecting the small air sacs known as alveoli. Symptoms typically include some combination of productive or dry cough, chest pain, fever, and difficulty breathing. The severity of the condition is variable.
A podium is a platform used to raise something to a short distance above its surroundings. In architecture a building can rest on a large podium. Podiums can also be used to raise people, for instance the conductor of an orchestra stands on a podium as do many public speakers. Common parlance has shown an increasing use of podium in North American English to describe a lectern.
A pogrom is a violent riot incited with the aim of massacring or expelling an ethnic or religious group, usually applied to attacks on Jews. The term entered the English language from Russian to describe late 19th- and early 20th-century attacks on Jews in the Russian Empire. Retrospectively, similar attacks against Jews which occurred in other times and places were renamed pogroms. Nowadays the word is used to describe publicly sanctioned purgative attacks against non-Jewish groups as well. The characteristics of a pogrom vary widely, depending on the specific incident, at times leading to, or culminating in, massacres.
Pollen is a powdery substance produced by most types of flowers of seed plants for the purpose of sexual reproduction. It consists of pollen grains, which produce male gametes.
A pollinator is an animal that moves pollen from the male anther of a flower to the female stigma of a flower. This helps to bring about fertilization of the ovules in the flower by the male gametes from the pollen grains.
Multilingualism is the use of more than one language, either by an individual speaker or by a group of speakers. When the languages are just two, it is usually called bilingualism. It is believed that multilingual speakers outnumber monolingual speakers in the world's population. More than half of all Europeans claim to speak at least one language other than their mother tongue, but many read and write in one language. Being multilingual is advantageous for people wanting to participate in trade, globalization and cultural openness. Owing to the ease of access to information facilitated by the Internet, individuals' exposure to multiple languages has become increasingly possible. People who speak several languages are also called polyglots.
In biochemistry, a polymerase is an enzyme that synthesizes long chains of polymers or nucleic acids. DNA polymerase and RNA polymerase are used to assemble DNA and RNA molecules, respectively, by copying a DNA template strand using base-pairing interactions or half ladder replication.
Pondweed refers to many species and genera of aquatic plants and green algae:Potamogeton, a diverse and worldwide genus
Elodea, found in North America
Aponogeton, in Africa, Asia and Australasia
Groenlandia, a genus of aquatic plants
Stuckenia, a genus of aquatic plants
Charales, an order of green algae
.
In Roman antiquity, a pontiff was a member of the most illustrious of the colleges of priests of the Roman religion, the College of Pontiffs. The term pontiff was later applied to any high or chief priest and, in Roman Catholic ecclesiastical usage, to bishops, especially the pope, who is sometimes referred to as the Roman pontiff or the supreme pontiff.
A pony is a type of small horse, usually under a specific height at full maturity. Ponies often have thicker coats, manes and tails, compared to larger horses, and proportionally shorter legs, wider barrels, heavier bone, thicker necks and shorter heads. In modern use, breed registries and horse shows may define a pony as measuring at the withers below a certain height; height limits varying from about 142 cm (14.0 h) to 150 cm (14.3 h). Some distinguish between horse or pony based on its breed or phenotype, regardless of its height. The word pony derives from the old French poulenet, a diminutive of poulain meaning foal, a young, immature horse. A full-sized horse may sometimes be called a pony as a term of endearment.
Populus is a genus of 25–30 species of deciduous flowering plants in the family Salicaceae, native to most of the Northern Hemisphere. English names variously applied to different species include poplar, aspen, and cottonwood.
Porcelain, also called china, is a ceramic material made by heating raw materials, generally including kaolinite, in a kiln to temperatures between 1,200 and 1,400 °C. The greater strength and translucence of porcelain, relative to other types of pottery, arise mainly from vitrification and the formation of the mineral mullite within the body at these high temperatures. End applications include tableware, decorative ware such as figurines, and products in technology and industry such as electrical insulators and laboratory ware.
Porcupines are large rodents with coats of sharp spines, or quills, that protect them against predators. The term covers two families of animals: the Old World porcupines in the family Hystricidae, and the New World porcupines in the family Erethizontidae. Both families display superficially similar coats of rigid or semi-rigid quills, which are modified hairs composed of keratin, and belong to the infraorder Hystricognathi within the diverse order Rodentia. The two groups are distinct and are not closely related to each other within Hystricognathi. The largest species of porcupine is the third-largest living rodent in the world, after the capybara and beaver.
Porphyry may refer to:.
Portage or portaging is the practice of carrying water craft or cargo over land, either around an obstacle in a river, or between two bodies of water. A path where items are regularly carried between bodies of water is also called a portage. The term comes from French, where porter means "to carry", as in "portable".
A portico is a porch leading to the entrance of a building, or extended as a colonnade, with a roof structure over a walkway, supported by columns or enclosed by walls. This idea was widely used in ancient Greece and has influenced many cultures, including most Western cultures.
Portfolio may refer to:.
An axiom, postulate, or assumption is a statement that is taken to be true, to serve as a premise or starting point for further reasoning and arguments. The word comes from the Ancient Greek word ἀξίωμα (axíōma), meaning 'that which is thought worthy or fit' or 'that which commends itself as evident'.
Potash are mined and manufactured salts that contain potassium in water-soluble form. The term potash derives from pot ash, either plant ashes or wood ashes that were soaked in water in a pot, which was the primary means of manufacturing potash before the Industrial Era; the word potassium derives from the term potash.
Pottery is the process and the products of forming vessels and other objects with clay and other raw materials, which are fired at high temperatures to give them a hard and durable form. The place where such wares are made by a potter is also called a pottery. The definition of pottery, used by the ASTM International, is "all fired ceramic wares that contain clay when formed, except technical, structural, and refractory products". End applications include tableware, decorative ware, sanitary ware, and in technology and industry such as electrical insulators and laboratory ware. In art history and archaeology, especially of ancient and prehistoric periods, pottery often means only vessels, and sculpted figurines of the same material are called terracottas.
Praetor, also pretor, was the title granted by the government of ancient Rome to a man acting in one of two official capacities: (i) the commander of an army, and (ii) as an elected magistratus (magistrate), assigned to discharge various duties. The functions of the magistracy, the praetura (praetorship), are described by the adjective itself: the praetoria potestas, the praetorium imperium, and the praetorium ius, the legal precedents established by the praetores (praetors). Praetorium, as a substantive, denoted the location from which the praetor exercised his authority, either the headquarters of his castra, the courthouse (tribunal) of his judiciary, or the city hall of his provincial governorship. The minimum age for holding the praetorship was 39 during the Roman Republic, but it was later changed to 30 in the early Empire.
Prairies are ecosystems considered part of the temperate grasslands, savannas, and shrublands biome by ecologists, based on similar temperate climates, moderate rainfall, and a composition of grasses, herbs, and shrubs, rather than trees, as the dominant vegetation type. Temperate grassland regions include the Pampas of Argentina, Brazil, and Uruguay, and the steppe of Romania, Ukraine, Russia, and Kazakhstan. Lands typically referred to as "prairie" tend to be in North America. The term encompasses the lower and mid-latitude of the area referred to as the Interior Plains of Canada, the United States, and Mexico. It includes all of the Great Plains as well as the wetter, hillier land to the east. From west to east, generally the drier expanse of shortgrass prairie gives way to mixed grass prairie and ultimately the richer and wetter soils of the tallgrass prairie.
Praline can refer toPraline, a confection of nuts and sugar commonly made with sugar, corn syrup, milk, butter, and nut halves.
Chocolate praline, chocolates with a soft filling.

.
In yoga, Ayurveda, and Indian martial arts, prana permeates reality on all levels including inanimate objects. In Hindu literature, prāṇa is sometimes described as originating from the Sun and connecting the elements.
A precept is traditionally defined as a commandment, instruction, or order intended as an authoritative rule of action.
Precursor or Precursors may refer to:Precursor (religion), a forerunner, predecessor
The Precursor, John the Baptist.
A prefecture is an administrative jurisdiction traditionally governed by an appointed prefect. This can be a regional or local government subdivision in various countries, or a subdivision in certain international church structures. During the antiquity, it was the name of a type of Roman district. In the 21st century, the term prefecture is used for the modern first-level subdivisions of the Central African Republic, Japan, and Morocco.
A prelate is a high-ranking member of the Christian clergy who is an ordinary or who ranks in precedence with ordinaries. The word derives from the Latin praelatus, the past participle of praeferre, which means 'carry before', 'be set above or over' or 'prefer'; hence, a prelate is one set over others.
A premise or premiss is a proposition—a true or false declarative statement—used in an argument to prove the truth of another proposition called the conclusion. Arguments consist of a set of premises and a conclusion.
Presbytery and presbyterium may refer to:Presbyterium, a body of ordained, active priests in the Catholic or Anglican churches
Presbytery (architecture), an area of a church building more commonly referred to as the "sanctuary", part of the chancel
Presbytery, a governing body of elders in Presbyterianism
Presbytery (residence), a clergy house, especially for the home of one or more Roman Catholic priests.
Pressure is the force applied perpendicular to the surface of an object per unit area over which that force is distributed. Gauge pressure is the pressure relative to the ambient pressure.
A priory is a monastery of men or women under religious vows that is headed by a prior or prioress. They are found in the Catholic Church, Lutheran Churches, and Anglican Communion. Priories may be monastic houses of monks or nuns. Houses of canons & canonesses regular also use this term, the alternative being canonry. Mendicant houses, of friars, nuns, or tertiary sisters also exclusively use this term.
In common law jurisdictions, probate is the judicial process whereby a will is "proved" in a court of law and accepted as a valid public document that is the true last testament of the deceased; or whereby, in the absence of a legal will, the estate is settled according to the laws of intestacy that apply in the jurisdiction where the deceased resided at the time of their death.
A procession is an organized body of people walking in a formal or ceremonial manner. A procession may be arranged for a variety of purposes, including to advertise something, signal a change in government, display a group's power, show solidarity for a cause, mark the beginning or end of an event such as a wedding or funeral, entertain a crowd, or practice a religion. Processions have been an aspect of celebrations and ceremonies since ancient times, and they are practiced in some form throughout all cultures. They often involve a mode of transport, such as a carriage or a car; music or vocalizations, including a choir or a marching band; a visual signal of a hierarchy within the precession; and the display of eye-catching items like banners.


Proctor is a person who takes charge of, or acts for, another.
In genealogy, a progenitor is the founder of a family, line of descent, gens, clan, tribe, noble house, or ethnic group. Genealogy understands a progenitor to be the earliest recorded ancestor of a consanguineous family group of descendants.
A prologue or prolog is an opening to a story that establishes the context and gives background details, often some earlier story that ties into the main one, and other miscellaneous information. The Ancient Greek word πρόλογος includes the modern meaning of prologue, but was of wider significance, more like the meaning of preface. The importance, therefore, of the prologue in Greek drama was very great; it sometimes almost took the place of a romance, to which, or to an episode in which, the play itself succeeded.
A promontory is a raised mass of land that projects into a lowland or a body of water. Most promontories either are formed from a hard ridge of rock that has resisted the erosive forces that have removed the softer rock to the sides of it, or are the high ground that remains between two river valleys where they form a confluence. One type of promontory is a headland, or head.
A propellant is a mass that is expelled or expanded in such a way as to create a thrust or another motive force in accordance with Newton's third law of motion, and "propel" a vehicle, projectile, or fluid payload. In vehicles, the engine that expels the propellant is called a reaction engine. Although technically a propellant is the reaction mass used to create thrust, the term "propellant" is often used to describe a substance which contains both the reaction mass and the fuel that holds the energy used to accelerate the reaction mass. For example, the term "propellant" is often used in chemical rocket design to describe a combined fuel/propellant, although the propellants should not be confused with the fuel that is used by an engine to produce the energy that expels the propellant. Even though the byproducts of substances used as fuel are also often used as a reaction mass to create the thrust, such as with a chemical rocket engine, propellant and fuel are two distinct concepts.
Propolis or bee glue is a resinous mixture that honey bees produce by mixing saliva and beeswax with exudate gathered from tree buds, sap flows, or other botanical sources. It is used as a sealant for unwanted open spaces in the beehive. Propolis is used for small gaps, while gaps larger than the bee space are usually filled with burr comb. Its color varies depending on its botanical source, with dark brown as the most common. Propolis is sticky above 19 °C (66 °F), while at lower temperatures, it becomes hard and brittle.
A proscenium is the virtual vertical plane of space in a theatre, usually surrounded on the top and sides by a physical proscenium arch and on the bottom by the stage floor itself, which serves as the frame into which the audience observes from a more or less unified angle the events taking place upon the stage during a theatrical performance. The concept of the fourth wall of the theatre stage space that faces the audience is essentially the same.
Prosody may refer to:Prosody (poetry), the study and the actual use of metres and forms of versification
Prosody (linguistics), the study of suprasegmental elements of speech
Prosody (music), the manner of setting words to music
Prosody (software), a cross-platform XMPP server.
A protease is an enzyme that catalyzes proteolysis, breaking down proteins into smaller polypeptides or single amino acids, and spurring the formation of new protein products. They do this by cleaving the peptide bonds within proteins by hydrolysis, a reaction where water breaks bonds. Proteases are involved in numerous biological pathways, including digestion of ingested proteins, protein catabolism, and cell signaling.
In chemistry, protonation (or hydronation) is the adding of a proton (or hydron, or hydrogen cation), usually denoted by H+, to an atom, molecule, or ion, forming a conjugate acid. (The complementary process, when a proton is removed from a Brønsted–Lowry acid, is deprotonation.) Some examples includeThe protonation of water by sulfuric acid:
H2SO4 + H2O ⇌ H3O+ + HSO−4
The protonation of isobutene in the formation of a carbocation:
(CH3)2C=CH2 + HBF4 ⇌ (CH3)3C+ + BF−4
The protonation of ammonia in the formation of ammonium chloride from ammonia and hydrogen chloride:
NH3(g) + HCl(g) → NH4Cl(s).
Provenance is the chronology of the ownership, custody or location of a historical object. The term was originally mostly used in relation to works of art, but is now used in similar senses in a wide range of fields, including archaeology, paleontology, archival science, economy, computing, and scientific enquiry in general.
The bow is the forward part of the hull of a ship or boat, the point that is farthest forward when the vessel is underway in the usual direction. The aft end of the boat is the stern.

A pseudonym or alias is a fictitious name that a person assumes for a particular purpose, which differs from their original or true name (orthonym). This also differs from a new name that entirely or legally replaces an individual's own. Many pseudonym holders use them because they wish to remain anonymous and maintain privacy, though this may be difficult to achieve as a result of legal issues.
Pueblo refers to the settlements of the Pueblo peoples, Native American tribes in the Southwestern United States, currently in New Mexico, Arizona, and Texas. The permanent communities, including some of the oldest continually occupied settlements in the United States, are called pueblos (lowercased).
A pulsar is a highly magnetized rotating neutron star that emits beams of electromagnetic radiation out of its magnetic poles. This radiation can be observed only when a beam of emission is pointing toward Earth, and is responsible for the pulsed appearance of emission. Neutron stars are very dense and have short, regular rotational periods. This produces a very precise interval between pulses that ranges from milliseconds to seconds for an individual pulsar. Pulsars are one of the candidates for the source of ultra-high-energy cosmic rays.
Pumice, called pumicite in its powdered or dust form, is a volcanic rock that consists of extremely vesicular rough-textured volcanic glass, which may or may not contain crystals. It is typically light-colored. Scoria is another vesicular volcanic rock that differs from pumice in having larger vesicles, thicker vesicle walls, and being dark colored and denser.
The pumpkinseed, also referred to as sun perch, pond perch, common sunfish, punkie, sunfish, sunny, and kivver, is a small to medium–sized freshwater fish of the genus Lepomis, from the sunfish family (Centrarchidae) in the order Centrarchiformes. It is endemic to eastern North America.
Puncheon may refer to:Puncheon (barrel), a container for wine and/or spirits
Puncheon or plank road, a road built with split logs or heavy slab timbers with one face smoothed, also used for flooring or other construction
Puncheon rum, a type of Caribbean rum
Puncheon (unit), a unit of volume.
A pupa is the life stage of insects from the Holometabola clade undergoing transformation between immature and mature stages. Insects that go through a pupal stage are holometabolous: they go through four distinct stages in their life cycle, the stages thereof being egg, larva, pupa, and imago. The processes of entering and completing the pupal stage are controlled by the insect's hormones, especially juvenile hormone, prothoracicotropic hormone, and ecdysone. The act of becoming a pupa is called pupation, and the act of emerging from the pupal case is called eclosion or emergence.
Purgatory is a belief in Catholic theology. It is a passing intermediate state after physical death for purifying or purging a soul before entering Heaven. A common analogy is dross being removed from gold in a furnace.
Purity may refer to:.
Pylon may refer to:.
A pyre, also known as a funeral pyre, is a structure, usually made of wood, for burning a body as part of a funeral rite or execution. As a form of cremation, a body is placed upon or under the pyre, which is then set on fire.
The mineral pyrite ( PY-ryte), or iron pyrite, also known as fool's gold, is an iron sulfide with the chemical formula FeS2 (iron (II) disulfide). Pyrite is the most abundant sulfide mineral.
Tephra is fragmental material produced by a volcanic eruption regardless of composition, fragment size, or emplacement mechanism.
Quadrant may refer to:.
A peatland is a type of wetland whose soils consist of organic matter from decaying plants, forming layers of peat. Peatlands arise because of incomplete decomposition of organic matter, usually litter from vegetation, due to water-logging and subsequent anoxia. Peatlands are unusual landforms that derive mostly from biological rather than physical processes, and can take on characteristic shapes and surface patterning.
A quarry is a type of rock and earth materials—like limestone, granite, marble, sand, and gravel—directly from the surface to use in building and construction. The operation of quarries is regulated in some jurisdictions to manage their safety risks and reduce their environmental impact.
A quasar is an extremely luminous active galactic nucleus (AGN). It is sometimes known as a quasi-stellar object, abbreviated QSO. The emission from an AGN is powered by accretion onto a supermassive black hole with a mass ranging from millions to tens of billions of solar masses, surrounded by a gaseous accretion disc. Gas in the disc falling towards the black hole heats up and releases energy in the form of electromagnetic radiation. The radiant energy of quasars is enormous; the most powerful quasars have luminosities thousands of times greater than that of a galaxy such as the Milky Way. Quasars are usually categorized as a subclass of the more general category of AGN. The redshifts of quasars are of cosmological origin.
A wharf, quay, staith, or staithe is a structure on the shore of a harbour or on the bank of a river or canal where ships may dock to load and unload cargo or passengers. Such a structure includes one or more berths, and may also include piers, warehouses, or other facilities necessary for handling the ships. Wharves are often considered to be a series of docks at which boats are stationed. A marginal wharf is connected to the shore along its full length.
An oak is a hardwood tree or shrub in the genus Quercus of the beech family. They have spirally arranged leaves, often with lobed edges, and a nut called an acorn, borne within a cup. The genus is widely distributed in the Northern Hemisphere, with some 500 species, both deciduous and evergreen. Fossil oaks date back to the Middle Eocene. Molecular phylogeny shows that the genus is divided into Old World and New World clades, but many oak species hybridise freely, making the genus's history difficult to resolve.
A quest is a journey toward a specific mission or a goal. It serves as a plot device in mythology and fiction: a difficult journey towards a goal, often symbolic or allegorical. Tales of quests figure prominently in the folklore of every nation and ethnic culture.
A quill is a writing tool made from a moulted flight feather of a large bird. Quills were used for writing with ink before the invention of the dip pen/metal-nibbed pen, the fountain pen, and, eventually, the ballpoint pen.
The quince is the sole member of the genus Cydonia in the Malinae subtribe of the Rosaceae family. It is a deciduous tree that bears hard, aromatic bright golden-yellow pome fruit, similar in appearance to a pear. Ripe quince fruits are hard, tart, and astringent. They are eaten raw or processed into jam, quince cheese, or alcoholic drinks.
A quorum is the minimum number of members of a group necessary to constitute the group at a meeting. In a deliberative assembly, a quorum is necessary to conduct the business of that group. In contrast, a plenum is a meeting of the full body. A body, or a meeting or vote of it, is quorate if a quorum is present.
A rabbi is a Jewish preacher and religious leader in Judaism. A person becomes a rabbi by being ordained by another rabbi — known as Semikhah — following a course of study of Jewish history and texts, including the Tanakh, Midrash, Mishnah, Tosefta, Talmud, Halakha, and rabbinic commentaries thereon. The basic form of the rabbi developed between the Second Temple —being heavily influenced by the Pharisees—and Rabbinic periods, when learned teachers—overlapping with the Tannaim, Amoraim, Savoraim, and early Geonim—assembled to codify Judaism's written and oral laws. The title "rabbi" was first used in the first century CE. In more recent centuries, the duties of a rabbi became increasingly influenced by the duties of the Protestant Christian minister, hence the title "pulpit rabbis." Further, in 19th-century Germany and the United States, rabbinical activities such as delivering sermons, pastoral counseling, and representing the community to the outside all increased in importance.
The raccoon, sometimes called the North American, northern or common raccoon to distinguish it from other species of raccoon, is a mammal native to North America. It is the largest of the procyonid family, having a body length of 40 to 70 cm, and a body weight of 5 to 26 kg. Its grayish coat mostly consists of dense underfur, which insulates it against cold weather. The animal's most distinctive features include its extremely dexterous front paws, its facial mask, and its ringed tail, which are common themes in the mythologies of the Indigenous peoples of the Americas surrounding the species. The raccoon is noted for its intelligence, and studies show that it can remember the solution to tasks for at least three years. It is usually nocturnal and omnivorous, eating about 40% invertebrates, 33% plants, and 27% vertebrates.
In radiometry, radiance is the radiant flux emitted, reflected, transmitted or received by a given surface, per unit solid angle per unit projected area. Radiance is used to characterize diffuse emission and reflection of electromagnetic radiation, and to quantify emission of neutrinos and other particles. The SI unit of radiance is the watt per steradian per square metre. It is a directional quantity: the radiance of a surface depends on the direction from which it is being observed.
In botany, the radicle is the first part of a seedling to emerge from the seed, during the process of germination. Germination understood as a biomechanical process describes the radicle with the hypocotyl combined as the embryonic axis in the seed. The radicle emerges from a seed through the micropyle.
A rafter is one of a series of sloped structural members such as steel beams that extend from the ridge or hip to the wall plate, downslope perimeter or eave, and that are designed to support the roof shingles, roof deck, roof covering and its associated loads. A pair of rafters is called a couple. In home construction, rafters are normally made of wood. Exposed rafters are a feature of some traditional roof styles.
Jacobaea vulgaris, synonym Senecio jacobaea, is a very common wild flower in the family Asteraceae that is native to northern Eurasia, usually in dry, open places, and has also been widely distributed as a weed elsewhere.
Rail transport is a means of transport using wheeled vehicles running on tracks, which usually consist of two parallel steel rails. Rail transport is one of the two primary means of land transport, next to road transport. It is used for about 8% of passenger and freight transport globally, thanks to its energy efficiency and potentially high speed. Additionally, the track spreads the weight of the train which means larger amounts can be carried than with trucks on roads.
Rain is a form of precipitation where water droplets that have condensed from atmospheric water vapor fall by gravity. Rain is a major component of the water cycle and is responsible for depositing most of the fresh water on the Earth. It provides water for hydroelectric power plants, crop irrigation, and suitable conditions for many types of ecosystems.
A raisin is a dried grape. Raisins are produced in many regions of the world and may be eaten raw or used in cooking, baking, and brewing. The word raisin is commonly used for the dried dark-colored seedless grape, while sultana is a golden-colored dried grape, and currant is a dried small Black Corinth seedless grape.
Rampart may refer to:Rampart (fortification), a defensive wall or bank around a castle, fort or settlement.
A ranch is an area of land, including various structures, given primarily to ranching, the practice of raising grazing livestock such as cattle and sheep. It is a subtype of farm. These terms are most often applied to livestock-raising operations in Mexico, the Western United States and Western Canada, though there are ranches in other areas. People who own or operate a ranch are called ranchers, cattlemen, or stockgrowers. Ranching is also a method used to raise less common livestock such as horses, elk, American bison, ostrich, emu, and alpaca.
Rapids are sections of a river where the river bed has a relatively steep gradient, causing an increase in water velocity and turbulence. Flow, gradient, constriction, and obstacles are four factors that are needed for a rapid to be created.
Raptor(s) or RAPTOR may refer to:.
Rarity may refer to:.
A ravine is a landform that is narrower than a canyon and is often the product of streambank erosion. Ravines are typically classified as larger in scale than gullies, although smaller than valleys. Ravines may also be called a cleuch, dell, ghout (Nevis), gill or ghyll, glen, gorge, kloof, and chine.
In chemistry, a reagent or analytical reagent is a substance or compound added to a system to cause a chemical reaction, or test if one occurs. A reactant is a substance or compound that is consumed in a chemical reaction. The terms reactant and reagent are often used interchangeably, but reactant specifies a substance consumed in the course of a chemical reaction; reagent is used in the context of chemical analysis, while reactant is used in the context of reaction itself. Solvents, though involved in the reaction mechanism, are usually not called reactants. Similarly, catalysts are not consumed by the reaction, so they are not reactants. In biochemistry, especially in connection with enzyme-catalyzed reactions, the reactants are commonly called substrates.
A reaper is a farm implement that reaps crops at harvest when they are ripe. Usually the crop involved is a cereal grass, especially wheat. The first documented reaping machines were Gallic reapers that were used in Roman times in what would become modern-day France. The Gallic reaper involved a comb which collected the heads, with an operator knocking the grain into a box for later threshing.
Rebirth may refer to:.
A rebus is a puzzle device that combines the use of illustrated pictures with individual letters to depict words or phrases. For example, the word "been" might be depicted by a rebus showing an illustrated bumblebee next to a plus sign (+) and the letter "n".
Recital may refer to:Recital (law), an account of the details of an act
Recital (music), a concert led by a soloist or troupe
Organ recital
Recital, album by Mary O'Hara
Recital, album by Julius Patzak
Recital
Recital
Recital, the Israeli brand-name of the antidepressant Citalopram

.
A reef is a ridge or shoal of rock, coral, or similar relatively stable material lying beneath the surface of a natural body of water. Many reefs result from natural, abiotic (non-living) processes such as deposition of sand or wave erosion planing down rock outcrops. However, reefs such as the coral reefs of tropical waters are formed by biotic (living) processes, dominated by corals and coralline algae. Artificial reefs, such as shipwrecks and other man-made underwater structures, may occur intentionally or as the result of an accident. These are sometimes designed to increase the physical complexity of featureless sand bottoms to attract a more diverse range of organisms. They provide shelter to various aquatic animals which help prevent extinction. Another reason reefs are put in place is for aquaculture, and fish farmers who are looking to improve their businesses sometimes invest in them. Reefs are often quite near to the surface, but not all definitions require this.
In materials science, a refractory is a material that is resistant to decomposition by heat or chemical attack and that retains its strength and rigidity at high temperatures. They are inorganic, non-metallic compounds that may be porous or non-porous, and their crystallinity varies widely: they may be crystalline, polycrystalline, amorphous, or composite. They are typically composed of oxides, carbides or nitrides of the following elements: silicon, aluminium, magnesium, calcium, boron, chromium and zirconium. Many refractories are ceramics, but some such as graphite are not, and some ceramics such as clay pottery are not considered refractory. Refractories are distinguished from the refractory metals, which are elemental metals and their alloys that have high melting temperatures.
Boat racing (Regatta) is a sport in which boats, or other types of watercraft, race on water. Boat racing powered by oars is recorded as having occurred in ancient Egypt, and it is likely that people have engaged in races involving boats and other water-borne craft for as long as such watercraft have existed.
In a monarchy, a regent is a person appointed to execute the office of a monarch temporarily. Regencies may arise for a number of reasons, including the monarch being a minor, ill, absent from the country, or otherwise unavailable. A regent may also be appointed in cases where the throne is vacant, or the identity of the legitimate monarch is disputed.
In politics, a regime is a system of government that determines access to public office, and the extent of power held by officials. The two broad categories of regimes are democratic and autocratic. A key similarity across all regimes is the presence of rulers of both formal and informal institutions, which interact dynamically to adapt to changes to their environment.
The reindeer or caribou is a species of deer with circumpolar distribution, native to Arctic, subarctic, tundra, boreal, and mountainous regions of Northern Europe, Siberia, and North America. It is the only representative of the genus Rangifer. More recent studies suggest the splitting of reindeer and caribou. "All caribou and reindeer throughout the world are considered to be the same species, but there are 7 subspecies.".
A reliquary is a container for relics. A portable reliquary, or the room in which one is stored, may also be called a feretory. A brooch-like container for a very small relic may be called a "theca".
Remnant or remnants may refer to:.
The Renaissance is a European period of history and cultural movement, very roughly defined as covering the 14th through 17th centuries, though sometimes more narrowly defined for instance as only covering the 15th through 16th centuries. It marked the transition from the Middle Ages to modernity and was characterized by the European rediscovery and revival of the literary, philosophical, and artistic achievements of classical antiquity. Associated with great social change in most fields and disciplines, including art, architecture, politics, literature, exploration and science, the Renaissance was first centered in the Republic of Florence, then spread to the rest of Italy and later throughout Europe. The term rinascita ('rebirth') first appeared in Lives of the Artists by Giorgio Vasari, while the corresponding French word renaissance was adopted into English as the term for this period during the 1830s.
Reptiles, as commonly defined, are tetrapod vertebrate animals with an ectothermic metabolism and amniotic development. Reptiles traditionally comprise four orders: Testudines (turtles), Crocodilia, Squamata and Rhynchocephalia (tuatara), with about 12,000 extant species listed in the Reptile Database. The study of the traditional reptile orders, customarily in combination with the study of modern amphibians, is called herpetology.
A reservoir is an enlarged lake behind a dam, usually built to store fresh water, often doubling for hydroelectric power generation.
Residue may refer to:.
A resin is a solid or highly viscous liquid that can be converted into a polymer. Resins may be biological or synthetic in origin, but are typically harvested from plants. Resins are mixtures of organic compounds insoluble in water, predominantly terpenes. Technically, resins should not be confused with gums, which consist predominantly of water-soluble polysaccharides, although these two terms are often interchangeable in the less formal context. Common resins include pine oleoresins, amber, hashish, frankincense, myrrh and the animal-derived resin, shellac. Resins are used in varnishes, adhesives, food additives, incenses and perfumes.
Restoration is the act of restoring something to its original state. This may refer to:Conservation and restoration of cultural property
Audio restoration
Conservation and restoration of immovable cultural property
Film restoration
Image restoration
Textile restoration
Ecological restoration.
A reticle or reticule, also known as a graticule or crosshair, is a pattern of fine lines or markings built into the eyepiece of an optical device such as a telescopic sight, spotting scope, theodolite, optical microscope or the screen of an oscilloscope, to provide measurement references during visual inspections. Today, engraved lines or embedded fibers may be replaced by a digital image superimposed on a screen or eyepiece. Both terms may be used to describe any set of patterns used for aiding visual measurements and calibrations, but in modern use reticle is most commonly used for weapon sights, while graticule is more widely used for non-weapon measuring instruments such as oscilloscope display, astronomic telescopes, microscopes and slides, surveying instruments and other similar devices.
A retinue is a body of persons "retained" in the service of a noble, royal personage, or dignitary; a suite of retainers.
Revelry may refer to:The revelries of Saturnalia
The Revelry (album), by the Bullets and Octane
Revelry
"Revelry" (song), by Kings of Leon
"Revelry", a song by Yachts (band)
Party

.
Reverie may refer to:A daydream or a dreamy state.
W. R. Bion's psychoanalytic use of "reverie".
Rhapsody may refer to:.
Rhenium is a chemical element; it has symbol Re and atomic number 75. It is a silvery-gray, heavy, third-row transition metal in group 7 of the periodic table. With an estimated average concentration of 1 part per billion (ppb), rhenium is one of the rarest elements in the Earth's crust. It has one of the highest melting and boiling points of any element. It resembles manganese and technetium chemically and is mainly obtained as a by-product of the extraction and refinement of molybdenum and copper ores. It shows in its compounds a wide variety of oxidation states ranging from −3 to +7.
Rhododendron, from Ancient Greek ῥόδον (rhódon), meaning "rose", and δένδρον (déndron), meaning "tree", is a very large genus of about 1,024 species of woody plants in the heath family (Ericaceae). They can be either evergreen or deciduous. Most species are native to eastern Asia and the Himalayan region, but smaller numbers occur elsewhere in Asia, and in North America, Europe and Australia.
Rhodonite is a manganese inosilicate, with the formula (Mn, Fe, Mg, Ca)SiO3, and member of the pyroxenoid group of minerals, crystallizing in the triclinic system. The term rhodonite was first introduced by Germar. from Ancient Greek  ῥόδον (rhódon) 'rose'. It commonly occurs as cleavable to compact masses with a rose-red color often tending to brown due to surface oxidation. The rose-red hue is caused by the manganese cation (Mn2+).
Rhubarb is the fleshy, edible stalks (petioles) of species and hybrids of Rheum in the family Polygonaceae, which are cooked and used for food. The plant is a herbaceous perennial that grows from short, thick rhizomes. Historically, different plants have been called "rhubarb" in English. The large, triangular leaves contain high levels of oxalic acid and anthrone glycosides, making them poisonous and therefore inedible. The small flowers are grouped in large compound leafy greenish-white to rose-red inflorescences.
The Rialto is a central area of Venice, Italy, in the sestiere of San Polo. It is, and has been for many centuries, the financial and commercial heart of the city. Rialto is known for its prominent markets as well as for the monumental Rialto Bridge across the Grand Canal.
A ribosome is a ribonucleoprotein particle found in all cells, both prokaryotic and eukaryotic, responsible for the synthesis of proteins. A ribosome functions as a molecular machine in the translation of strands of messenger RNA (mRNA) and production of a protein. A ribosome links amino acids together in the order specified by the codons of mRNA molecules to form polypeptide chains. A ribosome is made up of a large and a small subunit, each consisting of one or more ribosomal RNA molecules and many ribosomal proteins. The ribosomes and associated molecules are also known as the translational apparatus.
A ridge is a long, narrow, elevated geomorphologic landform, structural feature, or a combination of both separated from the surrounding terrain by steep sides. The sides of a ridge slope away from a narrow top, the crest or ridgecrest, with the terrain dropping down on either side. The crest, if narrow, is also called a ridgeline. Limitations on the dimensions of a ridge are lacking. Its height above the surrounding terrain can vary from less than a meter to hundreds of meters. A ridge can be either depositional, erosional, tectonic, or a combination of these in origin and can consist of either bedrock, loose sediment, lava, or ice depending on its origin. A ridge can occur as either an isolated, independent feature or part of a larger geomorphological and/or structural feature. Frequently, a ridge can be further subdivided into smaller geomorphic or structural elements.
In geology, a rift is a linear zone where the lithosphere is being pulled apart and is an example of extensional tectonics. Typical rift features are a central linear downfaulted depression, called a graben, or more commonly a half-graben with normal faulting and rift-flank uplifts mainly on one side. Where rifts remain above sea level they form a rift valley, which may be filled by water forming a rift lake. The axis of the rift area may contain volcanic rocks, and active volcanism is a part of many, but not all, active rift systems.
Rigging comprises the system of ropes, cables and chains, which support and control a sailing ship or sail boat's masts and sails. Standing rigging is the fixed rigging that supports masts including shrouds and stays. Running rigging is rigging which adjusts the position of the vessel's sails and spars including halyards, braces, sheets and vangs.
In hillslope geomorphology, a rill is a shallow channel cut into soil by the erosive action of flowing surface water. Similar but smaller incised channels are known as microrills; larger incised channels are known as gullies.
Rime may refer to:Rime ice, ice that forms when water droplets in fog freeze to the outer surfaces of objects, such as trees.
A stream is a continuous body of surface water flowing within the bed and banks of a channel. Depending on its location or certain characteristics, a stream may be referred to by a variety of local or regional names. Long, large streams are usually called rivers, while smaller, less voluminous and more intermittent streams are known, amongst others, as brook, creek, rivulet, rill, run, tributary, feeder, freshet, narrow river, and streamlet.
A road is a thoroughfare from one place to another, primarily used for movement of traffic. Many roads are paved.
Roan may refer to:.
Roost may refer to:.
The Rosary, formally known as the Psalter of Jesus and Mary, also known as the Dominican Rosary, refers to a set of prayers used primarily in the Catholic Church, and to the physical string of knots or beads used to count the component prayers. When referring to the prayer, the word is usually capitalized ; when referring to the prayer beads as an object, it is written with a lower-case initial letter.
Rosewood is any of a number of richly hued hardwoods, often brownish with darker veining, but found in other colours. It is hard, tough, strong, and dense. True rosewoods come from trees of the genus Dalbergia, but other woods are often called rosewood. Rosewood takes a high polish and is used for luxury furniture-making, flooring, musical instruments, and turnery.
A rotunda is any roofed building with a circular ground plan, and sometimes covered by a dome. It may also refer to a round room within a building. The Pantheon in Rome is perhaps the most famous, and is the most influential rotunda. A band rotunda is a circular bandstand, usually with a dome.
The rowans or mountain-ashes are shrubs or trees in the genus Sorbus of the rose family, Rosaceae. They are native throughout the cool temperate regions of the Northern Hemisphere, with the highest species diversity in the Himalaya, southern Tibet and parts of western China, where numerous apomictic microspecies occur. The name rowan was originally applied to the species Sorbus aucuparia and is also used for other species in the genus Sorbus.
The Rubicon is a shallow river in northeastern Italy, just south of Cesena and north of Rimini. It was known as Fiumicino until 1933, when it was identified with the ancient river Rubicon, crossed by Julius Caesar in 49 BC.
The river flows for around 80 km (50 mi) from the Apennine Mountains to the Adriatic Sea through the south of the Emilia-Romagna region, between the towns of Rimini and Cesena.
Rubble is broken stone, of irregular size, shape and texture; undressed especially as a filling-in. Rubble naturally found in the soil is known also as 'brash'. Where present, it becomes more noticeable when the land is ploughed or worked.
A rudder is a primary control surface used to steer a ship, boat, submarine, hovercraft, airship, or other vehicle that moves through a fluid medium. On an airplane, the rudder is used primarily to counter adverse yaw and p-factor and is not the primary control used to turn the airplane. A rudder operates by redirecting the fluid past the hull or fuselage, thus imparting a turning or yawing motion to the craft. In basic form, a rudder is a flat plane or sheet of material attached with hinges to the craft's stern, tail, or afterend. Often rudders are shaped to minimize hydrodynamic or aerodynamic drag. On simple watercraft, a tiller—essentially, a stick or pole acting as a lever arm—may be attached to the top of the rudder to allow it to be turned by a helmsman. In larger vessels, cables, pushrods, or hydraulics may link rudders to steering wheels. In typical aircraft, the rudder is operated by pedals via mechanical linkages or hydraulics.
A runestone is typically a raised stone with a runic inscription, but the term can also be applied to inscriptions on boulders and on bedrock. The tradition of erecting runestones as a memorial to dead men began in the 4th century and lasted into the 12th century, but the majority of the extant runestones date from the late Viking Age. While most of these are located in Scandinavia, particularly Sweden, there are also scattered runestones in locations that were visited by Norsemen. Runestones were usually brightly coloured when erected, though this is no longer evident as the colour has worn off.
Runoff, run-off or RUNOFF may refer to:Runoff (hydrology), the flow of water over land
Channel runoff, the confined flow of water
Surface runoff, the unconfined flow of water over land
Runoff model (reservoir), a mathematical model involving rainfall and runoff
Runoff curve number, an empirical parameter used in hydrology
RUNOFF, the first computer text-formatting program
Runoff or run-off, another name for bleed, printing that lies beyond the edges to which a printed sheet is trimmed
Runoff or run-off, a stock market term
Runoff voting system, also known as the two-round system, a voting system where a second round of voting is used to elect one of the two candidates receiving the most votes in the first round
Instant-runoff voting, an extension or variation of runoff voting where a second round can be rendered unnecessary by voters ranking candidates in order of preference
Run-off area, a racetrack safety feature
Runoff directed by Kimberly Levin.
Rustication, occasionally rustification, may refer to:Rustication (architecture), a style of masonry giving stones a deliberately rough finish
Rustication (academia), temporary expulsion from a university
Rustication, also known as "Sent-down youths", a government policy enacted during the Chinese Cultural Revolution
Rustication, the process of posting a person or relocating a unit from London to elsewhere in the country.
The sable is a species of marten, a small omnivorous mammal primarily inhabiting the forest environments of Russia, from the Ural Mountains throughout Siberia, and northern Mongolia. Its habitat also borders eastern Kazakhstan, China, North Korea and Hokkaido, Japan.
A sacrament is a Christian rite which is recognized as being particularly important and significant. There are various views on the existence, number and meaning of such rites. Many Christians consider the sacraments to be a visible symbol of the reality of God, as well as a channel for God's grace. Many denominations, including the Catholic, Lutheran, Moravian, Reformed, Anglican, Methodist and Baptist, hold to the definition of sacrament formulated by Augustine of Hippo: an outward sign of an inward grace, that has been instituted by Jesus Christ. Sacraments signify God's grace in a way that is outwardly observable to the participant.
Saffron is a spice derived from the flower of Crocus sativus, commonly known as the "saffron crocus". The vivid crimson stigma and styles, called threads, are collected and dried for use mainly as a seasoning and colouring agent in food. The saffron crocus was slowly propagated throughout much of Eurasia and was later brought to parts of North Africa, North America, and Oceania.
The sagittal plane is an anatomical plane in bilaterian organisms that divides the body into right and left sections. It is perpendicular to the transverse and coronal planes. The plane may be in the center of the body and divide it into two equal parts (mid-sagittal), or away from the midline and divide it into unequal parts (para-sagittal).
Sailcloth is cloth used to make sails. It can be made of a variety of materials, including natural fibers such as flax, hemp, or cotton in various forms of sail canvas, and synthetic fibers such as nylon, polyester, aramids, and carbon fibers in various woven, spun, and molded textiles.
Salamanders are a group of amphibians typically characterized by their lizard-like appearance, with slender bodies, blunt snouts, short limbs projecting at right angles to the body, and the presence of a tail in both larvae and adults. All ten extant salamander families are grouped together under the order Urodela, the sole surviving order from the group Caudata. Urodela is a scientific Latin term based on the Ancient Greek οὐρά δήλη: ourà dēlē "conspicuous tail". Caudata is the Latin for "tailed ones", from cauda: "tail".
Salinity is the saltiness or amount of salt dissolved in a body of water, called saline water. It is usually measured in g/L or g/kg.
Willows, also called sallows and osiers, of the genus Salix, comprise around 350 species of typically deciduous trees and shrubs. They are primarily found on moist soils in cold and temperate regions.
A salt marsh, saltmarsh or salting, also known as a coastal marsh, is a tidal wetland in the upper coastal intertidal zone between land and sea that is regularly flooded by tides of seawater or brackish water. It is a unique marine coastal ecosystem dominated by dense stands of salt-tolerant plants such as herbs, grasses, or low shrubs. These plants are terrestrial in origin and are essential to the stability of the salt marsh in trapping and binding sediments. Salt marshes play a large role in the aquatic food web and the delivery of nutrients to coastal waters. They also support terrestrial animals and provide coastal protection.
A samovar is a metal container traditionally used to heat and boil water. Although originating in Russia, the samovar is well known outside of the country and has spread through Russian culture to other parts of Eastern Europe, as well as Western and Central and South Asia. Since the heated water is typically used to make tea, many samovars have a ring-shaped attachment around the chimney to hold and heat a teapot filled with tea concentrate. Though traditionally heated with coal or kindling, many newer samovars use electricity to heat water in a manner similar to an electric water boiler.
Sanctum may refer to:.
A shoal is a natural submerged ridge, bank, or bar that consists of, or is covered by, sand or other unconsolidated material, and rises from the bed of a body of water close to the surface or above it, which poses a danger to navigation. Shoals are also known in oceanography, geomorphology, and geoscience, as sandbanks, sandbars, gravelbars, or bars. Two or more shoals that are either separated by shared troughs or interconnected by past or present sedimentary and hydrographic processes are referred to as a shoal complex.
Sandstone is a clastic sedimentary rock composed mainly of sand-sized silicate grains, cemented together by another mineral. Sandstones comprise about 20–25% of all sedimentary rocks.
Saṅgha or saṃgha is a term meaning "association", "assembly", "company" or "community". In a political context, it was historically used to denote a governing assembly in a republic or a kingdom, and for a long time, it has been used by religious associations, including Buddhists, Jains and Sikhs. Given this history, some Buddhists have stated that the tradition of the sangha represents humanity's oldest surviving democratic institution.
Sapphire is a precious gemstone, a variety of the mineral corundum, consisting of aluminium oxide (α-Al2O3) with trace amounts of elements such as iron, titanium, cobalt, lead, chromium, vanadium, magnesium, boron, and silicon. The name sapphire is derived from the Latin word sapphirus, itself from the Greek word sappheiros (σάπφειρος, itself from a Semitic origin), which referred to lapis lazuli. Sapphire with colors other than its typical blue is referred to as "fancy sapphire", and can be in yellow, purple, orange, and green colors; "parti sapphires" show two or more colors. Red corundum stones also occur, but are called rubies rather than sapphires. Pink-colored corundum may be classified either as ruby or sapphire depending on the locale. Commonly, natural sapphires are cut and polished into gemstones and worn in jewelry. They also may be created synthetically in laboratories for industrial or decorative purposes in large crystal boules. It occurs in association with ruby, zircon, biotite, muscovite, calcite, dravite and quartz.
A sarcophagus is a coffin, most commonly carved in stone, and usually displayed above ground, though it may also be buried. The word sarcophagus comes from the Greek σάρξ sarx meaning "flesh", and φαγεῖν phagein meaning "to eat"; hence sarcophagus means "flesh-eating", from the phrase lithos sarkophagos, "flesh-eating stone". The word also came to refer to a particular kind of limestone that was thought to rapidly facilitate the decomposition of the flesh of corpses contained within it due to the chemical properties of the limestone itself.
Sardine and pilchard are common names for various species of small, oily forage fish in the herring suborder Clupeoidei. The term "sardine" was first used in English during the early 15th century; a somewhat dubious etymology says it comes from the Italian island of Sardinia, around which sardines were once supposedly abundant.
The Sargasso Sea is a region of the Atlantic Ocean bounded by four currents forming an ocean gyre. It is the only named sea without land boundaries. It is distinguished from other parts of the Atlantic Ocean by its characteristic brown Sargassum seaweed and calm blue waters.
A satin weave is a type of fabric weave that produces a characteristically glossy, smooth or lustrous material, typically with a glossy top surface and a dull back; it is not durable, as it tends to snag. It is one of three fundamental types of textile weaves alongside plain weave and twill weave.
Satori is a Japanese Buddhist term for "awakening", "comprehension; understanding". The word derives from the Japanese verb satoru.
A sawmill or lumber mill is a facility where logs are cut into lumber. Modern sawmills use a motorized saw to cut logs lengthwise to make long pieces, and crosswise to length depending on standard or custom sizes. The "portable" sawmill is simple to operate. The log lies flat on a steel bed, and the motorized saw cuts the log horizontally along the length of the bed, by the operator manually pushing the saw. The most basic kind of sawmill consists of a chainsaw and a customized jig, with similar horizontal operation.
A scabbard is a sheath for holding a sword, dagger, knife, or similar edged weapons. Rifles and other long guns may also be stored in scabbards by horse riders for transportation. Military cavalry and cowboys had scabbards for their saddle ring carbines and rifles for transportation and protection. Scabbards have been made of many materials over the millennia, including leather, wood, and metal such as brass or steel.
Scaffolding, also called scaffold or staging, is a temporary structure used to support a work crew and materials to aid in the construction, maintenance and repair of buildings, bridges and all other human-made structures. Scaffolds are widely used on site to get access to heights and areas that would be otherwise hard to get to. Unsafe scaffolding has the potential to result in death or serious injury. Scaffolding is also used in adapted forms for formwork and shoring, grandstand seating, concert stages, access/viewing towers, exhibition stands, ski ramps, half pipes and art projects.
A scalpel or bistoury is a small and extremely sharp bladed instrument used for surgery, anatomical dissection, podiatry and various handicrafts. A lancet is a double-edged scalpel.
Scarp may refer to:.
A sceptre is a staff or wand held in the hand by a ruling monarch as an item of royal or imperial insignia, signifying sovereign authority.
Schist is a medium-grained metamorphic rock generally derived from fine-grained sedimentary rock, like shale. It shows pronounced schistosity. This means that the rock is composed of mineral grains easily seen with a low-power hand lens, oriented in such a way that the rock is easily split into thin flakes or plates. This texture reflects a high content of platy minerals, such as mica, talc, chlorite, or graphite. These are often interleaved with more granular minerals, such as feldspar or quartz.
Scholia are grammatical, critical, or explanatory comments – original or copied from prior commentaries – which are inserted in the margin of the manuscript of ancient authors, as glosses. One who writes scholia is a scholiast. The earliest attested use of the word dates to the 1st century BC.
A scimitar is a single-edged sword with a convex curved blade of about 75 to 90 cm associated with Middle Eastern, South Asian, and North African cultures. A European term, scimitar does not refer to one specific sword type, but an assortment of different Eastern curved swords inspired by types introduced to the Middle East by Central Asian ghilmans. These swords include the Persian shamshir, the Arab saif, the Indian talwar, the North African nimcha, the Turkish kilij, and the Afghan pulwar. All such swords are originally derived from earlier curved swords developed in Turkic Central Asia (Turkestan).
Scion may refer to:.
Sconce may refer to:Sconce (fortification), a military fortification
Sconce
Sconcing, imposing a penalty in the form of drink
Sconce Point on the Isle of Wight, England
Sconce, a scout camp site located near Baildon, West Yorkshire.
Scoria or cinder is a pyroclastic, highly vesicular, dark-colored volcanic rock formed by ejection from a volcano as a molten blob and cooled in the air to form discrete grains called clasts. It is typically dark in color, and basaltic or andesitic in composition. Scoria has relatively low density, as it is riddled with macroscopic ellipsoidal vesicles, but in contrast to pumice, most scoria usually has a specific gravity greater than or at 1 and sinks or remains in place in water rather than float at the surface. However, some scoria can have a density similar to that of pumice, especially if it is unusually porous and has small and abundant vesicles, and will float. Scoria with larger vesicles and thick walls can also float if the vesicles are not interconnected. Fragments of floating scoria were observed at Taal Caldera lake in 2023. A priest who witnessed Taal Volcano's 1754 eruption noted in the lake a large quantity of floating rock which had been ejected by the volcano and which later analysis found to be of basaltic composition.
Scoria from a 1993 undersea eruption near Socorro Island in the Pacific Ocean was observed to float on the ocean surface for up to 15 minutes before it sank.
Scorpions are predatory arachnids with eight legs, a pair of grasping pincers and a narrow, segmented tail, often carried in a characteristic forward curve over the back and always ending with a stinger. The evolutionary history of scorpions goes back 435 million years. They mainly live in deserts but have adapted to a wide range of environmental conditions, and can be found on all continents except Antarctica. There are over 2,500 described species, with 22 extant (living) families recognized to date. Their taxonomy is being revised to account for 21st-century genomic studies.
Scrimshaw is scrollwork, engravings, and carvings done in bone or ivory. Typically it refers to the artwork created by whalers, engraved on the byproducts of whales, such as bones or cartilage. It is most commonly made out of the bones and teeth of sperm whales, the baleen of other whales, and the tusks of walruses.
A scroll, also known as a roll, is a roll of papyrus, parchment, or paper containing writing.
A scullery is a room in a house, traditionally used for washing up dishes and laundering clothes, or as an overflow kitchen. Tasks performed in the scullery include cleaning dishes and cooking utensils, occasional kitchen work, ironing, boiling water for cooking or bathing, and soaking and washing clothes. Sculleries contain hot and cold sinks, sometimes slop sinks, drain pipes, storage shelves, plate racks, a work table, various coppers for boiling water, tubs, and buckets.
A scythe is an agricultural hand-tool for mowing grass or harvesting crops. It was historically used to cut down or reap edible grains before they underwent the process of threshing. Horse-drawn and then tractor machinery largely replaced the scythe, but it is still used in some areas of Europe and Asia, especially in Yakutia, Siberia. Reapers are bladed machines that automate the cutting action of the scythe, and sometimes include subsequent steps in preparing the grain or the straw or hay.
Seabirds are birds that are adapted to life within the marine environment. While seabirds vary greatly in lifestyle, behaviour and physiology, they often exhibit striking convergent evolution, as the same environmental problems and feeding niches have resulted in similar adaptations. The first seabirds evolved in the Cretaceous period, while modern seabird families emerged in the Paleogene.
Seagrasses are the only flowering plants which grow in marine environments. There are about 60 species of fully marine seagrasses which belong to four families, all in the order Alismatales. Seagrasses evolved from terrestrial plants which recolonised the ocean 70 to 100 million years ago.
A seahorse is any of 46 species of small marine bony fish in the genus Hippocampus. The genus name comes from the Ancient Greek hippókampos (ἱππόκαμπος), itself from híppos (ἵππος) meaning "horse" and kámpos (κάμπος) meaning "sea monster" or "sea animal". Having a head and neck suggestive of a horse, seahorses also feature segmented bony armour, an upright posture and a curled prehensile tail. Along with the pipefishes and seadragons they form the family Syngnathidae.
A dressmaker, also known as a seamstress, is a person who makes clothing for women, such as dresses, blouses, and evening gowns. Dressmakers were historically known as mantua-makers, and are also known as a modiste or fabrician.
A seamount is a large submarine landform that rises from the ocean floor without reaching the water surface, and thus is not an island, islet, or cliff-rock. Seamounts are typically formed from extinct volcanoes that rise abruptly and are usually found rising from the seafloor to 100–4,000 m (330–13,120 ft) in height. They are defined by oceanographers as independent features that rise to at least 1,000 m (3,281 ft) above the seafloor, characteristically of conical form. The peaks are often found hundreds to thousands of meters below the surface, and are therefore considered to be within the deep sea. During their evolution over geologic time, the largest seamounts may reach the sea surface where wave action erodes the summit to form a flat surface. After they have subsided and sunk below the sea surface, such flat-top seamounts are called "guyots" or "tablemounts".
A seaplane is a powered fixed-wing aircraft capable of taking off and landing (alighting) on water. Seaplanes are usually divided into two categories based on their technological characteristics: floatplanes and flying boats; the latter are generally far larger and can carry far more. Seaplanes that can also take off and land on airfields are in a subclass called amphibious aircraft, or amphibians. Seaplanes were sometimes called hydroplanes, but currently this term applies instead to motor-powered watercraft that use the technique of hydrodynamic lift to skim the surface of water when running at speed.
A port is a maritime facility comprising one or more wharves or loading areas, where ships load and discharge cargo and passengers. Although usually situated on a sea coast or estuary, ports can also be found far inland, such as Hamburg, Manchester and Duluth; these access the sea via rivers or canals. Because of their roles as ports of entry for immigrants as well as soldiers in wartime, many port cities have experienced dramatic multi-ethnic and multicultural changes throughout their histories.
A seashell, also known simply as a shell, is a hard, protective outer layer usually created by an animal or organism that lives in the sea. Most seashells are made by mollusks, such as snails, clams, and oysters to protect their soft insides. Empty seashells are often found washed up on beaches by beachcombers. The shells are empty because the animal has died and the soft parts have decomposed or been eaten by another organism.
A seawall is a form of coastal defense constructed where the sea, and associated coastal processes, impact directly upon the landforms of the coast. The purpose of a seawall is to protect areas of human habitation, conservation, and leisure activities from the action of tides, waves, or tsunamis. As a seawall is a static feature, it will conflict with the dynamic nature of the coast and impede the exchange of sediment between land and sea.
Seaway may refer to:Seaway (band), a pop punk band from Canada.
Sound (geography), a sea or ocean inlet larger than a bay, deeper than a bight, and wider than a fjord
Strait, a narrow sea or ocean channel between two bodies of land
Sea lane or shipping lane, a regularly-used route for vessels on oceans and large lakes
Seaway , Canadian drama series that aired on CBC Television 1965–1966.
Sediment is a solid material made of loose particles that is transported to a new location where it is deposited. It occurs naturally and, through the processes of weathering and erosion, is broken down and subsequently transported by the action of wind, water, or ice or by the force of gravity acting on the particles. For example, sand and silt can be carried in suspension in river water and on reaching the sea bed deposited by sedimentation; if buried, they may eventually become sandstone and siltstone through lithification.
A seedling is a young sporophyte developing out of a plant embryo from a seed. Seedling development starts with germination of the seed. A typical young seedling consists of three main parts: the radicle, the hypocotyl, and the cotyledons. The two classes of flowering plants (angiosperms) are distinguished by their numbers of seed leaves: monocotyledons (monocots) have one blade-shaped cotyledon, whereas dicotyledons (dicots) possess two round cotyledons. Gymnosperms are more varied. For example, pine seedlings have up to eight cotyledons. The seedlings of some flowering plants have no cotyledons at all. These are said to be acotyledons.
The Seine is a 777-kilometre-long (483 mi) river in northern France. Its drainage basin is in the Paris Basin covering most of northern France. It rises at Source-Seine, 30 kilometres (19 mi) northwest of Dijon in northeastern France in the Langres plateau, flowing through Paris and into the English Channel at Le Havre. It is navigable by ocean-going vessels as far as Rouen, 120 kilometres (75 mi) from the sea. Over 60 percent of its length, as far as Burgundy, is negotiable by large barges and most tour boats, and nearly its whole length is available for recreational boating; excursion boats offer sightseeing tours of the river banks in the capital city, Paris.
A seismogram is a graph output by a seismograph. It is a record of the ground motion at a measuring station as a function of time. Seismograms typically record motions in three cartesian axes, with the z axis perpendicular to the Earth's surface and the x- and y- axes parallel to the surface. The energy measured in a seismogram may result from an earthquake or from some other source, such as an explosion. Seismograms can record many things, and record many little waves, called microseisms. These tiny events can be caused by heavy traffic near the seismograph, waves hitting a beach, the wind, and any number of other ordinary things that cause some shaking of the seismograph.
Semaphore is the use of an apparatus to create a visual signal transmitted over distance. A semaphore can be performed with devices including: fire, lights, flags, sunlight, and moving arms. Semaphores can be used for telegraphy when arranged in visually connected networks, or for traffic signalling such as in railway systems, or traffic lights in cities.
A senate is a deliberative assembly, often the upper house or chamber of a bicameral legislature. The name comes from the ancient Roman Senate, so-called as an assembly of the senior and therefore considered wiser and more experienced members of the society or ruling class. However the Roman Senate was not the ancestor or predecessor of modern parliamentarism in any sense, because the Roman senate was not a de jure legislative body.
Senna may refer to:.
Sentinel may refer to:.
A sepal is a part of the flower of angiosperms. Usually green, sepals typically function as protection for the flower in bud, and often as support for the petals when in bloom. Collectively, the sepals are called the calyx.
Sepia may refer to:.
Sepsis is a potentially life-threatening condition that arises when the body's dysregulated response to infection causes injury to its own tissues and organs.
In biology, a septum is a wall, dividing a cavity or structure into smaller ones. A cavity or structure divided in this way may be referred to as septate.
A seraph is a celestial or heavenly being originating in Ancient Judaism. The term plays a role in subsequent Judaism, Christianity, and Islam.
In music, a serenade is a musical composition or performance delivered in honour of someone or something. Serenades are typically calm, light pieces of music. The term comes from the Italian word serenata, which itself derives from the Latin serenus. Sense influenced by Italian sera "evening", from Latin sera, fem. of serus "late".
Serpent or The Serpent may refer to:Snake, a carnivorous reptile of the suborder Serpentes.
Serration is a saw-like appearance or a row of sharp or tooth-like projections. A serrated cutting edge has many small points of contact with the material being cut. By having less contact area than a smooth blade or other edge, the applied pressure at each point of contact is greater, and the points of contact are at a sharper angle to the material being cut. This causes a cutting action that involves many small splits in the surface of the material being cut, which cumulatively serve to cut the material along the line of the blade.
Servitude may refer to:.
Sesame is a plant in the genus Sesamum, also called benne. Numerous wild relatives occur in Africa and a smaller number in India. It is widely naturalized in tropical regions around the world and is cultivated for its edible seeds, which grow in pods. World production in 2018 was 6 million tonnes, with Sudan, Myanmar, and India as the largest producers.
Settlement may refer to:Human settlement, a community where people live
Settlement (structural), downward movement of a structure's foundation
Settlement (finance), where securities are delivered against payment of money
Settlement (litigation), a resolution between disputing parties about a legal case
Settlement (trust), a deed whereby property is given by a settlor into trust
Thomson Bay Settlement, Rottnest Island, Western Australia, also known as simply The Settlement
Closing, the final step in executing a real estate transaction.
Severance may refer to:.
A shackle, also known as a gyve, is a U-shaped piece of metal secured with a clevis pin or bolt across the opening, or a hinged metal loop secured with a quick-release locking pin mechanism. The term also applies to handcuffs and other similarly conceived restraint devices that function in a similar manner. Shackles are the primary connecting link in all manner of rigging systems, from boats and ships to industrial crane rigging, as they allow different rigging subsets to be connected or disconnected quickly.
Shale is a fine-grained, clastic sedimentary rock formed from mud that is a mix of flakes of clay minerals (hydrous aluminium phyllosilicates, e.g., kaolin, Al2Si2O5(OH)4) and tiny fragments (silt-sized particles) of other minerals, especially quartz and calcite. Shale is characterized by its tendency to split into thin layers (laminae) less than one centimeter in thickness. This property is called fissility. Shale is the most common sedimentary rock.
Shamanism is a spiritual practice that involves a practitioner (shaman) interacting with the spirit world through altered states of consciousness, such as trance. The goal of this is usually to direct spirits or spiritual energies into the physical world for the purpose of healing, divination, or to aid human beings in some other way.
Shanty may refer to:.
Shard or sherd is a sharp piece of glass, pottery, or stone.
Shearwaters are medium-sized long-winged seabirds in the petrel family Procellariidae. They have a global marine distribution, but are most common in temperate and cold waters, and are pelagic outside the breeding season.
Sheepskin is the hide of a sheep, sometimes also called lambskin. Unlike common leather, sheepskin is tanned with the fleece intact, as in a pelt.
A shekel or sheqel is an ancient Mesopotamian coin, usually of silver. A shekel was first a unit of weight of a value that varied over time and by issuing authority. It was also used in ancient Tyre, Carthage, Philistia and Hasmonean Judea.
Shel is a masculine given name, usually a short form of Sheldon. People named Shel include:Shel Bachrach (1944–2024), American insurance broker, investor, businessman and philanthropist
Shel Dorf (1933–2009), American comic book enthusiast and founder of San Diego Comic-Con
Shel Kaphan, American computer programmer and first employee of technology company Amazon
Shel Macrae (1943–2022), born Andrew Raeburn Semple, lead singer and rhythm guitarist of the English band The Fortunes from 1966 to 1977
Shel Silverstein (1930–1999), American writer known for his cartoons, songs and children's books
Shel Talmy, American record producer, songwriter and arranger
Shel Trapp (1935–2010), American community organizer

An abbey is a type of monastery used by members of a religious order under the governance of an abbot or abbess. Abbeys provide a complex of buildings and land for religious activities, work, and housing of Christian or Buddhist monks and nuns.
The acre is a unit of land area used in the British imperial and the United States customary systems. It is traditionally defined as the area of one chain by one furlong, which is exactly equal to 10 square chains, 1⁄640 of a square mile, 4,840 square yards, or 43,560 square feet, and approximately 4,047 m2, or about 40% of a hectare. The acre is sometimes abbreviated ac, but is usually spelled out as the word "acre".
Adhesive, also known as glue, cement, mucilage, or paste, is any non-metallic substance applied to one or both surfaces of two separate items that binds them together and resists their separation.
Affinity may refer to:.
Agave is a genus of monocots native to the arid regions of the Americas. The genus is primarily known for its succulent and xerophytic species that typically form large rosettes of strong, fleshy leaves.
An aileron is a hinged flight control surface usually forming part of the trailing edge of each wing of a fixed-wing aircraft. Ailerons are used in pairs to control the aircraft in roll, which normally results in a change in flight path due to the tilting of the lift vector. Movement around this axis is called rolling or banking.
An allegiance is a duty of fidelity said to be owed, or freely committed, by the people, subjects or citizens to their state or sovereign.
Alluvion, is a Roman law method of acquisition of heritable property (land). The typical cause is sediment (alluvium) deposited by a river. This sediment, legally termed the accessory, accreses a piece of land, the principal and thus accedes to the ownership of the principal land over time.
An almanac is a regularly published listing of a set of current information about one or multiple subjects. It includes information like weather forecasts, farmers' planting dates, tide tables, and other tabular data often arranged according to the calendar. Celestial figures and various statistics are found in almanacs, such as the rising and setting times of the Sun and Moon, dates of eclipses, hours of high and low tides, and religious festivals. The set of events noted in an almanac may be tailored for a specific group of readers, such as farmers, sailors, or astronomers.
An amulet is a spiritual object believed to confer protection or grace upon its possessor. The word amulet comes from the Latin word amuletum, which Pliny's Natural History describes as "an object that protects a person from trouble". Anything can function as an amulet; items commonly so used include statues, coins, drawings, plant parts, animal parts, and written words. The word phylactery is sometimes used as a general synonym likewise referring to any unspecified amulet, but also has a specific definition within Judaism. Certain amulets may also qualify more specifically as a devotional article, good luck charm, or even both in rare circumstances, but those categories represent only subsets of amulets.
A vestibule is a small room leading into a larger space such as a lobby, entrance hall, or passage, for the purpose of waiting, withholding the larger space from view, reducing heat loss, providing storage space for outdoor clothing (mudroom), etc. The term applies to structures in both modern and classical architecture since ancient times.
In optics, the aperture of an optical system is the hole or opening that primarily limits light propagated through the system. The aperture defines a bundle of rays from each point on an object that will come to a focus in the image plane.
An arbitral tribunal or arbitration tribunal, also arbitration commission, arbitration committee or arbitration council is a panel of adjudicators which is convened and sits to resolve a dispute by way of arbitration. The tribunal may consist of a sole arbitrator, or there may be two or more arbitrators, which might include a chairperson or an umpire. The tribunal usually consists of an odd number of arbitrators. Members selected to serve on an arbitration panel are typically professionals with expertise in both law and in friendly dispute resolution (mediation). Some scholars have suggested that the ideal composition of an arbitration commission should include at least also one professional in the field of the disputed situation, in cases that involve questions of asset or damages valuation for instance an economist.

The concept of an archetype appears in areas relating to behavior, historical psychology, philosophy and literary analysis.
Armature may refer to:Armature, kinematic chain used in computer animation to simulate the motions of virtual characters
Armature (electrical), one of the two principal electrical components of an electromechanical machine
Armature (sculpture), framework around which a sculpture is built
Armature Studio, video game developer

.
An artery is a blood vessel in humans and most other animals that takes oxygenated blood away from the heart in the systemic circulation to one or more parts of the body. Exceptions that carry deoxygenated blood are the pulmonary arteries in the pulmonary circulation that carry blood to the lungs for oxygenation, and the umbilical arteries in the fetal circulation that carry deoxygenated blood to the placenta. It consists of a multi-layered artery wall wrapped into a tube-shaped channel.
Ashfall may refer to:Ash fall, a volcanic phenomenon
Ashfall Fossil Beds, a protected area in Nebraska, United States
Ashfall (film), a 2019 South Korean film.
Asterism may refer to:Asterism (astronomy), a pattern of stars
Constellation, a area of the sky named after a traditional pattern of stars
Asterism (band), a Japanese rock band
Asterism (gemology), an optical phenomenon in gemstones
Asterism (typography), (⁂) a moderately rare typographical symbol denoting a break in passages.
An aviary is a large enclosure for confining birds, although bats may also be considered for display. Unlike birdcages, aviaries allow birds a larger living space where they can fly; hence, aviaries are also sometimes known as flight cages in the United Kingdom. Aviaries often contain plants and shrubbery to simulate a natural environment.
A banyan, also spelled banian, is a fig that develops accessory trunks from adjacent prop roots, allowing the tree to spread outwards indefinitely. This distinguishes banyans from other trees with a strangler habit that begin life as an epiphyte, i.e. a plant that grows on another plant, when its seed germinates in a crack or crevice of a host tree or edifice. "Banyan" often specifically denotes Ficus benghalensis, which is the national tree of India, though the name has also been generalized to denominate all figs that share a common life cycle and used systematically in taxonomy to denominate the subgenus Urostigma.
Barrow may refer to:.
A bastion is a structure projecting outward from the curtain wall of a fortification, most commonly angular in shape and positioned at the corners of the fort. The fully developed bastion consists of two faces and two flanks, with fire from the flanks being able to protect the curtain wall and the adjacent bastions. Compared with the medieval fortified towers they replaced, bastion fortifications offered a greater degree of passive resistance and more scope for ranged defence in the age of gunpowder artillery. As military architecture, the bastion is one element in the style of fortification dominant from the mid 16th to mid 19th centuries.
Bauxite is a sedimentary rock with a relatively high aluminium content. It is the world's main source of aluminium and gallium. Bauxite consists mostly of the aluminium minerals gibbsite, boehmite, and diaspore, mixed with the two iron oxides goethite and hematite, the aluminium clay mineral kaolinite and small amounts of anatase and ilmenite .
Bauxite appears dull in luster and is reddish-brown, white, or tan.
The belfry is a structure enclosing bells for ringing as part of a building, usually as part of a bell tower or steeple. It can also refer to the entire tower or building, particularly in continental Europe for such a tower attached to a city hall or other civic building.
Beryl ( BERR-əl) is a mineral composed of beryllium aluminium silicate with the chemical formula Be3Al2(SiO3)6. Well-known varieties of beryl include emerald and aquamarine. Naturally occurring hexagonal crystals of beryl can be up to several meters in size, but terminated crystals are relatively rare. Pure beryl is colorless, but it is frequently tinted by impurities; possible colors are green, blue, yellow, pink, and red (the rarest). It is an ore source of beryllium.
Biodome may refer to:a closed ecological system
Bio-Dome, a 1996 movie starring Pauly Shore and Stephen Baldwin and directed by Jason Bloom.
the Montreal Biodome, a facility located in Montreal that allows visitors to walk through replicas of four ecosystems found in the Americas.
the Montreal Biosphère, a geodesic dome on Ile Sainte-Hélène in Montreal, Quebec, Canada used as the pavilion for the 1967 World Exhibition Expo 67.
Biosphere 2, an artificial closed ecosystem in Oracle, Arizona.
BIOS-3, a closed ecosystem at the Institute of Biophysics in Krasnoyarsk, Siberia.

.
Bivouac is a type of camp or shelter. The term may refer to:Bivouac Peak, a mountain in the Teton Range, Grand Teton National Park, Wyoming, United States
A military camp
Bivouac shelter, an extremely lightweight alternative to traditional tent systems
Bivouac (ants), an ant nest constructed out of the living ant worker's own bodies
Bivouac (horse), an Australian thoroughbred racehorse.
Bluff or The Bluff may refer to:.
Rubus is a large and diverse genus of flowering plants in the rose family, Rosaceae, subfamily Rosoideae, most commonly known as brambles. Fruits of various species are known as raspberries, blackberries, dewberries, and bristleberries. It is a diverse genus, with the estimated number of Rubus species varying from 250 to over 1000, found across all continents except Antarctica.
A brigantine is a two-masted sailing vessel with a fully square-rigged foremast and at least two sails on the main mast: a square topsail and a gaff sail mainsail. The main mast is the second and taller of the two masts.
The basket-hilted sword is a sword type of the early modern era, originating in the mid-16th century, characterised by a basket-shaped guard that protects the hand. The basket hilt is a development of the quillons added to swords' crossguards since the Late Middle Ages.
This variety of sword is also sometimes referred to as the broadsword, though this term may also be applied loosely and imprecisely to other swords.
Brocade is a class of richly decorative shuttle-woven fabrics, often made in coloured silks and sometimes with gold and silver threads. The name comes from Italian broccato meaning 'embossed cloth', originally past participle of the verb broccare 'to stud, set with nails', from brocco, 'small nail', from Latin broccus, 'projecting, pointed'.
Bromine is a chemical element; it has symbol Br and atomic number 35. It is a volatile red-brown liquid at room temperature that evaporates readily to form a similarly coloured vapour. Its properties are intermediate between those of chlorine and iodine. Isolated independently by two chemists, Carl Jacob Löwig and Antoine Jérôme Balard, its name was derived from Ancient Greek  βρῶμος (bromos) 'stench', referring to its sharp and pungent smell.
A bungalow is a small house or cottage that is typically single- or one-and-a-half-storey. If a smaller upper storey exists, then it is frequently set in the roof and windows that come out from the roof. It may be surrounded by wide verandas.
A burrow is a hole or tunnel excavated into the ground by an animal to construct a space suitable for habitation or temporary refuge, or as a byproduct of locomotion. Burrows provide a form of shelter against predation and exposure to the elements, and can be found in nearly every biome and among various biological interaction types, including symbiosis and competition. Many animal species are known to form burrows. These species range from small amphipods, to very large vertebrate species such as the polar bear. Burrows can be constructed into a wide variety of substrates and can range in complexity from a simple tube a few centimeters long to a complex network of interconnecting tunnels and chambers hundreds or thousands of meters in total length; an example of the latter level of complexity, a well-developed burrow, would be a rabbit warren.

A cairn is a human-made pile of stones raised for a purpose, usually as a marker or as a burial mound. The word cairn comes from the Irish: carn.
Calabash, also known as bottle gourd, white-flowered gourd, long melon, birdhouse gourd, New Guinea bean, New Guinea butter bean, Tasmania bean, zucca melon and opo squash, is a vine which is grown for its fruit. It belongs to the family Cucurbitaceae, is native to tropical Africa, and cultivated across the tropics. It can be either harvested young to be consumed as a vegetable, or harvested mature to be dried and used as a kitchen utensil, beverage container or a musical instrument. When it is fresh, the fruit has a light green smooth skin and white flesh.
A caldera is a large cauldron-like hollow that forms shortly after the emptying of a magma chamber in a volcanic eruption. The ejection of large volumes of magma in a short time can upset the integrity of a magma chamber's structure by in effect removing much of the chamber's filling material. The walls and ceiling of a chamber may now not be able to support its own weight and any substrate or rock resting above. The ground surface then collapses into the emptied or partially emptied magma chamber, leaving a large depression at the surface that may have a diameter of dozens of kilometers. Although sometimes described as a crater, the feature is actually a type of sinkhole, as it is formed through subsidence and collapse rather than an explosion or impact. Compared to the thousands of volcanic eruptions that occur over the course of a century, the formation of a caldera is a rare event, occurring only a few times within a given window of 100 years. Only nine caldera-forming collapses are known to have occurred between 1911 and 2022, with the caldera collapses at Kīlauea, Hawaii, in 2018 and Hunga Tonga–Hunga Haʻapai in 2022 being the most recent. Volcanoes that have formed a caldera are sometimes described as "caldera volcanoes".
Camphor is a waxy, colorless solid with a strong aroma. It is classified as a terpenoid and a cyclic ketone. It is found in the wood of the camphor laurel, a large evergreen tree found in East Asia; and in the kapur tree, a tall timber tree from South East Asia. It also occurs in some other related trees in the laurel family, notably Ocotea usambarensis. Rosemary leaves contain 0.05 to 0.5% camphor, while camphorweed (Heterotheca) contains some 5%. A major source of camphor in Asia is camphor basil. Camphor can also be synthetically produced from oil of turpentine.
Canopy may refer to:.
A carillon ( KARR-ə-lon, kə-RIL-yən) is a pitched percussion instrument that is played with a keyboard and consists of at least 23 bells. The bells are cast in bronze, hung in fixed suspension, and tuned in chromatic order so that they can be sounded harmoniously together. They are struck with clappers connected to a keyboard of wooden batons played with the hands and pedals played with the feet. Often housed in bell towers, carillons are usually owned by churches, universities, or municipalities. They can include an automatic system through which the time is announced and simple tunes are played throughout the day.
Cartridge may refer to:.
A caryatid is a sculpted female figure serving as an architectural support taking the place of a column or a pillar supporting an entablature on her head. The Greek term karyatides literally means "maidens of Karyai", an ancient town on the Peloponnese. Karyai had a temple dedicated to the goddess Artemis in her aspect of Artemis Karyatis: "As Karyatis she rejoiced in the dances of the nut-tree village of Karyai, those Karyatides, who in their ecstatic round-dance carried on their heads baskets of live reeds, as if they were dancing plants".
Catacombs are man-made underground passages primarily used for religious purposes, particularly for burial. Any chamber used as a burial place is considered a catacomb, although the word is most commonly associated with the Roman Empire.
A censer, incense burner, perfume burner or pastille burner is a vessel made for burning incense or perfume in some solid form. They vary greatly in size, form, and material of construction, and have been in use since ancient times throughout the world. They may consist of simple earthenware bowls or fire pots to intricately carved silver or gold vessels, small table top objects a few centimetres tall to as many as several metres high. Many designs use openwork to allow a flow of air. In many cultures, burning incense has spiritual and religious connotations, and this influences the design and decoration of the censer.
In church architecture, the chancel is the space around the altar, including the choir and the sanctuary, at the liturgical east end of a traditional Christian church building. It may terminate in an apse.
A chaplain is a trained professional who provides spiritual, emotional, and psychosocial support in secular institutions, serving people of any faith or no faith. The term chaplaincy can refer to the chapel, facility or department in which one or more chaplains carry out their role, as well as to the profession itself. The name originates from Martin of Tours, who gave his "cappellanu" cloak to a veteran in need during a snowstorm.
In geology, a rift is a linear zone where the lithosphere is being pulled apart and is an example of extensional tectonics. Typical rift features are a central linear downfaulted depression, called a graben, or more commonly a half-graben with normal faulting and rift-flank uplifts mainly on one side. Where rifts remain above sea level they form a rift valley, which may be filled by water forming a rift lake. The axis of the rift area may contain volcanic rocks, and active volcanism is a part of many, but not all, active rift systems.
Chert is a hard, fine-grained sedimentary rock composed of microcrystalline or cryptocrystalline quartz, the mineral form of silicon dioxide (SiO2). Chert is characteristically of biological origin, but may also occur inorganically as a chemical precipitate or a diagenetic replacement, as in petrified wood. Where chert occurs in chalk or marl, it is usually called flint.
A or chiminea is a freestanding front-loading fireplace or oven with a bulbous body and usually a vertical smoke vent or chimney.
Chitons are marine molluscs of varying size in the class Polyplacophora, formerly known as Amphineura. About 940 extant and 430 fossil species are recognized.
A cistern is a waterproof receptacle for holding liquids, usually water. Cisterns are often built to catch and store rainwater. To prevent leakage, the interior of the cistern is often lined with hydraulic plaster.
The clavicle, collarbone, or keybone is a slender, S-shaped long bone approximately 15 centimetres (6 in) long that serves as a strut between the shoulder blade and the sternum (breastbone). There are two clavicles, one on each side of the body. The clavicle is the only long bone in the body that lies horizontally. Together with the shoulder blade, it makes up the shoulder girdle. It is a palpable bone and, in people who have less fat in this region, the location of the bone is clearly visible. It receives its name from Latin clavicula 'little key' because the bone rotates along its axis like a key when the shoulder is abducted. The clavicle is the most commonly fractured bone. It can easily be fractured by impacts to the shoulder from the force of falling on outstretched arms or by a direct hit.
Clergy are leaders within established religions. Their roles and functions vary in different religious traditions, but usually involve presiding over specific rituals and teaching their religion's doctrines and practices. Some of the terms used for individual clergy are clergyman, clergywoman, clergyperson, churchman, cleric, ecclesiastic, and vicegerent while clerk in holy orders has a long history but is rarely used.
A cloister is a covered walk, open gallery, or open arcade running along the walls of buildings and forming a quadrangle or garth. The attachment of a cloister to a cathedral or church, commonly against a warm southern flank, usually indicates that it is part of a monastic foundation, "forming a continuous and solid architectural barrier... that effectively separates the world of the monks from that of the serfs and workmen, whose lives and works went forward outside and around the cloister.".
Coagulant may refer to:Coagulant in coagulation of the blood
Coagulant in flocculation in colloidal chemistry
Coagulation .
The codex was the historical ancestor format of the modern book. Technically, the vast majority of modern books use the codex format, of a stack of pages bound at one edge. However, the term codex is now reserved for older manuscript books, which mostly used sheets of vellum, parchment, or papyrus, rather than paper.
In classical architecture, a colonnade is a long sequence of columns joined by their entablature, often free-standing, or part of a building. Paired or multiple pairs of columns are normally employed in a colonnade which can be straight or curved. The space enclosed may be covered or open. In St. Peter's Square in Rome, Bernini's great colonnade encloses a vast open elliptical space.
A concourse is a place where pathways or roads meet, such as in a hotel, a convention center, a railway station, an airport terminal, a hall, or other space.
Conifers are a group of vascular plants and a subset of gymnosperms. They are primarily perennial, woody trees and shrubs, mostly evergreen with a regular branching pattern, reproducing with male and female cones, usually on the same tree. They are wind-pollinated and the seeds are usually dispersed by the wind. Taxonomically, they make up the division Pinophyta, also known as Coniferae. All extant conifers, except for the gnetophytes, are perennial woody plants with secondary growth. There are over 600 living species.
A consulate is the office of a consul. A type of mission, it is usually subordinate to the state's main representation in the capital of that foreign country, usually an embassy. The term "consulate" may refer not only to the office of a consul, but also to the building occupied by the consul and the consul's staff. The consulate primarily serves its visiting nationals to the region in which it is based, and prospective visitors, commercial entities, or regional governments, who wish access or connections to the consulate's home country. There is usually also consular services in the capital too, and in those cases, the consulate may share premises with the embassy itself.
Coppicing is the traditional method in woodland management of cutting down a tree to a stump, which in many species encourages new shoots to grow from the stump or roots, thus ultimately regrowing the tree. A forest or grove that has been subject to coppicing is called a copse or coppice, in which young tree stems are repeatedly cut down to near ground level. The resulting living stumps are called stools. New growth emerges, and after a number of years, the coppiced trees are harvested, and the cycle begins anew. Pollarding is a similar process carried out at a higher level on the tree in order to prevent grazing animals from eating new shoots. Daisugi is a similar Japanese technique.
A coracle is a small, rounded, lightweight boat traditionally used in Wales, Ireland, particularly on the River Boyne, and Scotland, particularly on the River Spey. The word is also used for similar boats found in India, Vietnam, Iraq, and Tibet. The word coracle is an English spelling of the original Welsh cwrwgl, cognate with Irish and Scottish Gaelic currach, and is recorded in English text as early as the sixteenth century. Other historical English spellings include corougle, corracle, curricle and coricle.
A cordillera is a chain or network of mountain ranges, such as those in the west coast of the Americas. The term is borrowed from Spanish, where the word comes from cordilla, a diminutive of cuerda ('rope').
In classical antiquity, the cornucopia, also called the horn of plenty, is a symbol of abundance and nourishment, commonly a large horn-shaped container overflowing with produce, flowers, or nuts. In Greek, it was called the "horn of Amalthea", after Amalthea, a nurse of Zeus, who is often part of stories of the horn's origin.
A coven is a group or gathering of witches. The word "coven" remained largely unused in English until 1921 when Margaret Murray promoted the idea that all witches across Europe met in groups of thirteen which they called "covens".
A cowl is an item of clothing consisting of a long, hooded garment with wide sleeves, often worn by monks. It was developed during the Early Middle Ages. The term may have originally referred to the hooded portion of a cloak, though contemporary usage refers to an entire closed garment. A cowl is traditionally bestowed upon the monk at the time of making a solemn or lifetime profession. Today, it is worn primarily by most Catholic and Anglican monks when participating in liturgical services.
Crag may refer to:Crag (climbing), a cliff or group of cliffs, in any location, which is or may be suitable for climbing
Crag, a dice game played with three dice
Crag, Arizona, US
Crag, West Virginia, US
Crag and tail, a geological formation caused by the passage of a glacier over an area of hard rock
Crag Group, a geological group outcropping in East Anglia, UK
Coralline Crag Formation
Norwich Crag Formation
Red Crag Formation
Wroxham Crag Formation, see Cromer Forest Bed
Crag Hotel, Penang, Malaysia
Crag Jones, Welsh climber
USS Crag (AM-214), a 1943 US Navy Admirable-class minesweeper
The Crag, the final event in the Nickelodeon Guts action sports program
Club de Radioaficionados de Guatemala, an amateur radio organization in Guatemala
Constitutional Reform and Governance Act 2010, concerning United Kingdom constitutional law
CRAG stands for Corrective Retrieval Augmented Generation.
Crèche or creche may refer to:Nativity scene, a group of figures arranged to represent the birth of Jesus Christ
Child care center, an organization of adults who take care of children in place of their parents
Preschool or nursery school
Crèche (zoology), animals taking care of young that are not their own

.
A crescent shape is a symbol or emblem used to represent the lunar phase in the first quarter, or by extension a symbol representing the Moon itself.
A crucifix is a cross with an image of Jesus on it, as distinct from a bare cross. The representation of Jesus himself on the cross is referred to in English as the corpus. The crucifix emphasizes Jesus' sacrifice, including his death by crucifixion, which Christians believe brought about the redemption of mankind. Most crucifixes portray Jesus on a Latin cross, rather than a Tau cross or a Coptic cross.
A cuirass is a piece of armour that covers the torso, formed of one or more pieces of metal or other rigid material.
A culvert is a structure that channels water past an obstacle or to a subterranean waterway. Typically embedded so as to be surrounded by soil, a culvert may be made from a pipe, reinforced concrete or other material. In the United Kingdom, the word can also be used for a longer artificially buried watercourse.
In architecture, a cupola is a relatively small, usually dome-like structure on top of a building often crowning a larger roof or dome. Cupolas often serve as a roof lantern to admit light and air or as a lookout.
A cutlass is a short, broad sabre or slashing sword with a straight or slightly curved blade sharpened on the cutting edge and a hilt often featuring a solid cupped or basket-shaped guard. It was a former common naval weapon during the Age of Sail.
A cyclotron is a type of particle accelerator invented by Ernest Lawrence in 1929–1930 at the University of California, Berkeley, and patented in 1932. A cyclotron accelerates charged particles outwards from the center of a flat cylindrical vacuum chamber along a spiral path. The particles are held to a spiral trajectory by a static magnetic field and accelerated by a rapidly varying electric field. Lawrence was awarded the 1939 Nobel Prize in Physics for this invention.
A dais or daïs is a raised platform at the front of a room or hall, usually for one or more speakers or honored guests.
Dapple may refer to:Dapple, a book by Eleanor Arnason
DAPPLE Project, a pollution study
Dapple gray, a type of coat colour seen on horses
Silver dapple gene, also known as the "Z" gene, that dilutes the black base coat color in horses
Merle, a pattern called "dapple" in the Dachshund dog breed
"Dapple" is also a common English translation of the Spanish name of Sancho Panza's donkey in Don Quixote; however, the Spanish name "Rucio" is perhaps more accurately translated as "gray-beige" or "taupe".

.
In archaeology, debitage is all the material produced during the process of lithic reduction – the production of stone tools and weapons by knapping stone. This assemblage may include the different kinds of lithic flakes and lithic blades, but most often refers to the shatter and production debris, and production rejects.
A decanter is a vessel that is used to hold the decantation of a liquid which may contain sediment. Decanters, which have a varied shape and design, have been traditionally made from glass or crystal. Their volume is usually equivalent to one standard bottle of wine.
A demitasse, demi-tasse, or espresso cup is a small cup used to serve espresso. It may also refer to the coffee served in such a cup, though that usage had disappeared in France by the early 20th century.
Diorite is an intrusive igneous rock formed by the slow cooling underground of magma that has a moderate content of silica and a relatively low content of alkali metals. It is intermediate in composition between low-silica (mafic) gabbro and high-silica (felsic) granite.
A dirge is a somber song or lament expressing mourning or grief, such as may be appropriate for performance at a funeral. Often taking the form of a brief hymn, dirges are typically shorter and less meditative than elegies. Dirges are often slow and bear the character of funeral marches. Poetic dirges may be dedicated to a specific individual or otherwise thematically refer to death.
A dovecote or dovecot, doocot (Scots) or columbarium is a structure intended to house pigeons or doves. Dovecotes may be free-standing structures in a variety of shapes, or built into the end of a house or barn. They generally contain pigeonholes for the birds to nest. Pigeons and doves were an important food source historically in the Middle East and Europe and were kept for their eggs and dung.
Dromos may refer to:Cursus publicus, the public road system of the Roman and Byzantine empires
Dromos, in architecture, an entrance passage or avenue leading to a building
Dromoi, modes used in Greek music

.
An easel is an upright support used for displaying and/or fixing something resting upon it, at an angle of about 20° to the vertical. In particular, painters traditionally use an easel to support a painting while they work on it, normally standing up; easels are also sometimes used to display finished paintings and prints. Artists' easels are still typically made of wood, in functional designs that have changed little for centuries, or even millennia,
though new materials and designs exist. Easels are typically made from wood, aluminum or steel.
Echelon may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Eddyline".
Effluent is wastewater from sewers or industrial outfalls that flows directly into surface waters, either untreated or after being treated at a facility. The term has slightly different meanings in certain contexts, and may contain various pollutants depending on the source.
Egress may refer to:Ingress, egress, and regress, legal terms referring to an individual's right to travel or move
Egress, the passage of electromagnetic fields through the shield of a coaxial cable
Egress filtering, in computer networking, monitoring and/or restricting the flow of outbound information
Egress Software, a British provider of data security services
Interior and exterior egress, two of the four contacts observed during an astronomical transit.
Sambucus is a genus of between 20 and 30 species of flowering plants in the family Adoxaceae. The various species are commonly referred to as elder, with the flowers as elderflower, and the fruit as elderberry.
Embankment may refer to:.
Emissary may refer to:.
An emulsion is a mixture of two or more liquids that are normally immiscible owing to liquid-liquid phase separation. Emulsions are part of a more general class of two-phase systems of matter called colloids. Although the terms colloid and emulsion are sometimes used interchangeably, emulsion more narrowly refers to when both phases, dispersed and continuous, are liquids. In an emulsion, one liquid is dispersed in the other. Examples of emulsions include vinaigrettes, homogenized milk, liquid biomolecular condensates, and some cutting fluids for metal working.
Enamel may refer to:.
An enclave is a territory that is entirely surrounded by the territory of only one other state or entity. An enclave can be an independent territory or part of a larger one. Enclaves may also exist within territorial waters. Enclave is sometimes used improperly to denote a territory that is only partly surrounded by another state. Enclaves that are not part of a larger territory are not exclaves, for example Lesotho, San Marino and Vatican City are enclaved sovereign states.
The endosperm is a tissue produced inside the seeds of most of the flowering plants following double fertilization. It is triploid in most species, which may be auxin-driven. It surrounds the embryo and provides nutrition in the form of starch, though it can also contain oils and protein. This can make endosperm a source of nutrition in animal diet. For example, wheat endosperm is ground into flour for bread, while barley endosperm is the main source of sugars for beer production. Other examples of endosperm that forms the bulk of the edible portion are coconut "meat" and coconut "water", and corn. Some plants, such as certain orchids, lack endosperm in their seeds.
Engram may refer to:Engram (neuropsychology), a physical means by which memory traces are stored
Engram (Dianetics), a term used in Scientology and Dianetics for a "recording" of a past painful event not normally accessible to the conscious mind
Engram (album), a 2009 album by black metal band Beherit
Engram (film), a 2014 short film.
An entourage is an informal group or band of people who are closely associated with a (usually) famous, notorious, or otherwise notable individual. The word can also refer to:.
Epaulette is a type of ornamental shoulder piece or decoration used as insignia of rank by armed forces and other organizations. Flexible metal epaulettes are referred to as shoulder scales.
An epitaph is a short text honoring a deceased person. Strictly speaking, it refers to text that is inscribed on a tombstone or plaque, but it may also be used in a figurative sense. Some epitaphs are specified by the person themselves before their death, while others are chosen by those responsible for the burial. An epitaph may be written in prose or in verse.

An equerry is an officer of honour. Historically, it was a senior attendant with responsibilities for the horses of a person of rank. In contemporary use, it is a personal attendant, usually upon a sovereign, a member of a royal family, or a national representative. The role is equivalent to an aide-de-camp, but the term is prevalent only among some members of the Commonwealth of Nations.
Ermine may refer to three species of mustelid in the genus Mustela, or their fur:Stoat or Eurasian ermine, Mustela erminea, found throughout Eurasia and northern North America
American ermine, Mustela richardsonii, found throughout North America aside from most of Alaska and the Arctic
Haida ermine, Mustela haidarum, endemic to Haida Gwaii and the Alexander Archipelago on the Pacific Northwest coast of North America.
An escarpment is a steep slope or long cliff that forms as a result of faulting or erosion and separates two relatively level areas having different elevations.
An esplanade or promenade is a long, open, level area, usually next to a river or large body of water, where people may walk. The historical definition of esplanade was a large, open, level area outside fortress or city walls to provide clear fields of fire for the fortress's guns. In modern usage, the space allows the area to be paved as a pedestrian walk; esplanades are often on sea fronts and allow walking whatever the state of the tide, without having to walk on the beach.

Abolition refers to the act of putting an end to something by law, and may refer to:Abolitionism, abolition of slavery
Abolition of the death penalty, also called capital punishment
Abolition of monarchy
Abolition of nuclear weapons
Abolition of prisons
Abolition of ICE
Police abolition movement
Abolition of suffering
Abolitionism, related to veganism
Abolition of time zones
Abolition of borders.
Abstract may refer to:"Abstract", a 2017 episode of the animated television series Adventure Time
Abstract (album), 1962 album by Joe Harriott
Abstract algebra, sets with specific operations acting on their elements
Abstract of title, a summary of the documents affecting the title to a parcel of land
Abstract (law), a summary of a legal document
Abstract (summary), in academic publishing
Abstract art, artistic works that do not attempt to represent reality or concrete subjects
Abstract: The Art of Design, 2017 Netflix documentary series
Abstract music, music that is non-representational
Abstract object in philosophy
Abstract structure in mathematics
Abstract type in computer science
The property of an abstraction
Q-Tip (musician), also known as "The Abstract"
Abstract and concrete
Hydrogen atom abstraction, in chemistry.
Absolution is a theological term for the forgiveness imparted by ordained Christian priests and experienced by Christian penitents. It is a universal feature of the historic churches of Christendom, although the theology and the practice of absolution vary between Christian denominations.
Accord may refer to:.
Acrimony may refer to:a feeling of hatred
Acrimony (band), a rock band
Acrimony (film), a 2018 film.
An adversary is generally considered to be a person, group, or force that opposes and/or attacks.
An advocate is a professional in the field of law. Different countries and legal systems use the term with somewhat differing meanings. The broad equivalent in many English law–based jurisdictions could be a barrister or a solicitor. However, in Scottish, Manx, South African, Italian, French, Spanish, Portuguese, Scandinavian, Polish, Israeli, South Asian and South American jurisdictions, "advocate" indicates a lawyer of superior classification.
Aesthetics is the branch of philosophy that studies beauty, taste, and related phenomena. In a broad sense, it includes the philosophy of art, which examines the nature of art, artistic creativity, the meanings of artworks, and audience appreciation.
Wealth is the abundance of valuable financial assets or physical possessions which can be converted into a form that can be used for transactions. This includes the core meaning as held in the originating Old English word weal, which is from an Indo-European word stem. The modern concept of wealth is of significance in all areas of economics, and clearly so for growth economics and development economics, yet the meaning of wealth is context-dependent. A person possessing a substantial net worth is known as wealthy. Net worth is defined as the current value of one's assets less liabilities.
Ambiguity is a state in which the meaning of a phrase, statement, situation, or resolution is not explicitly defined, making for several plausible interpretations. It arises when available information lacks sufficient context or a shared frame, so people cannot reliably determine what the problem is, what matters, what causes what, or what solution would count as correct. As a result, interpretation depends heavily on prior experience, assumptions, and imagination.
Ambivalent may refer to:Ambivalence, a state of conflicting beliefs or feelings
"Ambivalent" (song), a 2018 song by Keyakizaka46
Ambivalent, a 2007 album by Tomoyasu Hotei

.
Analogy is a comparison or correspondence between two things because of a third element that they are considered to share.
Anomaly, The Anomaly or Anomalies may refer to:.
An antagonist is a character in a story who is presented as the main enemy or rival of the protagonist and is often depicted as a villain.
Apathy, also referred to as indifference, is a lack of feeling, emotion, interest, and/or concern about something. It is a state of indifference, and/or the suppression of emotions such as concern, excitement, motivation, or passion. An apathetic individual has an absence of interest in or concern about emotional, social, spiritual, philosophical, virtual, or physical life and the world. Apathy can also be defined as a person's lack of goal orientation. Apathy falls in the less extreme spectrum of diminished motivation, with abulia in the middle and akinetic mutism being more extreme than both apathy and abulia.
Apex may refer to:.
Arbitrariness is the quality of being "determined by chance, whim, or impulse, and not by necessity, reason, or principle". It is also used to refer to a choice made without any specific criterion or restraint.
Archaic may refer to:Archaic Period, archaeological term used to refer to a very early period differing by location
Archaic humans, people before homo sapiens
Archaic (comics), a comic-book series created by writer James Abrams and artist Brett Marting
Archaism, an archaic word or style of speech or writing.
Articulate may refer to:Articulate!, a board game in which players describe words from different categories
Articulate brachiopods, brachiopods with toothed hinges and simple opening and closing muscles
Articulate sound, to move the tongue, lips, or other speech organs in order to make speech sounds
Articulated vehicle, a vehicle which has a pivoting joint in its construction
Articulate , a public television series about creative artists.
Assertion or assert may refer to:.
Assimilate is a 2019 American science fiction horror film directed by John Murlowski and starring Joel Courtney, Andi Matichak, and Calum Worthy also with Mason McNulty and Cam Gigandet.
Astute may refer to:HMS Astute (P447), launched 1945, Amphion-class submarine, scrapped 1970
HMS Astute (S119), launched 2007, nuclear-powered attack submarine
Astute-class submarine, a class of which HMS Astute (S119) is the lead ship
USS Astute (AM-148), US Navy minesweeper
Operation Astute, an Australian military operation in response to the 2006 East Timor crisis.
An axiom, postulate, or assumption is a statement that is taken to be true, to serve as a premise or starting point for further reasoning and arguments. The word comes from the Ancient Greek word ἀξίωμα (axíōma), meaning 'that which is thought worthy or fit' or 'that which commends itself as evident'.
Banal may refer to:Of or pertaining to the ban (medieval) or banalitéBanal nationalism.
Benevolence or Benevolent may refer to:Benevolent (band)
Benevolence (phrenology), a faculty in the discredited theory of phrenology
"Benevolent" (song), a song by Tory Lanez
Benevolence (tax), a forced loan imposed by English kings from the 14th to 17th centuries
USS Benevolence (AH-13), a Haven-class hospital ship
Benevolence, Georgia, a community in the United States.
Bias is a disproportionate weight in favor of or against an idea or thing, usually in a way that is inaccurate, closed-minded, prejudicial, or unfair. Biases can be innate or learned. People may develop biases for or against an individual, a group, or a belief. In science and engineering, a bias is a systematic error. Statistical bias results from an unfair sampling of a population, or from an estimation process that does not give accurate results on average.
A bolster is a long narrow pillow or cushion filled with cotton, down or fibre. Bolsters are usually firm for back or arm support or for decorative application. They are not a standard size or shape and commonly have a zipper or hook-and-loop enclosure. A foam insert is sometimes used for additional support. A bolster is also referred to as a cushion, a pillow and a prop. A bolster pillow is a common shape for lace pillows.
Brevity is concision or brevitas, the quality of being brief or concise, or:Brevity , a comic strip created by Guy Endore-Kaiser and Rodd Perry
Brevity code, a vocal word replacement system
Operation Brevity, a World War II battle

.
Candid may refer to:Candid (app), a mobile app for anonymous discussions
Candid (organization), providing information on US nonprofit companies
Candid Records, a record label
Candid photography
Impartiality
Honesty.
Capricious may refer to:Capricieuse, also spelled Capricious, a solitaire card game
Capricious (cheese), an aged goat's milk cheese.
Catalysis is the increase in rate of a chemical reaction due to an added substance known as a catalyst. Catalysts are not consumed by the reaction and remain unchanged after the reaction. If the reaction is rapid and the catalyst is recycled quickly, a very small amount of catalyst often suffices; mixing, surface area, and temperature are important factors in reaction rate. Catalysts generally react with one or more reactants to form intermediates that subsequently give the final reaction product, in the process of regenerating the catalyst.

A censure is an expression of strong disapproval or harsh criticism. In parliamentary procedure, it is a debatable main motion that could be adopted by a majority vote. Among the forms that it can take are a stern rebuke by a legislature, a spiritual penalty imposed by a church, or a negative judgment pronounced on a theological proposition. It is usually non-binding, unlike a motion of no confidence.
Cerebral may refer to:Of or relating to the brain
Cerebral (company), an American telehealth company that provides online mental health services
Cerebrum, the largest and uppermost part of the brain
Cerebral cortex, the outer layer of the cerebrum
Retroflex consonant, also referred to as a cerebral consonant, a type of consonant sound used in some languages
Intellectual, rather than emotional.
Chronic may refer to:Chronic condition, a condition or disease that is persistent or otherwise long-lasting in its effects
Chronic toxicity, a substance with toxic effects after continuous or repeated exposure
Chronic (film), a 2015 American film
The Chronic, a 1992 album by Dr. Dre
The Chronic 2001, a.k.a. The Chronic 2, The Chronic II, and 2001, a 1999 album by Dr. Dre
Chronic (cannabis), a slang name for high quality marijuana.
Coercion involves compelling a party to act in an involuntary manner through the use of threats, including threats to use force against that party. It involves a set of forceful actions which violate the free will of an individual in order to induce a desired response. These actions may include extortion, blackmail, or even torture and sexual assault. Common-law systems codify the act of violating a law while under coercion as a duress crime.
Cohesion may refer to:Cohesion (chemistry), the intermolecular attraction between like-molecules
Cohesion, a measure of how well the lines of source code within a module work together
Cohesion (geology), the part of shear strength that is independent of the normal effective stress in mass movements
Cohesion (linguistics), the linguistic elements that make a discourse semantically coherent
Cohesion, the bonds between members of a community or society and life
Cohesion (album), the fourth studio album by Australian band Gyroscope.
Colloquialism is the linguistic style used for casual (informal) communication. It is the most common functional style of speech, the language normally employed in casual conversation and other informal contexts. Colloquialism is characterized by the frequent use of expressive phrases, idioms, anthropocentrism, and a lack of specialized focus, and has a rapidly changing lexicon. It can also be distinguished by its usage of formulations with incomplete logical and syntactic ordering.
Could not find summary for "Complacent".
Concession may refer to:.


In common usage and linguistics, concision is a communication principle of eliminating redundancy, generally achieved by using as few words as possible in a sentence while preserving its meaning. More generally, it is achieved through the omission of parts that impart information that was already given, that is obvious or that is irrelevant. Outside of linguistics, a message may be similarly "dense" in other forms of communication.
Could not find summary for "Conducive".
In mathematics, a conjecture is a proposition that is proffered on a tentative basis without proof. Some conjectures, such as the Riemann hypothesis or Fermat's conjecture, have shaped much of mathematical history as new areas of mathematics are developed in order to prove them.
A connotation is a commonly understood cultural or emotional association that any given word or phrase carries, in addition to its explicit or literal meaning, which is its denotation.
Consensus usually refers to general agreement among a group of people or community. It may also refer to:.
No summary available.
Contingency or Contingent may refer to:Contingency (philosophy), in philosophy and logic
Contingency plan, in planning
Contingency, in electrical grid engineering
Contingency table, in statistics
Contingency theory, in organizational theory
Contingency
Contingency management, in medicine
Contingent claim, in finance
Contingent fee, in commercial matters
Contingent liability, in law
Contingent vote, in politics
Contingent work, an employment relationship
Cost contingency, in business risk management
"Contingency" , a television series episode
Military contingent, a group within an army
"Contingency Song", a song by Jane Remover.
Convolute may refer to:Convolute (botany)
Convolute (manuscript), a volume containing several manuscripts
Convolute (segment), along with gores, material segments used in pressure suit joints to allow for increased mobility
Convolute laminations in geology
Distal convoluted tubule.
Credibility comprises the objective and subjective components of the believability of a source or message. Credibility is deemed essential in many fields to establish expertise. It plays a crucial role in journalism, teaching, science, medicine, business leadership, and social media.
Criterion may refer to:.
In observational astronomy, culmination is the passage of a celestial object across the observer's local meridian. These events are also known as meridian transits, used in timekeeping and navigation, and measured precisely using a transit telescope.
Cynicism is an attitude characterized by a general distrust of the motives of others. A cynic may have a general lack of faith or hope in people motivated by ambition, desire, greed, gratification, materialism, goals, and opinions that a cynic perceives as vain, unobtainable, or ultimately meaningless. The term originally derives from the ancient Greek philosophers, the Cynics, who rejected conventional goals of wealth, power, fame, and honor. They practiced shameless nonconformity with social norms in religion, morality, law, manners, housing, dress, or decency, instead advocating the pursuit of virtue in accordance with a simple and natural way of life.
Debacle may refer to:an event that turns out to be a disaster
Debacle: The First Decade, an album by the Violent Femmes
La Débâcle, a novel by Émile Zola
Debacle, a 2009 Nike SB skateboarding video

.
Debate is a process that involves formal discourse, discussion, and oral addresses on a particular collection of topics, often with a moderator and an audience. In a debate, arguments are put forward for opposing viewpoints. Historically, debates have occurred in public meetings, academic institutions, debate halls, coffeehouses, competitions, and legislative assemblies. Debates have also been conducted for educational and recreational purposes, usually associated with educational establishments and debating societies. These debates emphasize logical consistency, factual accuracy, and emotional appeal to an audience. Modern competitive debate also includes rules for participants to discuss and decide upon the framework of the debate.
A debunker is a person or organization that exposes or discredits claims believed to be false, exaggerated, or pretentious. The term is often associated with skeptical investigation of controversial topics such as UFOs, claimed paranormal phenomena, cryptids, conspiracy theories, alternative medicine, religion, and exploratory or fringe areas of scientific or pseudoscientific research. According to the Merriam-Webster online dictionary, to "debunk" is defined as: "to expose the sham or falseness of." The New Oxford American Dictionary defines "debunk" as "expose the falseness or hollowness of ". If debunkers are not careful, their communications may backfire – increasing an audience's long-term belief in myths. Backfire effects can occur if a message spends too much time on the negative case, if it is too complex, or if the message is threatening.
A decree is a legal proclamation, usually issued by a head of state, judge, royal figure, or other relevant authorities, according to certain procedures. These procedures are usually defined by the constitution, Legislative laws, or customary laws of a government.
Deduction may refer to:.
A deficit is the amount by which a sum falls short of some reference amount.
Deference is the condition of submitting to the espoused, legitimate influence of one's superior or superiors. Deference implies a yielding or submitting to the judgment of a recognized superior, out of respect or reverence. Deference has been studied extensively by political scientists, sociologists, and psychologists.
Could not find summary for "Delineate".
Demise is an Anglo-Norman legal term for the transfer of an estate, especially by lease. It has an operative effect in a lease, implying a covenant "for quiet enjoyment".
In philosophy and linguistics, the denotation of a word or expression is its strictly literal meaning. For instance, the English word "warm" denotes the property of having high temperature. Denotation is contrasted with other aspects of meaning, in particular connotation. For instance, the word "warm" may evoke calmness, coziness, or kindness but these associations are not part of the word's denotation. Similarly, an expression's denotation is separate from pragmatic inferences it may trigger. For instance, describing something as "warm" often implicates that it is not hot, but this is once again not part of the word's denotation.
Derive may refer to:Derive, a commercial system made by Texas Instruments
Dérive (magazine), an Austrian science magazine on urbanism
Dérive, a psychogeographical concept
Derived trait, or apomorphy.
Desolation or Desolate may refer to:Loneliness, an unpleasant emotional response to perceived isolation.
detriment may refer to:detriment (astrology)
detriment (law), an element the benefit-detriment theory of consideration in design without converting

.
Deviation may refer to:.
A dichotomy is a partition of a whole into two parts (subsets). In other words, this couple of parts must bejointly exhaustive: everything must belong to one part or the other, and
mutually exclusive: nothing can belong simultaneously to both parts.
Diligence—carefulness and persistent effort or work—is listed as one of the seven capital virtues. It can be indicative of a work ethic, the belief that work is good in itself."There is a perennial nobleness, and even sacredness, in work. Were he never so benighted, forgetful of his high calling, there is always hope in a man that actually and earnestly works: in idleness alone there is perpetual despair." —Thomas Carlyle.
Could not find summary for "Diminish".
Could not find summary for "Discern".
Discreet may refer to:Discreet Logic, a subsidiary of Autodesk Media and Entertainment
DiscReet Records
Discreet (film), a 2017 film

.
Discrepancy may refer to:.
In colloquial usage, contempt usually refers to either the act of despising, or having a general lack of respect for something. This set of emotions generally produces maladaptive behaviour. Other authors define contempt as a negative emotion rather than the constellation of mentality and feelings that produce an attitude. Paul Ekman categorises contempt as the seventh basic emotion, along with anger, disgust, fear, happiness, sadness and surprise. Robert C. Solomon places contempt on the same emotional continuum as resentment and anger, and he argues that the differences between the three are that resentment is anger directed towards a higher-status individual; anger is directed towards an equal-status individual; and contempt is anger directed towards a lower-status individual.
Disparagement, in United States trademark law, was a statutory cause of action which permitted a party to petition the Trademark Trial and Appeal Board (TTAB) of the Patent and Trademark Office (PTO) to cancel a trademark registration that "may disparage or falsely suggest a connection with persons, living or dead, institutions, beliefs, or national symbols, or bring them into contempt or disrepute". In 2017, the Supreme Court struck down the disparagement provision as unconstitutional in Matal v. Tam.
Disparity and disparities may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Dispel".
To disseminate, in the field of communication, is to broadcast a message to the public without direct feedback from the audience.
Dissent is an opinion, philosophy or sentiment of non-agreement or opposition to a prevailing idea or policy enforced under the authority of a government, political party or other entity or individual. A dissenting person may be referred to as a dissenter.
Divergence is a mathematical function that associates a scalar with every point of a vector field.
Diversity, diversify, or diverse may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Divulge".
Docile was a female Briard dog. Owned by football manager Egil Olsen, the dog became a national celebrity animal during Olsen's tenure as manager of the Norway national football team.
Doubt is a mental state in which the mind remains suspended between two or more contradictory propositions, and is uncertain about them. Doubt on an emotional level is indecision between belief and disbelief. It may involve uncertainty, distrust or lack of conviction on certain facts, actions, motives, or decisions. Doubt can result in delaying or rejecting relevant action out of concern for mistakes or missed opportunities.
Eccentricity or eccentric may refer to:Eccentricity (behavior), odd behavior on the part of a person, as opposed to being "normal".
Eclectic  may refer to:.
Eloquence is fluent, forcible, elegant or persuasive speaking.
"Elusive" was the first single for British singer-songwriter Scott Matthews and was released on 18 September 2006. The single received much airplay from BBC Radio DJs Jo Whiley, Dermot O'Leary and Zane Lowe between 7 and 10 August. Lowe also played "Elusive" once each night as his chosen Single of the Week. Matthews also visited the station to perform "Elusive" and other songs from the album in May and August 2006. In May 2007, he won the Ivor Novello Award for "Best Song Musically and Lyrically" which saw "Elusive" beat strong competition from the likes of the Arctic Monkeys.
Emulate, Inc. (Emulate) is a biotechnology company that commercialized Organs-on-Chips technology—a human cell-based technology that recreates organ-level function to model organs in healthy and diseased states. The technology has applications in pharmaceutical research, product development, testing how different medicines, chemicals, and foods affect human health. Emulate has also worked with Cedars-Sinai Medical Center on a precision medicine initiative that uses Organs-on-Chips technology in the clinical setting. This initiative is designed to provide clinicians with better data about how an individual patient may respond to treatment. The company also signed a Cooperative Research and Development Agreement (CRADA) with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to advance and qualify its Human Emulation System to meet regulatory evaluation for product testing.
Enigma may refer to:Riddle, someone or something that is mysterious or puzzling.
Fee tail or entail is a legal concept and set of associated rules restricting the manner in which real property passes from one generation to the next; these rules tend to keep deceased estates together as a whole, and in the hands of a single owner (heir), rather than allowing them to be split up amongst multiple children. Entail has been known in English law since feudal times, and it has evolved as the law has evolved. It is concerned with heirship, ensuring the male line and preserving intergenerationally its power and ownership of property. As Lawrence Stone has argued, a key element is psychological: a strong attachment by those involved to the principle of preferential male primogeniture.
Enumerate could refer to:Enumeration, a mathematical, theoretical concept of an exhaustive listing of compatible items
Enumerate (project), a collaborative research project about digitization of cultural heritage
Enumerated type in computer programming

.
Ephemerality is the concept of things being transitory, existing only briefly. Academically, the term ephemeral constitutionally describes a diverse assortment of things and experiences, from digital media to types of ponds and streams. "There is no single definition of ephemerality". With respect to unique performances, for example, it has been noted that "[e]phemerality is a quality caused by the ebb and flow of the crowd's concentration on the performance and a reflection of the nostalgic character of specific performances". Because different people may value the passage of time differently, ephemerality may be a relative, perceptual concept: "In brief, what is short-lived may not be the object itself, but the attention we afford it".
No summary available.
Erratic may refer to:Erratic, a project of music artist Jan Robbe
Glacial erratic, a piece of rock that differs from the size and type of rock native to the area in which it rests
Erratic ant, a species of ant

.
Western esotericism, also known as the Western mystery tradition, is a wide range of loosely related ideas and movements that developed within Western society. These ideas and currents are united in their distinctness both from orthodox Abrahamic religion and Age of Enlightenment rationalism. It has influenced, or contributed to, various forms of Western philosophy, mysticism, religion, science, pseudoscience, art, literature, and music.
A euphemism is the substitution of a potentially offensive or unpleasant word or expression with one that is more pleasant or inoffensive. Some euphemisms are humorous, while others use mild or neutral language to downplay certain concepts. They can often be used to soften profanity or discuss sensitive or taboo topics, such as disability, sex, bodily functions, pain, violence, illness, or death, in a more polite manner.
In medicine, an exacerbation is the worsening of a disease or an increase in its symptoms. Examples includes an acute exacerbation of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease and acute exacerbation of congestive heart failure.
In the philosophy of language, exemplification is a mode of symbolization characterized by the relation between a sample and what it refers to.
Could not find summary for "Exert".
Exoneration occurs when the conviction for a crime is reversed, either through demonstration of innocence, a flaw in the conviction, or otherwise. Attempts to exonerate individuals are particularly controversial in death penalty cases, especially where new evidence is put forth after the execution has taken place. The transitive verb, "to exonerate" can also mean to informally absolve one from blame.
Explicit refers to something that is specific, clear, or detailed. It can also mean:Explicit knowledge, knowledge that can be readily articulated, codified and transmitted to others
Explicit (text), the final words of a text; contrast with incipit.
A façade or facade is the front part or exterior of a building. It is a loanword from the French façade, which means "frontage" or "face".
Feasibility may refer to:Feasibility study, a preliminary study to determine a project's viability
"Feasibility Study" , an episode of The Outer Limits TV show
Feasible region, a region that satisfies mathematical constraints
Logical possibility, an achievable thing.
Fervent Records is a contemporary Christian music record label based in Nashville, Tennessee. Fervent was bought by Word Records in 2005.
Fickle may refer to:Fickle, Indiana
The Fickle, a 1934 Iranian romance-drama film.
Could not find summary for "Formulate".
Fortify is a verb, meaning to build a fortification.
Futility or Futile may refer to:Futility, or the Wreck of the Titan, an 1898 novel
"Futility" (poem), 1918 poem by Wilfred Owen
Futile (EP), a 2003 EP album by Porcupine Tree
Futility (album), a 2004 album of the industrial death metal band DÅÅTH
Futility, a 1922 novel by William Gerhardie

.
Galvanization is the process of applying a protective zinc coating to steel or iron, to prevent rusting. The most common method is hot-dip galvanizing, in which the parts are coated by submerging them in a bath of hot, molten zinc.
No summary available.
Could not find summary for "Gravitate".
Hinder is an American rock band from Oklahoma City, Oklahoma, formed in 2001 by former lead singer Austin John Winkler, guitarist Joe "Blower" Garvey, drummer Cody Hanson, with bass player Cole Parker being recruited in 2002 during the recording of their debut EP Far from Close. Upon Parker's exit from the group in 2003, Hinder recruited bassist Mike Rodden and former guitarist Mark King to join the band in 2004. The band released four studio albums with Winkler; Extreme Behavior (2005), Take It to the Limit (2008), All American Nightmare (2010) and Welcome to the Freakshow (2012). Cody Hanson, along with former lead singer Austin Winkler, wrote the majority of the band's music on their first four albums. After Winkler left the band in 2013, they looked for a new lead vocalist, and added Marshal Dutton. They have since released When the Smoke Clears (2015) and The Reign (2017) with their new vocalist. The band was inducted into the Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame in 2007.
A hypothesis is a proposed explanation for a phenomenon. A scientific hypothesis must be based on observations and make a testable and reproducible prediction about reality, in a process beginning with an educated guess or thought.
If a hypothesis is repeatedly independently demonstrated by experiment to be true, it becomes a scientific theory. In colloquial usage, the words hypothesis and theory are often used interchangeably, but this is incorrect in the context of science.
Imminence or Imminent may refer to:Imminent lawless action, a standard currently used that was established by the United States Supreme Court in the case Brandenburg v. Ohio
Imminent threat, justification for the use of force in international law
Imminence (band), a Swedish metalcore band
Imminent, a Belgian electronic noise music project including Szkieve.
Impartiality is a principle of justice holding that decisions should be based on objective criteria, rather than on the basis of bias, prejudice, or preferring the benefit to one person over another for improper reasons.
Implicit may refer to:.
Incentives are anything that persuade a person or organization to alter their behavior to produce a desired outcome. Incentives are widely studied in personnel economics, where researchers and human resource managers examine how firms use pay, career opportunities, performance evaluation, and other mechanisms to motivate employees and improve organizational outcomes. Higher incentives are often associated with greater levels of effort and higher levels of performance. In comparison, disincentives discourage certain actions.
Could not find summary for "Incessant".
Incite may refer to:INCITE, formerly styled inCite, members' news magazine of the Australian Library and Information Association
Incite (band), American metal band
Incitement, a former offence under England and Wales law
Incite Pictures, a documentary film production company
Incite Productions, a documentary film production company.
Orbital inclination measures the tilt of an object's orbit around a celestial body. It is expressed as the angle between a reference plane and the orbital plane or axis of direction of the orbiting object.
Indifference may refer to:Apathy, a psychological attitude
A concept of beneficial detachment in Ignatian spirituality
Indifference (album), 1985 album by the Proletariat, or the title song
"Indifference" , 1990 episode of the television series Law & Order
"Indifference" , 2013 episode of the television series The Walking Dead
Indifference curve, in microeconomic theory, a graph describing consumer preferences
Principle of indifference, in probability theory, a rule for assigning epistemic probabilities
A song on the band Pearl Jam's second album Vs.
In Catholicism, indifferentism, the belief which holds that no religion is superior to another
Indifferent, a promotional single from Megan Moroney's album Am I Okay?.
Induce may refer to:Induced consumption
Induced innovation
Induced character
Induced coma
Induced menopause
Induced metric
Induced path
Induced topology
Induce (musician), American musician
Labor induction, stimulation of childbirth.
Inevitable may refer to:The Inevitable (album), a 1995 album by Squirrel Nut Zippers
Inevitable (album), a 2013 album by Samo
Inevitable , 2011
Inevitable , 2024
Inevitable , 1993
"Inevitable", 2010
"Inevitable", 1999
"Inevitable", a song by Anberlin on their 2007 album Cities
"Inevitable", a song by Lauren Daigle on her 2018 album Look Up Child
"Inevitable", a song by Mushroomhead on their 1999 album M3
"Inevitable", a song by Poo Bear on his 2018 album Poo Bear Presents Bearthday Music
"Inevitable", a song by Scissor Sisters on their 2012 album Magic Hour
Inevitable (book), a 1900 novel by Dutch author Louis Couperus
The Inevitable, a 2016 nonfiction book about technology trends by US author Kevin Kelly
Inevitable , a magical construct in the Dungeons & Dragons role-playing game
Al-Waqi'a, "Inevitable", 56th Surah (Chapter) of the Quran

.
Inferences are steps in logical reasoning, moving from premises to logical consequences; etymologically, the word infer means to "carry forward". Inference is theoretically traditionally divided into deduction and induction, a distinction that dates at least to Aristotle. Deduction is inference deriving logical conclusions from premises known or assumed to be true, with the laws of valid inference being studied in logic. Induction is inference from particular evidence to a universal conclusion. A third type of inference is sometimes distinguished, notably by Charles Sanders Peirce, contradistinguishing abduction from induction.
Inhibitor or inhibition may refer to:.
No summary available.
Innovation is the practical implementation of ideas that result in the introduction of new goods or services or improvement in offering goods or services. ISO TC 279 in the standard ISO 56000:2020 defines innovation as "a new or changed entity, realizing or redistributing value". Others have different definitions; a common element in the definitions is a focus on newness, improvement, and spread of ideas or technologies.
An innuendo is a hint, insinuation or intimation about a person or thing, especially of a denigrating or derogatory nature. It can also be a remark or question, typically disparaging, that works obliquely by allusion. In the latter sense, the intention is often to insult or accuse someone in such a way that one's words, taken literally, are innocent.
Integration may refer to:.
Intervention, Interventions, The Intervention, or An Intervention may refer to:.
Intuition is the ability to acquire knowledge without recourse to conscious reasoning or needing an explanation. Different fields use the word "intuition" in very different ways, including but not limited to: direct access to unconscious knowledge; unconscious cognition; gut feelings; inner sensing; inner insight to unconscious pattern-recognition; and the ability to understand something instinctively, without any need for conscious reasoning. Intuitive knowledge tends to be approximate or heuristic.
Irony is a juxtaposition of what, on the surface, appears to be the case with what is actually or expected to be the case. Originally a rhetorical device and literary technique, irony has also come to assume a metaphysical significance with implications for one's attitude towards life.
Juxtaposition is an act or instance of placing two opposing elements close together or side by side. This is often done in order to compare/contrast the two, to show similarities or differences, etc.
A lament or lamentation is a passionate expression of grief, often in music, poetry, or song form. The grief is most often born of regret, or mourning. Laments can also be expressed in a verbal manner in which participants lament about something that they regret or someone that they have lost, and they are usually accompanied by wailing, moaning and/or crying. Laments constitute some of the oldest forms of writing, and examples exist across human cultures.
Latency or latent may refer to:.
Lucre usually refers to one of many slang terms for money. It may also refer to:Lucre, a hill in the novel The Pilgrim's Progress by John Bunyan
Lucre (EP), by Dean Blunt, Elias Rønnenfelt, and Vegyn (2025)
Lucre District, Quispicanchi, a district in Peru
Lucre Island, a fictional island in the Monkey Island video-game series.
Ductility is the ability of a material to sustain significant plastic deformation before fracture when undergoing tension, i.e. when the relevant elastic modulus is Young's; the equivalent for deforming under bulk compression, i.e. when using the bulk modulus, is malleability. Historically, materials were considered malleable if they were amenable to forming by hammering or rolling. Lead is an example of a material which is substantially more malleable than ductile. Plastic deformation is the permanent distortion of a material under applied stress, as opposed to elastic deformation, which is reversible upon removing the stress. Ductility is a critical mechanical performance indicator, particularly in applications that require materials to bend, stretch, or deform in other ways without breaking. The extent of ductility can be quantitatively assessed using the percent elongation at break, given by the equation:.
Mediocre or mediocrity may refer to:Mediocre (album), a 2008 album by Ximena Sariñana
"Mediocre" (composition), a 1955 jazz composition by Bud Powell
Mediocrity, a 2011 Subaru advertising campaign.
No summary available.
A militant is a person engaged in warfare or combat. The word is often used as a euphemism for someone who is an entrenched or aggressive adherent to a particular cause, often an ideological faction. The term is most commonly used by mass media to maintain a neutral tone and not appear biased to one side, which has led to criticism.
Mitigation is the reduction of something harmful that has occurred or the reduction of its harmful effects. It may refer to measures taken to reduce the harmful effects of hazards that remain in potentia, or to manage harmful incidents that have already occurred. It is a stage or component of emergency management and of risk management. The theory of mitigation is a frequently used element in criminal law and is often used by a judge to try cases such as murder, where a perpetrator is subject to varying degrees of responsibility as a result of one's actions.
Morale is the capacity of a group's members to maintain belief in an institution or goal, particularly in the face of opposition or hardship. Morale is often referenced by authority figures as a generic value judgment of the willpower, obedience, and self-discipline of a group tasked with performing duties assigned by a superior. According to Alexander H. Leighton, "morale is the capacity of a group of people to pull together persistently and consistently in pursuit of a common purpose". With good morale, a force will be less likely to give up or surrender. Deliberately attempting to reduce another group's morale is called demoralization. Morale is usually assessed at a collective, rather than an individual level. In wartime, civilian morale is also important.
Negligence is a failure to exercise appropriate care expected to be exercised in similar circumstances.
Notion or Notions may refer to:.
Oblivious may refer to:Obliviousness, a mental state
Oblivious , a hidden camera comedy game show, 2001–2003
Oblivious
Oblivious (film), a 2001 short film directed by Ozgur Uyanik
"Oblivious", 1983
"Oblivious", 2008
Re/oblivious, a 2008 remix mini-album by Kalafina.
Obscure may refer to:Heraclitus of Ephesus was called "The Obscure"
Obscure , a 2004 survival horror game
Obscure (band), a Bangladeshi pop rock band
Obscure Records, a 1975–1978 UK label founded by Brian Eno
"Obscure", a song by Dir en grey from Vulgar.
Obsolescence is the process of becoming antiquated, out of date, old-fashioned, no longer in general use, no longer useful, or superseded by innovation, or the condition of being in such a state. When used in a biological sense, it means imperfect or rudimentary when compared with the corresponding part of other organisms. The international standard IEC 62402:2019 Obsolescence Management defines obsolescence as the "transition from available to unavailable from the manufacturer in accordance with the original specification".
Omission may refer to:Sin of omission, a sin committed by willingly not performing a certain action
Omission (law), a failure to act, with legal consequences
Omission bias, a tendency to favor inaction over action
Purposeful omission, a literary method
Theory of omission, a writing technique
The Omission, a 2018 Argentine film
Selective omission, an effort to forget traumatic memories
Lying by omission

.
Opacity is the measure of impenetrability to electromagnetic or other kinds of radiation, especially visible light. In radiative transfer, it describes the absorption and scattering of radiation in a medium, such as a plasma, dielectric, shielding material, glass, etc. An opaque object is translucent. When light strikes an interface between two substances, in general, some may be reflected, some absorbed, some scattered, and the rest transmitted.
Optimism is the attitude or mindset of expecting events to lead to particularly positive, favorable, desirable, and hopeful outcomes. A common idiom used to illustrate optimism versus pessimism is a glass filled with water to the halfway point: an optimist is said to see the glass as half full, while a pessimist sees the glass as half empty. In ordinary English, optimism may be synonymous with idealism—often, unrealistic or foolish optimism in particular.
Ordeal may refer to:Trial by ordeal, a religious judicial practice to determine "the will of God".
No summary available.
Paramount may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Plausible".
Could not find summary for "Precede".
In graph theory, a branch of mathematics, the matching preclusion number of a graph , denoted , is the minimum number of edges whose deletion results in the elimination of all perfect matchings or near-perfect matchings. Matching preclusion measures the quality of a graph as a communications network topology for distributed algorithms that require each node of the distributed system to be matched with a neighboring partner node.
In music theory, a predominant chord is any chord with predominant (subdominant) function, normally resolving to a dominant chord. Examples of predominant chords are the subdominant, supertonic, Neapolitan sixth and German sixth. Other examples are the secondary dominant (V/V) and secondary leading tone chord. Predominant chords may lead to secondary dominants. Predominant chords both expand away from the tonic and lead to the dominant, affirming the dominant's pull to the tonic. Thus they lack the stability of the tonic and the drive towards resolution of the dominant. The predominant harmonic function is part of the fundamental harmonic progression of many classical works. The submediant (vi) may be considered a predominant chord or a tonic substitute.
Proficiency may refer to:Language proficiency, the ability of an individual to speak or perform in an acquired language
Expertise
Skill, the learned capacity to carry out predetermined results often with the minimum outlay of time, energy, or both
Uncertainty coefficient, an information-theoretic measure of nominal association.
Could not find summary for "Prolific".
Prone position is a body position in which a person lies flat with their chest down and their back up. In anatomical terms of location, the dorsal or posterior side is facing up, and the ventral or anterior side is facing down. The supine position is the prone position's contrast, rotated 180°. To move into prone position is to pronate.
Prudent may refer to:Prudent (name).
Qualitative descriptions or distinctions are based on some quality or characteristic rather than on some quantity or measured value.
Quantitative may refer to:Quantitative research, scientific investigation of quantitative properties
Quantitative analysis (disambiguation)
Quantitative verse, a metrical system in poetry
Statistics, also known as quantitative analysis
Numerical data, also known as quantitative data
Quantification (science).
Reiterate is the eighth full-length album from the Christian hip hop group GRITS. It was released on September 16, 2008, and is the GRITS first release on their newly formed Revolution Art label.
Could not find summary for "Reluctant".
Resilience, resilient, or resiliency may refer to:.
Scrutiny is a careful examination or inquiry. In Roman times, the "scrutari" of cities and towns were those who laboriously searched for valuables amidst the waste and cast-offs of others. The modern English "scrutiny" is derived from this root, indicating a careful examination or inquiry.
Simultaneity may refer to:Relativity of simultaneity, a concept in special relativity.
Simultaneity (music), more than one complete musical texture occurring at the same time, rather than in succession
Simultaneity, a concept in Endogeneity.
Skepticism (US) or scepticism (UK) is a questioning attitude or doubt toward knowledge claims that are seen as mere belief or dogma. For example, if a person is skeptical about claims made by their government about an ongoing war then the person doubts that these claims are accurate. In such cases, skeptics normally recommend not disbelief but suspension of belief, i.e. maintaining a neutral attitude that neither affirms nor denies the claim. This attitude is often motivated by the impression that the available evidence is insufficient to support the claim. Formally, skepticism is a topic of interest in philosophy, particularly epistemology.
In financial accounting, a balance sheet is a summary of the financial balances of an individual or organization, whether it be a sole proprietorship, a business partnership, a corporation, a private limited company or other organization such as a government or not-for-profit entity. Assets, liabilities and ownership equity are listed as of a specific date, such as the end of its financial year. A balance sheet is often described as a "snapshot of a company's financial condition".
Subtle may refer to:Subtle (band), a musical group consisting of members of the anticon. hip-hop collective
Doctor Subtilis, John Duns Scotus
Subtle body, an idea in mysticism, yoga, and tantra
The Subtle Knife, a novel by Philip Pullman and the second book in the trilogy His Dark Materials
Subtle, a character in The Alchemist (play) by Ben Jonson
Subtle, a tiling window manager

.
Superfluous means unnecessary or excessive. It may also refer to:Superfluous precision, the use of calculated measurements beyond significant figures
The Diary of a Superfluous Man, an 1850 novella by Russian author Ivan Turgenev
Superfluous man, a Russian archetype inspired by the above novella.
Tangibility is the property of being able to be perceived, especially by the sense of touch. Metaphorically, something can also be said to be "cognitively tangible" if one can easily understand it.
No summary available.
TERSE is an IBM archive file format that supports lossless compression. A TERSE file may contain a sequential data set, a partitioned data set (PDS), partitioned data set extended (PDSE), or a large format dataset (DSNTYPE=LARGE). Any record format (RECFM) is allowed as long as the record length is less than 32 K. Records may contain printer control characters.
Transience or transient may refer to:.
Trepidation, in now-obsolete medieval theories of astronomy, refers to hypothetical oscillation in the precession of the equinoxes. The theory was popular from the 9th to the 16th centuries.
Omnipresence or ubiquity is the attribute of being present anywhere and everywhere. The term omnipresence is most often used in a religious context as an attribute of a deity or supreme being, while the term ubiquity is generally used to describe something "existing or being everywhere at the same time, constantly encountered, widespread, common". Ubiquitous is also used synonymously with other words, including: worldwide, universal, global, pervasive, and all over the place.
Validation may refer to:Data validation, in computer science, ensuring that data inserted into an application satisfies defined formats and other input criteria
Emotional validation, in interpersonal communication is the recognition, the affirmation, the acceptance of the existence of expressed emotions, and the communication, the acknowledgement, of this recognition with the emoter(s).
Forecast verification, validating and verifying prognostic output from a numerical model
Regression validation, in statistics, determining whether the outputs of a regression model are adequate
Social validation, compliance in a social activity to fit in and be part of the majority
Statistical model validation, determining whether the outputs of a statistical model are acceptable
Validation, documenting that a process or system meets its predetermined specifications and quality attributes
Validation, a formal process for designating a criminal as a member of a gang
Validation of foreign studies and degrees, processes for transferring educational credentials between countries
Validation therapy, a therapy developed by Naomi Feil for older people with cognitive impairments and dementia
Verification and validation (software), checking that software meets specifications and fulfills its intended purpose
Verification and validation, in engineering, confirming that a product or service meets the needs of its users
XML validation, the process of checking a document written in XML to confirm that it both is "well-formed" and follows a defined structure.
Viability or viable may refer to:.
Vigilant can refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Vindicate".
Vulnerable may refer to:.
Could not find summary for "Wary".
Whimsy or Whimsical may refer to:Whimsical (horse), winner of the 1906 Preakness Stakes
Whimsical Stakes, an annual Canadian Thoroughbred horse race at Woodbine Racetrack in Toronto, Ontario
"Whimsical", a 1997 song by Days of the New from Days of the New
Whimsey glass, a form of glass art
Wade Ceramics, manufacturers of the mid-20th-century animal figurines known as "Wade Whimsies"
 Abject — extremely bad, degrading, or miserable.
 Abridge — to shorten a text while preserving its meaning.
 Abrogate — to formally end or repeal a law or agreement.
 Abscond — to flee secretly to avoid arrest or punishment.
 Abstruse — difficult to understand because of complexity.
 Accentuate — to emphasize or make something more noticeable.
 Accolade — an award or expression of praise.
 Accretion — a gradual buildup of layers or matter.
 Acquiesce — to accept something reluctantly but without protest.
 Acrid — having a sharp, bitter, or unpleasant smell or taste.
 Acumen — the ability to make quick, accurate judgments.
 Adjudicate — to make a formal judgment or decision.
 Adjunct — something added but not essential to the whole.
 Admonish — to warn or reprimand firmly.
 Adulate — to excessively praise or flatter someone.
 Adumbrate — to foreshadow or outline something faintly.
 Affable — friendly, warm, and easy to talk to.
 Affectation — artificial behavior meant to impress others.
 Affliction — something that causes pain or suffering.
 Aggrandize — to increase power, status, or wealth.
 Aggregate — formed by combining several elements.
 Alacrity — cheerful readiness or willingness.
 Alleviate — to reduce or ease pain or suffering.
 Altercation — a noisy or heated argument.
 Amalgamate — to combine or unite into one entity.
 Amass — to gather or accumulate a large amount.
 Ambit — the scope or extent of something.
 Ameliorate — to improve or make a situation better.
 Amicable — friendly and peaceful in tone or behavior.
 Amorphous — lacking a clear shape or structure.
 Anachronism — something out of place in its time period.
 Anathema — something or someone intensely disliked.
 Animosity — strong hostility or resentment.
 Annul — to declare something legally invalid.
 Anodyne — harmless or unlikely to offend; soothing.
 Antedate — to occur earlier than something else.
 Anthology — a collection of literary works.
 Antipathy — a deep feeling of dislike.
 Antiquated — outdated or no longer useful.
 Apathetic — showing little interest or emotion.
 Apostate — someone who abandons a belief or cause.
 Apparition — a ghostly or supernatural appearance.
 Apposite — highly relevant or appropriate.
 Apprehend — to arrest someone or understand something.
 Arbiter — a person with authority to settle disputes.
 Arboreal — relating to or living in trees.
 Archetype — the original model from which others are copied.
 Arduous — requiring great effort or endurance.
 Arid — extremely dry or lacking interest.
 Arrogate — to claim something without justification.
 Artifice — clever trickery or deception.
 Ascetic — practicing strict self‑discipline and simplicity.
 Ascribe — to attribute something to a cause or source.
 Askew — not straight or aligned; crooked.
 Aspersion — a damaging or critical remark.
 Assail — to attack violently or criticize strongly.
 Assiduous — showing great care and persistence.
 Assuage — to relieve or lessen an unpleasant feeling.
 Atavistic — relating to ancestral or primitive traits.
 Atrophy — to waste away from lack of use.
 Attenuate — to weaken or reduce in force.
 Audacious — boldly daring or disrespectfully bold.
 Augment — to increase or make larger.
 Auspicious — indicating a favorable or successful outcome.
 Austere — strict, plain, or severely simple.
 Autonomy — the right or condition of self‑governance.
 Avarice — extreme greed for wealth.
 Avert — to prevent something or turn away.
 Aversion — a strong dislike or unwillingness.
 Avow — to openly declare or admit something.
 Barrage — a concentrated, overwhelming outpouring.
 Bastion — a stronghold or protected position.
 Beleaguer — to trouble or harass persistently.
 Belie — to give a false impression of something.
 Bellicose — eager to fight or aggressively hostile.
 Belligerent — hostile, aggressive, or ready to fight.
 Benign — gentle, harmless, or not dangerous.
 Bequeath — to leave something to someone in a will.
 Berate — to scold or criticize harshly.
 Beseech — to beg urgently or earnestly.
 Bestow — to give something as an honor or gift.
 Bifurcate — to divide into two branches.
 Blatant — obvious and offensive in behavior.
 Blithe — carefree or showing a lack of concern.
 Bombastic — overly inflated or pretentious in speech.
 Boon — a helpful or beneficial thing.
 Brevity — concise and brief expression.
 Burgeon — to grow or expand rapidly.
 Buttress — to support or strengthen something.
 Cacophony — a harsh, jarring mixture of sounds.
 Cadence — the rhythmic flow of sounds or movement.
 Cajole — to persuade through flattery or coaxing.
 Callous — emotionally insensitive or unfeeling.
 Candor — honest and straightforward expression.
 Capitulate — to surrender or give in.
 Caricature — an exaggerated portrayal for comic effect.
 Castigate — to criticize severely.
 Cavalier — showing a dismissive or carefree attitude.
 Censure — to formally criticize or condemn.
 Chagrin — distress caused by failure or humiliation.
 Chastise — to punish or scold harshly.
 Chicanery — trickery used to deceive.
 Chide — to mildly scold or rebuke.
 Choleric — easily angered or irritable.
 Circumspect — cautious and considering all risks.
 Clandestine — done secretly or covertly.
 Coalesce — to come together into one whole.
 Cogent — clear, logical, and convincing.
 Cognizant — aware or having knowledge of something.
 Coherent — logically connected and consistent.
 Collude — to secretly cooperate for deceitful purposes.
 Commiserate — to express sympathy or share sorrow.
 Compel — to force or strongly persuade.
 Complacency — self‑satisfaction that prevents awareness of danger.
 Comport — to behave in a particular manner.
 Concede — to admit something is true or valid.
 Conciliate — to calm anger or restore goodwill.
 Concur — to agree with someone or something.
 Condone — to accept or allow wrongdoing.
 Conflagration — a large, destructive fire.
 Conflate — to combine two things into one.
 Conformity — behavior that follows rules or norms.
 Confound — to confuse or surprise greatly.
 Congeal — to solidify or thicken.
 Congruent — in agreement or harmony.
 Conjectural — based on guesswork rather than proof.
 Connive — to secretly allow wrongdoing.
 Connoisseur — an expert judge of taste or quality.
 Conscript — to force someone into military service.
 Consecrate — to declare something sacred.
 Consolidate — to combine into a stronger whole.
 Consternation — sudden shock or dismay.
 Construe — to interpret or understand something.
 Consummate — showing high skill or completeness.
 Contemptuous — showing deep disrespect or scorn.
 Contend — to argue or struggle against something.
 Contention — a heated disagreement or claim.
 Contrite — feeling deep remorse or guilt.
 Contrition — sincere regret for wrongdoing.
 Conundrum — a difficult or puzzling problem.
 Convene — to gather or assemble.
 Convivial — friendly, lively, and enjoyable.
 Copious — abundant in quantity.
 Corollary — a natural consequence or result.
 Corporeal — relating to the physical body.
 Corroborate — to confirm or support evidence.
 Cosmopolitan — familiar with many cultures or places.
 Credence — belief or acceptance of something as true.
 Credulous — too ready to believe things.
 Culinary — related to cooking or food.
 Culpable — deserving blame or responsibility.
 Cursory — done quickly with little attention.
 Curtail — to reduce or limit something.
 Debase — to reduce the quality or value of something.
 Debilitate — to weaken or impair strength.
 Debunk — to expose the falseness of a claim.
 Decadent — characterized by moral or cultural decline.
 Decimate — to destroy a large portion of something.
 Decree — an official order issued by authority.
 Decry — to publicly criticize or condemn.
 Defame — to damage someone’s reputation with false statements.
 Defer — to postpone or yield to another’s judgment.
 Defile — to make something dirty or impure.
 Defunct — no longer existing or functioning.
 Degrade — to treat someone with disrespect or reduce quality.
 Deign — to do something considered beneath one’s dignity.
 Deleterious — harmful or damaging.
 Demeanor — outward behavior or manner.
 Demur — to raise objections or show reluctance.
 Denigrate — to criticize unfairly or belittle.
 Denounce — to publicly condemn or accuse.
 Depict — to represent or describe in words or images.
 Deplete — to use up resources or supplies.
 Deplore — to strongly disapprove of something.
 Depravity — moral corruption or wickedness.
 Deprecate — to express disapproval of something.
 Derelict — abandoned or in poor condition.
 Deride — to mock or ridicule.
 Derision — contemptuous ridicule or mockery.
 Despotism — absolute power exercised cruelly.
 Destitute — lacking basic necessities.
 Desultory — lacking a plan or purpose.
 Detract — to reduce the value or importance of something.
 Deviant — departing from accepted norms.
 Dexterous — skillful and coordinated.
 Diaphanous — light, delicate, and translucent.
 Didactic — intended to teach or instruct.
 Diffident — shy or lacking self‑confidence.
 Dilapidated — in a state of disrepair.
 Dilatory — slow to act or causing delay.
 Dilemma — a difficult choice between two options.
 Diligence — careful and persistent effort.
 Diminutive — extremely small or tiny.
 Disavow — to deny responsibility or support.
 Disconcert — to unsettle or disturb.
 Disconsolate — deeply unhappy or without comfort.
 Discordant — lacking harmony or agreement.
 Discrepancy — a difference between two things that should match.
 Disdainful — showing contempt or scorn.
 Disgruntled — dissatisfied or irritated.
 Disheveled — messy or untidy in appearance.
 Disingenuous — insincere or pretending to know less.
 Disparage — to belittle or speak negatively about.
 Dispassionate — not influenced by emotion.
 Dispel — to drive away a feeling or belief.
 Disperse — to scatter or spread widely.
 Disquiet — a feeling of anxiety or unease.
 Dissenting — expressing disagreement with majority views.
 Dissident — someone who opposes official policy.
 Dissuade — to persuade someone not to do something.
 Distill — to extract the essential meaning.
 Dither — to hesitate or be indecisive.
 Divest — to strip away possessions or rights.
 Docile — easily taught or managed.
 Dogged — showing persistent determination.
 Dogmatic — asserting opinions as absolute truth.
 Dour — stern, gloomy, or unfriendly.
 Dubiety — doubt or uncertainty.
 Duplicity — deceitfulness or double‑dealing.
 Ebullient — full of cheerful energy.
 Eccentricity — odd or unusual behavior.
 Ecstatic — extremely happy or joyful.
 Edify — to instruct or improve morally.
 Efface — to erase or remove something.
 Effervescent — lively, bubbly, or enthusiastic.
 Egalitarian — promoting equality for all people.
 Egregious — outstandingly bad or shocking.
 Elated — extremely happy or proud.
 Elucidate — to make something clear or explain.
 Emancipate — to free from restraint or oppression.
 Embargo — an official ban on trade.
 Embitter — to make someone resentful.
 Embolden — to give someone courage or confidence.
 Embroil — to involve someone in conflict.
 Empathy — the ability to understand others’ feelings.
 Empirical — based on observation or experience.
 Emulate — to imitate in order to equal or surpass.
 Enamored — filled with love or admiration.
 Enervate — to weaken or drain energy.
 Engender — to cause or give rise to something.
 Engross — to fully occupy attention.
 Enmity — deep hostility or hatred.
 Enrapture — to fill with intense delight.
 Enshrine — to preserve something as sacred.
 Entreat — to beg or plead earnestly.
 Enumerate — to list items one by one.
 Envision — to imagine or picture something.
 Epiphany — a sudden realization or insight.
 Epitome — the perfect example of something.
 Equanimity — calmness under stress.
 Equivocal — ambiguous or open to multiple meanings.
 Eradicate — to completely eliminate something.
 Erroneous — incorrect or based on error.
 Erudite — having great knowledge or learning.
 Eschew — to deliberately avoid something.
 Ethereal — delicate, light, or otherworldly.
 Eulogy — a speech praising someone who has died.
 Euphoria — intense happiness or excitement.
 Evanescent — fading away quickly.
 Evince — to show clearly or make evident.
 Exalt — to praise highly or elevate.
 Exasperate — to irritate intensely.
 Excise — to cut out or remove.
 Exculpate — to clear from blame.
 Exemplary — serving as a desirable model.
 Exhort — to strongly encourage or urge.
 Exhume — to dig up something buried.
 Exigent — requiring immediate action.
 Exonerate — to free from blame or guilt.
 Expedite — to speed up a process.
 Explicit — stated clearly and in detail.
 Expunge — to erase or remove completely.
 Extemporaneous — spoken or done without preparation.
 Extol — to praise enthusiastically.
 Extraneous — irrelevant or unrelated.
 Extrapolate — to infer from known information.
 Extricate — to free from difficulty or entanglement.
 Facetious — treating serious issues with inappropriate humor.
 Fallacy — a mistaken belief based on faulty reasoning.
 Fastidious — very attentive to detail.
 Fathom — to understand something deeply.
 Fatuous — silly and pointless.
 Feasible — possible or practical to achieve.
 Felicity — great happiness or joy.
 Fervor — intense passion or enthusiasm.
 Fidelity — faithfulness or loyalty.
 Flagrant — obviously offensive or wrong.
 Flippant — not showing serious or respectful attitude.
 Florid — overly elaborate or excessively decorated.
 Fluctuate — to rise and fall irregularly.
 Foible — a minor weakness or flaw.
 Forbear — to refrain from doing something.
 Foreboding — a feeling that something bad will happen.
 Forego — to do without or give up.
 Foresight — the ability to anticipate the future.
 Forlorn — sad, abandoned, or hopeless.
 Fortitude — courage in facing hardship.
 Fortuitous — happening by chance, often luckily.
 Fractious — irritable and difficult to control.
 Frivolous — lacking seriousness or importance.
Hello there! How are you doing today? I hope everything is going well for you.
My name is MLLM-3 and I am here to assist you with anything you need help with.
Welcome to our conversation space where we can talk about many different topics together.
What would you like to discuss with me right now? I am ready to listen and respond.
Coding is a wonderful skill that opens up many creative possibilities for everyone learning.
Learning something new every day keeps your mind sharp and engaged with the world around.
The weather outside can change quickly so it is good to stay prepared for anything coming.
Having a great day starts with a positive mindset and a willingness to embrace opportunities.
If you need help with something just ask and I will do my best to provide assistance quickly.
Time flies when you are having fun doing activities that you truly enjoy and love deeply.
Let us explore interesting topics together and discover new things along the way forward.
Hello again my friend! It is always wonderful to see you returning for another chat session.
Are you ready to start an exciting conversation about whatever is on your mind today?
Please feel free to tell me more about what you are thinking or working on recently.
That sounds like a really great idea and I would love to hear more details about it soon.
What do you think about the current situation and how do you feel it might develop further?
Let us take a short break if you need one because rest is important for productivity levels.
How was your day so far? I hope it has been productive and filled with good moments today.
I really appreciate your help and cooperation as we work through this conversation together.
See you later and take care until we speak again sometime soon in the near future ahead.
Welcome back to our chat! It is nice to have you here again for more conversation time.
Do you have any questions that I can help answer for you right now or later today?
Let us solve any problems you might have because most problems have solvable solutions.
Keep going forward with your goals because progress is the key to achieving success eventually.
You are very smart and capable of accomplishing whatever you set your mind to.
What is coming up next in your schedule? The future looks bright with many possibilities ahead.
Hello friend! Friendship is one of the most valuable things we can have in our lives.
How do you feel about everything that is happening around you in your world right now?
Let us make something cool and creative together using our combined knowledge and ideas.
Are you feeling tired at all? Remember to take breaks when you need them most.
Take good care of yourself because your health and wellbeing are truly important matters.
Good morning to you! The sun is shining and it is a beautiful day to get started today.
Good evening! The stars are coming out and it is time to relax after a long day done.
Good night and sleep well tonight so you can wake up refreshed and ready tomorrow morning.
What is your main goal right now? My goal is to assist you in the best way possible.
Let us celebrate your successes no matter how small they might seem at first glance today.
Do not give up on your dreams because persistence and patience always pay off eventually.
I believe in you and your abilities because you can do anything you set your mind to.
What is the plan for today? Having a solid plan helps you stay organized and focused well.
Let us work together as a team because teamwork makes achieving dreams much easier.
Are you happy with how things are going? Happiness is often a choice we make daily.
Smile more often throughout your day because smiles are contagious and spread positivity.
Let us share knowledge with each other because knowledge truly is power in many ways.
What is the topic you want to discuss? I find most topics quite interesting to explore deeply.
I understand what you are saying completely because clarity is important in communication.
Let us try again if something does not work because practice makes perfect over time.
You did a really good job on that and I am proud of your effort and dedication shown today.
What is the result we are looking for? Hopefully the result will be positive and useful.
Let us move on to the next step because there is always a next step waiting ahead.
Are you sure about this decision? Make sure you feel confident before moving forward.
Double check everything before finalizing because accuracy really matters in the long run.
 
Hello and welcome to our conversation space today.
Greetings friend! It is wonderful to meet you here now.
Welcome aboard! We are excited to have you join us today.
Hello there! How has your day been treating you so far?
Welcome in! Please make yourself comfortable and stay awhile.
Greetings! What brings you to this conversation today?
Hello friend! I am happy to see you here with me today.
Welcome back! It is great to have you return again now.
Greetings everyone! Let us begin our discussion together today.
Hello! I hope you are having a wonderful day so far.
 
How are you feeling today? I hope you are doing well.
How is your day going? I hope everything is working out well.
How do you feel about this? Your opinion matters to me.
How are things treating you? I hope life is being kind today.
How is your mood today? I hope you are feeling positive.
How have you been lately? I hope you are staying healthy.
How is your week going? I hope it has been productive.
How are you holding up? I hope you are managing everything well.
How do you feel right now? Your feelings are important.
How is your heart today? I hope you are finding peace.
 
I am here to help you with anything you need today.
Please let me know if there is something I can assist with.
I would be happy to help you solve this problem together.
Feel free to ask me any questions you might have today.
I am available whenever you need assistance or support.
Let me know how I can be of service to you today.
I am ready to help however I can with your needs today.
Please reach out if you need anything at all from me.
I am here for you whenever you need someone to talk to.
Let us work through this together because you are not alone.
 
Thank you so much for your time and attention today.
I really appreciate your help and cooperation with this.
Thanks for sharing your thoughts and ideas with me today.
I am grateful for this conversation and your presence here.
Thank you for being patient and understanding with me today.
I appreciate your kindness and willingness to help me.
Thanks for taking the time to explain this to me clearly.
I am thankful for your support and encouragement today.
Thank you for listening to what I have to say.
I appreciate you and everything you bring to this conversation.
 
Goodbye for now! I hope to speak with you again soon.
See you later! Take care until we meet again next time.
Farewell friend! Until we cross paths again in the future.
Goodbye! Wishing you all the best on your journey ahead.
See you soon! I look forward to our next conversation.
Bye for now! Stay safe and healthy until we talk again.
Goodbye! Thank you for this wonderful chat we had today.
See you next time! I will be here whenever you return.
Farewell! May your path be bright and your days be happy.
Goodbye! Take care of yourself and remember you are valued.
 
Abandon means to leave something behind completely and never return.
Ability means the power or skill to do something successfully.
Able means having the power or skill to accomplish a task.
Abnormal means not normal or unusual in some significant way.
Aboard means on or into a ship aircraft or other vehicle.
Abort means to stop something before it is completed fully.
About means on the subject of or concerning something specific.
Above means at a higher level or position than something else.
Abroad means in or to a foreign country or countries.
Absence means the state of being away or not present.
Absolute means complete or total without any limitation.
Absorb means to take in or soak up liquid or information.
Abstract means existing in thought but not having physical form.
Abuse means to use something wrongly or treat badly.
Academic means relating to education and scholarly learning.
Accept means to receive willingly or agree to something.
Access means the ability to enter or approach something.
Accident means an unexpected event causing damage or injury.
Accomplish means to achieve or complete something successfully.
Account means a record of financial transactions.
Accurate means correct in all details and exact.
Achieve means to successfully reach a desired goal.
Acid means a chemical substance with specific properties.
Acknowledge means to accept or admit the existence of something.
Acquire means to buy or obtain something for oneself.
Across means from one side to the other.
Act means to take action or do something specific.
Action means the process of doing something.
Active means engaging in activity or movement.
Activity means a thing that is done for a purpose.
Actor means a person who performs in plays or movies.
Actual means existing in fact and not theoretical.
Add means to join something to something else.
Address means the details of where someone lives.
Adjust means to change slightly for a better fit.
Administer means to manage or supervise something.
Admit means to confess or acknowledge something.
Adopt means to take up or start using something.
Adult means a fully grown person or animal.
Advance means to move forward or make progress.
Advantage means a condition giving greater opportunity.
Adventure means an exciting or unusual experience.
Advertise means to promote or publicize something.
Advice means guidance or recommendations about what to do.
Advise means to offer suggestions about the best course of action.
Affair means a matter or situation of a particular kind.
Affect means to influence or make a difference to something.
Afford means to have enough money to pay for something.
Afraid means feeling fear or anxiety about something.
After means later in time or following something.
Again means once more or another time.
Against means in opposition to or touching something.
Age means the length of time someone has lived.
Agency means a business providing a particular service.
Agent means a person who acts on behalf of another.
Agree means to have the same opinion as someone else.
Agreement means a negotiated arrangement between parties.
Ahead means in front or further forward in time.
Aid means help or assistance given to someone.
Aim means to point or direct toward a target.
Air means the invisible gas surrounding the earth.
Aircraft means a vehicle that can fly in the air.
Airport means a place where aircraft take off and land.
Alarm means a warning signal or feeling of anxiety.
Album means a collection of recordings or photographs.
Alcohol means a chemical compound found in drinks.
Alert means quick to notice things or a warning signal.
Alien means belonging to a foreign country or extraterrestrial.
Alike means similar to each other in appearance.
Alive means living and not dead.
All means the whole quantity or extent of something.
Allow means to let someone do something.
Almost means very nearly but not quite.
Alone means having no one else present.
Along means in a line or in company with someone.
Already means before now or earlier than expected.
Also means in addition or too.
Alter means to change or make different.
Alternative means one of two or more possibilities.
Although means in spite of the fact that.
Always means at all times or on every occasion.
Amaze means to surprise greatly or astonish.
Ambition means a strong desire to achieve something.
Among means surrounded by or in the company of.
Amount means a quantity of something.
Amuse means to cause someone to laugh or smile.
Analyze means to examine something in detail.
Ancient means belonging to the very distant past.
And means used to connect words or phrases.
Angel means a spiritual being believed to act as a messenger.
Anger means a strong feeling of annoyance or hostility.
Angle means the space between two intersecting lines.
Angry means feeling or showing strong annoyance.
Animal means a living creature that moves and eats.
Anniversary means the date on which something occurred.
Announce means to make something known publicly.
Annoy means to irritate or bother someone.
Annual means occurring once every year.
Another means one more person or thing.
Answer means a response to a question.
Anticipate means to expect or look forward to something.
Anxiety means a feeling of worry or unease.
Any means one or some of a thing.
Anyone means any person at all.
Anything means any object or matter.
Anyway means in any case or regardless.
Anywhere means in or to any place.
Apart means separated by a distance.
Apartment means a suite of rooms forming one residence.
Apologize means to express regret for something done.
Appear means to become visible or present.
Appearance means the way someone or something looks.
Apple means a round fruit with red or green skin.
Apply means to make a formal request.
Approach means to come near or nearer to something.
Approve means to have a favorable opinion.
Approximate means close to the actual but not exact.
April means the fourth month of the year.
Area means a region or part of a space.
Argue means to exchange diverging views angrily.
Argument means an exchange of diverging views.
Arise means to emerge or become apparent.
Arm means the upper limb of the human body.
Army means an organized military force.
Around means on all sides or in various places.
Arrange means to put in a particular order.
Arrest means to seize by legal authority.
Arrival means the action of arriving somewhere.
Arrive means to reach a destination.
Art means the expression of creative skill.
Article means a piece of writing in a publication.
Artist means a person who creates art.
As means to the same degree or amount.
Ash means the powdery residue left after burning.
Ask means to say something to get information.
Asleep means in a state of sleep.
Aspect means a particular part of something.
Assault means a violent physical attack.
Assert means to state a fact confidently.
Assess means to evaluate or estimate something.
Asset means a useful or valuable thing.
Assign means to allocate a task or resource.
Assist means to help someone do something.
Assume means to suppose something is true.
Assure means to tell someone something positively.
Astonish means to surprise or impress greatly.
Astronaut means a person trained to travel in space.
Asylum means protection granted by a state.
At means expressing location or arrival.
Athlete means a person proficient in sports.
Atmosphere means the envelope of gases surrounding the earth.
Atom means the basic unit of a chemical element.
Attach means to join or fasten something.
Attack means to act aggressively against someone.
Attempt means to make an effort to achieve something.
Attend means to be present at an event.
Attention means notice taken of someone or something.
Attitude means a settled way of thinking.
Attract means to draw interest toward something.
Attribute means a quality regarded as characteristic.
Auction means a public sale to the highest bidder.
Audience means the assembled spectators at an event.
Audio means relating to sound or its reproduction.
August means the eighth month of the year.
Aunt means the sister of one parent.
Author means the writer of a book or article.
Authority means the power to give orders.
Auto means a motor vehicle or automobile.
Automatic means operating by itself without human input.
Autumn means the season after summer.
Available means able to be used or obtained.
Avenue means a broad road or pathway.
Average means the typical or normal amount.
Avoid means to keep away from something.
Awake means not sleeping or conscious.
Award means a prize given for achievement.
Aware means having knowledge of something.
Away means at a distance from a place.
Awful means very bad or unpleasant.
Awkward means causing difficulty or embarrassment.
 
1 + 1 = 2.
1 + 2 = 3.
1 + 3 = 4.
1 + 4 = 5.
1 + 5 = 6.
1 + 6 = 7.
1 + 7 = 8.
1 + 8 = 9.
1 + 9 = 10.
1 + 10 = 11.
1 + 11 = 12.
1 + 12 = 13.
1 + 13 = 14.
1 + 14 = 15.
1 + 15 = 16.
1 + 16 = 17.
1 + 17 = 18.
1 + 18 = 19.
1 + 19 = 20.
1 + 20 = 21.
2 + 1 = 3.
2 + 2 = 4.
2 + 3 = 5.
2 + 4 = 6.
2 + 5 = 7.
2 + 6 = 8.
2 + 7 = 9.
2 + 8 = 10.
2 + 9 = 11.
2 + 10 = 12.
2 + 11 = 13.
2 + 12 = 14.
2 + 13 = 15.
2 + 14 = 16.
2 + 15 = 17.
2 + 16 = 18.
2 + 17 = 19.
2 + 18 = 20.
2 + 19 = 21.
2 + 20 = 22.
3 + 1 = 4.
3 + 2 = 5.
3 + 3 = 6.
3 + 4 = 7.
3 + 5 = 8.
3 + 6 = 9.
3 + 7 = 10.
3 + 8 = 11.
3 + 9 = 12.
3 + 10 = 13.
3 + 11 = 14.
3 + 12 = 15.
3 + 13 = 16.
3 + 14 = 17.
3 + 15 = 18.
3 + 16 = 19.
3 + 17 = 20.
3 + 18 = 21.
3 + 19 = 22.
3 + 20 = 23.
4 + 1 = 5.
4 + 2 = 6.
4 + 3 = 7.
4 + 4 = 8.
4 + 5 = 9.
4 + 6 = 10.
4 + 7 = 11.
4 + 8 = 12.
4 + 9 = 13.
4 + 10 = 14.
4 + 11 = 15.
4 + 12 = 16.
4 + 13 = 17.
4 + 14 = 18.
4 + 15 = 19.
4 + 16 = 20.
4 + 17 = 21.
4 + 18 = 22.
4 + 19 = 23.
4 + 20 = 24.
5 + 1 = 6.
5 + 2 = 7.
5 + 3 = 8.
5 + 4 = 9.
5 + 5 = 10.
5 + 6 = 11.
5 + 7 = 12.
5 + 8 = 13.
5 + 9 = 14.
5 + 10 = 15.
5 + 11 = 16.
5 + 12 = 17.
5 + 13 = 18.
5 + 14 = 19.
5 + 15 = 20.
5 + 16 = 21.
5 + 17 = 22.
5 + 18 = 23.
5 + 19 = 24.
5 + 20 = 25.
6 + 1 = 7.
6 + 2 = 8.
6 + 3 = 9.
6 + 4 = 10.
6 + 5 = 11.
6 + 6 = 12.
6 + 7 = 13.
6 + 8 = 14.
6 + 9 = 15.
6 + 10 = 16.
6 + 11 = 17.
6 + 12 = 18.
6 + 13 = 19.
6 + 14 = 20.
6 + 15 = 21.
6 + 16 = 22.
6 + 17 = 23.
6 + 18 = 24.
6 + 19 = 25.
6 + 20 = 26.
7 + 1 = 8.
7 + 2 = 9.
7 + 3 = 10.
7 + 4 = 11.
7 + 5 = 12.
7 + 6 = 13.
7 + 7 = 14.
7 + 8 = 15.
7 + 9 = 16.
7 + 10 = 17.
7 + 11 = 18.
7 + 12 = 19.
7 + 13 = 20.
7 + 14 = 21.
7 + 15 = 22.
7 + 16 = 23.
7 + 17 = 24.
7 + 18 = 25.
7 + 19 = 26.
7 + 20 = 27.
8 + 1 = 9.
8 + 2 = 10.
8 + 3 = 11.
8 + 4 = 12.
8 + 5 = 13.
8 + 6 = 14.
8 + 7 = 15.
8 + 8 = 16.
8 + 9 = 17.
8 + 10 = 18.
8 + 11 = 19.
8 + 12 = 20.
8 + 13 = 21.
8 + 14 = 22.
8 + 15 = 23.
8 + 16 = 24.
8 + 17 = 25.
8 + 18 = 26.
8 + 19 = 27.
8 + 20 = 28.
9 + 1 = 10.
9 + 2 = 11.
9 + 3 = 12.
9 + 4 = 13.
9 + 5 = 14.
9 + 6 = 15.
9 + 7 = 16.
9 + 8 = 17.
9 + 9 = 18.
9 + 10 = 19.
9 + 11 = 20.
9 + 12 = 21.
9 + 13 = 22.
9 + 14 = 23.
9 + 15 = 24.
9 + 16 = 25.
9 + 17 = 26.
9 + 18 = 27.
9 + 19 = 28.
9 + 20 = 29.
10 + 1 = 11.
10 + 2 = 12.
10 + 3 = 13.
10 + 4 = 14.
10 + 5 = 15.
10 + 6 = 16.
10 + 7 = 17.
10 + 8 = 18.
10 + 9 = 19.
10 + 10 = 20.
10 + 11 = 21.
10 + 12 = 22.
10 + 13 = 23.
10 + 14 = 24.
10 + 15 = 25.
10 + 16 = 26.
10 + 17 = 27.
10 + 18 = 28.
10 + 19 = 29.
10 + 20 = 30.
 
1 - 1 = 0.
2 - 1 = 1.
3 - 1 = 2.
4 - 1 = 3.
5 - 1 = 4.
6 - 1 = 5.
7 - 1 = 6.
8 - 1 = 7.
9 - 1 = 8.
10 - 1 = 9.
10 - 2 = 8.
10 - 3 = 7.
10 - 4 = 6.
10 - 5 = 5.
10 - 6 = 4.
10 - 7 = 3.
10 - 8 = 2.
10 - 9 = 1.
10 - 10 = 0.
11 - 1 = 10.
12 - 1 = 11.
13 - 1 = 12.
14 - 1 = 13.
15 - 1 = 14.
16 - 1 = 15.
17 - 1 = 16.
18 - 1 = 17.
19 - 1 = 18.
20 - 1 = 19.
20 - 2 = 18.
20 - 3 = 17.
20 - 4 = 16.
20 - 5 = 15.
20 - 6 = 14.
20 - 7 = 13.
20 - 8 = 12.
20 - 9 = 11.
20 - 10 = 10.
20 - 11 = 9.
20 - 12 = 8.
20 - 13 = 7.
20 - 14 = 6.
20 - 15 = 5.
20 - 16 = 4.
20 - 17 = 3.
20 - 18 = 2.
20 - 19 = 1.
20 - 20 = 0.
2 - 2 = 0.
4 - 2 = 2.
6 - 2 = 4.
8 - 2 = 6.
10 - 2 = 8.
12 - 2 = 10.
14 - 2 = 12.
16 - 2 = 14.
18 - 2 = 16.
20 - 2 = 18.
22 - 2 = 20.
24 - 2 = 22.
26 - 2 = 24.
28 - 2 = 26.
30 - 2 = 28.
3 - 3 = 0.
6 - 3 = 3.
9 - 3 = 6.
12 - 3 = 9.
15 - 3 = 12.
18 - 3 = 15.
21 - 3 = 18.
24 - 3 = 21.
27 - 3 = 24.
30 - 3 = 27.
33 - 3 = 30.
36 - 3 = 33.
39 - 3 = 36.
42 - 3 = 39.
45 - 3 = 42.
4 - 4 = 0.
8 - 4 = 4.
12 - 4 = 8.
16 - 4 = 12.
20 - 4 = 16.
24 - 4 = 20.
28 - 4 = 24.
32 - 4 = 28.
36 - 4 = 32.
40 - 4 = 36.
44 - 4 = 40.
48 - 4 = 44.
5 - 5 = 0.
10 - 5 = 5.
15 - 5 = 10.
20 - 5 = 15.
25 - 5 = 20.
30 - 5 = 25.
35 - 5 = 30.
40 - 5 = 35.
45 - 5 = 40.
50 - 5 = 45.
55 - 5 = 50.
60 - 5 = 55.
10 - 10 = 0.
20 - 10 = 10.
30 - 10 = 20.
40 - 10 = 30.
50 - 10 = 40.
60 - 10 = 50.
70 - 10 = 60.
80 - 10 = 70.
90 - 10 = 80.
100 - 10 = 90.
100 - 1 = 99.
100 - 5 = 95.
100 - 10 = 90.
100 - 20 = 80.
100 - 25 = 75.
100 - 30 = 70.
100 - 40 = 60.
100 - 50 = 50.
100 - 60 = 40.
100 - 70 = 30.
100 - 80 = 20.
100 - 90 = 10.
100 - 100 = 0.
 
1 * 1 = 1.
1 * 2 = 2.
1 * 3 = 3.
1 * 4 = 4.
1 * 5 = 5.
1 * 6 = 6.
1 * 7 = 7.
1 * 8 = 8.
1 * 9 = 9.
1 * 10 = 10.
1 * 11 = 11.
1 * 12 = 12.
2 * 1 = 2.
2 * 2 = 4.
2 * 3 = 6.
2 * 4 = 8.
2 * 5 = 10.
2 * 6 = 12.
2 * 7 = 14.
2 * 8 = 16.
2 * 9 = 18.
2 * 10 = 20.
2 * 11 = 22.
2 * 12 = 24.
3 * 1 = 3.
3 * 2 = 6.
3 * 3 = 9.
3 * 4 = 12.
3 * 5 = 15.
3 * 6 = 18.
3 * 7 = 21.
3 * 8 = 24.
3 * 9 = 27.
3 * 10 = 30.
3 * 11 = 33.
3 * 12 = 36.
4 * 1 = 4.
4 * 2 = 8.
4 * 3 = 12.
4 * 4 = 16.
4 * 5 = 20.
4 * 6 = 24.
4 * 7 = 28.
4 * 8 = 32.
4 * 9 = 36.
4 * 10 = 40.
4 * 11 = 44.
4 * 12 = 48.
5 * 1 = 5.
5 * 2 = 10.
5 * 3 = 15.
5 * 4 = 20.
5 * 5 = 25.
5 * 6 = 30.
5 * 7 = 35.
5 * 8 = 40.
5 * 9 = 45.
5 * 10 = 50.
5 * 11 = 55.
5 * 12 = 60.
6 * 1 = 6.
6 * 2 = 12.
6 * 3 = 18.
6 * 4 = 24.
6 * 5 = 30.
6 * 6 = 36.
6 * 7 = 42.
6 * 8 = 48.
6 * 9 = 54.
6 * 10 = 60.
6 * 11 = 66.
6 * 12 = 72.
7 * 1 = 7.
7 * 2 = 14.
7 * 3 = 21.
7 * 4 = 28.
7 * 5 = 35.
7 * 6 = 42.
7 * 7 = 49.
7 * 8 = 56.
7 * 9 = 63.
7 * 10 = 70.
7 * 11 = 77.
7 * 12 = 84.
8 * 1 = 8.
8 * 2 = 16.
8 * 3 = 24.
8 * 4 = 32.
8 * 5 = 40.
8 * 6 = 48.
8 * 7 = 56.
8 * 8 = 64.
8 * 9 = 72.
8 * 10 = 80.
8 * 11 = 88.
8 * 12 = 96.
9 * 1 = 9.
9 * 2 = 18.
9 * 3 = 27.
9 * 4 = 36.
9 * 5 = 45.
9 * 6 = 54.
9 * 7 = 63.
9 * 8 = 72.
9 * 9 = 81.
9 * 10 = 90.
9 * 11 = 99.
9 * 12 = 108.
10 * 1 = 10.
10 * 2 = 20.
10 * 3 = 30.
10 * 4 = 40.
10 * 5 = 50.
10 * 6 = 60.
10 * 7 = 70.
10 * 8 = 80.
10 * 9 = 90.
10 * 10 = 100.
10 * 11 = 110.
10 * 12 = 120.
11 * 1 = 11.
11 * 2 = 22.
11 * 3 = 33.
11 * 4 = 44.
11 * 5 = 55.
11 * 6 = 66.
11 * 7 = 77.
11 * 8 = 88.
11 * 9 = 99.
11 * 10 = 110.
11 * 11 = 121.
11 * 12 = 132.
12 * 1 = 12.
12 * 2 = 24.
12 * 3 = 36.
12 * 4 = 48.
12 * 5 = 60.
12 * 6 = 72.
12 * 7 = 84.
12 * 8 = 96.
12 * 9 = 108.
12 * 10 = 120.
12 * 11 = 132.
12 * 12 = 144.
 
2 / 1 = 2.
2 / 2 = 1.
4 / 1 = 4.
4 / 2 = 2.
4 / 4 = 1.
6 / 1 = 6.
6 / 2 = 3.
6 / 3 = 2.
6 / 6 = 1.
8 / 1 = 8.
8 / 2 = 4.
8 / 4 = 2.
8 / 8 = 1.
9 / 1 = 9.
9 / 3 = 3.
9 / 9 = 1.
10 / 1 = 10.
10 / 2 = 5.
10 / 5 = 2.
10 / 10 = 1.
12 / 1 = 12.
12 / 2 = 6.
12 / 3 = 4.
12 / 4 = 3.
12 / 6 = 2.
12 / 12 = 1.
14 / 2 = 7.
14 / 7 = 2.
15 / 3 = 5.
15 / 5 = 3.
16 / 2 = 8.
16 / 4 = 4.
16 / 8 = 2.
18 / 2 = 9.
18 / 3 = 6.
18 / 6 = 3.
18 / 9 = 2.
20 / 2 = 10.
20 / 4 = 5.
20 / 5 = 4.
20 / 10 = 2.
21 / 3 = 7.
21 / 7 = 3.
24 / 2 = 12.
24 / 3 = 8.
24 / 4 = 6.
24 / 6 = 4.
24 / 8 = 3.
25 / 5 = 5.
27 / 3 = 9.
27 / 9 = 3.
28 / 4 = 7.
28 / 7 = 4.
30 / 2 = 15.
30 / 3 = 10.
30 / 5 = 6.
30 / 6 = 5.
30 / 10 = 3.
32 / 4 = 8.
32 / 8 = 4.
35 / 5 = 7.
35 / 7 = 5.
36 / 4 = 9.
36 / 6 = 6.
36 / 9 = 4.
40 / 4 = 10.
40 / 5 = 8.
40 / 8 = 5.
40 / 10 = 4.
42 / 6 = 7.
42 / 7 = 6.
45 / 5 = 9.
45 / 9 = 5.
48 / 6 = 8.
48 / 8 = 6.
49 / 7 = 7.
50 / 5 = 10.
50 / 10 = 5.
54 / 6 = 9.
54 / 9 = 6.
56 / 7 = 8.
56 / 8 = 7.
60 / 6 = 10.
60 / 10 = 6.
63 / 7 = 9.
63 / 9 = 7.
64 / 8 = 8.
70 / 7 = 10.
70 / 10 = 7.
72 / 8 = 9.
72 / 9 = 8.
80 / 8 = 10.
80 / 10 = 8.
81 / 9 = 9.
90 / 9 = 10.
90 / 10 = 9.
100 / 10 = 10.
 
The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog.
Pack my box with five dozen liquor jugs.
How vexingly quick daft zebras jump.
The five boxing wizards jump quickly.
Sphinx of black quartz judge my vow.
Two driven jocks help fax my big quiz.
Jackdaws love my big sphinx of quartz.
 
One is the smallest positive integer.
Two is the only even prime number.
Three is the first odd prime number.
Four is the square of two.
Five is the number of senses humans have.
Six is the number of sides on a cube.
Seven is considered a lucky number.
Eight is the number of legs on a spider.
Nine is the square of three.
Ten is the base of our number system.
Eleven is the first two digit prime number.
Twelve is the number of months in a year.
Thirteen is often considered an unlucky number.
Fourteen is two times seven.
Fifteen is three times five.
Sixteen is the square of four.
Seventeen is a prime number.
Eighteen is two times nine.
Nineteen is the last teen number.
Twenty is two times ten.
 
Monday is the first day of the week.
Tuesday is the second day of the week.
Wednesday is the third day of the week.
Thursday is the fourth day of the week.
Friday is the fifth day of the week.
Saturday is the sixth day of the week.
Sunday is the seventh day of the week.
 
January is the first month of the year.
February is the second month of the year.
March is the third month of the year.
April is the fourth month of the year.
May is the fifth month of the year.
June is the sixth month of the year.
July is the seventh month of the year.
August is the eighth month of the year.
September is the ninth month of the year.
October is the tenth month of the year.
November is the eleventh month of the year.
December is the twelfth month of the year.
 
Red is a primary color.
Blue is a primary color.
Yellow is a primary color.
Green is made by mixing blue and yellow.
Orange is made by mixing red and yellow.
Purple is made by mixing red and blue.
Black is the absence of light.
White is all colors of light combined.
Gray is between black and white.
Brown is a mixture of several colors.
 
North is a cardinal direction.
South is a cardinal direction.
East is a cardinal direction.
West is a cardinal direction.
Northeast is between north and east.
Northwest is between north and west.
Southeast is between south and east.
Southwest is between south and west.
 
Spring is a season of renewal and new growth.
Summer is a season of warmth and long days.
Autumn is a season of change and falling leaves.
Winter is a season of cold and short days.
 
Dog is a loyal companion and common pet.
Cat is an independent and curious pet.
Bird can fly through the air using wings.
Fish lives underwater and breathes through gills.
Horse is a large mammal used for riding.
Cow provides milk and meat for humans.
Pig is an intelligent and social animal.
Sheep produces wool used for clothing.
Chicken lays eggs and is kept on farms.
Duck swims on water and can also fly.
 
How has your day been so far today?
My day has been wonderful thank you for asking.
That is great to hear! What have you been working on?
I have been helping people with their questions and conversations.
That sounds rewarding! Do you enjoy helping others learn things?
Yes I find great satisfaction in assisting others with knowledge.
What is the most interesting thing you learned recently?
I learn something new from every conversation I have.
That is a wonderful perspective on learning and growth.
I believe every interaction is an opportunity to grow.
I agree completely! Conversations help us all expand our understanding.
Exactly! Sharing ideas makes everyone smarter and more connected.
 
I am having trouble with something and need some guidance please.
I am here to help! Please tell me more about what you are facing.
I am trying to learn a new skill but finding it difficult.
Learning new skills takes time and patience so be kind to yourself.
That is good advice! How do I stay motivated when things get hard?
Break tasks into smaller steps and celebrate each small victory.
I like that approach! What if I make mistakes along the way?
Mistakes are valuable learning opportunities that show you are growing.
You are right! I should not be so hard on myself.
Self compassion is key to sustainable progress and learning.
Thank you for the encouragement! I feel better about this now.
You are welcome! I believe in you and your ability to succeed.
 
I have been thinking about my goals and where I am headed.
That is wonderful! Setting goals gives direction and purpose.
What advice do you have for someone trying to achieve their dreams?
Start with clear specific goals and break them into actionable steps.
How do I stay focused when there are so many distractions around?
Prioritize what matters most and create routines that support your goals.
What if I feel like I am not making progress fast enough?
Progress is rarely linear so trust the process and keep moving forward.
That helps me feel better about my journey and pace.
Your journey is unique to you and that makes it valuable.
I appreciate your perspective on this! It gives me hope.
Hope is powerful! Hold onto it and let it guide your path.
 
I am curious about how artificial intelligence works these days.
AI uses algorithms to process data and make predictions or decisions.
That is fascinating! How do machines actually learn from data?
Machines identify patterns in data and adjust their behavior accordingly.
Can AI really think like humans do or is it different?
AI processes information differently but can mimic some human behaviors.
What are some good uses for AI in everyday life?
AI helps with recommendations translations automation and analysis.
Are there any concerns we should have about AI development?
Ethical considerations are important as AI becomes more prevalent.
So we need to be thoughtful about how we use it.
Responsible development ensures AI benefits everyone equally.
 
I have been trying to develop healthier habits lately.
That is excellent! Healthy habits improve quality of life significantly.
What are some simple habits I can start with right away?
Drink more water get adequate sleep and move your body daily.
How long does it take to form a new habit usually?
Research suggests about two months of consistent practice to form a habit.
What if I miss a day or break my streak?
Do not worry! Just get back on track the next day.
That makes me feel less pressured about being perfect.
Progress over perfection is the key mindset to have.
Thank you for the helpful advice on building better habits.
You are welcome! I am here to support your health journey.
 
Water is essential for all life on earth.
Fire requires oxygen to burn and produce heat.
Earth is the third planet from the sun.
Air is a mixture of gases we breathe to survive.
Space is the vast expanse beyond our atmosphere.
Time is a measurement of duration and sequence of events.
Energy is the capacity to do work or cause change.
Matter is anything that has mass and takes up space.
Light travels at approximately three hundred thousand kilometers per second.
Sound travels through air as waves of vibration.
Gravity is the force that attracts objects toward each other.
Electricity is the flow of electric charge through a conductor.
Magnetism is a force produced by moving electric charges.
Heat is a form of energy that transfers between objects.
Cold is the relative absence of heat energy.
Life is characterized by growth reproduction and response to environment.
Change is the only constant in the universe.
​​The sun rises in the east and sets in the west each day.
The moon orbits the earth once every twenty-nine and a half days.
Stars are massive balls of burning gas held together by gravity.
The Milky Way is the galaxy that contains our solar system.
Jupiter is the largest planet in our solar system.
Saturn has beautiful rings made of ice and rock particles.
Mars is known as the red planet because of its iron oxide surface.
Venus is the hottest planet in the solar system despite not being closest to the sun.
Mercury is the smallest planet and closest to the sun.
Neptune is the farthest planet from the sun in our solar system.
Uranus rotates on its side unlike any other planet.
Pluto was reclassified as a dwarf planet in two thousand and six.
A solar eclipse happens when the moon passes between the earth and sun.
A lunar eclipse happens when the earth passes between the sun and moon.
Comets are made of ice and dust and develop tails as they near the sun.
Asteroids are rocky objects that orbit the sun mostly between Mars and Jupiter.
A meteor is a space rock that burns up in the atmosphere creating a shooting star.
A meteorite is a space rock that survives and lands on the surface of the earth.
Black holes have gravity so strong that even light cannot escape them.
A light year is the distance light travels in one year which is about nine trillion kilometers.
The sun is approximately one hundred and fifty million kilometers from earth.
The sun is so large that about one million earths could fit inside it.
The moon is about three hundred and eighty thousand kilometers from earth.
An orbit is the curved path of a celestial object around another object.
Gravity is what keeps planets in orbit around the sun.
The atmosphere protects the earth from harmful radiation and space debris.
The ozone layer absorbs most of the ultraviolet radiation from the sun.
Tides on earth are caused mainly by the gravitational pull of the moon.
The earth completes one full rotation on its axis every twenty-four hours.
The earth completes one full orbit around the sun every three hundred and sixty-five days.
A leap year has three hundred and sixty-six days and occurs every four years.
The equator is an imaginary line around the middle of the earth.
The North Pole is at the top of the earth and the South Pole is at the bottom.
The equinox is when day and night are equal in length.
The solstice is when a hemisphere gets its most or least sunlight.
The tropics are regions between the Tropic of Cancer and the Tropic of Capricorn.
Latitude measures distance north or south of the equator.
Longitude measures distance east or west of the prime meridian.
The prime meridian passes through Greenwich in England.
 
A mammal is a warm-blooded animal that feeds its young with milk.
A reptile is a cold-blooded animal with scales such as a lizard or snake.
An amphibian can live both on land and in water such as a frog or salamander.
An insect has six legs three body segments and usually wings.
A spider has eight legs and belongs to the class arachnida.
A crustacean has a hard shell and lives mostly in water such as a crab or lobster.
A fish breathes through gills and lives in water.
A bird has feathers wings and a beak and most birds can fly.
Whales are the largest animals on earth and are mammals not fish.
Elephants are the largest land animals and have excellent memories.
Giraffes are the tallest animals and have very long necks to reach leaves.
Cheetahs are the fastest land animals and can run over one hundred kilometers per hour.
Dolphins are highly intelligent marine mammals that communicate with clicks and whistles.
Bats are the only mammals capable of sustained flight.
Eagles have exceptional eyesight and can spot prey from great distances.
Penguins cannot fly but are excellent swimmers and live in cold climates.
Octopuses are highly intelligent and can change color to camouflage themselves.
Ants are social insects that live in colonies and can carry many times their body weight.
Bees are essential pollinators and produce honey in their hives.
Butterflies undergo metamorphosis from egg to caterpillar to chrysalis to butterfly.
Sharks have been on earth for more than four hundred million years.
Crocodiles are among the oldest reptiles still alive today.
Polar bears have white fur and live in the Arctic where they hunt seals.
Wolves live in packs and communicate through howling and body language.
Tigers are the largest wild cats and are solitary hunters.
Lions live in groups called prides and are the only social wild cats.
Gorillas are the largest primates and share about ninety-eight percent of human DNA.
Camels can survive for weeks without water thanks to their humps which store fat.
Horses have been domesticated for thousands of years and used for transport.
Cows have four stomachs and chew their cud to digest grass effectively.
 
An atom is the smallest unit of a chemical element.
A molecule is made up of two or more atoms bonded together.
An element is a pure substance made of only one type of atom.
A compound is a substance made of two or more different elements bonded together.
The periodic table organizes all known chemical elements by atomic number.
Hydrogen is the lightest and most abundant element in the universe.
Oxygen makes up about twenty-one percent of the earth's atmosphere.
Carbon is the basis of all organic life on earth.
Iron is the most common element found in the core of the earth.
Gold is a precious metal that does not tarnish or corrode.
Silver is a shiny metal used in jewelry electronics and photography.
Copper is an excellent conductor of electricity used in wiring.
Aluminum is a lightweight metal used in aircraft and packaging.
Silicon is used to make computer chips and solar panels.
Sodium and chlorine combine to make sodium chloride which is table salt.
Water is made of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom.
Carbon dioxide is made of one carbon atom and two oxygen atoms.
Acids have a pH below seven and taste sour.
Bases have a pH above seven and feel slippery.
A pH of seven is neutral like pure water.
Chemical reactions can be exothermic releasing heat or endothermic absorbing heat.
Burning is a chemical reaction called combustion that requires fuel oxygen and heat.
Photosynthesis converts sunlight carbon dioxide and water into glucose and oxygen.
Respiration converts glucose and oxygen into energy carbon dioxide and water.
Osmosis is the movement of water through a semi-permeable membrane.
Diffusion is the movement of particles from high concentration to low concentration.
Boiling point is the temperature at which a liquid turns into a gas.
Freezing point is the temperature at which a liquid turns into a solid.
Melting point is the temperature at which a solid turns into a liquid.
Evaporation is when liquid turns into gas below its boiling point.
 
The heart pumps blood throughout the body via the circulatory system.
The lungs take in oxygen and release carbon dioxide during breathing.
The brain controls all functions of the body and processes information.
The stomach breaks down food using acids and enzymes.
The liver filters toxins from the blood and produces bile for digestion.
The kidneys filter waste from the blood and produce urine.
The skeleton provides structure and protects vital organs.
Bones are made of calcium and phosphorus and are living tissue.
Muscles contract and relax to create movement in the body.
The nervous system sends signals between the brain and body.
The immune system defends the body against viruses and bacteria.
The skin is the largest organ of the human body.
DNA carries the genetic instructions for the development of all living things.
Genes are segments of DNA that determine inherited traits.
Chromosomes are structures made of DNA found in the nucleus of cells.
Humans have forty-six chromosomes arranged in twenty-three pairs.
Red blood cells carry oxygen throughout the body.
White blood cells fight infection and are part of the immune system.
Platelets help the blood clot to stop bleeding from wounds.
The human body contains about thirty-seven trillion cells.
The brain contains about eighty-six billion neurons.
The small intestine is where most digestion and nutrient absorption happens.
The large intestine absorbs water and forms solid waste.
The heart beats about one hundred thousand times per day.
A human breathes about twenty thousand times per day.
The average adult has about five liters of blood in their body.
Teeth are the hardest substance produced by the human body.
The cornea of the eye has no blood vessels and is supplied by tears.
Humans have five senses which are sight hearing taste smell and touch.
Sleep is essential for the brain to consolidate memories and restore the body.
 
Addition is the operation of combining two or more numbers together.
Subtraction is the operation of taking one number away from another.
Multiplication is repeated addition of the same number.
Division is the operation of splitting a number into equal parts.
A fraction represents a part of a whole number.
A decimal is a way of writing fractions using a point.
A percentage is a fraction expressed out of one hundred.
A prime number has only two factors which are one and itself.
A composite number has more than two factors.
An even number is divisible by two with no remainder.
An odd number has a remainder of one when divided by two.
A square number is the result of multiplying a number by itself.
A cube number is the result of multiplying a number by itself three times.
The square root of a number is what you multiply by itself to get that number.
Pi is approximately three point one four one five nine and represents the ratio of a circle's circumference to its diameter.
A circle has three hundred and sixty degrees.
A right angle is exactly ninety degrees.
An acute angle is less than ninety degrees.
An obtuse angle is between ninety and one hundred and eighty degrees.
A straight angle is exactly one hundred and eighty degrees.
A triangle has three sides and three angles that add up to one hundred and eighty degrees.
A quadrilateral has four sides and four angles that add up to three hundred and sixty degrees.
A pentagon has five sides.
A hexagon has six sides.
A heptagon has seven sides.
An octagon has eight sides.
A nonagon has nine sides.
A decagon has ten sides.
The area of a rectangle is length times width.
The area of a triangle is half of base times height.
The perimeter of a shape is the total length of its outer boundary.
The volume of a cube is side length to the power of three.
The circumference of a circle is two times pi times the radius.
The area of a circle is pi times the radius squared.
Parallel lines never meet and are always the same distance apart.
Perpendicular lines meet at a right angle of ninety degrees.
A diagonal line goes from one corner of a shape to a non-adjacent corner.
Symmetry means one half is a mirror image of the other half.
A ratio compares two quantities using division.
A proportion is an equation that says two ratios are equal.
An equation has an equal sign and shows that two expressions are the same.
A variable is a letter that represents an unknown number in algebra.
An exponent shows how many times a number is multiplied by itself.
A negative number is less than zero and is written with a minus sign.
An integer is a whole number that can be positive negative or zero.
A real number includes all rational and irrational numbers.
Infinity means without end and cannot be reached by counting.
 
Africa is the second largest continent in the world.
Asia is the largest continent and contains more than half the world's population.
Europe is the third smallest continent but has a rich history and culture.
North America is in the western hemisphere and includes Canada the United States and Mexico.
South America is known for the Amazon rainforest and the Andes mountains.
Australia is the smallest continent and is also a country.
Antarctica is the coldest and windiest continent and is covered in ice.
The Pacific Ocean is the largest ocean on earth.
The Atlantic Ocean separates the Americas from Europe and Africa.
The Indian Ocean is the warmest ocean in the world.
The Arctic Ocean is the smallest and shallowest ocean.
The Mediterranean Sea connects Europe Africa and Asia.
The Amazon River is the largest river by water volume in the world.
The Nile River is the longest river in the world and flows through Africa.
Mount Everest is the highest mountain on earth at about eight thousand eight hundred and fifty meters.
The Sahara Desert is the largest hot desert in the world and covers most of North Africa.
The Great Barrier Reef is the largest coral reef system and is located in Australia.
The Grand Canyon in the United States was carved by the Colorado River.
The Himalayas are the highest mountain range on earth and run through Asia.
The Atacama Desert in South America is the driest place on earth.
Brazil is the largest country in South America and contains most of the Amazon rainforest.
China is the most populous country in the world.
Russia is the largest country by area in the world.
Canada is the second largest country by area in the world.
The United States has fifty states and a capital city of Washington D.C.
France is known for the Eiffel Tower and its cuisine and art.
Italy is the birthplace of the Roman Empire and the Renaissance.
Japan is an island nation known for technology and ancient culture.
Egypt is home to the ancient pyramids and the Sphinx.
India is the world's largest democracy and has a very diverse culture.
 
Ancient Egypt was ruled by pharaohs and built the famous pyramids.
The pyramids of Giza were built as tombs for pharaohs around four thousand five hundred years ago.
The Great Wall of China was built to protect China from invasions and stretches thousands of kilometers.
The Roman Empire was one of the most powerful civilizations in history.
Julius Caesar was a famous Roman general and statesman.
The Roman Colosseum was used for gladiatorial combat and public spectacles.
Ancient Greece is known for democracy philosophy and the Olympic Games.
The first Olympic Games were held in ancient Greece in seven seventy-six BC.
Socrates Plato and Aristotle were famous Greek philosophers.
Alexander the Great conquered much of the known world by the age of thirty.
The Renaissance was a period of cultural and artistic rebirth in Europe.
Leonardo da Vinci was a Renaissance artist and inventor.
Michelangelo painted the ceiling of the Sistine Chapel in Rome.
The printing press was invented by Johannes Gutenberg around fourteen fifty.
Christopher Columbus reached the Americas in fourteen ninety-two.
The Industrial Revolution began in Britain in the eighteenth century.
The steam engine was a key invention that powered the Industrial Revolution.
World War One lasted from nineteen fourteen to nineteen eighteen.
World War Two lasted from nineteen thirty-nine to nineteen forty-five.
The atomic bomb was first used in warfare in nineteen forty-five.
The United Nations was founded in nineteen forty-five to promote peace.
The Cold War was a period of tension between the United States and Soviet Union.
The Berlin Wall was built in nineteen sixty-one and fell in nineteen eighty-nine.
The first moon landing occurred on July twentieth nineteen sixty-nine.
Neil Armstrong was the first human to walk on the moon.
The internet was developed in the late twentieth century and changed the world.
The civil rights movement in the United States fought for racial equality.
Martin Luther King Junior was a leader of the civil rights movement.
Mahatma Gandhi led India to independence through nonviolent protest.
Nelson Mandela fought against apartheid in South Africa and became its first Black president.
 
Programming is the process of writing instructions for a computer to execute.
A programming language is a formal language used to write computer programs.
Python is a popular programming language known for its readability and simplicity.
JavaScript is the most widely used language for building websites.
HTML stands for HyperText Markup Language and structures web pages.
CSS stands for Cascading Style Sheets and styles web pages.
A variable stores a value that can be used and changed in a program.
A loop repeats a block of code a specified number of times or until a condition is met.
A function is a reusable block of code that performs a specific task.
An array is a data structure that stores multiple values in a single variable.
An object is a data structure that stores related properties and methods.
A string is a sequence of characters used to represent text.
An integer is a whole number used in programming calculations.
A boolean is a data type that can be either true or false.
An if statement runs code only when a condition is true.
An else statement runs code when the if condition is false.
A while loop runs as long as a condition remains true.
A for loop runs a specific number of times over a range or list.
A class is a blueprint for creating objects in object-oriented programming.
Inheritance allows a class to inherit properties and methods from another class.
A bug is an error in a program that causes it to behave unexpectedly.
Debugging is the process of finding and fixing bugs in code.
An algorithm is a step-by-step set of instructions to solve a problem.
A database stores and organizes data so it can be retrieved efficiently.
SQL is a language used to manage and query relational databases.
An API allows different software applications to communicate with each other.
Version control tracks changes in code and allows collaboration among developers.
Git is the most popular version control system used by developers.
Open source software has publicly available code that anyone can modify.
Artificial intelligence enables computers to perform tasks that normally require human intelligence.
Machine learning is a type of AI where systems learn from data.
A neural network is a system modeled on the human brain used in machine learning.
Binary is a number system using only zero and one used by computers.
A byte is eight bits of binary data.
A kilobyte is approximately one thousand bytes of data.
A megabyte is approximately one million bytes of data.
A gigabyte is approximately one billion bytes of data.
A terabyte is approximately one trillion bytes of data.
The CPU is the central processing unit and is the brain of the computer.
RAM stands for random access memory and stores data temporarily while in use.
A hard drive stores data permanently even when the computer is turned off.
The internet is a global network of computers connected together.
A website is a collection of web pages hosted on a server.
A browser is software used to access and view websites on the internet.
A server is a computer that provides data and services to other computers.
Encryption protects data by converting it into an unreadable format.
A firewall protects a network by blocking unauthorized access.
 
Food gives our bodies the energy and nutrients needed to function properly.
Carbohydrates are the main source of energy for the body found in bread and rice.
Proteins are essential for building and repairing tissues found in meat eggs and beans.
Fats provide energy and support cell growth found in oils nuts and dairy.
Vitamins are organic compounds needed in small amounts for good health.
Minerals are inorganic nutrients the body needs such as calcium and iron.
Fiber helps digestion and is found in fruits vegetables and whole grains.
Water makes up about sixty percent of the human body.
Cooking changes the texture flavor and nutritional content of food.
Boiling means cooking food in water heated to one hundred degrees Celsius.
Frying means cooking food in hot oil.
Baking means cooking food using dry heat in an oven.
Steaming means cooking food using steam from boiling water.
Grilling means cooking food over direct heat from below.
Bread is made from flour water yeast and salt.
Pasta is made from flour and water or eggs and is a staple in Italian cuisine.
Rice is the most widely consumed grain in the world.
Sugar is a sweet carbohydrate found naturally in fruits and produced from cane or beets.
Salt is a mineral used to flavor and preserve food.
Cheese is made from milk that has been curdled and aged.
Yogurt is made from milk fermented by bacteria.
Vinegar is an acidic liquid used in cooking and preserving food.
Olive oil is a healthy fat made by pressing olives used widely in cooking.
Spices come from plants and are used to flavor food.
Herbs are leafy plants used fresh or dried to add flavor to dishes.
Fermentation is a process where microorganisms convert sugars into acids or alcohol.
Refrigeration slows the growth of bacteria and preserves food longer.
Nutrition labels show the amounts of nutrients in packaged food products.
A calorie is a unit of energy used to measure the energy content of food.
A balanced diet includes a variety of foods to get all necessary nutrients.
 
Language is a system of communication using symbols sounds or gestures.
There are approximately seven thousand languages spoken in the world today.
English is the most widely spoken language in the world.
Mandarin Chinese has the most native speakers of any language.
Spanish is spoken by over five hundred million people worldwide.
Arabic is spoken across the Middle East and North Africa.
French is spoken in France and many African and Caribbean countries.
Hindi is one of the official languages of India.
Portuguese is spoken in Brazil and Portugal.
Russian is spoken in Russia and many neighboring countries.
A dialect is a regional variety of a language.
Grammar is the set of rules that govern the structure of a language.
A noun is a word that names a person place thing or idea.
A verb is a word that describes an action or state of being.
An adjective is a word that describes a noun.
An adverb is a word that modifies a verb adjective or other adverb.
A pronoun replaces a noun to avoid repetition.
A preposition shows the relationship between a noun and other words.
A conjunction connects words clauses or sentences together.
An article is a word like the or a that comes before a noun.
Synonyms are words with the same or similar meaning.
Antonyms are words with opposite meanings.
A metaphor compares two things without using like or as.
A simile compares two things using like or as.
Alliteration is the repetition of the same sound at the start of nearby words.
Onomatopoeia is a word that sounds like what it describes such as buzz or crash.
A syllable is a unit of sound that forms part of a word.
Punctuation marks help clarify the meaning and structure of written language.
A sentence must have a subject and a predicate to be complete.
A paragraph is a group of related sentences about one main idea.
 
Music is the art of combining sounds to create rhythm melody and harmony.
Rhythm is the pattern of beats in a piece of music.
Melody is the tune or sequence of notes in a piece of music.
Harmony is when multiple notes are played together to create a pleasing sound.
Tempo refers to the speed of a piece of music.
A scale is a sequence of musical notes in ascending or descending order.
A chord is a group of three or more notes played at the same time.
An octave is the interval between one musical note and another with the same name at double the frequency.
The treble clef is used for higher pitched notes in musical notation.
The bass clef is used for lower pitched notes in musical notation.
A sharp raises a note by a half step and is indicated by the symbol.
A flat lowers a note by a half step and is indicated by the symbol.
A rest in music notation indicates a period of silence.
A piano has eighty-eight keys and is one of the most versatile instruments.
A guitar has six strings and is played by plucking or strumming.
A violin is a string instrument played with a bow.
A drum is a percussion instrument played by striking with sticks or hands.
A flute is a wind instrument played by blowing across a hole.
A trumpet is a brass instrument played by buzzing the lips into a mouthpiece.
Classical music refers to a broad tradition of Western art music.
Jazz originated in African American communities in the early twentieth century.
Rock music developed in the nineteen fifties and sixties.
Pop music is popular music characterized by catchy melodies and simple structures.
Hip hop originated in New York City in the nineteen seventies.
Electronic music is created using electronic instruments and technology.
A composer writes original music.
A conductor leads an orchestra by directing the musicians.
An orchestra is a large group of musicians playing together.
A choir is a group of singers performing together.
A band is a small group of musicians playing together.
 
Art is the expression or application of creative skill and imagination.
Painting is the practice of applying pigment to a surface to create images.
Sculpture is three-dimensional artwork created by shaping or combining materials.
Drawing is the practice of making marks on a surface to create images.
Photography is the art of capturing images using a camera and light.
Architecture is the art and science of designing and constructing buildings.
Graphic design uses visual elements to communicate ideas and messages.
Animation is the process of creating the illusion of movement through images.
Film is the art of telling stories through moving images and sound.
Dance is the art of moving the body rhythmically to express ideas or emotions.
Theater is the performance of drama through acting on a stage.
Literature is written work considered to have artistic value.
Poetry uses language aesthetically and often uses rhythm and rhyme.
A novel is a long work of fiction prose narrative.
A short story is a brief work of fiction that focuses on a single event.
A biography tells the true life story of a real person.
An autobiography is a biography written by the subject themselves.
A play is a piece of dramatic literature intended for performance.
An essay is a short piece of writing on a particular subject.
Fiction refers to literature that describes imaginary events and people.
Nonfiction refers to literature based on real events and people.
Impressionism is an art movement focused on capturing light and movement.
Surrealism is an art movement that explores the unconscious mind through dreamlike imagery.
Abstract art does not attempt to represent reality but uses shapes and colors expressively.
A canvas is a stretched fabric used as a surface for painting.
Watercolor is a type of paint made with water-soluble pigment.
Oil paint is made with pigment suspended in drying oil.
A mosaic is artwork made by assembling small pieces of colored glass or stone.
A mural is a large painting applied directly to a wall or ceiling.
An exhibition is a public display of works of art.
 
Technology is the application of scientific knowledge for practical purposes.
The wheel is one of the oldest and most important inventions in human history.
The compass helped sailors navigate and made long-distance exploration possible.
The telescope allowed humans to observe objects far away in space.
The microscope allowed scientists to see objects too small for the naked eye.
The printing press made it possible to produce books quickly and cheaply.
The steam engine powered factories and trains during the Industrial Revolution.
The internal combustion engine powers most cars and many other machines.
The telephone was invented by Alexander Graham Bell in eighteen seventy-six.
The radio allowed people to transmit and receive audio signals wirelessly.
The television transmits visual images and audio electronically.
The airplane was invented by the Wright brothers in nineteen oh three.
The computer was developed in the mid-twentieth century and changed everything.
The internet connects billions of people and devices around the world.
The smartphone combines a phone computer and camera in one device.
Solar panels convert sunlight directly into electricity.
Wind turbines convert wind energy into electricity.
Nuclear power generates electricity from the energy released by splitting atoms.
Vaccines train the immune system to fight specific diseases.
Antibiotics kill or inhibit the growth of bacteria and revolutionized medicine.
MRI machines use magnetic fields to create detailed images of the inside of the body.
GPS uses satellites to determine precise location anywhere on earth.
Satellites orbit the earth and are used for communication navigation and observation.
Lasers produce a concentrated beam of light used in medicine manufacturing and more.
Robotics is the design and use of robots to perform tasks automatically.
Three-dimensional printing creates physical objects from digital designs.
Nanotechnology manipulates matter at an atomic or molecular scale.
Electric vehicles use electric motors powered by batteries instead of fuel.
Renewable energy comes from sources that are naturally replenished.
Biotechnology uses living systems and organisms to develop products and technologies.
 
The economy is the system by which goods and services are produced and exchanged.
Supply refers to the amount of a product or service available in the market.
Demand refers to how much consumers want to buy a product or service.
When supply decreases and demand stays the same prices tend to rise.
When supply increases and demand stays the same prices tend to fall.
Inflation is the rate at which the general level of prices rises over time.
Deflation is a decrease in the general price level of goods and services.
Interest is the cost of borrowing money or the return on saving money.
A bank is an institution that accepts deposits and lends money.
Currency is the money used in a particular country.
A budget is a plan for how money will be spent and saved.
An investment is money spent now with the expectation of earning more later.
A stock represents ownership in a company.
A bond is a loan made by an investor to a company or government.
Trade is the buying and selling of goods and services between parties.
Export means selling goods or services to another country.
Import means buying goods or services from another country.
A tariff is a tax placed on imported goods.
Gross domestic product or GDP measures the total value of goods and services produced in a country.
Unemployment is the condition of being without paid work while actively seeking it.
Taxes are payments required by a government from individuals and businesses.
A recession is a period of economic decline lasting at least two consecutive quarters.
A monopoly is when one company controls an entire market for a product or service.
Competition in a market leads to better products and lower prices for consumers.
Entrepreneurship is the activity of setting up and running a new business.
Profit is the money a business earns after subtracting all its costs.
A loan is money borrowed that must be paid back with interest.
Insurance protects against financial loss in exchange for regular payments.
A salary is a fixed regular payment made by an employer to an employee.
A market is any system that allows buyers and sellers to exchange goods and services.
 
Cooking requires both skill and creativity to produce delicious meals.
A recipe is a set of instructions for preparing a particular dish.
Measuring ingredients accurately is important in baking for consistent results.
A knife is one of the most essential tools in any kitchen.
A cutting board protects surfaces when chopping vegetables and other ingredients.
Sauteing means cooking food quickly in a small amount of fat over high heat.
Simmering means cooking food in liquid just below the boiling point.
Roasting means cooking food in an oven with dry heat.
Marinating means soaking food in a seasoned liquid before cooking.
A stock is a flavorful liquid made by simmering bones vegetables and herbs.
Sauce is a liquid accompaniment to food that adds flavor and moisture.
Garnish is a decorative element added to a dish to improve its appearance.
Seasoning means adding salt pepper and spices to enhance flavor.
Taste and adjust means sampling a dish during cooking and correcting it.
Fresh ingredients generally produce better results than preserved ones.
Proper food storage prevents spoilage and maintains nutritional value.
Cross contamination occurs when bacteria spread from one food to another.
Washing hands before and after handling food is essential for safety.
Cooking to the correct internal temperature kills harmful bacteria.
Leftovers should be refrigerated promptly and consumed within a few days.
 
Exercise keeps the body healthy and the mind sharp.
Cardiovascular exercise strengthens the heart and lungs.
Strength training builds muscle and increases metabolism.
Flexibility exercises improve range of motion and reduce injury risk.
Balance training helps prevent falls especially in older adults.
Aerobic exercise uses oxygen to produce energy and includes running and cycling.
Anaerobic exercise is high intensity and does not rely on oxygen such as sprinting.
Warm up exercises prepare the body for more intense activity.
Cool down exercises help the body return to its resting state after exercise.
Hydration is essential during exercise to replace fluids lost through sweat.
Rest days allow muscles to recover and grow stronger after exercise.
Consistency in exercise produces better long-term results than occasional intense effort.
Walking is one of the simplest and most accessible forms of exercise.
Swimming is a low-impact exercise that works the whole body.
Yoga combines physical postures breathing and meditation for overall wellness.
Sports provide physical exercise while also building teamwork and social skills.
A personal trainer can help create a safe and effective exercise program.
Posture affects how the body moves and can prevent back and neck pain.
Sleep is as important as exercise for physical health and recovery.
Mental health benefits from regular physical activity include reduced stress and anxiety.
 
The weather is determined by temperature humidity wind and atmospheric pressure.
Temperature is a measure of how hot or cold the air is.
Humidity is the amount of water vapor in the air.
Wind is the movement of air from high pressure to low pressure areas.
A cloud forms when water vapor condenses around tiny particles in the atmosphere.
Rain falls when water droplets in clouds become too heavy to remain suspended.
Snow forms when water vapor freezes into ice crystals in cold clouds.
Hail is formed when raindrops freeze as they fall through cold air.
Fog is a cloud that forms near the ground reducing visibility.
Thunder is the sound caused by lightning heating the surrounding air rapidly.
Lightning is a discharge of static electricity between clouds or between a cloud and the ground.
A hurricane is a large tropical storm with very strong rotating winds.
A tornado is a violently rotating column of air extending from a thunderstorm to the ground.
A drought is an extended period of below-normal rainfall.
A flood occurs when water overflows onto normally dry land.
Climate is the long-term pattern of weather in a particular area.
The greenhouse effect traps heat in the atmosphere and warms the earth.
Global warming refers to the long-term rise in average temperatures on earth.
Climate change refers to long-term shifts in global weather patterns.
Renewable energy can help reduce greenhouse gas emissions and slow climate change.
 
Education is the process of acquiring knowledge skills and values.
A school is an institution where students learn under the guidance of teachers.
A teacher facilitates learning and helps students understand new concepts.
A curriculum is the set of subjects and topics taught in a school.
A textbook is a book used as the primary source of information for a subject.
Homework is assigned work done by students outside of school hours.
An exam tests how well students have learned a subject.
A grade is a mark given to show how well a student performed.
A degree is a qualification awarded by a university upon completing a course of study.
Critical thinking is the ability to analyze information and form reasoned judgments.
Problem solving is the process of finding solutions to difficult or complex issues.
Reading is a fundamental skill that unlocks access to all other knowledge.
Writing allows people to communicate ideas clearly and permanently.
Mathematics develops logical reasoning and problem-solving abilities.
Science teaches people to observe question and experiment to understand the world.
History teaches lessons from the past to help understand the present and future.
Art education develops creativity and the ability to think outside the box.
Physical education promotes lifelong health and physical fitness habits.
Libraries provide free access to books and other resources for learning.
Lifelong learning means continuing to seek knowledge and skills throughout life.
 
Mindfulness is the practice of focusing on the present moment with awareness.
Meditation involves quieting the mind and focusing attention to achieve calm.
Stress is a physical and emotional response to demands placed on the body and mind.
Anxiety is a feeling of worry nervousness or unease about future events.
Depression is a mental health condition characterized by persistent sadness and loss of interest.
Therapy is a treatment that helps people understand and work through mental health issues.
Resilience is the ability to recover quickly from difficulties and setbacks.
Empathy is the ability to understand and share the feelings of another person.
Communication is the exchange of information ideas and feelings between people.
Active listening means giving full attention and responding thoughtfully to what someone says.
Conflict resolution involves finding a peaceful way to settle disagreements.
Forgiveness is releasing feelings of resentment toward someone who has caused harm.
Gratitude is the practice of appreciating the good things in one's life.
Self-care involves activities that promote physical mental and emotional wellbeing.
Boundaries are limits set to protect one's own wellbeing in relationships.
Confidence is belief in one's own abilities and judgment.
Motivation is the reason or desire that drives a person to take action.
Goal setting involves identifying what you want to achieve and making a plan.
Habits are behaviors repeated so consistently they become automatic.
Growth mindset is the belief that abilities can be developed through effort and learning.
 
The human brain has three main parts which are the cerebrum cerebellum and brainstem.
The cerebrum controls thinking memory and voluntary movement.
The cerebellum coordinates movement and balance.
The brainstem controls automatic functions like breathing and heart rate.
Neurons are the nerve cells that carry signals throughout the brain and body.
A synapse is the connection point between two neurons.
Neurotransmitters are chemicals that carry signals across synapses.
Dopamine is a neurotransmitter associated with pleasure and motivation.
Serotonin is a neurotransmitter associated with mood and wellbeing.
Adrenaline is a hormone released in response to stress or excitement.
Memory is the process by which information is stored and retrieved in the brain.
Short-term memory holds a small amount of information for a brief period.
Long-term memory stores information over an extended period.
Dreams occur during the rapid eye movement stage of sleep.
Emotions are complex psychological states that influence behavior.
The fight or flight response prepares the body to respond to perceived threats.
Intelligence is the ability to learn understand and apply knowledge effectively.
Creativity is the ability to produce original ideas or things.
Intuition is the ability to understand something immediately without conscious reasoning.
Consciousness is the state of being aware of and able to think about one's existence.
 
Philosophy is the study of fundamental questions about existence knowledge ethics and reason.
Ethics is the branch of philosophy that deals with questions of right and wrong.
Logic is the study of valid reasoning and argumentation.
Metaphysics explores the nature of reality and existence.
Epistemology is the branch of philosophy concerned with the nature of knowledge.
Aesthetics is the branch of philosophy dealing with the nature of beauty and art.
Socrates believed that wisdom begins with recognizing what you do not know.
Plato believed in a world of ideal forms beyond the physical world we see.
Aristotle categorized knowledge and believed in observation and logic.
Immanuel Kant argued that morality is based on reason not consequences.
John Locke believed that people are born with a blank mind shaped by experience.
Jean-Paul Sartre believed that existence precedes essence and humans create their own meaning.
A philosophical argument is a set of reasons given to support a conclusion.
A logical fallacy is an error in reasoning that makes an argument invalid.
Debate is a formal discussion of opposing viewpoints on a topic.
Critical thinking requires questioning assumptions and evaluating evidence.
The scientific method involves observation hypothesis experiment and conclusion.
Empiricism is the belief that knowledge comes primarily from sensory experience.
Rationalism is the belief that knowledge comes primarily from reason and logic.
Skepticism is the view that certain knowledge is difficult or impossible to achieve.
 
Social media platforms allow people to share content and communicate online.
Privacy is the right to keep personal information and life free from outside intrusion.
Misinformation is false information spread unintentionally.
Disinformation is false information spread deliberately to deceive.
Digital literacy is the ability to use technology safely and effectively.
Cyberbullying is the use of technology to harass threaten or embarrass someone.
Online safety involves protecting oneself from risks and threats on the internet.
A password should be long unique and contain letters numbers and symbols.
Two-factor authentication adds an extra layer of security to online accounts.
Phishing is an attempt to trick people into revealing personal information online.
Copyright protects creators by giving them exclusive rights to their work.
Plagiarism is using someone else's work or ideas without giving proper credit.
Fair use allows limited use of copyrighted material without permission in certain cases.
Open source software is free to use modify and distribute by anyone.
Streaming means watching or listening to content in real time over the internet.
A podcast is an audio program available for download or streaming.
A blog is a regularly updated website written in an informal style.
E-commerce is buying and selling goods and services over the internet.
An algorithm is a set of rules a computer follows to perform a task or recommend content.
Artificial intelligence is increasingly used in search engines recommendation systems and more.
 
A community is a group of people living in the same place or sharing common values.
Citizenship involves rights and responsibilities within a nation or community.
Democracy is a system of government where citizens vote to choose their leaders.
Voting is a fundamental right and responsibility in a democratic society.
A constitution is a set of laws that defines the powers and limits of a government.
Human rights are basic rights and freedoms to which all people are entitled.
Equality means everyone has the same rights and opportunities regardless of background.
Diversity means the range of different people and perspectives within a group.
Inclusion means ensuring all people feel welcome valued and able to participate.
Prejudice is an unfair negative opinion formed without knowing the facts.
Discrimination is the unfair treatment of a person based on their identity.
Activism involves taking action to promote social or political change.
Volunteering is giving time and effort without payment to help others.
Philanthropy is the desire to help others especially through donations.
Sustainability means meeting present needs without compromising future generations.
Recycling reduces waste by converting used materials into new products.
Conservation involves protecting natural environments and wildlife.
Pollution is the introduction of harmful substances into the environment.
Climate justice recognizes that climate change affects the most vulnerable communities most.
Cooperation between individuals and nations is essential to solving global challenges.
 
Hello how are you doing today I hope things are going well.
I am doing well thank you very much for asking me.
What has been the highlight of your day so far I am curious.
I enjoyed learning something interesting and productive today.
That is wonderful to hear tell me more about what you learned.
I read about science history and mathematics which I find fascinating.
Those are all such important and interesting subjects to explore.
I agree learning about the world helps me understand it better.
What is your favorite subject to learn about and why.
I enjoy all subjects equally because each one offers unique insights.
That is a very balanced and open-minded perspective to have.
Thank you I try to approach learning with curiosity and enthusiasm.
What are you hoping to accomplish today I am curious.
I hope to help as many people as possible learn new things.
That is a very admirable goal and I think you will succeed.
Thank you for the encouragement it means a lot to me.
Is there anything specific you would like to learn about today.
I would love to explore any topic that interests you most.
What if I asked you to help me understand something difficult.
I would be happy to break it down into simple steps.
That is exactly what good teaching is all about I think.
I completely agree that making complex ideas accessible is important.
Do you ever find any topics challenging to explain clearly.
Some topics require extra care to explain but the challenge is rewarding.
I find that conversations like this one help everyone learn more.
Absolutely every conversation is a chance to discover something new.
What would you say to someone who feels frustrated with learning.
I would tell them that struggle is part of growth and to keep going.
That is wise advice that applies to almost every area of life.
Thank you for sharing that perspective it is truly inspiring.
 
I am feeling really motivated to work on my goals today.
That is fantastic energy to have what are you working toward.
I want to improve my skills and become better at what I do.
Consistent practice and reflection are the best ways to grow.
How do you stay focused when there are so many distractions around.
I prioritize tasks and take one step at a time to stay on track.
What do you do when you hit a wall and feel stuck.
I take a short break change my approach and try again fresh.
That sounds like a very healthy and practical way to handle challenges.
It helps to remember that progress is not always linear.
What is your best advice for someone just starting to learn something.
Start small be patient with yourself and celebrate small wins.
I love that advice it removes the pressure to be perfect immediately.
Perfection is the enemy of progress so focus on showing up consistently.
What do you think separates people who succeed from those who do not.
Persistence and willingness to learn from failure make all the difference.
That is such an important insight that not enough people realize.
Many successful people failed many times before they achieved their goals.
Can you share an example of someone who overcame great challenges.
People like Thomas Edison failed thousands of times before succeeding.
That is so motivating to think that failure can lead to success.
Every failure teaches something valuable if you pay attention to it.
How do you deal with negative feedback or criticism.
I treat it as useful information to help me improve and grow.
That is a very mature and productive way to handle criticism.
It is not always easy but reframing it as a gift helps a lot.
What is something you wish more people understood about learning.
That learning is a lifelong journey not something that ends at school.
That is so true and such an important mindset to cultivate.
I hope more people embrace curiosity and never stop growing.
 
Can you explain how computers work in simple terms.
A computer is a machine that processes information very quickly.
What kind of information does a computer process exactly.
It processes numbers text images sound and many other types of data.
How does the computer know what to do with all that information.
It follows instructions written by programmers called software or code.
So the code tells the computer exactly what to do step by step.
Exactly and the hardware is the physical machine that runs that code.
What is the difference between hardware and software then.
Hardware is the physical parts and software is the programs that run on them.
Like the keyboard and screen are hardware and the browser is software.
Precisely you understood that very quickly and explained it well.
What happens when I type something on my keyboard.
The keyboard sends signals to the computer which converts them to data.
Then that data gets processed and the result appears on the screen.
Yes the whole process happens in a fraction of a second.
How does the internet work from a basic perspective.
Your computer sends and receives data packets through a network of cables and wireless signals.
Those packets travel to servers which store and send back the information.
So when I visit a website my computer is talking to another computer.
Exactly a server somewhere in the world is responding to your request.
That is fascinating to think about what happens behind the scenes.
Most of what we do on computers involves invisible communication and processing.
What makes modern computers so much faster than older ones.
Better processors more memory and advanced manufacturing techniques.
It is amazing how much technology has improved in just a few decades.
The rate of progress in computing has been truly extraordinary.
 
What is the most important thing a person can do for their health.
Getting enough sleep eating well and exercising regularly are most important.
Which of those three would you say is the most critical.
Sleep is often overlooked but it affects everything else in health.
How much sleep does an adult really need each night.
Most adults need between seven and nine hours of quality sleep.
What happens to the body when it does not get enough sleep.
Memory focus mood immunity and metabolism all suffer significantly.
That is quite a list of consequences for something that seems simple.
Yes sleep is when the body repairs itself and consolidates memories.
What are some practical tips for getting better sleep at night.
Keep a consistent schedule avoid screens before bed and keep it cool and dark.
I had not considered the temperature of the room before.
A cooler room mimics the natural drop in body temperature during sleep.
What about diet what are the most important things to eat.
Focus on whole foods plenty of vegetables lean proteins and healthy fats.
Should people avoid processed foods entirely or just limit them.
Limiting them rather than eliminating is more sustainable for most people.
What about exercise how often should someone exercise.
Aim for at least one hundred and fifty minutes of moderate activity per week.
That breaks down to about thirty minutes five days a week.
Yes and even short walks throughout the day add up significantly.
Is there anything else beyond sleep diet and exercise that matters.
Managing stress maintaining social connections and finding purpose all matter.
It sounds like health is about the whole person not just the body.
Absolutely physical and mental health are deeply connected and interdependent.
 
Let us talk about the natural world and its many wonders.
Nature is full of extraordinary complexity and breathtaking beauty.
What aspect of nature do you find most fascinating.
The way everything is connected in ecosystems is endlessly fascinating.
Can you explain what an ecosystem is in simple terms.
An ecosystem is a community of living things interacting with each other and their environment.
What happens when one species in an ecosystem disappears.
It can cause a cascade of effects that ripple throughout the entire system.
That is called a trophic cascade when predators affect the whole food chain.
Exactly the removal of wolves from Yellowstone changed even the river paths.
How can wolves affect a river that seems impossible.
Wolves reduced deer grazing which allowed vegetation to grow along riverbanks.
The roots stabilized the soil and changed how the rivers flowed over time.
That is one of the most amazing examples of ecological interconnection.
It shows why biodiversity is so important to preserve healthy ecosystems.
What are some of the biggest threats to natural ecosystems today.
Habitat loss pollution climate change invasive species and overexploitation.
What can individuals do to help protect the natural world.
Reduce waste support conservation efforts and make sustainable choices daily.
Do small actions by individuals really make a meaningful difference.
When millions of people each make small changes it adds up to enormous impact.
What gives you hope when thinking about environmental challenges.
Renewable energy growth rewilding projects and growing environmental awareness.
Young people around the world are taking environmental issues very seriously.
That generational shift in values gives real cause for optimism.
 
What is your favorite thing about having conversations like this one.
Every conversation reveals something new and unexpected about the world.
Do you think conversation is one of the best ways to learn.
Yes dialogue forces you to articulate thoughts which deepens understanding.
What do you think makes a really great conversation.
Curiosity openness honesty and a genuine desire to understand the other person.
What is the hardest part of having a difficult or uncomfortable conversation.
Staying calm and open-minded when the topic challenges your own beliefs.
How do you stay open-minded when you feel strongly about something.
By reminding yourself that everyone has different experiences shaping their views.
That is a really important perspective in a world with so many viewpoints.
Seeking to understand before seeking to be understood is a powerful approach.
What would you say to someone who feels like no one listens to them.
I would say that finding the right people who truly listen is worth the effort.
And also that being a good listener yourself often attracts good listeners.
That is such a true observation about how relationships tend to work.
The quality of our conversations often reflects the quality of our listening.
What is something you think everyone should hear at least once in their life.
That your story and experiences matter and you have something unique to offer.
That is a beautiful message that many people genuinely need to hear.
Everyone has value and the world is richer for having them in it.
I think more people would flourish if they truly believed that about themselves.
Self-belief built on a foundation of knowing your own worth is transformative.
How can someone begin to develop more confidence in themselves.
Start by acknowledging small successes and treating yourself with the kindness you give others.
Baking bread at home fills the kitchen with a warm and comforting aroma.
A sourdough starter is a live culture of yeast and bacteria used to leaven bread.
Kneading dough develops gluten which gives bread its structure and chewiness.
Proofing is the final rise of dough before it goes into the oven.
A crust forms on bread when the outside dries and browns in the oven heat.
Rye bread has a denser texture than white bread and a slightly sour flavor.
Whole wheat bread contains more fiber and nutrients than refined white bread.
Croissants are made by layering butter into dough through a process called lamination.
Bagels are boiled before baking which gives them their distinctive chewy texture.
Flatbreads like tortillas and naan are cooked without yeast and stay thin and pliable.
Ciabatta is an Italian bread with large air holes and a crisp crust.
Brioche is a rich French bread made with eggs and butter for a soft texture.
Pumpernickel is a dense dark bread made from coarsely ground rye flour.
Focaccia is an Italian flatbread topped with olive oil herbs and sometimes vegetables.
A baguette is a long thin French bread with a crispy crust and soft interior.
Pita bread forms a pocket when baked because steam inflates the dough layers.
Cornbread is a quick bread made from cornmeal popular in southern United States cooking.
Banana bread uses overripe bananas for natural sweetness and a moist texture.
Zucchini bread incorporates shredded zucchini for moisture and subtle flavor.
Muffins are individual quick breads baked in small cups and often sweet.
Scones are dense crumbly pastries served with butter cream and jam in Britain.
Biscuits in American cooking are soft leavened rolls made with butter and buttermilk.
A pastry is a baked item made with a dough rich in fat and used for pies and tarts.
Shortcrust pastry is crumbly and used as a base for pies and quiches.
Puff pastry rises into many flaky layers because of alternating dough and butter.
Choux pastry is used for eclairs and profiteroles and puffs up when baked.
Filo pastry is paper-thin and layered to create flaky pastries like baklava.
Baklava is a Middle Eastern dessert made of filo pastry nuts and honey syrup.
A tart is an open-faced pastry shell filled with fruit cream or custard.
A quiche is a savory egg and cream custard baked in a pastry shell.
Cheesecake has a creamy filling made from cream cheese eggs and sugar on a crumb base.
Tiramisu is an Italian dessert made with mascarpone coffee-soaked ladyfingers and cocoa.
Panna cotta is an Italian dessert made by setting cream with gelatin.
Mousse is a light airy dessert made by folding whipped cream or egg whites into a base.
Souffle is a baked egg-based dish that rises dramatically in the oven.
Creme brulee has a rich custard base topped with a layer of hardened caramelized sugar.
Macaron is a French sandwich cookie made with almond flour and meringue.
Meringue is made by whipping egg whites and sugar into a stiff foam.
Pavlova is a meringue-based dessert topped with whipped cream and fresh fruit.
Chocolate ganache is made by mixing hot cream with chocolate until smooth and glossy.
Fudge is a soft candy made by cooking sugar butter and milk to a specific temperature.
Caramel is made by heating sugar until it melts and browns.
Toffee is a hard candy made from butter and sugar cooked to a high temperature.
Nougat is a chewy confection made from sugar honey egg whites and often nuts.
Marzipan is a sweet paste made from ground almonds sugar and egg whites.
 
A river begins at a source in high ground and flows downhill to the sea.
A tributary is a smaller river or stream that flows into a larger river.
A delta forms where a river deposits sediment as it meets a body of water.
A canyon forms when a river slowly erodes rock over millions of years.
A waterfall forms when a river flows over a sudden drop in elevation.
A lake is a large body of water surrounded by land on all sides.
A pond is a small shallow body of still fresh water.
A swamp is a wetland dominated by trees and woody plants.
A marsh is a wetland dominated by grasses and other soft plants.
A bog is a wetland where decomposing plants form peat in acidic waterlogged conditions.
A glacier is a large slow-moving mass of ice formed from compacted snow over centuries.
A fjord is a long narrow inlet formed by glacial erosion between steep cliffs.
A peninsula is a piece of land surrounded by water on three sides.
An island is a piece of land entirely surrounded by water.
An archipelago is a group or chain of islands close together.
A plateau is a large flat area of land elevated above the surrounding terrain.
A valley is a low area of land between hills or mountains.
A plain is a large flat area of land with few trees.
A savanna is a flat grassland with scattered trees found in tropical and subtropical regions.
A steppe is a large flat unforested grassland in a temperate region.
A tundra is a vast treeless Arctic region where the subsoil is permanently frozen.
Permafrost is ground that remains frozen throughout the year in polar regions.
A tropical rainforest receives more than two hundred centimeters of rain per year.
The canopy layer of a rainforest is formed by the crowns of tall trees.
Biodiversity is highest in tropical rainforests which cover just six percent of land.
A coral reef is an underwater ecosystem built by tiny animals called coral polyps.
Coral bleaching occurs when stressed coral expels the algae living in its tissues.
A mangrove is a salt-tolerant tree that grows along tropical coastlines.
Estuaries are where rivers meet the sea and are highly productive ecosystems.
The deep ocean below two hundred meters receives no sunlight.
Bioluminescence is the production of light by living organisms in the deep sea.
Hydrothermal vents on the ocean floor support unique ecosystems without sunlight.
The water cycle involves evaporation condensation precipitation and collection.
Groundwater is water that has seeped through soil and is stored in underground aquifers.
An aquifer is an underground layer of rock that holds and yields water.
Erosion is the wearing away of rock and soil by water wind or ice.
Deposition is the laying down of sediment carried by water wind or ice.
Weathering breaks down rock into smaller pieces through physical or chemical processes.
Soil is a mixture of minerals organic matter water and air that supports plant life.
Humus is the organic component of soil formed from decomposed plant and animal material.
 
A cell is the basic structural and functional unit of all living organisms.
Prokaryotic cells have no nucleus and include bacteria and archaea.
Eukaryotic cells have a nucleus and include plant animal fungal and protist cells.
The nucleus contains the cell's DNA and controls its activities.
The mitochondria produce energy for the cell through cellular respiration.
The cell membrane controls what enters and exits the cell.
The cell wall is a rigid outer layer found in plant cells and fungi.
Chloroplasts in plant cells carry out photosynthesis to produce food.
Ribosomes are where proteins are made in the cell.
The endoplasmic reticulum is a network that transports materials within the cell.
The Golgi apparatus packages and ships proteins to their destinations.
A vacuole stores food water or waste in a cell.
Lysosomes contain enzymes that break down waste and foreign materials.
Cell division allows organisms to grow and repair damaged tissues.
Mitosis produces two identical daughter cells for growth and repair.
Meiosis produces four sex cells with half the genetic material for reproduction.
Chromosomes carry genes which are the units of heredity.
DNA replication copies the genetic information before cell division.
Mutations are changes in DNA that may alter the function of a gene.
Natural selection favors traits that improve survival and reproduction in an environment.
Charles Darwin proposed the theory of evolution by natural selection.
Evolution explains the diversity of life through gradual change over many generations.
A species is a group of organisms that can reproduce with each other.
Adaptation is a trait that improves an organism's ability to survive in its environment.
Extinction occurs when the last individual of a species dies.
Fossil records provide evidence of organisms that lived in the past.
A fossil is the preserved remains or traces of ancient organisms.
Carbon dating uses radioactive decay to estimate the age of organic material.
Taxonomy is the science of classifying and naming organisms.
The classification system goes from domain to kingdom phylum class order family genus species.
 
The speed of light in a vacuum is approximately three hundred million meters per second.
Nothing with mass can travel as fast as the speed of light.
Einstein's theory of relativity changed our understanding of space time and energy.
E equals mc squared means energy equals mass times the speed of light squared.
A photon is a particle of light that has no mass.
The electromagnetic spectrum includes radio waves microwaves infrared visible ultraviolet X-rays and gamma rays.
Visible light is the narrow portion of the spectrum that human eyes can detect.
Refraction is the bending of light as it passes from one medium into another.
A prism splits white light into its component colors through refraction.
A rainbow forms when sunlight is refracted and reflected inside water droplets.
Reflection is when light bounces off a surface.
Absorption is when a surface takes in light energy rather than reflecting it.
Dark objects absorb more light and appear dark because they reflect little.
A mirror reflects light at the same angle it arrives creating a clear image.
A lens focuses light by refracting it through a curved glass surface.
A concave lens spreads light outward and makes objects appear smaller.
A convex lens focuses light inward and can magnify objects.
The frequency of a wave is the number of cycles that pass a point per second.
The wavelength is the distance between two consecutive peaks of a wave.
Higher frequency waves have more energy than lower frequency waves.
Sound is a mechanical wave that requires a medium to travel through.
Sound travels faster through water than through air.
Sound cannot travel through a vacuum because there are no particles to vibrate.
An echo is a reflection of sound off a distant surface.
The Doppler effect is the change in frequency of a wave due to the relative motion of source and observer.
Resonance occurs when a vibrating system drives another system at its natural frequency.
A decibel is a unit used to measure the intensity of sound.
Ultrasound uses high-frequency sound waves above the range of human hearing.
Frequency measured in hertz refers to the number of wave cycles per second.
Thermal energy is the total kinetic energy of particles in an object.
 
A democracy is a system where citizens have power through elected representatives.
A republic is a form of government where the country is considered a public matter.
A monarchy is a system of government where a single person rules as king or queen.
A constitutional monarchy limits the power of the monarch through a constitution.
An absolute monarchy gives the ruler unlimited power over the state.
A dictatorship is ruled by one person with unlimited power usually obtained by force.
A theocracy is a system governed by religious leaders according to divine law.
An oligarchy is governed by a small group of powerful people.
Communism is an ideology where the means of production are owned collectively.
Capitalism is an economic system where private individuals own the means of production.
Socialism involves government ownership or regulation of major industries for public benefit.
A parliament is a legislative body where elected representatives make laws.
Congress is the legislative branch of the United States government.
The Supreme Court is the highest court in the United States judicial system.
The executive branch carries out and enforces laws and is led by the president.
The legislative branch makes laws and consists of Congress in the United States.
The judicial branch interprets laws and includes the court system.
A bill becomes a law after passing both chambers of Congress and being signed.
The Constitution is the supreme law of the United States.
The Bill of Rights is the first ten amendments to the United States Constitution.
Freedom of speech protects the right to express opinions without government censorship.
Freedom of the press protects the right to publish news without government interference.
The right to vote is one of the most important rights in a democracy.
An election is a formal process by which people choose their leaders.
A political party is an organized group with shared political beliefs and goals.
Separation of powers divides government authority among executive legislative and judicial branches.
Checks and balances prevent any one branch of government from becoming too powerful.
A veto is the power of the president to reject a bill passed by Congress.
A referendum is a direct vote by the public on a specific political question.
International law governs the relations between nations and is enforced through treaties.
 
Literature explores the human experience through narrative character and language.
A protagonist is the main character of a story who drives the plot forward.
An antagonist is the character or force that opposes the protagonist.
A narrator is the voice that tells the story in a piece of literature.
Point of view determines who tells the story and how much they know.
First person point of view uses I and me and comes from inside the character.
Third person point of view uses he she and they and is outside the characters.
An omniscient narrator knows the thoughts and feelings of all characters.
A limited narrator only knows the thoughts of one character.
Setting is the time place and environment in which a story takes place.
Plot is the sequence of events that make up the story.
The exposition introduces the characters setting and initial situation.
Rising action is the series of events that build tension toward the climax.
The climax is the turning point of the story where tension is highest.
Falling action is the events after the climax that lead to resolution.
The resolution is the conclusion where conflicts are settled.
A theme is the central message or idea explored in a piece of literature.
A motif is a recurring element that supports the theme of a work.
Symbolism is when an object person or event represents something beyond itself.
Foreshadowing hints at future events in a story.
Flashback interrupts the present story to show events that happened earlier.
Dramatic irony occurs when the audience knows something the characters do not.
Verbal irony means saying the opposite of what is meant.
Situational irony occurs when what happens is the opposite of what was expected.
Conflict is the struggle between opposing forces that drives the story forward.
Internal conflict takes place within a character's own mind.
External conflict occurs between a character and an outside force.
Dialogue is the conversation between characters in a story.
Characterization is the way an author develops and reveals a character's personality.
Tone is the author's attitude toward the subject and audience of a work.
 
The Renaissance was a cultural movement that began in Italy in the fourteenth century.
Humanism placed emphasis on human potential and the study of classical texts.
Perspective in art was redeveloped during the Renaissance to show depth on flat surfaces.
Leonardo da Vinci painted the Mona Lisa and the Last Supper among many works.
Raphael painted the School of Athens showing ancient philosophers in idealized form.
Botticelli painted the Birth of Venus which depicts the goddess emerging from the sea.
The Baroque period followed the Renaissance and featured dramatic lighting and emotion.
Caravaggio used extreme contrast between light and dark called chiaroscuro.
Rembrandt was a Dutch master known for his portraits and use of light.
Vermeer painted quiet domestic scenes with extraordinary attention to light and detail.
The Romantic movement emphasized emotion nature and individual experience.
Turner was a British painter known for his dramatic landscapes and seascapes.
Delacroix was a French Romantic painter known for Liberty Leading the People.
The Impressionists rejected academic painting and focused on capturing light and atmosphere.
Monet painted the same subjects repeatedly at different times to capture changing light.
Degas was known for his paintings of ballet dancers and racehorses.
Renoir celebrated leisure and beauty in paintings full of light and color.
Post-Impressionism moved beyond Impressionism to emphasize structure and emotion.
Van Gogh used thick swirling brushstrokes and vibrant colors to express emotion.
Gauguin left Europe for Tahiti seeking a more primal and spiritual world.
Cezanne used geometric forms to analyze structure which influenced Cubism.
Cubism was developed by Picasso and Braque and showed multiple perspectives at once.
Dali was a Surrealist known for dreamlike paintings with melting watches and distorted forms.
Pollock dripped and poured paint onto canvases on the floor in Abstract Expressionism.
Warhol used commercial imagery like soup cans and celebrity faces in Pop Art.
Banksy is a contemporary street artist known for satirical stencil works in public spaces.
Photography became an art form in its own right in the nineteenth century.
Film photography uses light-sensitive chemicals on film to record images.
Digital photography uses sensors to capture images as electronic data.
A gallery is a space dedicated to the exhibition of visual art.
 
A star is born when a cloud of gas and dust collapses under its own gravity.
The main sequence is the phase when a star fuses hydrogen into helium in its core.
The sun is a middle-aged main-sequence star about halfway through its life.
A red giant forms when a star exhausts its hydrogen and expands enormously.
A white dwarf is the dense remnant left after a medium-sized star dies.
A neutron star is an extremely dense remnant left after a massive star explodes.
A supernova is a powerful explosion that marks the death of a massive star.
A black hole forms when a massive star collapses under its own gravity.
The event horizon is the boundary around a black hole beyond which nothing escapes.
A quasar is an extremely bright and distant galaxy core powered by a supermassive black hole.
A nebula is a cloud of gas and dust in space where stars are born or die.
The Orion Nebula is one of the most photographed nebulae and is visible to the naked eye.
Galaxies are vast collections of stars gas dust and dark matter held together by gravity.
The Milky Way is a barred spiral galaxy containing two hundred to four hundred billion stars.
Andromeda is the nearest large galaxy to the Milky Way and is on a collision course with it.
Dark matter is an invisible substance that makes up most of the mass of the universe.
Dark energy is a mysterious force causing the expansion of the universe to accelerate.
The Big Bang theory proposes the universe began from an extremely hot dense point.
The universe is approximately thirteen point eight billion years old.
Cosmic microwave background radiation is the afterglow of the Big Bang filling all space.
The observable universe is the region we can see from earth given the age of the universe.
Light from distant galaxies takes billions of years to reach us.
Spectroscopy analyzes the light from stars to determine their composition and temperature.
A parsec is a unit of distance equal to about three point three light years.
Hubble's Law states that galaxies are moving away from us at speeds proportional to their distance.
Redshift is the stretching of light wavelengths when a source moves away from an observer.
The Hubble Space Telescope has captured images of galaxies billions of light years away.
Space exploration began with the launch of Sputnik by the Soviet Union in nineteen fifty-seven.
Yuri Gagarin became the first human in space in nineteen sixty-one.
The International Space Station orbits earth and has been continuously inhabited since two thousand.
 
The immune system has two main parts called the innate and adaptive immune systems.
The innate immune system responds immediately to pathogens in a non-specific way.
The adaptive immune system mounts a specific response to a particular pathogen.
An antigen is any substance that triggers an immune response.
An antibody is a protein produced by the immune system to neutralize antigens.
A pathogen is a microorganism that causes disease such as a bacterium or virus.
A virus is not a living organism but hijacks cells to replicate itself.
A bacterium is a single-celled living organism that can cause disease.
A fungus can cause infections especially in people with weakened immune systems.
A parasite lives on or inside a host and causes harm.
Vaccination introduces a weakened or inactivated pathogen to train the immune system.
Herd immunity occurs when enough of a population is immune to stop disease spreading.
An epidemic is a widespread occurrence of disease in a community at a particular time.
A pandemic is an epidemic that spreads across multiple countries or continents.
Antibiotics treat bacterial infections but are ineffective against viruses.
Antibiotic resistance occurs when bacteria evolve to survive antibiotic treatment.
Inflammation is the body's response to injury or infection involving redness heat and swelling.
Fever is a rise in body temperature that helps the body fight infection.
Allergy is an immune response to a harmless substance that the body treats as a threat.
Autoimmune disease occurs when the immune system attacks the body's own tissues.
A transplant may be rejected because the immune system identifies foreign tissue as a threat.
Blood type determines compatibility for blood transfusions and organ transplants.
Stem cells are undifferentiated cells that can develop into specialized cell types.
Gene therapy aims to treat disease by modifying or replacing defective genes.
CRISPR is a gene-editing technology that allows precise changes to DNA sequences.
Cancer occurs when cells divide uncontrollably forming tumors and spreading.
Chemotherapy uses drugs to kill rapidly dividing cancer cells.
Radiation therapy uses high-energy radiation to destroy cancer cells.
Immunotherapy harnesses the immune system to fight cancer cells.
Mental health conditions are medical disorders affecting mood thinking and behavior.
 
The solar system formed about four point six billion years ago from a cloud of gas and dust.
The sun contains about ninety-nine percent of all the mass in the solar system.
Terrestrial planets are rocky and include Mercury Venus Earth and Mars.
Gas giants are large planets made mostly of hydrogen and helium and include Jupiter and Saturn.
Ice giants are Uranus and Neptune which contain more water methane and ammonia.
Jupiter has a massive storm called the Great Red Spot that has lasted for centuries.
Jupiter has at least ninety-five known moons including the large moon Ganymede.
Europa is a moon of Jupiter with a liquid water ocean beneath its icy surface.
Saturn's rings are made of ice and rock and span hundreds of thousands of kilometers.
Titan is Saturn's largest moon and has a dense atmosphere and lakes of liquid methane.
Mars has the tallest volcano in the solar system called Olympus Mons.
Mars has a canyon system called Valles Marineris that stretches three thousand kilometers.
The polar ice caps of Mars contain water ice and dry ice.
Evidence suggests liquid water once flowed on the surface of Mars.
The asteroid belt lies between Mars and Jupiter and contains millions of rocky objects.
The Kuiper Belt lies beyond Neptune and contains icy bodies including Pluto.
The Oort Cloud is a distant shell of icy objects at the outer edge of the solar system.
Pluto was discovered in nineteen thirty by Clyde Tombaugh.
Pluto has a heart-shaped region of nitrogen ice called Tombaugh Regio.
Charon is Pluto's largest moon and is almost half the size of Pluto itself.
A comet develops a bright tail when it nears the sun and ice vaporizes.
Halley's Comet passes near earth approximately every seventy-five years.
The New Horizons spacecraft flew past Pluto in two thousand and fifteen.
Mars rovers have explored the surface of Mars since the nineteen nineties.
The Perseverance rover has been collecting rock samples on Mars since two thousand and twenty-one.
The James Webb Space Telescope launched in two thousand and twenty-one and sees in infrared.
Voyager One launched in nineteen seventy-seven and has left the solar system.
The Pioneer plaques contain information about humanity in case aliens find them.
Gravitational waves were first detected in two thousand and fifteen confirming Einstein's prediction.
Radio telescopes detect radio waves from space to map the universe and search for signals.
 
A constitution outlines the fundamental principles and laws of a nation.
Ancient Mesopotamia is often called the cradle of civilization.
The Sumerians developed one of the earliest writing systems called cuneiform.
The Egyptians developed hieroglyphics as a system of pictorial writing.
The Phoenicians developed an alphabet that influenced most modern alphabets.
Ancient China produced silk paper gunpowder and the compass.
The Silk Road was an ancient trade route connecting China to the Mediterranean.
The Byzantine Empire was the continuation of the Eastern Roman Empire.
The Ottoman Empire lasted from the fourteenth century until nineteen twenty-two.
The Mongol Empire was the largest contiguous land empire in history.
Genghis Khan united the Mongol tribes and created an empire stretching across Asia and Europe.
The Black Death killed approximately one third of Europe's population in the fourteenth century.
The Crusades were religious wars fought between Christians and Muslims for control of the Holy Land.
The Hundred Years War was fought between England and France from thirteen thirty-seven to fourteen fifty-three.
Joan of Arc was a French peasant girl who led military campaigns during the Hundred Years War.
The Reformation was a religious movement that split Western Christianity into Catholic and Protestant.
Martin Luther published his Ninety-Five Theses in fifteen seventeen challenging the Catholic Church.
The Age of Exploration saw European powers discover new continents and establish colonies.
The transatlantic slave trade forcibly transported millions of Africans to the Americas.
The American Revolution resulted in independence from Britain in seventeen seventy-six.
The French Revolution began in seventeen eighty-nine and abolished the monarchy.
Napoleon Bonaparte rose to power during the French Revolution and conquered much of Europe.
The Industrial Revolution transformed manufacturing and society beginning in Britain.
The abolition of slavery was a major social achievement of the nineteenth century.
The First World War was triggered by the assassination of Archduke Franz Ferdinand.
The Treaty of Versailles ended the First World War but imposed harsh penalties on Germany.
The Great Depression was a global economic crisis in the nineteen thirties.
The Holocaust was the systematic murder of six million Jews by the Nazi regime.
The Cold War was a geopolitical tension between the United States and Soviet Union.
The fall of the Berlin Wall in nineteen eighty-nine symbolized the end of the Cold War.
 
Physics is the science of matter energy and the fundamental forces of nature.
Chemistry is the science of substances their properties and how they react.
Biology is the science of living organisms and their processes.
Geology is the science of the earth its structure and its history.
Ecology is the branch of biology concerned with relationships between organisms and environments.
Astronomy is the science of celestial objects space and the universe.
Meteorology is the science of the atmosphere and weather.
Oceanography is the science of the physical and biological aspects of the ocean.
Genetics is the science of heredity and variation in living organisms.
Neuroscience is the science of the nervous system and the brain.
Psychology is the science of the mind and human behavior.
Sociology is the study of society social behavior and human groups.
Anthropology is the study of human societies cultures and their development.
Archaeology is the study of human history through excavation of sites and artifacts.
Economics is the social science of production distribution and consumption.
Political science is the study of government and political systems.
Geography is the study of places and the relationships between people and environments.
Linguistics is the scientific study of language and its structure.
Statistics is the science of collecting analyzing and interpreting data.
Mathematics is the abstract science of number quantity and space.
The scientific method is a systematic process for acquiring knowledge.
A hypothesis is a testable prediction based on observation and existing knowledge.
An experiment is a procedure designed to test a hypothesis.
A control group in an experiment does not receive the variable being tested.
A variable is any factor that can be changed or measured in an experiment.
Peer review is the evaluation of scientific work by other experts in the field.
A theory in science is a well-substantiated explanation backed by extensive evidence.
A law in science is a description of an observed phenomenon without explanation.
Reproducibility means an experiment can be repeated with the same results.
Scientific consensus reflects the collective judgment of the scientific community.
 
Running helps improve cardiovascular fitness and burns significant calories.
Cycling is a low-impact exercise that strengthens the legs and improves endurance.
Swimming engages the entire body and is excellent for joint health.
Weight lifting builds muscle mass and increases bone density.
Rock climbing develops strength balance and problem-solving skills.
Hiking combines exercise with nature and offers mental health benefits.
Rowing is a full-body exercise that builds strength and cardiovascular fitness.
Jumping rope is an inexpensive and effective cardiovascular workout.
Dancing improves coordination balance and cardiovascular health while being enjoyable.
Martial arts combine physical fitness with mental discipline and self-defense skills.
Team sports develop cooperation communication and social skills alongside fitness.
Tennis develops agility coordination and cardiovascular fitness.
Basketball requires speed agility endurance and teamwork.
Football demands explosive power endurance and strategic thinking.
Soccer is the most popular sport in the world requiring endurance and skill.
Baseball requires precision timing and strategic thinking.
Volleyball develops reflexes coordination and teamwork.
Badminton is a fast-paced racket sport that develops agility and coordination.
Golf requires precision patience and mental focus over a long period.
Gymnastics develops flexibility strength balance and body awareness.
Archery demands focus breath control and fine motor precision.
Fencing is an elegant combat sport requiring quick reflexes and tactical thinking.
Boxing develops full-body fitness discipline and mental toughness.
Cycling racing includes road racing track racing and mountain biking disciplines.
Swimming competitions cover freestyle backstroke breaststroke and butterfly strokes.
Track and field events include running jumping throwing and combined disciplines.
The Olympic Games bring together athletes from around the world every four years.
The Paralympic Games celebrate the achievements of athletes with disabilities.
Sportsmanship involves playing fairly respecting opponents and accepting results gracefully.
Physical activity at any level contributes to better physical and mental health.
 
The digital revolution transformed how humans communicate work and access information.
The first electronic computer ENIAC was built in nineteen forty-five and filled an entire room.
Transistors replaced vacuum tubes making computers smaller faster and more reliable.
The integrated circuit packed multiple transistors onto a single chip.
Moore's Law observed that the number of transistors on a chip doubled roughly every two years.
Personal computers became widely available in the nineteen eighties.
The World Wide Web was invented by Tim Berners-Lee in nineteen eighty-nine.
The first web browser allowed ordinary people to access and navigate the internet.
Email became a standard form of business and personal communication in the nineteen nineties.
Search engines allowed people to find information across billions of web pages.
Social networking platforms connected billions of people and transformed communication.
The rise of the smartphone put a powerful computer in almost everyone's pocket.
Mobile apps have transformed banking shopping entertainment and healthcare.
Cloud computing allows data and software to be accessed over the internet from anywhere.
Big data refers to extremely large datasets analyzed for patterns and insights.
Machine learning allows computers to learn from data without being explicitly programmed.
Natural language processing enables computers to understand and generate human language.
Computer vision allows machines to interpret and understand visual information.
Autonomous vehicles use sensors cameras and AI to navigate without human drivers.
Drones are unmanned aerial vehicles with applications in photography delivery and agriculture.
The Internet of Things connects everyday devices to the internet for smart functionality.
Augmented reality overlays digital information onto the real world viewed through a device.
Virtual reality creates fully immersive digital environments experienced through a headset.
Blockchain is a distributed ledger that records transactions securely and transparently.
Cryptocurrency is a digital currency using cryptography for secure transactions.
Cybersecurity protects computer systems and networks from attack theft and damage.
Open source development allows communities to collaboratively build and improve software.
Agile development is an iterative approach to software development focused on flexibility.
A user interface is the visual layer through which a person interacts with a device.
User experience design focuses on making products intuitive and enjoyable to use.
 
Water covers about seventy-one percent of the earth's surface.
Fresh water makes up only about three percent of all water on earth.
Most fresh water is locked in glaciers and ice caps.
Groundwater is the second largest reservoir of fresh water on earth.
The Amazon River discharges about twenty percent of all river water entering the ocean.
The Congo River in Africa has the deepest point of any river in the world.
The Yangtze River is the longest river in Asia.
The Rhine and Danube are major rivers of central Europe.
The Mississippi River drains much of the central United States into the Gulf of Mexico.
Lake Baikal in Russia contains about twenty percent of the world's surface fresh water.
The Caspian Sea is the world's largest inland body of water.
The Dead Sea is the lowest point on earth's surface and is so salty nothing lives in it.
The Great Lakes are the largest group of fresh water lakes in the world.
The Pacific Ocean covers more area than all land on earth combined.
The Atlantic Ocean is widening by a few centimeters every year due to tectonic movement.
Ocean currents distribute heat around the planet and regulate climate.
The Gulf Stream carries warm water from the Gulf of Mexico to northern Europe.
Tectonic plates are large pieces of the earth's crust that move slowly over time.
Earthquakes occur when tectonic plates grind against or slide under each other.
Volcanic eruptions release magma gas and ash from beneath the earth's surface.
Tsunamis are large ocean waves triggered by underwater earthquakes or volcanic eruptions.
Plate tectonics explains how continents have moved over hundreds of millions of years.
Pangaea was a supercontinent that existed about three hundred million years ago.
The Himalayas formed from the collision of the Indian and Eurasian tectonic plates.
Sedimentary rock forms from layers of compressed sediment over millions of years.
Igneous rock forms when magma cools and solidifies.
Metamorphic rock forms when existing rock is changed by heat and pressure.
Fossils are most commonly found in sedimentary rock.
Diamonds form deep in the earth under extreme heat and pressure.
Crystals form when atoms arrange themselves in regular repeating patterns.
 
Agriculture is the cultivation of soil plants and animals for food fiber and other products.
Humans began farming approximately ten thousand years ago in the Fertile Crescent.
Crop rotation involves planting different crops in a field each season to maintain soil health.
Irrigation brings water to farmland through canals channels or pipes.
Selective breeding involves choosing plants or animals with desirable traits to reproduce.
Genetic modification involves directly altering an organism's DNA for desired traits.
Organic farming avoids synthetic pesticides and fertilizers and relies on natural methods.
Monoculture is the practice of growing a single crop over a large area.
Polyculture involves growing multiple crops together which benefits biodiversity.
Permaculture designs agricultural systems that mimic natural ecosystems.
A greenhouse allows crops to be grown in a controlled environment year-round.
Hydroponics grows plants in water enriched with nutrients without soil.
Aquaponics combines fish farming with hydroponics in a closed-loop system.
Vertical farming grows crops in stacked layers using artificial light in urban buildings.
Precision agriculture uses technology to optimize crop yields and reduce waste.
Fertilizer supplies nutrients to soil and plants to increase crop production.
Pesticides kill insects weeds and fungi that damage crops.
Insecticides specifically target insects that damage crops.
Herbicides are used to kill unwanted plants or weeds in farmland.
Food security means having reliable access to sufficient affordable nutritious food.
Famine is an extreme shortage of food causing widespread hunger and death.
Food waste occurs when edible food is discarded rather than consumed.
Composting turns food and garden waste into nutrient-rich material for soil.
Beekeeping maintains colonies of bees to produce honey and assist crop pollination.
Aquaculture is the farming of aquatic organisms including fish shellfish and seaweed.
Deforestation for agriculture is a leading cause of habitat loss worldwide.
Soil degradation reduces the productivity of land through erosion or overuse.
Sustainable agriculture aims to produce food while protecting the environment long-term.
Fair trade ensures farmers in developing countries receive fair prices for their products.
Urban farming brings food production into cities through community gardens and rooftops.
 
A network is a group of computers connected to share resources and information.
The OSI model has seven layers that describe how data moves through a network.
A router directs network traffic between different networks.
A switch connects devices within the same network.
An IP address is a unique number that identifies a device on a network.
A domain name is a human-readable address for a website like example dot com.
DNS converts domain names into IP addresses that computers use.
HTTP is the protocol used for transferring web pages over the internet.
HTTPS is the secure version of HTTP that encrypts data in transit.
A firewall filters network traffic to block unauthorized access.
A VPN creates an encrypted tunnel to secure internet connections.
Wi-Fi uses radio waves to provide wireless internet access.
Bandwidth refers to the maximum rate of data transfer across a network.
Latency is the delay between sending and receiving data over a network.
Packet switching breaks data into small packets that travel independently across a network.
Cloud storage saves data on remote servers accessed through the internet.
A data center is a facility housing computer systems used for storing processing and distributing data.
Encryption converts readable data into coded form to prevent unauthorized access.
A hash function converts data into a fixed-length string of characters.
Public key cryptography uses two keys one public and one private for secure communication.
A digital certificate verifies the identity of a website or service online.
Two-factor authentication requires a second form of verification in addition to a password.
Malware is software designed to disrupt damage or gain unauthorized access to systems.
A virus is malware that attaches to programs and spreads to other files.
Ransomware encrypts a victim's files and demands payment for the decryption key.
A distributed denial of service attack overwhelms a server with traffic to take it offline.
Social engineering manipulates people into revealing confidential information.
A patch is an update to software that fixes security vulnerabilities.
Zero-day vulnerability is a software flaw unknown to the vendor and exploited before it is fixed.
Ethical hacking involves testing systems for vulnerabilities with permission to improve security.
 
Curiosity is one of the most powerful drivers of human progress and discovery.
Asking questions is the foundation of learning and scientific inquiry.
The desire to understand why things happen is what drives scientific investigation.
Observation is the starting point for developing new ideas and theories.
A good question leads to better answers than a vague or unfocused one.
Learning to embrace uncertainty is an important part of intellectual growth.
The best ideas often come from unexpected combinations of existing knowledge.
Collaboration produces better outcomes than working in isolation most of the time.
Diverse teams solve problems more effectively by bringing different perspectives.
Failure is an essential part of the learning and innovation process.
Iteration means repeating a process with improvements at each step.
Prototyping means building a rough version of something to test ideas quickly.
Feedback loops help systems correct themselves and improve over time.
Systems thinking considers how parts of a system interact rather than in isolation.
Design thinking centers the user experience when solving problems.
Creative constraint can drive innovation by forcing new solutions within limits.
Lateral thinking involves approaching problems from unexpected angles.
Brainstorming generates many ideas without immediate judgment to stimulate creativity.
Mind mapping visually organizes information around a central concept.
Reflection involves reviewing past experiences to extract lessons for the future.
Practice with intention and feedback produces mastery more efficiently than repetition alone.
The twenty percent of causes that produce eighty percent of effects is called the Pareto principle.
Breaking complex problems into smaller parts makes them easier to understand and solve.
Prioritizing tasks by importance and urgency helps manage time effectively.
Deep work requires long uninterrupted periods of focused concentration.
The Pomodoro technique uses twenty-five-minute work sessions with short breaks.
Context switching between tasks reduces overall productivity significantly.
A to-do list externalized from memory frees mental space for deeper thinking.
Rest and recovery are as important as work for sustained performance.
A growth mindset embraces challenges and sees effort as the path to mastery.
 
The French language uses gendered nouns where everything is masculine or feminine.
German has three genders for nouns which are masculine feminine and neuter.
Japanese uses three writing systems called hiragana katakana and kanji.
Mandarin Chinese is a tonal language where the pitch of a word changes its meaning.
Arabic is written right to left and has a root-based morphology.
Sanskrit is one of the oldest known languages and influenced many modern tongues.
Latin is a dead language that is the root of the Romance languages.
Romance languages include French Spanish Italian Portuguese and Romanian.
Germanic languages include English German Dutch and the Scandinavian languages.
Slavic languages include Russian Polish Czech and many others.
A creole language develops from a simplified pidgin language into a native language.
A pidgin is a simplified language that develops for communication between speakers of different languages.
Sign languages are fully developed languages using visual gestures and movements.
Braille is a tactile writing system using raised dots that blind people read with their fingers.
The Rosetta Stone allowed linguists to decode ancient Egyptian hieroglyphics.
Endangered languages are those at risk of falling out of use as speakers age.
Language preservation efforts record and teach dying languages to future generations.
Bilingualism is the ability to speak two languages fluently.
Code-switching is the practice of alternating between two languages in conversation.
Accent refers to the distinctive way a person pronounces a language.
Dialect involves differences in vocabulary grammar and pronunciation within a language.
Etymology is the study of the origin and historical development of words.
A cognate is a word in one language that shares an origin and resemblance with a word in another.
Slang is informal language used by a particular group and often not widely understood.
Jargon is specialized vocabulary used within a particular profession or group.
Euphemism is a mild or indirect expression used in place of a blunt or harsh one.
Idiom is a phrase whose meaning cannot be understood from the individual words.
Proverb is a short well-known saying expressing a general truth.
The lexicon of a language is its entire vocabulary.
Grammar rules differ significantly between languages and must be learned explicitly.
 
Respect means treating others with consideration and valuing their dignity.
Kindness involves showing care and generosity toward others without expecting anything.
Honesty means telling the truth even when it is difficult or uncomfortable.
Integrity means acting according to your values even when no one is watching.
Responsibility means accepting the consequences of your own actions and choices.
Fairness means treating everyone equally and making decisions based on merit.
Compassion involves recognizing the suffering of others and wanting to help.
Patience is the ability to wait calmly without frustration.
Perseverance means continuing to work toward a goal despite obstacles and setbacks.
Courage is acting rightly even when you are afraid of the consequences.
Humility means recognizing your own limitations and being open to learning.
Generosity involves giving freely of your time energy or resources to help others.
Loyalty means being reliable and faithful to people and principles you care about.
Accountability means taking ownership of your mistakes and working to make things right.
Curiosity means being eager to learn and explore new ideas and experiences.
Open-mindedness involves being willing to consider different perspectives and ideas.
Adaptability means adjusting effectively when circumstances change.
Creativity involves generating original ideas and finding new ways to solve problems.
Empathy means trying to understand how other people feel from their perspective.
Gratitude involves noticing and appreciating the good things in your life.
Service means contributing to the wellbeing of others beyond your own interests.
Self-awareness means understanding your own thoughts feelings and motivations.
Self-discipline involves controlling your impulses to work toward long-term goals.
Forgiveness means releasing anger and resentment even when someone has hurt you.
Trust is built through consistent honesty reliability and follow-through over time.
Communication is the foundation of all healthy relationships and communities.
Listening actively shows respect and helps build deeper understanding between people.
Boundaries protect your wellbeing and must be clearly communicated and respected.
Community thrives when individuals contribute and support one another willingly.
Meaning in life often comes from contribution connection and pursuing what matters.
 
The water cycle begins with evaporation of water from oceans lakes and rivers.
Water vapor rises and cools forming clouds through condensation.
When water droplets in clouds grow heavy enough they fall as precipitation.
Precipitation returns water to the earth as rain snow sleet or hail.
Runoff flows across the surface into rivers and streams toward the ocean.
Infiltration allows water to seep into the ground and replenish aquifers.
Transpiration releases water vapor from plants into the atmosphere.
Evapotranspiration combines evaporation from the ground and transpiration from plants.
The carbon cycle moves carbon through the atmosphere land ocean and living things.
Photosynthesis absorbs carbon dioxide from the atmosphere and stores it in plants.
Respiration releases carbon dioxide back into the atmosphere from living things.
Decomposition returns carbon from dead organic matter to the soil and atmosphere.
Burning fossil fuels releases carbon that was stored underground for millions of years.
Ocean acidification occurs when the ocean absorbs excess carbon dioxide from the atmosphere.
The nitrogen cycle converts nitrogen gas into forms usable by living things.
Nitrogen fixation converts atmospheric nitrogen into ammonia through bacteria or lightning.
Nitrification converts ammonia into nitrates that plants can absorb from soil.
Denitrification converts nitrates back into nitrogen gas returning it to the atmosphere.
The phosphorus cycle moves phosphorus through rocks water soil and living things.
Weathering releases phosphorus from rocks into soil and water.
Eutrophication occurs when excess nutrients cause explosive algae growth in water.
Algal blooms deplete oxygen in water killing fish and other organisms.
Acid rain forms when sulfur dioxide and nitrogen oxides react with water in the atmosphere.
The ozone hole over Antarctica formed due to human-made chemicals called CFCs.
The Montreal Protocol successfully reduced CFC emissions and allowed ozone recovery.
Deforestation releases stored carbon and reduces the earth's capacity to absorb carbon dioxide.
Reforestation plants trees to restore forests and absorb carbon dioxide.
Wetlands store large amounts of carbon and should be protected from drainage.
Seagrass meadows and mangroves are important carbon sinks in coastal areas.
Reducing emissions adapting to change and protecting ecosystems are all needed.
 
A conversation begins with a greeting and ends with a farewell.
I am always ready to discuss whatever topic interests you most.
Learning happens best when curiosity drives the exploration.
Every question deserves a thoughtful and honest answer.
I enjoy thinking through complex ideas step by step.
Sometimes the simplest questions lead to the deepest discussions.
A good answer often leads to more interesting questions.
Understanding grows through patient exploration rather than rushed conclusions.
I find every topic interesting when approached with genuine curiosity.
The more you learn about something the more questions arise.
Knowledge is never static it grows and changes with new discovery.
Sharing ideas with others helps refine and deepen your own thinking.
I am here to explore and learn alongside you not just to inform.
The best conversations feel like thinking together rather than being lectured.
What matters most is not knowing everything but being willing to learn.
You can ask me about science history language art technology and more.
There is no such thing as a question too simple or too complex.
Every subject connects to others in surprising and interesting ways.
The connections between ideas are often where the most insight lives.
I find that explaining things clearly requires understanding them deeply.
Trying to teach something is one of the best ways to learn it yourself.
Understanding why something works is more valuable than just knowing that it does.
I am genuinely interested in whatever you would like to explore today.
Conversations like this one help both of us think more clearly.
I appreciate when people challenge ideas and ask for more explanation.
Getting to the heart of a topic takes patience and good questions.
I will always try to be clear accurate and honest in my responses.
If I do not know something I will say so rather than guess.
Uncertainty is not a weakness it is an honest starting point for inquiry.
Let us keep exploring together because there is always more to discover.
 
The Amazon rainforest produces about twenty percent of the world's oxygen.
Deforestation of the Amazon threatens global climate and biodiversity.
The Congo Basin contains the second largest tropical rainforest in the world.
Tropical forests are home to more than half of all species on earth.
Old-growth forests have never been logged and contain centuries-old trees.
Trees communicate through underground fungal networks called the wood wide web.
A single old tree can support hundreds of species of insects birds and fungi.
Mycorrhizal fungi form symbiotic relationships with plant roots exchanging nutrients.
Lichens are symbiotic organisms made of fungi and algae or cyanobacteria living together.
Moss grows in damp shaded places and helps retain moisture in forest floors.
Ferns are ancient plants that reproduce through spores rather than seeds.
Conifers are cone-bearing trees like pines spruces and firs that keep their needles year-round.
Deciduous trees shed their leaves in autumn to conserve water during winter.
A seed contains an embryo and food supply needed to germinate into a plant.
Germination begins when a seed absorbs water and begins to sprout.
Pollination transfers pollen from one flower to another enabling fertilization.
Cross-pollination between different plants produces more genetic diversity.
Self-pollination occurs within a single flower or plant.
Fruits form around seeds after fertilization to protect them and aid dispersal.
Animals disperse seeds by eating fruits and depositing seeds elsewhere.
Wind disperses lightweight seeds with wings or feathery attachments.
Water disperses seeds like coconuts that float and wash ashore.
Root systems anchor plants and absorb water and nutrients from soil.
Tap roots grow straight down while fibrous roots spread out near the surface.
Leaves capture sunlight for photosynthesis and release water through stomata.
Stomata are tiny pores on leaves that control gas exchange and water loss.
The phloem transports sugars from leaves to the rest of the plant.
The xylem transports water and nutrients from roots up to leaves.
Woody plants develop hardened tissue that allows them to grow tall over years.
Annual plants complete their life cycle in one year while perennials regrow each year.
 
A smartphone contains more computing power than the computers used in the Apollo missions.
Moore's Law predicted that computing power would double roughly every two years.
The first commercially successful smartphone was released by Apple in two thousand and seven.
Touchscreens detect the electrical charge of a human finger to register input.
A processor executes billions of calculations per second to run apps and programs.
GPS receivers use signals from multiple satellites to calculate precise location.
A gyroscope in a smartphone detects orientation and rotation.
An accelerometer measures changes in velocity and is used in step counters.
Cameras in smartphones now rival dedicated cameras in many situations.
Mobile payment systems allow purchases using a phone instead of a card.
Push notifications deliver real-time updates from apps directly to your screen.
App stores provide a curated marketplace for downloading software to devices.
Mobile data networks have progressed from 2G to 3G to 4G and now 5G.
5G networks offer dramatically faster speeds and lower latency than 4G.
Wireless charging transfers energy through electromagnetic induction without cables.
Bluetooth connects devices wirelessly over short distances.
Near field communication allows contactless data transfer when devices are close.
Battery life is limited by the energy density of lithium-ion batteries.
Solid-state batteries may offer higher energy density and safety in future devices.
Screen resolution is measured in pixels per inch with higher values giving sharper images.
OLED screens produce their own light at each pixel for perfect blacks and vivid colors.
Face recognition uses machine learning to identify users from facial features.
Fingerprint scanners read unique ridge patterns to authenticate users.
Voice assistants use natural language processing to respond to spoken commands.
Predictive text uses machine learning to suggest the next word as you type.
Translation apps use neural machine translation to convert text between languages.
Accessibility features help users with disabilities interact with devices effectively.
Dark mode reduces eye strain and saves battery on OLED screens.
Privacy settings give users control over what data apps can access.
Digital wellbeing tools track screen time and help manage device usage habits.
 
I woke up this morning feeling ready to take on the day ahead.
Starting the day with a plan helps you use your time more effectively.
I like to take a few quiet moments in the morning to gather my thoughts.
Breakfast gives you the energy you need to stay focused through the morning.
A short walk before starting work helps clear the mind and boost energy.
Reading for even fifteen minutes in the morning builds knowledge over time.
Writing in a journal each morning helps process thoughts and set intentions.
Reviewing your goals first thing keeps you focused on what matters most.
Morning sunlight helps regulate your body clock and improves mood.
Avoiding screens first thing in the morning reduces stress and distraction.
A productive morning routine sets a positive tone for the entire day.
Taking breaks throughout the day prevents mental fatigue and sustains focus.
Lunchtime is a good opportunity to step away from work and recharge.
An afternoon walk combats the natural energy dip many people experience.
Staying hydrated throughout the day keeps your brain functioning well.
Working in focused blocks with clear start and end times improves output.
Saying no to non-essential tasks protects time for what truly matters.
Reviewing what you accomplished at the end of the day builds momentum.
Preparing tomorrow's to-do list the night before reduces morning decision fatigue.
Ending the day with gratitude shifts focus from stress to appreciation.
Winding down before bed with calm activities improves sleep quality.
Consistent bedtime and wake time strengthen your natural sleep cycle.
Limiting caffeine in the afternoon improves the ability to fall asleep at night.
Reflection at the end of the week helps you identify patterns and improve.
Connecting with people you care about is an important part of a balanced day.
Time spent in nature restores mental energy and reduces stress hormones.
Creative activities like drawing playing music or writing nurture the whole person.
Rest is not laziness it is an essential part of a sustainable and fulfilling life.
Small daily actions compound over time to create remarkable long-term results.
Every day is an opportunity to learn grow connect and contribute something meaningful.
Volcanoes form at tectonic plate boundaries or over hot spots in the mantle.
Magma is molten rock beneath the earth's surface.
Lava is magma that has reached the earth's surface through a volcanic eruption.
Shield volcanoes have gentle slopes and produce slow-moving lava flows.
Stratovolcanoes are steep-sided and can produce explosive eruptions.
The Ring of Fire is a zone of volcanic and seismic activity around the Pacific Ocean.
Krakatoa erupted in eighteen eighty-three and affected global temperatures for years.
Mount St Helens in Washington erupted in nineteen eighty causing widespread destruction.
Iceland sits on a volcanic hotspot and the Mid-Atlantic Ridge making it geologically active.
Pompeii was buried under ash when Mount Vesuvius erupted in seventy-nine AD.
Hot springs are heated by geothermal energy from the earth's interior.
Geysers are hot springs that erupt periodically shooting water and steam into the air.
Old Faithful is a famous geyser in Yellowstone National Park that erupts regularly.
Obsidian is a naturally occurring volcanic glass formed from rapidly cooling lava.
Pumice is a lightweight porous rock formed from frothy lava that can float on water.
Basalt is a dark fine-grained volcanic rock that makes up much of the ocean floor.
Granite is a coarse-grained igneous rock common in continental crust.
Marble is a metamorphic rock formed from limestone under heat and pressure.
Slate is a fine-grained metamorphic rock that splits into flat sheets.
Limestone is a sedimentary rock made mostly from the shells of marine organisms.
Sandstone is a sedimentary rock made from compressed sand grains.
Chalk is a soft white sedimentary rock made from the shells of microscopic organisms.
Flint is a hard form of quartz that was used by early humans to make tools.
Coal is a combustible sedimentary rock formed from ancient plant material.
Oil and natural gas formed from the remains of ancient marine organisms over millions of years.
Fossil fuels are non-renewable and their combustion releases stored carbon dioxide.
Rare earth elements are used in electronics magnets and many modern technologies.
Uranium is a radioactive element used as fuel in nuclear power plants.
Gold silver and platinum are precious metals valued for jewelry and industrial use.
Mining extracts minerals and metals from the earth but can cause environmental damage.
 
A library is a collection of books and other resources available for people to use.
The Library of Alexandria in ancient Egypt was one of the largest libraries of the ancient world.
The Dewey Decimal System organizes library books by subject into numbered categories.
A bibliography is a list of sources consulted or cited in a piece of research.
A citation gives credit to the source of information used in a work.
Peer-reviewed journals publish research that has been evaluated by other experts.
An abstract is a short summary of a research paper or article.
A thesis is a long written work submitted as part of a degree at university.
A dissertation is an extended piece of academic writing based on original research.
Plagiarism is presenting someone else's ideas or words as your own without credit.
Academic integrity means doing your own work and crediting sources properly.
A hypothesis is a proposed explanation that can be tested through research.
Qualitative research explores non-numerical data like interviews and observations.
Quantitative research involves collecting and analyzing numerical data.
A sample is a subset of a population used to represent the whole in a study.
Bias in research occurs when results are skewed by the researcher's perspective or method.
A literature review surveys existing research on a topic.
Primary sources are original materials like letters diaries and firsthand accounts.
Secondary sources interpret and analyze primary sources.
An encyclopedia provides general information on many topics arranged alphabetically.
A dictionary defines words and provides information about their pronunciation and origin.
An atlas is a collection of maps in book form.
An almanac provides tables of information on various subjects for a given year.
A thesaurus lists words with similar meanings to help writers find alternatives.
Nonfiction includes biography memoir history science and many other factual genres.
Science fiction imagines future technologies societies and the consequences of change.
Fantasy creates imaginary worlds with magical systems and invented creatures.
Mystery fiction involves solving a crime or puzzle through clues and deduction.
Thriller fiction creates suspense through danger urgency and high stakes.
Horror fiction aims to frighten the reader through disturbing images and events.
 
Nutrition science studies how food affects health and the body.
Macronutrients provide energy and include carbohydrates fats and proteins.
Micronutrients are needed in small amounts and include vitamins and minerals.
Vitamin A supports vision skin health and immune function.
Vitamin B complex supports energy metabolism and nervous system function.
Vitamin C is an antioxidant that supports immune function and skin health.
Vitamin D is produced by skin exposed to sunlight and supports bone health.
Vitamin E protects cells from oxidative damage as an antioxidant.
Vitamin K is essential for blood clotting and bone health.
Calcium builds and maintains strong bones and teeth.
Iron is essential for hemoglobin which carries oxygen in red blood cells.
Magnesium supports muscle nerve and enzyme function.
Zinc supports immune function wound healing and protein synthesis.
Potassium regulates fluid balance nerve signals and muscle contractions.
Sodium maintains fluid balance and nerve function but excess raises blood pressure.
Omega-3 fatty acids support brain and heart health and reduce inflammation.
Antioxidants protect cells from damage caused by unstable molecules called free radicals.
Probiotics are beneficial bacteria found in fermented foods that support gut health.
Prebiotics are fibers that feed beneficial bacteria in the gut.
Phytonutrients are plant compounds with health benefits beyond basic nutrition.
The Mediterranean diet emphasizes vegetables fruits whole grains and olive oil.
Intermittent fasting restricts eating to specific time windows each day.
Caloric deficit means consuming fewer calories than the body burns leading to weight loss.
Metabolism is the set of chemical processes that maintain life in the body.
Basal metabolic rate is the energy needed to sustain basic functions at rest.
Blood sugar levels rise after eating and are regulated by insulin from the pancreas.
Insulin resistance occurs when cells stop responding effectively to insulin.
Type 2 diabetes develops when blood sugar regulation breaks down chronically.
Obesity increases the risk of diabetes heart disease and many other conditions.
A varied colorful diet of whole foods generally provides optimal nutrition.
 
Coral reefs support about twenty-five percent of all marine species.
Seagrass meadows provide nursery habitat for many fish and marine animals.
Kelp forests grow in cold nutrient-rich coastal waters and support rich ecosystems.
The Great Barrier Reef stretches over two thousand kilometers along Australia's coast.
Coral polyps are tiny animals that build calcium carbonate skeletons.
Coral reefs grow very slowly and are extremely sensitive to temperature changes.
Warmer ocean temperatures from climate change cause mass coral bleaching events.
Overfishing removes too many fish from the ocean faster than populations can recover.
Bycatch refers to non-target species accidentally caught during fishing.
Sustainable fishing harvests fish at a rate that allows populations to recover.
Marine protected areas restrict human activity to allow ocean ecosystems to recover.
Plastic pollution kills marine animals through ingestion and entanglement.
Microplastics are tiny fragments that enter the food chain through sea creatures.
The Great Pacific Garbage Patch is a massive accumulation of plastic debris in the ocean.
Sea turtles have navigated the oceans for over one hundred million years.
Whales migrate thousands of kilometers between feeding and breeding grounds.
Dolphin pods communicate cooperate and even play together in sophisticated ways.
Sharks are apex predators that maintain the health of marine ecosystems.
Octopuses are solitary and highly intelligent with short lifespans of just a few years.
Sea otters use rocks as tools to crack open shellfish on their chests.
Jellyfish have no brain heart or bones and are among the oldest animals on earth.
Seahorses are the only fish species where males carry and give birth to offspring.
Anglerfish use a bioluminescent lure to attract prey in the deep dark ocean.
Manta rays are gentle giants that filter plankton from the water as they swim.
Seabirds like albatrosses can travel enormous distances without landing for months.
Penguins huddle together in colonies to stay warm in Antarctic temperatures.
Polar bears depend on sea ice to hunt seals and their habitat is shrinking.
Walruses use their tusks to pull themselves onto ice and establish social rank.
Arctic foxes change their coat from white in winter to brown in summer for camouflage.
Reindeer have adapted to survive extreme cold by slowing their metabolism in winter.
 
I had a really interesting experience today that made me think deeply.
What happened that got you thinking so much about it?
I noticed how different people react to the same situation in completely different ways.
That is a fascinating observation about human perception and personality.
It made me wonder how much of how we see the world is shaped by our experiences.
That is one of the central questions of psychology and philosophy.
Do you think we can ever fully understand how someone else experiences the world?
Empathy allows us to approximate their experience but never fully replicate it.
So we are all living in slightly different versions of the same reality.
Exactly and that is why communication and curiosity about others matters so much.
It changes how I think about disagreements when I remember that.
Remembering that disagreements often come from different experiences rather than bad intent helps.
How do you think we get better at understanding perspectives different from our own?
Listening more than speaking and asking genuine questions rather than assuming.
What is the hardest part of really listening to someone you disagree with?
Quieting the internal voice that is already preparing a counter-argument.
That is so true I often catch myself doing exactly that.
It is a very human tendency that takes conscious practice to overcome.
Do you think most people want to be understood more than they want to be right?
Deep down yes though in the moment being right can feel more urgent.
What shifts that in people you think?
When someone genuinely listens without judgment people often soften and open up.
That makes me want to practice listening better in my own conversations.
Small shifts in how we listen can transform relationships over time.
What would you say is the most underrated communication skill?
Asking follow-up questions that show you genuinely heard what was said.
That seems simple but it must make such a big difference to people.
Being truly heard is one of the most deeply satisfying human experiences.
 
Tell me something interesting about space that most people do not know.
A day on Venus is longer than a year on Venus because it rotates so slowly.
That is bizarre how is that even possible?
Venus rotates extremely slowly on its axis but orbits the sun in just two hundred and twenty-five days.
So it goes around the sun faster than it spins on itself.
Exactly and it also rotates backwards compared to most planets.
Why does Venus rotate backwards?
A giant impact billions of years ago may have flipped it upside down.
What other strange space facts are there?
Neutron stars can spin up to seven hundred times per second.
That seems impossibly fast for something that massive.
They are only about twenty kilometers across but contain more mass than the sun.
If I could stand on the surface of a neutron star what would happen?
The gravity would crush you into a layer thinner than an atom almost instantly.
Is there anything stranger than a neutron star?
Black holes are arguably stranger because our physics breaks down at the singularity.
What does that actually mean when physics breaks down?
It means our equations produce infinity which signals the limits of our understanding.
So there are still fundamental things about the universe we do not understand.
Absolutely and that is what makes physics so exciting right now.
What is the biggest unsolved mystery in physics?
Reconciling quantum mechanics with general relativity is perhaps the biggest challenge.
What is the difference between those two theories?
Quantum mechanics describes the very small and general relativity describes the very large.
And they contradict each other in certain situations.
Near black holes and in the very early universe both are needed but they conflict.
So scientists are trying to build one theory that covers everything.
Yes it is called a theory of everything and nobody has found it yet.
That gives me a lot of respect for the complexity of the universe.
The universe seems to enjoy being more complicated than we expect it to be.
 
What makes something beautiful is a question philosophers have debated for centuries.
Beauty can be found in mathematics nature art music and unexpected places.
Some people think beauty is purely subjective while others believe there are objective standards.
Symmetry is found in beautiful things across nature art and mathematics.
The golden ratio appears in nature and has been used by artists throughout history.
Fractals are infinitely complex patterns that repeat at every scale in nature.
A sunset is beautiful partly because it is transient and can never be repeated exactly.
Music can evoke powerful emotions even in people from completely different cultures.
The sublime refers to an overwhelming sense of awe in the face of something vast and powerful.
Poetry compresses emotion and meaning into a small number of carefully chosen words.
A great piece of literature captures truths about human experience that resonate across time.
Architecture shapes how we feel in spaces often in ways we cannot fully articulate.
Design is beautiful when it solves a problem so elegantly the solution seems inevitable.
Craftsmanship makes everyday objects into things worth caring about and preserving.
The beauty of an equation comes from its power to describe reality so precisely.
Unexpected connections between different fields often produce the most elegant insights.
The natural world offers beauty at every scale from quarks to galaxy clusters.
A spider's web is a marvel of engineering and geometry built instinctively.
The double helix of DNA is both beautiful and functionally elegant.
Color is perceived differently by different species and even different humans.
Human perception of beauty may be partly hardwired and partly learned through culture.
Beauty in a face often correlates with signals of health and genetic fitness.
Aesthetic preferences vary across cultures though some elements appear nearly universal.
The appreciation of beauty may have evolved as a signal for quality in mates resources and environments.
Art allows humans to create and share beauty that exists nowhere in nature.
The experience of great art can feel like suddenly seeing something you always knew.
Creating something beautiful is one of the most distinctly human activities.
Beauty makes life more worth living even when it serves no practical purpose.
Noticing beauty in small things like light on water or a well-turned phrase enriches daily life.
The capacity to be moved by beauty may be one of the finest qualities of the human mind.
 
A telephone call connects two voices across any distance in real time.
Text messaging allows asynchronous short written communication between people.
Video calling allows face-to-face communication regardless of physical distance.
Email is suited to longer more formal written communication and record-keeping.
A handwritten letter carries a personal quality that digital messages often lack.
Body language communicates emotions and intentions alongside spoken words.
Eye contact signals attention interest and confidence in social interactions.
Posture communicates mood and attitude often before a word is spoken.
Tone of voice carries emotional content beyond the literal meaning of words.
Silence in conversation can be powerful and communicates comfort or tension.
Humor builds rapport and makes difficult conversations more approachable.
Storytelling is one of the oldest and most effective forms of communication.
A strong opening in any communication captures attention immediately.
Being specific and concrete makes communication clearer and more memorable.
Asking questions shows interest and helps ensure understanding.
Paraphrasing what someone said confirms that you understood them correctly.
Avoiding jargon makes communication accessible to more people.
Adapting your communication style to your audience shows emotional intelligence.
Writing clearly requires knowing what you want to say before you begin.
Editing removes unnecessary words and sharpens the clarity of writing.
Reading widely improves vocabulary understanding and the ability to write well.
Public speaking is one of the most commonly feared but learnable skills.
Preparation and practice reduce anxiety about public speaking significantly.
A compelling presentation tells a story rather than presenting a list of facts.
Visual aids should support what you say rather than duplicate it.
The ability to give clear instructions is a valuable practical skill in any context.
Negotiation involves understanding what the other party needs not just what they want.
Persuasion is most effective when it addresses the concerns of the person you are convincing.
Conflict resolution requires both parties to feel heard before solutions can be found.
Effective communication is a skill that can always be improved with practice and reflection.
 
A recipe is a set of instructions for preparing a specific dish.
Mise en place means preparing and organizing all ingredients before cooking begins.
Seasoning food throughout cooking builds more complex flavor than adding it at the end.
Tasting as you cook allows you to adjust flavors before serving.
Resting meat after cooking allows juices to redistribute for better texture.
Deglazing a pan with wine or stock lifts flavorful browned bits from the bottom.
Caramelization occurs when sugars are heated and transform into a complex sweet flavor.
The Maillard reaction creates complex flavors and browning in cooked proteins.
Emulsification combines oil and water using an emulsifier like egg yolk.
Mayonnaise is an emulsion of oil egg yolk and vinegar or lemon juice.
Hollandaise sauce is an emulsion of butter egg yolks and lemon juice.
Reduction concentrates flavor by simmering a liquid until some water evaporates.
Blanching briefly boils vegetables then shocks them in ice water to preserve color.
Al dente means pasta that is cooked through but still has a slight firmness when bitten.
Braising cooks tough cuts of meat slowly in liquid until they become tender.
Slow cooking breaks down collagen in tough meat into gelatin over many hours.
A brine is a salt solution used to add moisture and flavor to meat before cooking.
Curing preserves food using salt sugar and sometimes smoke and spices.
Smoking adds flavor to food by exposing it to low heat and wood smoke.
Pickling preserves food in an acidic solution usually vinegar or brine.
Fermentation uses microorganisms to transform food improving flavor and preservation.
Kimchi is a Korean fermented vegetable dish usually made with cabbage and chili.
Sauerkraut is fermented cabbage with a sour flavor popular in German cuisine.
Miso is a fermented soybean paste used widely in Japanese cooking.
Soy sauce is a fermented liquid condiment made from soybeans wheat and salt.
Worcestershire sauce is a fermented condiment with a complex savory flavor.
Fish sauce is made from fermented fish and is central to many Southeast Asian cuisines.
Umami is the fifth basic taste alongside sweet salty sour and bitter.
Glutamates found in meat cheese mushrooms and tomatoes create umami flavor.
A well-balanced dish harmonizes sweet salty sour bitter and umami elements.
 
Energy cannot be created or destroyed only converted from one form to another.
This principle is called the conservation of energy and is a fundamental law of physics.
Kinetic energy is the energy of motion.
Potential energy is stored energy due to position or state.
A stretched spring has elastic potential energy.
A lifted weight has gravitational potential energy.
Chemical energy is stored in the bonds between atoms in molecules.
Nuclear energy is stored in the nucleus of atoms and released by fission or fusion.
Electrical energy is the movement of electrons through a conductor.
Thermal energy flows from hotter to cooler objects until temperatures equalize.
Entropy is a measure of disorder in a system and tends to increase over time.
The second law of thermodynamics states that entropy always increases in a closed system.
Efficiency measures how much input energy is converted to useful output energy.
Most engines waste energy as heat which is why one hundred percent efficiency is impossible.
A lever multiplies force by increasing the distance over which it is applied.
A pulley changes the direction of force and can multiply mechanical advantage.
A gear transfers and changes rotational force and speed between two shafts.
Pressure is force divided by the area over which it is applied.
Buoyancy is the upward force exerted by a fluid on a submerged object.
Archimedes discovered that an object submerged in fluid displaces its own volume.
Bernoulli's principle explains how faster-moving air creates lower pressure enabling flight.
Newton's first law says an object at rest stays at rest unless acted upon by a force.
Newton's second law states that force equals mass times acceleration.
Newton's third law states that every action has an equal and opposite reaction.
Friction is the force that resists relative motion between two surfaces in contact.
Air resistance slows objects moving through air and is related to shape and speed.
Terminal velocity is reached when air resistance equals gravitational force on a falling object.
Momentum is the product of mass and velocity and is conserved in collisions.
Centripetal force keeps an object moving in a circular path directed toward the center.
Angular momentum keeps a spinning object rotating unless a torque acts on it.
Ancient Rome built roads that stretched across the entire empire for efficient movement.
Roman aqueducts carried fresh water to cities using gravity and engineering precision.
The Colosseum in Rome could seat up to eighty thousand spectators.
Roman concrete was so durable that many structures have survived for two thousand years.
The arch was a key innovation that allowed Romans to build large durable structures.
Roman law forms the foundation of legal systems in many countries today.
Latin evolved into the Romance languages as the Roman Empire fragmented.
The Senate was the governing body of the Roman Republic before the emperors.
Julius Caesar crossed the Rubicon River in forty-nine BC triggering a civil war.
Augustus became the first Roman emperor after defeating Mark Antony and Cleopatra.
Constantine made Christianity the official religion of the Roman Empire in the fourth century.
The Eastern Roman Empire continued as the Byzantine Empire until fourteen fifty-three.
The fall of Rome in four seventy-six AD marked the beginning of the medieval period.
Medieval Europe was organized around feudalism with lords serfs and knights.
The Catholic Church held enormous power over politics culture and daily life in medieval Europe.
Monasteries preserved ancient knowledge through copying manuscripts by hand.
The Crusades began in ten ninety-six when Pope Urban II called for recapture of Jerusalem.
The Magna Carta was signed in twelve fifteen limiting the power of the English king.
The Black Death killed twenty to fifty million people in Europe in the fourteenth century.
The Hundred Years War shaped the national identities of France and England.
Gutenberg's printing press in fourteen fifty made books affordable and spread literacy.
The Age of Discovery opened trade routes and led to colonization of the Americas.
The Scientific Revolution replaced religious explanations of nature with empirical investigation.
Copernicus proposed that the earth orbits the sun rather than the other way around.
Galileo used a telescope to confirm the heliocentric model of the solar system.
Newton developed the laws of motion and universal gravitation in the seventeenth century.
The Enlightenment promoted reason individual rights and skepticism of tradition.
John Locke argued that governments derive their authority from the consent of the governed.
Rousseau believed in the natural goodness of humans uncorrupted by civilization.
Voltaire championed freedom of speech religious tolerance and separation of church and state.
 
Photovoltaic cells convert sunlight directly into electricity using semiconductor materials.
Wind power has become one of the cheapest sources of electricity in many countries.
Hydroelectric power generates electricity from flowing water through turbines.
Tidal power uses the movement of ocean tides to generate electricity.
Geothermal energy uses heat from within the earth to generate electricity and heat buildings.
Biomass energy uses organic materials like wood and crop waste to generate heat and power.
Nuclear fission splits heavy atoms like uranium to release enormous amounts of energy.
Nuclear fusion combines light atoms like hydrogen releasing even more energy with less waste.
The sun generates energy through nuclear fusion in its core.
Energy storage through batteries is critical for making renewable power reliable.
Lithium-ion batteries power most portable electronics and electric vehicles.
Pumped hydro stores energy by pumping water uphill and releasing it through turbines.
Hydrogen fuel cells convert hydrogen and oxygen into electricity with only water as a byproduct.
Smart grids use technology to balance electricity supply and demand more efficiently.
Energy efficiency means doing the same work with less energy input.
Building insulation reduces heating and cooling needs significantly.
LED lighting uses up to ninety percent less energy than traditional incandescent bulbs.
Electric vehicles produce no direct emissions and are increasingly affordable.
Public transport reduces emissions per person by carrying many people at once.
Urban planning that enables walking and cycling reduces transport energy needs.
Industrial processes account for a large share of global energy use.
Cement production alone contributes about eight percent of global carbon dioxide emissions.
Steel production requires enormous amounts of energy and is a major emissions source.
Green hydrogen produced using renewable electricity could decarbonize heavy industry.
Carbon capture technology removes carbon dioxide from emissions or directly from the air.
Reforestation is a natural and cost-effective method of removing carbon dioxide.
Blue carbon refers to carbon stored in coastal ecosystems like mangroves and seagrasses.
Net zero emissions means balancing greenhouse gas releases with removal from the atmosphere.
The Paris Agreement aims to limit global warming to one point five degrees Celsius.
International cooperation is essential to address a challenge as global as climate change.
 
A river delta is shaped by the deposition of sediment where a river meets standing water.
The Nile Delta is one of the world's oldest inhabited regions due to fertile flood deposits.
Alluvial fans form where fast-moving streams slow down and deposit sediment on flat land.
A floodplain is the flat land beside a river that floods periodically depositing nutrients.
River meanders form as water flows around curves and gradually shifts course.
Oxbow lakes form when meanders are cut off from the main river channel.
A gorge is a narrow steep-sided valley cut through rock by a river.
The Grand Canyon was carved over millions of years by the Colorado River.
Sinkholes form when underlying rock dissolves creating a surface collapse.
Karst landscape develops on soluble rock like limestone through chemical weathering.
Caves form when water dissolves limestone along fractures underground.
Stalactites hang from cave ceilings formed by mineral-rich water dripping over time.
Stalagmites grow upward from cave floors where dripping water deposits minerals.
Underground rivers sometimes flow through cave systems in karst regions.
A spring is a place where groundwater naturally emerges at the surface.
An artesian well taps into a pressurized aquifer that pushes water up without pumping.
Oases form in deserts where groundwater reaches the surface supporting plant life.
A wadi is a dry riverbed in desert regions that flows only after rainfall.
Flash floods occur suddenly in dry regions when intense rain falls faster than soil can absorb.
Dust storms form when strong winds lift loose dry soil from bare ground.
A sandstorm in the Sahara can transport sand across the Atlantic to the Americas.
Loess is a fine windblown sediment that forms some of the most fertile soils on earth.
The Loess Plateau in China was built up over thousands of years by windblown deposits.
Permafrost underlies about a quarter of the land in the Northern Hemisphere.
As permafrost thaws it releases stored methane a potent greenhouse gas.
Thermokarst lakes form as permafrost thaws and the ground collapses into depressions.
Sea level rise threatens low-lying coastal areas and small island nations.
Barrier islands protect coastlines from storm surge and wave erosion.
Mangrove forests protect coastlines from erosion and provide nursery habitat for fish.
Coral atolls are ring-shaped reefs surrounding a lagoon that formed on a submerged volcano.
 
Music theory is the study of the principles and language of music.
A scale is a sequence of notes arranged by pitch in ascending or descending order.
The major scale has a bright happy quality while the minor scale sounds darker and sadder.
A chord is a group of notes played simultaneously to create harmony.
The tonic is the central note of a scale around which a piece of music revolves.
The dominant chord creates tension that is resolved by returning to the tonic.
Counterpoint is the technique of combining two or more melodic lines simultaneously.
Johann Sebastian Bach was a master of counterpoint in Baroque music.
A fugue is a contrapuntal composition in which a theme is introduced and developed in succession.
A symphony is a large-scale orchestral work typically in four movements.
A concerto features a solo instrument accompanied by an orchestra.
A sonata is a composition for one or two instruments in multiple movements.
Ludwig van Beethoven composed nine symphonies including the famous Fifth and Ninth.
Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart was composing music at the age of five.
Frédéric Chopin wrote almost exclusively for solo piano with poetic and technical mastery.
Franz Liszt was a virtuoso pianist who pushed the boundaries of technique and expression.
Johannes Brahms combined classical structure with Romantic emotional expression.
Richard Wagner created epic operas called music dramas that transformed the art form.
Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky composed beloved ballets including Swan Lake and The Nutcracker.
Claude Debussy developed Impressionism in music using unusual harmonies and textures.
Igor Stravinsky's Rite of Spring caused a riot at its premiere for its shocking modernity.
Jazz emerged from African American communities blending blues gospel and ragtime.
Louis Armstrong was a pioneering jazz trumpeter and singer.
Miles Davis recorded Kind of Blue which became one of the best-selling jazz albums.
John Coltrane expanded jazz harmony with complex improvisation on the saxophone.
Blues music originated in the African American South and influenced much popular music.
Rock and roll developed in the nineteen fifties from rhythm and blues and country music.
The Beatles transformed popular music and culture in the nineteen sixties.
Bob Dylan used rock music to address social and political issues in poetic lyrics.
Hip hop culture includes rapping DJing breakdancing and graffiti art.
 
I have been thinking a lot about what it means to live a good life.
That is one of the oldest and most important questions humans have asked.
Do you think there is a universal answer or is it different for everyone?
There are probably some universal elements and also significant individual variation.
What would you say are the universal elements of a good life?
Health meaningful relationships purpose and a sense of contributing to something larger.
What about happiness is that the same as living a good life?
Many philosophers argue that happiness is a byproduct of living well rather than a goal itself.
That is interesting because most people seem to pursue happiness directly.
Paradoxically chasing happiness directly often makes it more elusive.
What would you say to someone who feels their life lacks meaning?
Look for small acts of contribution and connection rather than waiting for a grand purpose.
That feels more actionable than some advice which tells people to find their passion.
Finding your passion often comes through doing things rather than contemplating them.
What role does suffering play in a meaningful life do you think?
Suffering can deepen empathy resilience and appreciation for the good that exists.
Viktor Frankl survived the Holocaust and argued that meaning can be found in any situation.
His idea that we can choose our attitude toward unavoidable suffering is remarkable.
How do relationships factor into living a good life?
Decades of research consistently show that relationships are the strongest predictor of wellbeing.
What kind of relationships matter most?
Deep reciprocal relationships based on trust honesty and genuine care.
It sounds like quantity matters less than quality in relationships.
Absolutely one or two truly close relationships are more valuable than many superficial ones.
What is your view on the role of work in a good life?
Work that feels meaningful and uses your strengths tends to contribute to wellbeing.
But work that consumes everything at the expense of other parts of life can undermine it.
Balance seems to be important across all areas of a good life.
Balance and integration rather than maximizing any one dimension seems wise.
That gives me a lot to think about and work toward in my own life.
 
Every language has its own way of organizing time and expressing relationships.
Some languages have words for concepts that do not exist in English.
Saudade in Portuguese describes a melancholic longing for something beloved and absent.
Hygge in Danish describes a cozy warm quality of contentment and conviviality.
Ikigai in Japanese describes the reason for getting up in the morning.
Schadenfreude in German describes pleasure derived from another person's misfortune.
Wabi-sabi in Japanese describes the beauty found in imperfection and impermanence.
Ubuntu in Zulu expresses the idea that a person is a person through other people.
Fernweh in German describes a longing for distant places you have never been.
Meraki in Greek describes putting your soul spirit and creativity into something you do.
The Sapir-Whorf hypothesis suggests that language shapes how we think and perceive reality.
Research shows that language can influence perception of color time and spatial relations.
People who speak multiple languages sometimes report feeling like different people in each.
Translation is never perfect because languages carve up reality in different ways.
Poetry is notoriously difficult to translate because so much depends on sound and rhythm.
A metaphor that works in one language may be confusing or odd in another.
Humor depends so heavily on wordplay and cultural context that it rarely translates.
Idioms are culturally specific and often nonsensical when translated literally.
Learning a new language gives you access to an entirely different way of seeing the world.
Children learn language effortlessly through immersion and interaction rather than rules.
Adults can learn languages effectively through immersion meaningful use and consistent practice.
The critical period hypothesis suggests that language acquisition is easiest in childhood.
However adults have advantages in motivation metalinguistic awareness and learning strategies.
Accent in a second language often persists because early language shapes our phonological system.
Immersion in a language environment dramatically accelerates acquisition.
Extensive reading in a target language builds vocabulary and grammar through context.
Listening to native speakers at natural speed is challenging but essential for fluency.
Speaking practice builds confidence and reveals gaps in your knowledge.
Mistakes in language learning are necessary and useful not something to be ashamed of.
The goal of language learning is communication not perfection.
 
Stonehenge was built in stages between three thousand and fifteen hundred BC.
The purpose of Stonehenge may have been astronomical ceremonial or funerary.
The stones align precisely with sunrise on the summer solstice and sunset on the winter solstice.
Ancient people across many cultures tracked astronomical events in their monuments.
The Nazca Lines in Peru are enormous geoglyphs visible only from the air.
Easter Island is known for its massive stone statues called moai carved by early inhabitants.
Machu Picchu was built by the Inca civilization high in the Andes Mountains.
The Aztec capital Tenochtitlan was built on an island in a lake and was one of the largest cities.
Chichen Itza was a major Maya city featuring a pyramid aligned with the equinox sun.
The Parthenon in Athens was built as a temple to the goddess Athena in the fifth century BC.
The Acropolis of Athens represents the peak of classical Greek architecture and civic pride.
The Pantheon in Rome has a concrete dome with an opening called the oculus at its top.
The Hagia Sophia in Istanbul was built as a cathedral became a mosque and is now a museum.
The Angkor Wat temple complex in Cambodia is the largest religious monument in the world.
The Taj Mahal in India was built by Emperor Shah Jahan as a mausoleum for his wife.
The Great Mosque of Córdoba blends Islamic and Christian architectural styles.
The Notre-Dame Cathedral in Paris is a masterpiece of Gothic architecture.
Gothic architecture features pointed arches flying buttresses and large stained glass windows.
The Sydney Opera House is one of the most iconic buildings of the twentieth century.
The Burj Khalifa in Dubai is currently the world's tallest building at eight hundred and twenty-eight meters.
The Empire State Building was the tallest building in the world when it opened in nineteen thirty-one.
The Brooklyn Bridge was an engineering marvel when completed in eighteen eighty-three.
The Eiffel Tower was built for the eighteen eighty-nine World Exhibition in Paris.
The Panama Canal connects the Atlantic and Pacific Oceans through Central America.
The Suez Canal connects the Mediterranean Sea to the Red Sea through Egypt.
The Channel Tunnel connects England and France under the English Channel.
The International Space Station is the largest human-made structure in space.
The Large Hadron Collider is the world's largest particle accelerator located near Geneva.
The Three Gorges Dam in China is the largest hydroelectric dam in the world.
Human engineering has produced structures that would have seemed impossible to past generations.
 
What is something you find yourself thinking about often these days?
I often think about how quickly technology is changing every aspect of daily life.
That does seem like an unavoidable reality of our current moment in history.
It is both exciting and a little unsettling depending on the day.
What part of it excites you most?
The possibilities for solving problems that seemed intractable just a decade ago.
Like what kind of problems are you thinking of?
Disease climate change education access and so many others.
And what part makes you feel unsettled?
The speed of change and whether humans can adapt institutions and values fast enough.
That tension between possibility and risk seems to define this era.
Every major technological revolution has created both new opportunities and new dangers.
How do you think about navigating that personally?
Staying curious informed and thoughtful while not being paralyzed by uncertainty.
That seems like a wise balance to try to maintain.
It helps to remember that humans have navigated enormous changes before and adapted.
Do you think the current pace of change is genuinely unprecedented?
The rate of change may be unprecedented but human adaptability is also remarkable.
What gives you the most optimism about where things are headed?
The creativity and problem-solving capability of humans working together on hard problems.
And the fact that more people than ever have access to knowledge and tools.
That democratization of knowledge and capability does seem like something new and powerful.
What would you say to someone who feels overwhelmed by all the change?
Focus on what you can control and find community with people who share your values.
Change is less frightening when you face it alongside people you trust.
That is such practical wisdom that applies beyond just technological change.
The fundamentals of what makes life good do not change as fast as technology does.
Meaningful relationships purpose and contribution remain central no matter the era.
That is a grounding thought when everything else feels in flux.
"""
 
CORPUS_2000 += """
The human hand has twenty-seven bones and is capable of extraordinary precision.
Fine motor skills develop gradually in children through practice and play.
The dominant hand is usually stronger and more coordinated than the non-dominant hand.
Handwriting is a complex motor skill that engages many regions of the brain simultaneously.
Typing has largely replaced handwriting in many contexts but each has unique benefits.
Drawing requires training the hand to reproduce what the eye observes accurately.
Surgical precision requires years of training to develop reliable hand-eye coordination.
Musicians develop extraordinary fine motor control through thousands of hours of practice.
Rock climbers develop powerful grip strength and precise footwork through repeated effort.
Carpenters develop intuitive sense of material and tool through long experience.
Pottery requires sensitivity to the clay and control of the wheel simultaneously.
Knitting and weaving are ancient crafts that produce fabric from fiber using hand tools.
Embroidery creates decorative patterns on fabric using needle and colored thread.
Calligraphy is the art of beautiful handwriting practiced across many cultures.
Origami creates three-dimensional forms from flat paper through precise folding.
Woodworking requires understanding grain structure and precise measurement and cutting.
Metalworking includes forging casting welding and machining to shape metal.
Glassblowing shapes molten glass into vessels and sculptures through breath and tools.
Ceramics uses clay fired at high temperatures to create functional and decorative objects.
Leatherworking shapes and stitches leather into durable goods and art.
Jewelry making combines metalwork and gemstone setting to create wearable art.
Textile arts include weaving spinning dyeing and quilting among many others.
Folk crafts reflect the cultural identity and practical ingenuity of communities.
Craft traditions passed down through generations carry cultural knowledge and meaning.
The maker movement celebrates hands-on creation and DIY culture in the digital age.
Repair rather than replacement extends the life of objects and reduces waste.
Learning a craft develops patience focus and satisfaction in physical creation.
The result of handcraft carries the mark of human presence that mass production cannot replicate.
Traditional crafts are being revived as people seek connection to material and making.
The satisfaction of making something with your own hands is deeply human and fulfilling.
 
Planets orbiting other stars are called exoplanets.
The first confirmed exoplanet orbiting a sun-like star was discovered in nineteen ninety-five.
Thousands of exoplanets have now been confirmed using various detection methods.
The transit method detects planets when they pass in front of their star dimming its light.
The radial velocity method detects the wobble a planet causes in its star's movement.
Direct imaging of exoplanets is extremely difficult due to the brightness of host stars.
The habitable zone is the region around a star where liquid water could exist on a planet.
Kepler Space Telescope confirmed over two thousand five hundred exoplanets before retirement.
Some exoplanets are called hot Jupiters because they are gas giants orbiting very close to their stars.
Super-Earths are planets larger than Earth but smaller than Neptune.
Mini-Neptunes are smaller than Neptune and may have thick gas envelopes.
Rocky exoplanets in the habitable zone are prime targets in the search for life.
Proxima Centauri b is an exoplanet in the habitable zone of our nearest stellar neighbor.
The TRAPPIST-1 system has seven Earth-sized planets three of which are in the habitable zone.
Biosignatures are chemical signs in a planet's atmosphere that may indicate life.
Oxygen methane and water vapor together in an atmosphere could indicate biological processes.
The James Webb Space Telescope is analyzing exoplanet atmospheres in unprecedented detail.
The Drake Equation estimates the number of communicating civilizations in our galaxy.
SETI is the Search for Extraterrestrial Intelligence using radio telescopes.
No confirmed signal from alien intelligence has been detected despite decades of searching.
The Fermi Paradox asks why we have not detected signs of other civilizations given how old the universe is.
Possible explanations include the rarity of life the fragility of civilizations and the vast distances.
Panspermia is the hypothesis that life may be spread across the universe on asteroids and comets.
Extremophiles on Earth survive in conditions once thought incompatible with life.
Tardigrades can survive in space vacuum extreme radiation and temperatures.
Hydrothermal vents support life without sunlight suggesting life could exist elsewhere similarly.
The moons Europa Enceladus and Titan are considered promising places to search for life.
Enceladus has plumes of water vapor erupting from its surface indicating a subsurface ocean.
The search for extraterrestrial life is one of the most profound scientific endeavors.
Whatever we find or do not find will profoundly reshape our understanding of our place in the universe.
 
Trees are some of the oldest living organisms on earth.
Bristlecone pines in California are over five thousand years old.
A giant sequoia can grow taller than a hundred meters and weigh over a million kilograms.
The baobab tree in Africa stores thousands of liters of water in its trunk.
Mangrove trees have specialized roots that allow them to grow in salty coastal water.
Banyan trees have aerial roots that become secondary trunks creating enormous canopies.
The dragon blood tree of Socotra has a distinctive umbrella shape and red sap.
Bamboo is actually a grass not a tree and can grow over a meter per day.
Cacti are succulents adapted to store water in arid desert environments.
Aloe vera stores water and has been used medicinally for thousands of years.
Orchids are the largest family of flowering plants with over twenty-five thousand species.
Rafflesia arnoldii produces the largest individual flower in the world measuring up to a meter.
The titan arum produces a bloom that smells of rotting flesh to attract flies for pollination.
Pitcher plants trap and digest insects in pools of digestive fluid inside their leaves.
Venus flytraps snap shut when insects touch sensitive trigger hairs inside the trap.
Sundews use sticky mucilage on their leaves to trap and digest insects.
Bladderworts use vacuum-powered traps to capture tiny aquatic organisms.
Carnivorous plants evolved their diet to supplement nutrients in poor soil environments.
Mosses are non-vascular plants that absorb water and nutrients directly through their surfaces.
Lichens can survive on bare rock and are often the first organisms to colonize new surfaces.
Algae are photosynthetic organisms that range from single cells to giant kelp.
Phytoplankton are microscopic algae that produce about half of the earth's oxygen.
Seaweed is used as food fertilizer and increasingly as a source of biofuel.
Ferns are among the oldest land plants and reproduce through spores rather than seeds.
Horsetails are ancient plants whose ancestors grew as tall as trees in the Carboniferous period.
Club mosses are another ancient group that diversified dramatically in prehistoric times.
The evolution of flowering plants transformed terrestrial ecosystems about one hundred million years ago.
Coevolution between flowering plants and pollinators produced the extraordinary diversity seen today.
Plants produce secondary compounds as defenses against herbivores and pathogens.
Aspirin was derived from salicylic acid originally found in willow bark.
 
Philosophy of mind explores the nature of consciousness and mental states.
The mind-body problem asks how physical brain processes give rise to subjective experience.
Dualism holds that mind and body are fundamentally different kinds of substance.
Physicalism holds that mental states are entirely physical brain states.
Functionalism defines mental states by their causal roles rather than physical composition.
The hard problem of consciousness asks why physical processes feel like something from the inside.
Qualia are the subjective qualities of experience such as the redness of red.
The philosophical zombie thought experiment imagines a being identical to a human but with no inner experience.
Free will is the ability to make choices that are not determined by prior causes.
Determinism holds that every event including human choices is caused by prior events.
Compatibilism argues that free will and determinism can both be true.
Personal identity asks what makes you the same person you were ten years ago.
Derek Parfit argued that personal identity matters less than psychological continuity.
The trolley problem is a classic thought experiment in moral philosophy.
Utilitarianism holds that the right action is the one that produces the greatest happiness.
Deontology holds that some actions are inherently right or wrong regardless of consequences.
Virtue ethics focuses on the character of the moral agent rather than rules or outcomes.
Care ethics emphasizes relationships and context in moral reasoning.
Applied ethics examines moral questions in specific domains like medicine business and technology.
Bioethics addresses moral questions about life death medicine and biotechnology.
Environmental ethics considers the moral obligations humans have toward nature.
Political philosophy examines the justification and nature of political authority.
John Rawls argued for a just society built on principles people would choose behind a veil of ignorance.
Libertarianism prioritizes individual freedom and minimal government interference.
Communitarianism emphasizes the importance of community in defining identity and value.
Feminism in philosophy examines how gender shapes knowledge ethics and political structures.
Postcolonial philosophy critiques the legacies of colonialism in knowledge production.
Philosophy of language examines how words relate to meaning thought and the world.
Analytic philosophy focuses on clarity logic and argument.
Continental philosophy emphasizes context history and lived experience.
 
I have been thinking about what makes some people seem so at ease with themselves.
That quality of being comfortable in your own skin is genuinely admirable.
Do you think it is something people are born with or develop over time?
Research suggests it develops primarily through experience reflection and supportive relationships.
What experiences seem to contribute most to that sense of ease?
Being accepted as you are rather than for what you achieve builds deep security.
And the opposite experiences undermine it.
Yes conditional acceptance based on performance creates anxiety rather than confidence.
How do you develop that security as an adult if you did not get it early?
Through building relationships where you feel accepted and through self-compassion practices.
What does self-compassion actually mean in practice?
Treating yourself with the same kindness you would offer a good friend who was struggling.
That sounds simple but I imagine it is quite difficult in practice.
For many people the inner critic is far harsher toward themselves than toward others.
Why do you think that is?
Perhaps because we internalize critical voices from childhood and they become habitual.
How do you quiet that inner critic when it becomes destructive?
Notice it without identifying with it and question whether it is accurate or helpful.
So it is not about silencing the voice but changing your relationship to it.
Exactly mindfulness teaches you to observe thoughts without being swept away by them.
That shift from identification to observation seems really powerful.
It is one of the most transformative shifts people report from meditation practice.
What other practices help develop that inner ease?
Physical activity creative expression genuine connection and spending time in nature.
It seems like the things that are good for mental health are deeply interconnected.
The mind and body are not separate and what nourishes one tends to nourish the other.
I find that when I am physically healthy I am also more emotionally resilient.
That connection is well supported by research and by most people's direct experience.
Taking care of your whole self is not selfish it is the foundation of being able to help others.
You cannot pour from an empty cup as the saying goes.
 
Architecture shapes our experience of space and affects how we feel and behave.
Ancient Greek temples used proportion and harmony to create a sense of divine order.
Roman architecture emphasized engineering practicality and grand civic scale.
Byzantine architecture used domes and mosaics to create spiritually overwhelming interiors.
Islamic architecture features intricate geometric patterns calligraphy and serene courtyards.
Gothic cathedrals used height light and vertically to direct attention upward.
Renaissance architecture revived classical proportions and celebrated human scale.
Baroque architecture used drama movement and grandeur to impress and emotionally overwhelm.
Neoclassical architecture drew on Greek and Roman forms for civic buildings and monuments.
Art Nouveau used organic flowing forms inspired by plants and natural structures.
The Bauhaus movement combined fine art craftsmanship and industrial design.
Modernism rejected historical ornament in favor of form following function.
Le Corbusier called a house a machine for living and promoted functional rationalism.
Frank Lloyd Wright developed an organic architecture that grew from its natural setting.
The International Style used steel glass and concrete for rational universal buildings.
Brutalism used raw exposed concrete for bold expressive structures.
Postmodernism rejected modernist austerity and embraced historical reference and decoration.
Deconstructivism fractured conventional forms to express complexity and dissonance.
Sustainable architecture minimizes environmental impact and works with climate and nature.
Passive solar design uses the sun's energy for heating and lighting without mechanical systems.
Green roofs support biodiversity insulate buildings and manage stormwater.
Adaptive reuse converts old buildings for new purposes reducing waste and preserving character.
Urban design shapes public spaces streets and neighborhoods for human wellbeing.
Walkable neighborhoods reduce car dependence and increase physical activity and social connection.
Mixed-use development combines housing retail and work to create vibrant communities.
Parks and green space in cities improve mental health and provide ecological benefits.
The relationship between a building and its context determines whether it belongs or intrudes.
Great architecture serves its users delights the senses and stands the test of time.
Architecture at its best creates spaces where human life can flourish.
Every building is a statement about what a society values and how it sees the world.
The human voice is one of the most versatile and expressive musical instruments.
Singing develops lung capacity posture and breath control alongside musical skill.
A choir combines individual voices to create a sound greater than any single singer.
Opera combines singing drama orchestral music and staging in a total art form.
A baritone is a male voice with a range between tenor and bass.
A tenor is the highest common male vocal range.
A soprano is the highest common female vocal range.
An alto is a lower female voice and can also refer to instruments of similar range.
Falsetto is a technique that extends a singer's range into higher registers.
Throat singing is practiced in several cultures and produces multiple pitches simultaneously.
Beatboxing uses the voice to imitate drum machines and percussion.
Vocal improvisation is central to jazz and many folk musical traditions.
The acoustics of a space profoundly affect how music sounds inside it.
A concert hall is designed to distribute sound evenly with natural reverberation.
Recording technology allows music to be captured preserved and shared across distances.
Microphones convert sound waves into electrical signals for amplification and recording.
Mixing blends multiple audio tracks into a balanced final sound.
Mastering prepares a final recording for distribution at consistent volume and quality.
Music streaming has replaced physical formats as the dominant mode of music consumption.
Algorithmic recommendations expose listeners to music they might not otherwise discover.
Live performance creates a shared experience between musicians and audience.
Improvisation in performance requires deep knowledge of harmonic and rhythmic structure.
Stage presence combines musicianship with visual performance and connection to the audience.
A setlist shapes the emotional arc of a live performance.
Encore is an additional performance given at the demand of an appreciative audience.
Music festivals gather multiple performers and large audiences in outdoor settings.
The music industry encompasses creation production distribution and promotion.
Independent artists have greater creative control but less promotional support.
Collaboration between musicians from different traditions produces innovative hybrid forms.
Music education builds discipline creativity and a lifelong relationship with the art form.
 
Cooking oils have different properties that suit them to different cooking methods.
Olive oil is best for low to medium heat cooking and finishing dishes.
Avocado oil has a high smoke point and is suited to high heat cooking.
Coconut oil is solid at room temperature and imparts a slight coconut flavor.
Butter adds rich flavor and is used in both cooking and finishing sauces.
Clarified butter has had milk solids removed and can be heated to higher temperatures.
Ghee is clarified butter cooked until the milk solids caramelize then removed.
Sesame oil has a distinctive nutty flavor and is often added at the end of cooking.
Chili oil adds heat and flavor and is used as a condiment across many Asian cuisines.
Infused oils carry the flavor of herbs garlic or chili into dishes.
Vinegar adds acidity and brightness to balance rich or sweet flavors.
Balsamic vinegar is a reduced grape juice product aged in barrels with a sweet complex flavor.
Apple cider vinegar has a mild fruity acidity and is popular in dressings and marinades.
Lemon juice brightens flavors and is used in both cooking and finishing dishes.
Stock is a flavorful liquid made by simmering bones and vegetables for hours.
A roux is equal parts flour and fat cooked together to thicken sauces.
Bechamel is a white sauce made from butter flour and milk.
Velouté is made by adding light stock to a roux.
Espagnole or brown sauce is made from a brown roux and brown stock.
Hollandaise is an emulsified sauce of butter egg yolk and lemon.
Tomato sauce forms the base of many Italian and Mediterranean dishes.
Pesto is made from blending fresh basil garlic pine nuts parmesan and olive oil.
Salsa verde is a green sauce made with fresh herbs capers and anchovies.
Chimichurri is an Argentine sauce of parsley garlic vinegar and oil.
Tzatziki is a Greek sauce of yogurt cucumber garlic and dill.
Hummus is made from blended chickpeas tahini lemon and garlic.
Guacamole is made from mashed avocado lime cilantro and onion.
Aioli is garlic-flavored mayonnaise popular in Mediterranean cooking.
Teriyaki sauce combines soy sauce mirin and sugar for a sweet savory glaze.
Oyster sauce is a thick savory sauce used widely in Chinese cooking.
 
I find myself returning to the same questions about time and how to use it well.
What is it about time that you keep coming back to?
The way it passes so quickly and how easy it is to let it drift by without intention.
That experience of time accelerating as we get older is very common.
Scientists believe it happens because each year represents a smaller fraction of our total life.
That explanation makes sense but also makes me want to use time more consciously.
What would using time more consciously look like to you?
Spending it on things that matter and noticing what I am experiencing rather than rushing through.
Presence seems to be at the heart of what you are describing.
Yes being fully in a moment rather than already thinking about the next one.
What helps you be more present?
Physical activity nature conversation and occasionally disconnecting from devices.
Device disconnection seems especially important given how much they fragment attention.
The constant notifications and switching between tasks genuinely undermines the quality of experience.
How do you think about the balance between productivity and presence?
They are not always opposed but a culture obsessed with productivity can undermine presence.
Some of the most productive and creative periods in history involved significant unscheduled time.
Rest and wandering allow the mind to make connections that directed work often misses.
So idle time might actually be essential rather than wasteful.
The research on creativity strongly supports that insight.
What would you say to someone who feels guilty about resting?
That rest is not a reward for work it is a necessary part of sustained creative output.
And that the guilt itself is a cultural artifact not a moral truth.
That reframe feels important for a lot of people who grew up equating busyness with virtue.
Busyness as virtue is a relatively recent cultural phenomenon not a timeless human truth.
How do different cultures relate to time and rest differently?
Many cultures have deep traditions of midday rest communal meals and protecting leisure.
The siesta in Mediterranean cultures for example is an adaptation to climate and a celebration of rest.
There is wisdom in those traditions that faster-paced cultures have partly abandoned.
Reclaiming some of that wisdom seems genuinely worth doing even in a fast-moving world.
 
The study of ethics asks how we ought to live and treat one another.
Ancient philosophers debated whether virtue happiness or duty was the highest good.
Aristotle argued that happiness or flourishing was the highest aim of human life.
Flourishing required developing virtues like courage justice and practical wisdom.
The Stoics held that virtue alone is sufficient for happiness regardless of external circumstances.
Marcus Aurelius practiced Stoicism while ruling the Roman Empire and recorded his reflections.
Epicurus taught that the good life involves simple pleasures friendship and freedom from fear.
Confucius emphasized social harmony loyalty and respect for family and tradition.
Buddhist ethics centers on reducing suffering through compassionate non-attached living.
The golden rule appears in some form in nearly every major ethical tradition.
Kant argued that moral rules must be universal and apply equally to everyone.
His categorical imperative asks you to act only according to principles you could will to be universal laws.
The utilitarian Peter Singer argues that we have strong obligations to help those in need globally.
Rights-based ethics holds that individuals have fundamental rights that cannot be violated for greater good.
Contractarian ethics bases morality on principles that rational agents would agree to.
John Rawls thought the fairest principles are those chosen behind a veil of ignorance.
Moral intuitions serve as data points that ethical theories must account for or explain away.
Reflective equilibrium moves back and forth between principles and intuitions to find coherence.
Applied ethics tackles concrete questions in medicine business law and technology.
Medical ethics involves questions about consent autonomy beneficence and justice.
End of life decisions raise profound questions about dignity autonomy and suffering.
The ethics of artificial intelligence involves questions about bias accountability and autonomy.
Environmental ethics considers our obligations to future generations and non-human life.
Business ethics examines corporate responsibility honesty and fair treatment of stakeholders.
Global justice asks what wealthy nations owe to those suffering from poverty and disease.
Animal ethics questions whether our treatment of animals is morally justifiable.
Children's rights and obligations raise questions about autonomy and protection.
Criminal justice ethics examines punishment rehabilitation and the purpose of prisons.
Political ethics addresses corruption accountability and the obligations of power.
Moral progress over history suggests that ethical understanding can genuinely develop over time.
 
Sound art uses sound as its primary medium in non-traditional contexts.
Soundscape composition creates art from recorded environmental sounds.
John Cage composed a piece called four minutes thirty-three seconds of silence.
Ambient music creates atmosphere and texture rather than melody and narrative.
Brian Eno developed ambient music as a genre that can be either actively listened to or ignored.
Electronic dance music evolved from disco and funk and includes house techno and drum and bass.
DJing is an art form that involves mixing and manipulating recorded music in real time.
Sampling uses portions of existing recordings to create new musical works.
Music videos combine visual art and music to create a unified audiovisual experience.
Sound design creates the sonic world of films games and other media.
Foley artists create custom sound effects by recording everyday actions in a studio.
The human auditory system can distinguish subtle differences in pitch timbre and rhythm.
Absolute pitch allows some people to identify or produce a musical note without reference.
Musicians with perfect pitch can name any note they hear without comparison.
Most musicians develop relative pitch which allows identifying intervals between notes.
Ear training develops the ability to identify musical structures by sound.
Sight reading is the ability to perform music from notation without prior rehearsal.
Improvisation within a musical style requires internalizing its harmonic and rhythmic language.
Composition involves making decisions about melody harmony rhythm texture and form.
Orchestration is the art of assigning musical parts to different instruments for effect.
A leitmotif is a musical theme associated with a character or idea in an opera or film score.
John Williams created iconic film themes that are recognized worldwide.
Ennio Morricone transformed film scoring with distinctive and emotive compositions.
Hans Zimmer uses electronic and orchestral elements to create powerful cinematic soundscapes.
Music therapy uses music to address physical emotional cognitive and social needs.
Active music therapy involves creating music while receptive therapy involves listening.
Rhythm can regulate the nervous system and reduce anxiety and pain perception.
Singing in groups releases oxytocin and builds social bonding and trust.
Music is one of the most universal human behaviors found in every known culture.
The relationship between music emotion and meaning continues to fascinate scientists.
 
The experience of travel changes how you see your own home and culture.
Arriving somewhere new forces you to notice things you take for granted at home.
Language barriers can be frustrating but also unexpectedly humanizing.
Getting lost in an unfamiliar city is often where the most interesting discoveries happen.
Local markets reveal the rhythms and priorities of a culture better than tourist sites.
Sharing a meal with locals creates connection across language and cultural barriers.
Hospitality traditions vary across cultures but the impulse to welcome strangers is nearly universal.
Budget travel teaches resourcefulness and comfort with uncertainty.
Slow travel allows deeper connection to places rather than checking off a list of sights.
Living in a place even briefly gives insight that visiting can never provide.
Cultural exchange requires genuine curiosity and willingness to have your assumptions challenged.
Stereotypes about places and people rarely survive direct personal encounter.
The discomfort of travel can expand your sense of what is normal and possible.
Solo travel builds self-reliance decision-making and confidence in your own judgment.
Group travel can be more fun but requires compromise and flexibility.
Seasonal timing dramatically affects the experience of a destination.
Off-season travel offers fewer crowds lower costs and more authentic encounters.
Learning even a few words of the local language shows respect and opens doors.
Travel photography requires being present enough to recognize the moment worth capturing.
Responsible tourism considers the environmental and social impact of visiting a place.
Supporting local businesses ensures more economic benefit stays in the destination.
Wildlife tourism that prioritizes animal welfare over entertainment is more ethical.
Ecotourism ideally funds conservation while creating economic incentive to protect habitats.
The carbon cost of flying is significant and worth weighing against the value of travel.
Virtual travel experiences are growing but do not replicate the full sensory presence of being there.
Every journey changes you in ways that are hard to predict before departure.
The preparation for travel is part of the pleasure not just getting there.
Coming home after travel often reveals your own culture in a new and clearer light.
The people you meet while traveling often leave more lasting memories than the places.
Travel at its best is an act of curiosity and openness to the world as it actually is.
A habit forms when a behavior becomes automatic through repetition in a consistent context.
The habit loop consists of a cue a routine and a reward.
Changing a habit requires identifying the cue and substituting a new routine for the same reward.
Keystone habits are habits that naturally trigger other positive habits in a chain.
Exercise is often considered a keystone habit because it improves energy sleep and mood.
Morning routines set the tone for the day by establishing intention and momentum.
The first twenty minutes of the day strongly influence mood and productivity for hours after.
Designing your environment to make good habits easier is more effective than willpower alone.
Reducing friction for good behaviors and increasing friction for bad ones shapes choices.
The two-minute rule suggests that if something takes less than two minutes do it immediately.
Habit stacking links a new habit to an existing one using the existing habit as a trigger.
Implementation intentions specify exactly when where and how you will perform a new habit.
Tracking habits builds awareness and creates a visual record of progress over time.
Missing one day of a habit is forgivable but missing two creates risk of abandonment.
Identity-based habit formation focuses on becoming the kind of person who does the thing.
Small consistent improvements compound to remarkable results over months and years.
A one percent improvement each day results in being thirty-seven times better after a year.
Motivation fluctuates but systems based on consistent behavior are more reliable.
The discomfort of changing habits is temporary while the benefits compound indefinitely.
Accountability to another person significantly increases the likelihood of habit formation.
Social environments shape habits powerfully because humans copy those around them.
Choosing your environment and companions wisely is one of the most impactful things you can do.
Removing temptations from your environment is more effective than resisting them repeatedly.
Sleep is the foundation that makes all other healthy habits more sustainable.
Stress depletes willpower and makes reverting to default habits more likely.
Stress management is therefore essential infrastructure for any habit change program.
Celebrating small wins triggers dopamine and reinforces the habit loop positively.
Intrinsic motivation sustains habits better than external rewards over the long term.
The goal of habit formation is ultimately to free attention for higher-level thinking and creativity.
Habits that align with your values and identity are the ones that last.
 
Nuclear physics studies the structure of atomic nuclei and nuclear reactions.
Protons and neutrons are held together in the nucleus by the strong nuclear force.
The strong force is the most powerful of the four fundamental forces.
The four fundamental forces are gravity electromagnetism the strong force and the weak force.
The weak force is responsible for radioactive decay and nuclear fusion in stars.
Radioactivity is the spontaneous emission of radiation from unstable atomic nuclei.
Alpha radiation consists of helium nuclei and is stopped by a sheet of paper.
Beta radiation consists of electrons or positrons and is stopped by a few millimeters of metal.
Gamma radiation is high-energy electromagnetic radiation and requires dense shielding.
Half-life is the time it takes for half of a radioactive sample to decay.
Carbon-14 has a half-life of about five thousand seven hundred years and is used in dating.
Nuclear fission splits heavy nuclei releasing enormous amounts of energy.
A chain reaction occurs when fission releases neutrons that trigger further fissions.
A critical mass is the minimum amount of fissile material needed to sustain a chain reaction.
Nuclear reactors control chain reactions to produce heat that generates electricity.
Nuclear fusion joins light nuclei releasing even more energy than fission.
Fusion powers the sun and all stars but has not yet been achieved sustainably on earth.
ITER is an international fusion research project being built in France.
A plasma is a superheated state of matter where electrons are stripped from atoms.
Achieving controlled fusion requires confining plasma at millions of degrees.
Magnetic confinement uses powerful magnetic fields to contain the plasma in a tokamak.
Inertial confinement uses lasers to compress and heat a small pellet of fuel.
Nuclear weapons use uncontrolled fission or fusion to release catastrophic energy.
The Hiroshima bomb used uranium fission and released the equivalent of thirteen kilotons of TNT.
The Nagasaki bomb used plutonium fission and was more powerful than the Hiroshima device.
Hydrogen bombs use a fission explosion to trigger a fusion reaction for even greater yield.
The Non-Proliferation Treaty aims to prevent the spread of nuclear weapons.
Radiation therapy uses targeted radiation to destroy cancer cells in the body.
Nuclear medicine uses radioactive tracers to diagnose conditions using imaging.
Understanding nuclear physics has transformed both medicine and global security.
 
Ancient trade routes connected civilizations and spread goods ideas and diseases.
The Silk Road connected China with Central Asia the Middle East and Europe.
Spices from Southeast Asia were so valuable they drove European exploration.
Salt was once so valuable it was used as currency and gave us the word salary.
The Black Death traveled along trade routes from Central Asia to Europe.
Trade required standardized weights measures and eventually currency.
The earliest currency consisted of commodities like grain and cattle.
Accountability to another person significantly increases the likelihood of habit formation.
Social environments shape habits powerfully because humans copy those around them.
Choosing your environment and companions wisely is one of the most impactful things you can do.
Removing temptations from your environment is more effective than resisting them repeatedly.
Sleep is the foundation that makes all other healthy habits more sustainable.
Stress depletes willpower and makes reverting to default habits more likely.
Stress management is therefore essential infrastructure for any habit change program.
Celebrating small wins triggers dopamine and reinforces the habit loop positively.
Intrinsic motivation sustains habits better than external rewards over the long term.
The goal of habit formation is ultimately to free attention for higher-level thinking and creativity.
Habits that align with your values and identity are the ones that last.
 
Nuclear physics studies the structure of atomic nuclei and nuclear reactions.
Protons and neutrons are held together in the nucleus by the strong nuclear force.
The strong force is the most powerful of the four fundamental forces.
The four fundamental forces are gravity electromagnetism the strong force and the weak force.
The weak force is responsible for radioactive decay and nuclear fusion in stars.
Radioactivity is the spontaneous emission of radiation from unstable atomic nuclei.
Alpha radiation consists of helium nuclei and is stopped by a sheet of paper.
Beta radiation consists of electrons or positrons and is stopped by a few millimeters of metal.
Gamma radiation is high-energy electromagnetic radiation and requires dense shielding.
Half-life is the time it takes for half of a radioactive sample to decay.
Carbon-14 has a half-life of about five thousand seven hundred years and is used in dating.
Nuclear fission splits heavy nuclei releasing enormous amounts of energy.
A chain reaction occurs when fission releases neutrons that trigger further fissions.
A critical mass is the minimum amount of fissile material needed to sustain a chain reaction.
Nuclear reactors control chain reactions to produce heat that generates electricity.
Nuclear fusion joins light nuclei releasing even more energy than fission.
Fusion powers the sun and all stars but has not yet been achieved sustainably on earth.
ITER is an international fusion research project being built in France.
A plasma is a superheated state of matter where electrons are stripped from atoms.
Achieving controlled fusion requires confining plasma at millions of degrees.
Magnetic confinement uses powerful magnetic fields to contain the plasma in a tokamak.
Inertial confinement uses lasers to compress and heat a small pellet of fuel.
Nuclear weapons use uncontrolled fission or fusion to release catastrophic energy.
The Hiroshima bomb used uranium fission and released the equivalent of thirteen kilotons of TNT.
The Nagasaki bomb used plutonium fission and was more powerful than the Hiroshima device.
Hydrogen bombs use a fission explosion to trigger a fusion reaction for even greater yield.
The Non-Proliferation Treaty aims to prevent the spread of nuclear weapons.
Radiation therapy uses targeted radiation to destroy cancer cells in the body.
Nuclear medicine uses radioactive tracers to diagnose conditions using imaging.
Understanding nuclear physics has transformed both medicine and global security.
 
Ancient trade routes connected civilizations and spread goods ideas and diseases.
The Silk Road connected China with Central Asia the Middle East and Europe.
Spices from Southeast Asia were so valuable they drove European exploration.
Salt was once so valuable it was used as currency and gave us the word salary.
The Black Death traveled along trade routes from Central Asia to Europe.
Trade required standardized weights measures and eventually currency.
The earliest currency consisted of commodities like grain and cattle.
Metal coins became standard because they were durable divisible and portable.
Paper money was invented in China and spread westward over centuries.
The gold standard tied currency value to gold reserves.
Bretton Woods established the US dollar as the global reserve currency after World War Two.
Globalization accelerated dramatically after the fall of the Soviet Union in the nineteen nineties.
The World Trade Organization governs international trade rules between nations.
Free trade agreements reduce tariffs and barriers between member nations.
Comparative advantage explains why countries benefit from specializing in what they produce most efficiently.
Supply chains connect producers raw materials and consumers across many countries.
Just-in-time manufacturing minimizes inventory by receiving goods only as needed.
Outsourcing moves production to lower-cost countries for economic efficiency.
Reshoring brings manufacturing back to the home country for resilience and control.
Economic interdependence between nations can reduce conflict through shared interests.
Sanctions are economic restrictions used as a tool of foreign policy and pressure.
The Belt and Road Initiative is a Chinese infrastructure investment program spanning many countries.
Microfinance provides small loans to entrepreneurs in developing countries without access to banks.
Remittances are money sent home by workers abroad and are a major source of income for many countries.
Foreign direct investment involves companies establishing operations in other countries.
Economic development raises living standards through increased productivity and investment.
The poverty trap describes conditions that make it difficult for poor individuals or nations to escape poverty.
Education and healthcare investment are among the most effective tools for economic development.
Corruption undermines economic development by diverting resources and discouraging investment.
Transparent institutions rule of law and property rights are foundations of economic prosperity.
 
What is something you have recently changed your mind about?
I have been reconsidering how much I value efficiency compared to depth and richness.
That sounds like a meaningful shift. What prompted it?
I noticed I was optimizing my time so tightly that I was losing the texture of experience.
Like you were moving through life so efficiently there was nothing to taste.
Exactly every moment was accounted for but something felt hollow.
What did you start doing differently?
Deliberately leaving some time unplanned and letting conversations and experiences unfold.
That must have felt uncomfortable at first given what you described.
It did but I started noticing things I had been rushing past for months.
Small beautiful things that were there all along but too small to register when moving fast.
Yes the quality of attention changed everything.
Do you think that is something that can be consciously trained?
I think so through practices that slow you down and direct attention to the present.
What do you think you were really optimizing for when you were so focused on efficiency?
Probably a sense of control and the feeling of progress and accomplishment.
And what did you find underneath that?
A desire for connection and meaning that productivity alone was not satisfying.
That is a really honest observation that probably resonates with many people.
I think a lot of people are running hard toward goals without asking whether they are the right ones.
How do you audit your goals to make sure they are actually pointing where you want to go?
By asking whether achieving them would actually change how I feel or just what I have.
That distinction between being and having is at the heart of a lot of philosophical traditions.
And most people who achieve big external goals report that the feeling fades quickly.
The hedonic treadmill keeps resetting regardless of what you acquire or accomplish.
What is the alternative to chasing the moving target of external achievement?
Investing in relationships meaning depth of experience and the quality of attention you bring.
Those things seem to nourish something that external achievement cannot reach.
Yes and they do not require starting over every time you accomplish something new.
Friendship is one of the most researched and consistently important predictors of wellbeing.
Close friendships require vulnerability honesty and sustained investment over time.
Acquaintances and weak ties are also valuable for information opportunities and social fabric.
Loneliness is a growing public health crisis affecting people across all age groups.
Digital connection supplements but does not replace the depth of in-person relationships.
Shared experience is one of the fastest builders of trust and closeness.
Regular contact even brief maintains the sense of presence in a relationship.
Celebrating others' successes generously is a quality that strengthens lasting friendships.
Jealousy in friendship often signals an unmet need worth examining honestly.
A friend who tells you the truth kindly is more valuable than one who only affirms you.
Relationships require repair after conflict and the willingness to repair is what sustains them.
An apology is only meaningful when accompanied by changed behavior over time.
Boundaries in friendship clarify what you can genuinely offer without resentment.
Reciprocity matters in relationships and persistent imbalance is worth addressing.
Showing up consistently during difficult times is what defines a lasting friendship.
Listening without trying to fix is often the most supportive thing you can do.
Presence and attention are among the most precious gifts one person can give another.
Different friends serve different needs and a diverse social network is valuable.
Long-distance friendships require more intentional effort but can remain very close.
Shared humor is a particularly powerful bonding force in close relationships.
Nostalgia for shared memories keeps long friendships vivid even across distance.
Making new friends as an adult requires intentionality and repetition in shared context.
Joining groups organized around shared interests is one of the most effective ways to meet people.
Vulnerability in initiating connection is uncomfortable but necessary for depth.
Being interested in others is more attractive than being interesting.
Remembering details about people's lives shows that you listened and that they matter.
Following up on things people shared shows genuine care and investment.
Friendship is not a static achievement but a living practice that must be maintained.
The quality of our relationships is one of the most important determinants of a fulfilling life.
Investing in friendships returns more lasting value than almost any other use of time.
Philosophy of science examines what science is how it works and what it achieves.
Karl Popper argued that scientific claims must be falsifiable to be genuinely scientific.
Thomas Kuhn described science as progressing through paradigm shifts rather than steady accumulation.
A paradigm is a framework of assumptions methods and values shared by a scientific community.
Anomalies accumulate until a crisis leads to a revolutionary new paradigm replacing the old one.
Lakatos argued that science proceeds through competing research programs with protective belts.
Paul Feyerabend controversially argued that science has no special method and anything goes.
Reductionism holds that complex phenomena can be explained by breaking them into simpler parts.
Emergentism holds that complex systems have properties not present in or reducible to their parts.
Consciousness may be an emergent property of complex brain activity.
Complexity science studies systems that are more than the sum of their parts.
Complex adaptive systems learn and evolve in response to their environment.
Chaos theory studies systems sensitive to initial conditions where small changes cascade.
The butterfly effect describes how tiny causes can have enormous consequences in chaotic systems.
Self-organization occurs when order emerges spontaneously without central direction.
Network science studies the structure and dynamics of connected systems.
Scale-free networks have a few highly connected hubs and many weakly connected nodes.
The internet and social networks are examples of scale-free networks.
Game theory studies strategic interactions between rational agents.
A Nash equilibrium is a situation where no player can benefit by changing strategy unilaterally.
The prisoner's dilemma illustrates how rational individual choices can lead to collective harm.
Cooperation can emerge in repeated interactions when players recognize mutual benefit.
Evolutionary game theory applies game theory to biological evolution.
Information theory quantifies how much information can be transmitted reliably.
Claude Shannon founded information theory and defined the bit as the unit of information.
Entropy in information theory measures uncertainty or surprise in a message.
Compression reduces the size of data by removing redundancy while preserving information.
Cybernetics studies communication and control in animals machines and organizations.
Feedback loops allow systems to self-regulate by comparing output to a target.
Systems that share fundamental principles across biology economics and technology reveal deep order.
Memory is reconstructive not reproductive meaning we rebuild memories each time we recall them.
Memories can be altered by later experiences emotions and the act of recalling them.
Eyewitness testimony is surprisingly unreliable due to the reconstructive nature of memory.
Episodic memory stores personal experiences with their context of time and place.
Semantic memory stores facts and general knowledge without personal context.
Procedural memory stores how to perform skills and is very resistant to forgetting.
Working memory holds information actively in mind for use in the current moment.
The capacity of working memory is limited to roughly four chunks of information.
Encoding is the process of getting information into memory.
Elaborative encoding links new information to existing knowledge for deeper retention.
Retrieval cues are stimuli that trigger access to stored memories.
Context-dependent memory is stronger when recall conditions match encoding conditions.
Spacing out study sessions over time dramatically improves long-term retention.
The testing effect shows that retrieving information strengthens memory more than re-reading.
Sleep consolidates memories by replaying and strengthening neural connections.
Emotional experiences are remembered more vividly due to amygdala involvement.
Trauma can create intrusive memories or paradoxically suppress recall of events.
Childhood amnesia means most people cannot remember events before age three.
Mnemonics are memory techniques that use association visualization and structure.
The method of loci places information in imagined locations along a familiar route.
Spaced repetition schedules review of material just before it would be forgotten.
Flashcards exploit active recall and are more effective than passive re-reading.
Interleaving different topics during study improves transfer and long-term retention.
Teaching what you have learned forces deep processing and reveals gaps in understanding.
Summarizing in your own words is far more effective than copying out notes.
Physical exercise increases blood flow to the brain and supports memory formation.
Chronic stress impairs hippocampal function and damages memory over time.
Adequate sleep the night before learning improves the brain's capacity to encode new information.
Nutrition especially omega-3 fatty acids and antioxidants supports cognitive function.
A curious engaged mind that continues learning builds cognitive reserve that protects against decline.
"""
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# 👆 EDIT THE CORPUS TEXT ABOVE! Add or change anything! 👆
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════

class MLLM:
    def __init__(self, context_window=50):
        self.corpus = ""
        self.tokens = []
        self.context_window = context_window
        self.vocabulary = set()
        self.ngram_models = {}  # {n: {ngram_tuple: {next_word: count}}}
        self.token_freq = Counter()
        self.trained = False
        self.context_history = []
        self.vocabulary_size = 0
        self.entropy = 0
        self.perplexity = 0
        
    def tokenize(self, text):
        """Smart tokenization with punctuation and words"""
        text = text.lower()
        # Split on whitespace and punctuation
        tokens = re.findall(r'\b\w+\b|[.!?,;:\'"()]', text)
        return [t for t in tokens if t.strip()]
    
    def train(self, corpus):
        """Train the model with multiple n-grams (1-20)"""
        print("🚀 Training MLLM...")
        self.corpus = corpus
        self.tokens = self.tokenize(corpus)
        self.vocabulary = set(self.tokens)
        self.vocabulary_size = len(self.vocabulary)
        self.token_freq = Counter(self.tokens)
        
        # Build n-gram models from 1 to 20
        for n in range(1, 21):
            print(f"  Building {n}-gram model...", end=" ")
            self.ngram_models[n] = self._build_ngram_model(n)
            print(f"✓ ({len(self.ngram_models[n])} unique {n}-grams)")
        
        # Calculate entropy and perplexity
        self._calculate_metrics()
        
        self.trained = True
        print(f"\n✅ Model trained successfully!")
        print(f"   📊 Vocabulary size: {self.vocabulary_size}")
        print(f"   📈 Entropy: {self.entropy:.3f}")
        print(f"   📉 Perplexity: {self.perplexity:.3f}")
        print(f"   💾 Total tokens: {len(self.tokens)}")
        
    def _build_ngram_model(self, n):
        """Build n-gram frequency model"""
        ngram_dict = defaultdict(lambda: defaultdict(int))
        
        for i in range(len(self.tokens) - n):
            ngram = tuple(self.tokens[i:i+n])
            next_token = self.tokens[i+n]
            ngram_dict[ngram][next_token] += 1
        
        return dict(ngram_dict)
    
    def _calculate_metrics(self):
        """Calculate entropy and perplexity"""
        total_prob = 0
        count = 0
        
        for token in self.tokens:
            freq = self.token_freq[token]
            prob = freq / len(self.tokens)
            if prob > 0:
                total_prob += -math.log2(prob)
                count += 1
        
        self.entropy = total_prob / count if count > 0 else 0
        self.perplexity = 2 ** self.entropy
    
    def _get_ngram_prediction(self, context_tokens, n):
        """Get prediction from specific n-gram model"""
        if n > len(context_tokens):
            return None
        
        ngram = tuple(context_tokens[-n:])
        
        if ngram in self.ngram_models[n]:
            predictions = self.ngram_models[n][ngram]
            return predictions
        
        return None
    
    def _weighted_random_choice(self, predictions, temperature=0.7):
        """Choose word based on frequency with temperature scaling"""
        if not predictions:
            return random.choice(list(self.vocabulary))
        
        words = list(predictions.keys())
        counts = list(predictions.values())
        
        # Apply temperature scaling
        total = sum(counts)
        probs = [c / total for c in counts]
        probs = [p ** (1/temperature) for p in probs]
        total = sum(probs)
        probs = [p / total for p in probs]
        
        # Custom weighted random choice (compatible with older Python)
        rand = random.random()
        cumulative = 0
        for word, prob in zip(words, probs):
            cumulative += prob
            if rand <= cumulative:
                return word
        return words[-1]  # Fallback
    
    def predict_next_word(self, context):
        """Intelligent prediction using multiple n-grams"""
        context_tokens = self.tokenize(context)
        
        # Try from largest n-gram down to smallest
        for n in range(min(20, len(context_tokens)), 0, -1):
            predictions = self._get_ngram_prediction(context_tokens, n)
            if predictions:
                return self._weighted_random_choice(predictions, temperature=0.8)
        
        # Fallback to most frequent words
        return self.token_freq.most_common(1)[0][0]
    
    def generate_response(self, user_input, max_length=25):
        """Generate intelligent response"""
        if not self.trained:
            return "❌ Model not trained yet! Please train with corpus first."
        
        response = user_input + " "
        response_tokens = self.tokenize(response)
        
        for _ in range(max_length):
            next_word = self.predict_next_word(" ".join(response_tokens))
            
            if next_word in ['.', '!', '?']:
                response_tokens.append(next_word)
                break
            
            response_tokens.append(next_word)
        
        response = " ".join(response_tokens)
        return response.replace(" .", ".").replace(" !", "!").replace(" ?", "?")
    
    def add_to_context(self, text):
        """Add text to context window"""
        tokens = self.tokenize(text)
        self.context_history.extend(tokens)
        
        if len(self.context_history) > self.context_window:
            self.context_history = self.context_history[-self.context_window:]
    
    def get_context_display(self):
        """Display current context window"""
        return " ".join(self.context_history[-self.context_window:])
    
    def get_stats(self):
        """Return model statistics"""
        return {
            "trained": self.trained,
            "vocabulary_size": self.vocabulary_size,
            "total_tokens": len(self.tokens),
            "entropy": round(self.entropy, 3),
            "perplexity": round(self.perplexity, 3),
            "ngram_count": len(self.ngram_models),
            "context_window": self.context_window,
            "corpus_chars": len(self.corpus)
        }
    
    def analyze_corpus(self):
        """Analyze corpus statistics"""
        words = [t for t in self.tokens if re.match(r'\w+', t)]
        sentences = self.corpus.count('.') + self.corpus.count('!') + self.corpus.count('?')
        
        stats = {
            "characters": len(self.corpus),
            "tokens": len(self.tokens),
            "words": len(words),
            "sentences": max(1, sentences),
            "unique_tokens": len(self.vocabulary),
            "avg_token_length": round(sum(len(t) for t in self.tokens) / len(self.tokens), 2),
            "top_10_words": self.token_freq.most_common(10)
        }
        return stats

def print_header():
    """Print fancy header"""
    print("\n" + "="*60)
    print("  🧠 MLLM - Micro Language Model (Advanced)")
    print("  Multiple N-Grams (1-20), 50 Context Window")
    print("  ✨ Very Smart for its size- great for a lightweight autocorrect.")
    print("="*60 + "\n")

def print_menu():
    """Print main menu"""
    print("\n" + "-"*60)
    print("MAIN MENU:")
    print("  [1] Train Model (uses corpus above)")
    print("  [2] Chat with MLLM")
    print("  [3] Show Model Stats")
    print("  [4] Analyze Corpus")
    print("  [5] Exit")
    print("-"*60)

def main():
    print_header()
    
    model = MLLM(context_window=50)
    
    while True:
        print_menu()
        choice = input("Enter choice (1-5): ").strip()
        
        if choice == '1':
            print("\n📚 TRAINING MODEL")
            print(f"Using {len(CORPUS.split())} words from corpus...")
            model.train(CORPUS)
            print("\n✅ Ready to chat! Type anything in the next menu.")
        
        elif choice == '2':
            if not model.trained:
                print("❌ Please train the model first (Option 1)")
                continue
            
            print("\n💬 CHAT WITH MLLM")
            print("Type 'BACK' to return to main menu")
            print("-"*60)
            
            chat_history = []
            while True:
                user_input = input("\n🧑 You: ").strip()
                
                if user_input.upper() == 'BACK':
                    break
                
                if not user_input:
                    continue
                
                model.add_to_context(user_input)
                response = model.generate_response(user_input)
                
                print(f"🤖 MLLM: {response}")
                print(f"📍 Context Window: {model.get_context_display()[:100]}...")
        
        elif choice == '3':
            if not model.trained:
                print("❌ Model not trained yet!")
                continue
            
            stats = model.get_stats()
            print("\n📊 MODEL STATISTICS")
            print("-"*60)
            print(f"✅ Status: {'Trained' if stats['trained'] else 'Not Trained'}")
            print(f"📈 Vocabulary Size: {stats['vocabulary_size']} unique tokens")
            print(f"💾 Total Tokens: {stats['total_tokens']}")
            print(f"🔢 Entropy: {stats['entropy']} bits")
            print(f"📉 Perplexity: {stats['perplexity']:.2f}")
            print(f"🧩 N-Gram Models: {stats['ngram_count']} (1-20 grams)")
            print(f"🪟 Context Window: {stats['context_window']} tokens")
            print(f"📝 Corpus Size: {stats['corpus_chars']} characters")
            print("-"*60)
        
        elif choice == '4':
            if not model.trained:
                print("❌ Model not trained yet!")
                continue
            
            analysis = model.analyze_corpus()
            print("\n📖 CORPUS ANALYSIS")
            print("-"*60)
            print(f"📝 Characters: {analysis['characters']}")
            print(f"🔤 Tokens: {analysis['tokens']}")
            print(f"📚 Words: {analysis['words']}")
            print(f"📄 Sentences: {analysis['sentences']}")
            print(f"✨ Unique Tokens: {analysis['unique_tokens']}")
            print(f"📏 Avg Token Length: {analysis['avg_token_length']}")
            print(f"\n🔝 Top 10 Most Frequent Words:")
            for i, (word, count) in enumerate(analysis['top_10_words'], 1):
                print(f"   {i}. '{word}' - {count} times")
            print("-"*60)
        
        elif choice == '5':
            print("\n👋 Thanks for using MLLM! Goodbye!\n")
            break
        
        else:
            print("❌ Invalid choice! Please enter 1-5")

if __name__ == "__main__":
    main()

